
<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66194 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  12 May 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Attitudes of Youth Towards Careers Surveyed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Attitudes of Youth Towards Careers Surveyed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0329A Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO in Chinese 1 Mar p 7 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0329A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Dai Yumin (2071 5940 3046): "What Careers Youth </F>
Are Keen On"] 
  [Text] The China Youth Research Center in 
cooperation with the Heilongjiang Youth Research Center, the 
Liaoning Youth Research Center, and the Beijing Youth Research 
Center, conducted a survey from October 1992 to December 1993 on 
the employment situation for seven provinces and cities, in all 
issuing 5600 questionnaires, and received 4760 responses. An 
analysis of the survey results is presented below. 
  1. The overlapping nature and lack of choice in the career 
aspirations of youth. 
  In the course of investigating the satisfaction of youth 
towards their own current occupations, the survey answer 
"satisfied" constituted 39.4 percent, "not too satisfied" has 
43.2 percent, "very satisfied" and "very dissatisfied" were 7.0 
percent and 10.4 percent respectively. The overall percentage of 
youth who were not satisfied with their present occupation was 
53.6 percent. 
  Among young workers, the higher the level of education, the 
more numerous the number of those dissatisfied with their 
occupation, while among workers with a high school education, 
the total percentage of those dissatisfied was 53.1 percent, 
while for polytechnic school technicians the figure was 54.1 
percent, and for those with a university or higher education the 
total reached 64.4 percent. 
  2. Youth generally hope to change their occupation but 
movement on this front is sluggish. 
  When the survey asked whether the person was planning to 
change occupations, those expressing a strong desire amounted to 
11.8 percent, those who would move under the right conditions 
were 62.2 percent; these two answers accounted for 74 percent, 
while 13.7 percent had no plans either way, hence only 12.2 
percent said they did not plan to change occupations. 
  Using these percentages to make calculations, is it possible 
to say whether or not China will be facing the problem of having 
millions of youth on the job be on the move? The survey makes 
clear that since reform and opening 70 percent of youth have not 
once yet changed their occupation. When this is put up against 
the numbers hoping to change, an extreme contrast emerges. The 
greatest area is hope of change, and there is only an extremely 
small area of real change, indicating that one outstanding 
phenomenon among currently employed youth is the conceptual 
thinking is leading action and real movement is sluggish. 
  3. High income has become the major criterion in choosing an 
occupation, and the ability to handle risks is generally 
comparatively weak. 
  When asked "if you were allowed freedom to change 
occupation, 
in when direction would you development," 47.7 percent of the 
people chose "high income units," 40.7 percent chose "have a 
change to fully develop individual ability and worth." When 
these two are compared, the trend towards high income answer 
clearly has the advantage, being chosen by close to half the 
respondents; some 10.9 percent of the people chose "superior 
working conditions, big reputation," while only 5 percent of the 
respondents chose "pursue an official career." In addition to 
the economic requirement of high income, the other three items 
directly part of the requirements of society, totalled 52.3 
percent, and it can be seen that today, when high income is 
taken as the guiding thinking on choice of occupation, the 
various social requirements of youth are still powerful and 
prospering. 
  Though at present there is a general concentration on 
economic income, even more people who have for many years 
cultivated old habits still cant bear to part from comfortable, 
stable and secure occupations, and would rather have a small 
income, and also not willing to shoulder the hardships and the 
risks. For example: 50.1 percent chose Party and government 
organs and state-owned enterprises with their stability, 
comfortable working conditions, and very small risk. Clearly, 
the economic income of these two careers will not be very high; 
In addition, some 1/3 of the people those three capital 
enterprises [all foreign capital, partnership of Chinese and 
foreign capital, cooperatively managed], which give 
consideration to both high income and social dignity, and 
provide good material benefits. The individual household and 
private enterprises, which make really big money but also demand 
the shouldering of very difficult work, were chosen by 20 
percent, and other individual households constituted 8.8 percent. 
  On the survey item "what is your greatest worry about 
engaging in an individual business career," 12.3 indicated it 
was fear of losing the iron rice bowl, while "fear of insecurity 
resulting from policy changes" totalled 34 percent. 
  4. Youth occupational mobility, initiative, the goal of 
mobility and the multifaceted directions of this mobility. 
  For persons employed in China's traditional system, in 
addition to having work transfers arranged and carried out by 
higher levels, very few have the initiate to engage in mobility, 
or movement will come as a surprising and major event, and are 
worked out out of absolute necessity, and common aspirations do 
not receive sufficient time and are lightly brushed off without 
transfers being carried out. Since reform and opening, there has 
been a change in the situation in which traditionally one worked 
for decades in a position without change, to a situation of 
mobility with following of an individual's inclinations, and the 
resolutely resolving of the various requirements of the 
individual. In discovering the survey mobility factors, 38 
percent said they wanted to change because income was too low, 
while 15.3 percent said it was because of labor conditions. In 
addition, 5.6 percent wanted to move because of interpersonal 
relations were strained, 8 percent because of they worked too 
far from home, 13 percent did not have a residence, 2 percent 
found their strong points were not being given full play, while 
18 percent said their units were in a slump. 
  5. Youth are counting on a second occupation in seeking to 
get rich, but the number of people participating is gradually 
getting smaller. 
  When asked about the goal of engaging in a second 
occupation, 
31.6 percent of the respondents indicated they did this in order 
to "give full play to untapped ability, enliven the economy, and 
benefit the country and the people"; 48.9 percent of the people 
indicated they did it in order to increase their individual 
income; 20.6 percent of the people said "in order to know and 
understand society"; finally, 4.9 percent did it "to avoid 
falling behind the times." 
  6. Youth have hopes and worries when it comes to reform of 
the employment system. 
  When asked about "confronting the continuous reform of the 
working situation," 32.1 percent of the young people believed 
that "reform was better than no reform," while 24.8 percent felt 
that "it gives people even more excitement," and 27.7 percent of 
the young people demanded "an accelerated pace"; those who felt 
that "they were more and more disheartened" amounted to only 5.2 
percent, while those youth who "were resigned to their fate" 
totalled 12.6 percent. The above described statistics indicate 
that more than 87.6 percent of youth approve of and welcome 
enterprise reform, an overwhelming majority of young people. 
  At the same time, there is also quite a lot of concern: 
  1) Hope that it will be possible to give full play to 
individual ability and potential, worry that some people will 
lose their jobs, were respectively expressed by 64.7 percent and 
29 percent of the youth; 2) Hope that it would be possible 
through elimination of equalitarianism, and the big rice bowl , 
to reward diligence and punish laziness, and worry that things 
wont go as well as with previous loosening. 65.9 percent 
expressed the former, while 6.5 did the latter. Some 23.8 
percent indicated hope that since the big rice bowl had already 
been destroyed, it would also be necessary to address people 
with a human touch. 3) 32.6 percent indicated hope that through 
the factory director (manager) responsibility system it will be 
possible to achieve improved management, and develop production 
targets; 12.9 percent worried that the factory directors 
(managers) hoodwinked the people, had disadvantages and were of 
no benefit; 4) A majority of young people hoped that things such 
as the special economic zones would completely sweep away 
employment limitations; youth in this category totalled 6.6 
percent, while 13.3 percent advocated maintaining the original 
planned employment system. 
  When asked "in the wake of the accelerated reform of the 
employment allocation system, how has your live changed?" 35.9 
percent of the youth felt that "it was getting better and 
better"; 7.5 percent felt that "it was getting harder and 
harder," while another 29 percent felt that "it was the same as 
before, with not much difference" and 28.3 percent felt "unsure 
of the situation." 
  When asked "in an association improving to a state of 
excellence, if you were to be classified as an outsider to the 
group, what attitude would you take," 42.3 percent said that 
they would prepare to "enhance their quality, and struggle to 
early on return to the team"; 32.1 percent of the people would 
decide to "temporarily feel wronged for having perfection 
demanded, while at the same time planning to leave"; 22.7 
percent of the people felt that "it would fit in exactly with 
their wishes, in achieving their own development." Only 4.3 
percent would feel indignation and worry, and wait for a chance 
to retaliate and vent hatred. 
  Towards the phenomenon of unemployment in the society, 34.8 
percent of the youth believed that "this makes employed peopled 
cherish their own employment opportunities even more," 21.4 
percent felt that unemployment would make a person "frequently 
changing work is beneficial to the development of a person's 
individual character"; 19.9 percent believed that "it was 
beneficial to enterprise management and picking out talent"; 
31.0 percent felt that "it was not beneficial to the interests 
of staff and workers, and created instability in the society." 
  7. Rural youth provincialism was being shaken, the rate of 
incidence of leaving the soil is rising. 
  When rural youth were asked to answer the questions "How do 
you think peasants should pass their days?," only 9.7 percent 
maintained "looking after their own house and land," while 20 
percent felt that "farming all one's whole life does not make 
sense, going forth and planning to leave are good"; 43 percent 
of the people agreed that "using the land to produce more cash 
crops" was good; 27.3 percent of the people thought that 
"properly tilling the soil will allow it to produce more of 
those other incomes." 
  In the survey it was discovered that of the current rural 
youth, 21.6 percent basically worked on the outside; 20.9 
percent of the people during the course of a year spent roughly 
half the year on the outside working; 20 percent of the people 
worked outside for roughly 3 months of the year; only 37.6 
percent did not go outside. 
  When asked "if there was an even larger surplus in the labor 
force in your village, under what circumstances would you be 
prepare to leave," 27.6 percent chose "to join a township 
enterprise"; 47.9 percent would plan to "work at a small 
business"; 2.6 percent would be prepared to "go outside the 
village to do odd jobs": 16.7 percent "wanted to go to a city to 
do work": and 5.7 percent did not have any sense of what they 
were prepared to do, and answered "don't know." 
  8. Rural youth employment concepts are changing fast, and 
forms of employment constantly expanding. 
  When asked "in agricultural manual labor, what are you most 
willing to engage in," only 13.7 percent chose "grain 
production," while 43.9 percent chose "various breeding 
activities," 25.6 percent chose doing "nonagricultural planting, 
such as forestry, planting fruit trees, and other case crops, 
etc.; 17.3 percent chose "other." 
  When asked their views on the current phenomenon in rural 
areas of hiring people to come and plant contract land, 67 
percent of the youth believed that they could accept this, and 
that in this manner it would be possible to leave one's work and 
make big money; 16.1 percent felt that they were unable to 
determine whether this was in accord with policy; 6.9 percent 
thought that they could do this type of work, but were afraid 
that it smacked of "exploitation"; 10.3 percent believed that 
this went against the society's socialist orientation. 
  The new style of peasant slack season living also has 
changed 
very much since previous times, and how each time a slack season 
comes, 38.2 percent of the people go out to work in businesses, 
and make money; 39.8 percent of the people study agricultural 
scientific know-how; 12.9 percent "work when they encounter a 
money making activity"; and only 10.1 percent "play mahjongg, 
idle around, and make merry." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66195 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  7 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Accelerated Law-Making Urged To Boost Market Economy </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Accelerated Law-Making Urged To Boost Market Economy </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0425A Beijing ZHONGGUO WUZI BAO in Chinese 7 Mar 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0425A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO WUZI BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article: "Market Economy Rests On Legal Construction"] </F>
  [Text] There can be only one criterion for judging 
all aspects of legal construction: Does it contribute to the 
creation of a market economy and the development of productive 
forces? Does it enhance national strength overall? Will it help 
raise the people's living standard? 
  During the transition from one economic system to 
another, we must replace old rules with new ones promptly. 
Law-making must be the trailblazer and set the pace. Reform is 
simply political reform. We must change the system in accordance 
with the law. Use the law to guide, regulate, control, 
regularize, and ensure during the maturation of the market 
economy and in its operations by taking advantage of the law's 
special characteristics--its uniformity, coerciveness, openness, 
and stability. 
  Even as we accelerate law-making, we must step up 
corresponding judicial work and law enforcement. Use legal means 
to regularize and guide public behavior in the market economy 
and ensure normal activities in all links of the social chain: 
production, circulation, distribution, and consumption, thereby 
ensuring that the market mechanism fulfills its role and 
facilitates the accelerated development and continuation of the 
market economy. 
  In a certain sense, the market economy is a risk 
economy, which makes it even more necessary to strengthen the 
rule of law so as to avoid and manage risk. 
  The invigoration of the economy during the past few years 
has 
been accompanied by real estate wars, stock market wars, cotton 
war, steel war, and petroleum war, to name a few. Everything has 
happened, however bizarre. After Deng Xiaoping toured the south 
and made some speeches there, the economy was further energized 
and picked up additional momentum. Meanwhile, serious problems 
have proliferated in economic life. Examples: 
  A sharp rise in economic disputes. Between 
January and November 1993, the nation's courts tried 2,807,000 
assorted cases. Of this total, cases involving economic disputes 
rose 36.6 percent over the same period a year ago, while cases 
involving the maritime law and commercial law shot up 41.33 
percent. The total contested amount in economic cases brought to 
trial in all China reached 56.2 billion yuan, up 113.39 percent 
compared with the same period a year ago. 
  Proliferation of counterfeit and shoddy products. 
Between January and July 1992 trademark counterfeiting cases 
handled by the nation's procuratorial agencies numbered 1,911 in 
all, an increase of 232.9 percent compared with the 547 cases 
processed in the same period a year ago. Of these 1,911 cases, 
747 were major cases each involving over 10,000 yuan, up 375.8 
percent over the same period a year ago, when 157 similar cases 
were handled. In 1993 consumers' associations across the nation 
processed a total of 341,196 complaints, up 9.43 percent from 
1992, and recovered 204 million yuan in economic losses for 
consumers. Most complaints involved over-priced but poor-quality 
shoes and garments, problems caused by the use of cosmetics, 
injuries and deaths caused by gas water burners, injuries caused 
by beer can bursting, and quality problems pertaining to 
housing, motorcycles, and automobiles. The Beijing consumers' 
association handled 4,773 complaints from consumers in the first 
half of 1993, up 32 percent from the corresponding period in 
1992. On 16 December 1993, the Beijing technology supervision 
bureau tested 138 randomly selected commodities from five stores 
located at Landao Building and others. Of the 138 commodities, 
99, or 71.7 percent, passed the quality test, while 12, or 8.7 
percent, were found to be shoddy in quality. Shoddy products, 
counterfeited goods, and false advertising have been called the 
three leading public hazards in economic life today. 
  Stock market disturbances becoming frequent. There 
was a mad scramble by hundreds of thousands of people in 
Shanghai to purchase shares in early 1992. Similar episodes of 
frenzied share purchasing happened in June in Xiamen and in 
August in Shenzhen, the former involving hundreds of thousands 
of people, the latter close to a million. As a result, social 
order was badly disrupted. On 20 December 1993, the Shanghai 
stock exchange index plummeted 117 points (a precipitous drop of 
13 percent), the worst one-day decline on record. "Black Monday" 
left Shanghai's 5 million shareholders in shock and was a blow 
to social stability. By late 1993, there were already 15 million 
shareholders nation-wide, their ranks growing by more than 
10,000 every day on the average. The total value of shares being 
traded on the Shanghai and Shenzhen stock exchanges reached 250 
billion and 150 billion yuan, respectively. 
  Unbridled land and real estate speculation. The 
number of real estate enterprises in all China, which totalled 
just 3,000 in late 1991, shot up to almost 10,000 in 1992. 
Hainan alone boasted over 2,000 such companies in the first half 
of 1993. As part of its retrenchment effort aimed at cooling the 
economy, the government closed down 500. There were 1,500 
trading management agencies in addition to more than 100 trading 
forums. Some areas vie with one another to build the most 
development zones, which stood at 2,700 by late 1992, a 20-fold 
increase over the 117 in 1991. Between them the 2,700 
development zones take up 15,000 square kilometers of land, thus 
siphoning off into the hands of real estate owners and dealers 
hundreds of billions of yuan worth of return on state land. The 
state has not been fairly compensated. Whopping profits have led 
to a gradual increase in illegal speculative activities 
involving land and houses and created this contradiction. On the 
one hand, real estate speculators are sitting on almost 100 
million square kilometers of housing; on the other hand, the 
public has to grapple with a housing shortage. According to 
figures compiled by the State Statistical Bureau, there is a 
housing inventory of 50 million square kilometers nationwide in 
recent years. Thus a huge amount of farmland was taken up but 
not really utilized; land was allowed to lie idle. Peasants 
driven from farmland are joining the flow of migrants. Some have 
been driven to make trouble. There have even been cases of armed 
fighting. The upshot is a serious social problem. 
  Illegal fund-raising on the rise. Shen Taifu [3088 
1132 4395] of the Great Wall Machinery and Electronics 
High-Technology Company, for instance, swindled 1 billion yuan. 
His notarization organization in Beijing, the Zhongcheng 
Accounting Company, was involved in a false notarization case. 
  Swindling cases involving huge sums of money becoming 
commonplace. The Hengshui County branch of the Agricultural 
Bank was involved in a $10 billion credit card scam. It was also 
guilty of conspiring with a foreign swindler. Given the massive 
amount of money involved--equivalent to one-half of China's 
foreign exchange reserves--this case has disastrous consequences. 
  First, it was tax evasion and cheating. Now people inside 
and 
outside the country conspire to rob the treasury of vast sums in 
export rebates. In 1984 the Chinese government introduced an 
export rebate policy under which several circulation taxes paid 
on goods shipped overseas are returned to the appropriate export 
enterprises. But the policy is frequently exploited by criminals 
to defraud the government of tax rebates. In 1992 151 
enterprises were found to have obtained as much as 749 million 
yuan in tax rebates illegally, while the actual amount should be 
204 million yuan. In 1993 procuratorial agencies uncovered an 
organized ring that had been defrauding the government of tax 
debates. Investigators discovered that 71 state cadres took part 
in the scam and over 40 enterprises issued a total of 3 billion 
yuan worth of bogus invoices to cheat the government. 
Irrationalities in the fiscal system have persuaded some local 
leaders to see tax cheating as a shortcut to solving their 
fiscal problems, shaking off poverty, and achieving wealth. 
  Manufacturing of and trafficking in counterfeit 
currency on the rise. In 1984 a mere dozen cases of 
currency counterfeiting were reported nationwide. The number 
soared to 3,000 in 1991, when counterfeited bills worth 20 
million yuan were recovered, as were 400,000 yuan worth of state 
treasury bonds. Also uncovered were 30 plates for printing fake 
renminbi bills, 4 plates for counterfeiting state treasury 
bonds, and 13 plates for printing U.S. dollar bills. 
  Cases of fake drugs increasing. There were 15,000 
fake drug cases in 1991, up from 13,650 cases in 1990. 
Nationwide, as many as 33,857 enterprises are involved in the 
wholesale of drugs, a 1,500 percent increase over the early 
1980's. Of these drug enterprises, at least 50 percent are 
operating illegally, luring customers by offering hefty sales 
commissions. 
  More and more checkpoints being set up to demand 
payments. In recent years there has been a growing trend 
toward claiming a piece of land along a highway as one's turf 
and collecting payment from everybody who comes by. In Hebei 
Province alone, 26 agencies have set up 1,796 checkpoints along 
the highways and blanketed the area with an army of payment 
collectors. They stop and check every passing vehicle and 
invariably slap the drivers with a fine. Payments are demanded 
and fines imposed as arbitrarily as the checkpoints are set up. 
In 1991 alone, one agency collected 40 million yuan in highway 
fines, according to its receipts. 
  Enterprises may be tottering on the brink of bankruptcy 
but cannot actually go out of business. It has been five 
years since the Bankruptcy Law went into effect, but reform in 
other areas, such as account settlement by banks, assets and 
liabilities appraisal, order of transfer, and the social 
security system, has failed to keep up with it. The absence of a 
bankruptcy mechanism has made it difficult for enterprises to go 
bankrupt. Statistically, about one-quarter of China's state 
enterprises have been losing money for years. More recently, as 
many as one-third are openly in the red. Even if just 1 percent 
of state enterprises are unprofitable, that would be over 300 
companies. Yet fewer than 50 state enterprises actually went 
bankrupt during the entire 5-year period, less than 0.1 percent 
of the number of enterprises in a developed country that go 
bankrupt each year. Thus money-losing enterprises have become a 
bottomless pit that the state has no choice but to cover. 
  Mounting fire-related losses. In 1993 fires 
directly caused almost 900 billion yuan in economic losses, the 
worst since the PRC was founded in terms of the number of fires 
and their concentration. About 1,500 people were killed and the 
magnitude of direct economic losses was four times that 10 years 
ago. The fires occurred because people were so preoccupied with 
the pursuit of profits that they ignored fire safety. 
  All these shocking cases and events have seriously disrupted 
the economic order and resulted in all types of losses. The 
failure to make laws promptly and loopholes in the judicial 
system have combined to deprive the state of rules it can 
otherwise invoke as it goes about fulfilling its regulatory and 
control functions. At a time when the shortcomings of the old 
system have not been eliminated, we are confronted with new 
problems, which prevents the new system from working the way it 
should. 
  Even as we fully endorse the role of the market economy, we 
should realize the drawbacks inherent in it and the weaknesses 
and other undesirable things that may occur or have occurred in 
the market economy. The rise of the market economy has been 
followed by the emergence of market monopolies and local 
protectionism, by a drop in the output of public consumer goods 
and a steady increase in fake products and shoddy goods, illegal 
operations, and scams, by large amounts of public resources 
being wasted or damaged, by worsening environmental pollution 
and ecological degradation, and by widening income gaps among 
households. A string of activities in recent years aimed at 
cracking down on forgers, counterfeiters, smugglers; tax 
inspections; efforts to stop arbitrary fund-raising, 
apportionment, and fine collection; walks for quality and walks 
for the environment; and the anti-pornography drive have been 
highly successful. But organizing and launching short-term 
anti-crime sweeps can only solve a problem temporarily. 
(Sometimes anti-crime sweeps are overdone. We try to cover too 
much ground and crack down too hard.) The criminals re-emerge, 
more ferocious than before, when a campaign has spent its force. 
Result: The more you crack down, you worse the crimes. We have 
been treating the symptoms, not the disease. It takes much more 
than "decontrol," "policies," and eliminating administrative 
management to develop a market economy. What is even more 
important is to nurture sound market economic relations. And the 
only way to do that is to intensify legal construction and 
establish a market order. During the transition from one set of 
economic institutions to another, new rules must be adopted 
swiftly to replace the old ones. Since the old rules no longer 
apply under the new order, new rules must be put in place 
immediately. Otherwise, there will be chaos. 
  Legal construction today still fails to meet the 
requirements 
of the situation and is still not being taken really seriously 
by the various sectors, areas, and leaders at all levels. Deng 
Xiaoping told the 3d Plenum of the 11th CPC Central Committee 
back in 1979 that "we must institutionalize democracy and write 
it into law so that the system and the law will not change 
because of a change in leadership." The acceleration of China's 
modernization requires us to rule the nation in accordance with 
the law and earn the trust of the people and the world. In the 
new era of deepening reform and opening up China even more, we 
must further democracy, strengthen the rule of law, and avoid 
the rule of man. There have been many delays in the promulgation 
of a series of important laws badly needed to regulate and 
manage economic relations. To establish a socialist market 
economy, we must set up a coherent system of legal regulation 
and control. Half-hearted regulation and control will 
inevitably lead to chaos in the market economy, even economic 
life as a whole. To scale new heights, economic 
construction must proceed in tandem with legal construction. The 
two supplement each other and both are indispensable. 
  To meet the urgent need of using the law to promote reform, 
the standing committee of the National People's Congress and the 
ministries involved under the State Council are scrambling to 
formulate economic laws including a securities law, a budget 
law, a labor law, a foreign trade law, a central bank law, a 
commercial bank law, a notes law, an insurance law, and a 
futures trading law, etc. It is hoped that they will be 
introduced in close succession in 1994. 
  In short, a market economy not based on legal 
construction, in other words, a market lacking the rules and 
order of competition, will lead to chaos in the market economy, 
even in all areas of social and economic life. 
  The arduous task of building a socialist market economy not 
only represents a challenge to economists, but also presents a 
challenge and an opportunity to legal experts. The 
traditional theories, concepts, and methods of the academic 
legal community and legal circles have come under heavy attack 
and undergoing fundamental changes. In the end they will achieve 
a great leap forward. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66196 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  8 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   SPC Researchers View Prices for 1993, 1994 </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    SPC Researchers View Prices for 1993, 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0421A Beijing JINGJI YU GUANLI YANJIU [RESEARCH ON 
ECONOMICS AND MANAGEMENT] in Chinese No 1, 8 Feb 94 pp 32-36 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0421A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI YU GUANLI YANJIU [RESEARCH ON 
ECONOMICS AND MANAGEMENT] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Liu Wen (0491 2429) and Zhang Xuhong (1728 2485 </F>
1347) of the Market and Price Control Department under the State 
Planning Commission: "Review and Forecast of Market Price 
Regulation for 1993-1994"] 
  [Text] In 1993, the people throughout the country had 
earnestly implemented the guideline laid down by the 14th 
National CPC Congress and Comrade Xiaoping's instruction of 
"seizing the opportunity to accelerate the development"; and 
quickened their tempo in promoting economic development. The 
national economy continued to grow on the basis of its 1992 
development. At the same time, the various problems which had 
cropped up when the old system was being replaced by the new and 
the economy was rapidly developing also became more outstanding. 
People began to feel the potential pressure from inflation. From 
the second half of 1993, the party central committee and the 
State Council started to rectify the financial order and 
strengthen the macro-control. After several months, the national 
economy has begun to stabilize, and the prices on the market 
have returned to normality to a certain extent. It is expected 
that in 1994, the economic growth rate will drop slightly, but 
it will still register a fairly high rate of growth. There will 
be slightly less investments. However, an adequate amount of 
investments are needed in order to strengthen structural 
readjustment. The scale of price increases will become smaller, 
but the pressure from inflation and commodity prices will remain 
relatively high. Price reform will be carried out within the 
endurance of the different sectors of society. Rational reform 
measures will be announced continuously and at the right time. 
<H5>  I. Situation and Characteristics of China's Market Prices in </H5>
1993 
  From January to September 1993, the total volume of retail 
sales rose 22.4 percent over the same period in 1992. The 
general level of retail prices in the whole country was 
increased by 12.1 percent and residents' living expenses was up 
1.37 percent over the corresponding period in 1992, of which the 
living expenses in 35 large and medium-sized cities rose 18.9 
percent. Examining the situation of market prices in 1993, we 
notice the following characteristics: 
  1. The market of consumer goods was lively and flourishing. 
From January to September, the total volume of retail sales rose 
22.4 percent with an actual growth rate of 9.3 percent if price 
increases were factored in. China's market of consumer goods 
could clearly be divided into two stages: (1) During the first 
half of 1993, China's market of consumer goods registered a 
continuous growth with the rate of growth increasing every 
month. (2) During the second half of 1993, the market slowed 
down, but still witnessed a moderate, steady growth. The signs 
were: (A) Market sales began to decline. The growth rate of the 
volume of retail sales in July was 1.9 percent lower than that 
in June, and that of August was 4.6 percent lower than that of 
June. (B) The phenomenon of shopping spree to preserve the value 
of money once noticed in the first half of the year basically 
disappeared, and the sales of imported and famous brand home 
appliances and jewelry had notably declined. (C) The trend of 
group purchases of consumer goods was curbed. The rate of growth 
in this type of purchase dropped from the average rate of over 
30 percent in the first half of 1993 to approximately 22 percent 
between August and September, which was lower than that of 
average residents. 
  2. The market of producer goods had changed from a 
continuous 
strong market in the first half of the year to a relatively weak 
one. Sharply rising prices had slowly declined. The main signs 
were: (1) The market sales were notably declining. The rate of 
growth of the sales volume dropped from 49.5 percent in the 
first half of 1993 to 27.3 percent in the third quarter. The 
sellers' market was gradually changed to a buyers' market. In 
addition to the influence of the macro-economic control, there 
were two more factors which brought about the market changes in 
terms of supply and demand. (A) A strong macro-control had 
basically eliminated the demand of a speculative nature. (B) A 
large amount of imported producer goods have arrived, and the 
total volume of supplies has increased. (2) The inventory had 
greatly increased, making the continuously dwindling stock level 
to sharply rise. (3) The price of producer goods dropped. The 
growth rate of the general price index for producer goods 
dropped from 52.9 percent in June to 43.2 percent in August. 
  3. The scale of retail price increases had notably expanded 
since the beginning of 1993. People had begun to feel the 
potential pressure of inflation. After the macro-control was 
tightened, the price increases had slowed down. Between January 
and September, the general level of retail prices was 12.1 
percent higher than that in the same period in 1992. Although 
prices continued to rise during the second half of 1993, the 
price increases had slowed down. The reasons for the price 
increases to decline were as follows: (A) Except for the price 
increases in railway freight charges and electric power, there 
were no new projects for price reform during the second half of 
1993. (B) The effects of the several price reform projects on 
grain, coal and freight transportation, which took effect in the 
second half of 1992 gradually disappeared in the second half of 
1993. (C) The fall of the prices for producer goods brought down 
the production costs. 
  If we examined the price increases on various kinds of 
commodities and services, the retail price of consumer goods 
rose 11.8 percent between January and September. From the 
regional point of view, retail prices in urban areas were up 
12.6 percent, while that in rural areas rose 11.8 percent. The 
prices of service items in urban areas rose 31.6 percent and 
those in rural areas were up 25.6 percent. 
  In October 1993, we had predicted the trend of market prices 
in China for the fourth quarter on the basis of the inflationary 
trend and the market prices at that time. We forecast that the 
general price level would continue to climb up, but the upward 
trend of prices would level off. The general level of retail 
prices for 1993 would be approximately 13 percent. 
  4. According to the requirements in developing the socialist 
market economy, progress of a breakthrough nature was made in 
changing the mechanism of price formulation. Following the 
promulgation and revision of the list of price control items and 
the decision to decontrol government-fixed prices on a large 
scale in 1992, we had adopted a series of measures to change the 
mechanism of price formulation and made progress of a 
breakthrough nature. The measures were as follows: (1) Except 
for some individual provinces and autonomous regions, we had 
basically decontrol the price for purchasing grain and cooking 
oil on the basis of the principle of "unifying the policies, 
decentralizing policy-making power, giving the proper guidance 
and implementing the measures gradually." (2) State control was 
lifted on the distribution and the price of coal. (3) Price 
control on most of the iron and steel products was lifted. (4) 
The prices of some cement products, telecommunications 
switchboard equipment, heavy-duty trucks for civilian use, fire 
trucks and fire-fighting equipment were decontrolled. (5) Prices 
for products used by railway industry were decontrolled on a 
large scale. (6) Prices were properly appraised for the grain, 
chemical fertilizer, cotton, wood pulp and raw materials for 
detergents which were imported with foreign exchange of the 
central government. (G) Authority for collecting 22 types of 
administrative fees such as the charge for issuing visas to 
foreigners was delegated to the lower level. The administrative 
department in charge of fee collection may determine themselves 
the amount to be collected. 
  At the end of 1992, the share of state-controlled prices was 
only 5.9 percent of the total volume of retail sales, 
approximately 12.5 percent of the total amount of funds used in 
purchasing farm and sideline products and 18.7 percent of the 
total amount of revenues from the sales of producer goods. The 
share of state-set prices was even smaller in 1993, following 
the development of the market economy. In general, market has 
played a main leading role in price formation for both consumer 
and producer goods. 
  5. Emphasis was made in solving the problem of excessive low 
prices for basic industrial products, and great strides were 
made in readjusting the price structure. After the state had 
adjusted the prices of grain, coal, petroleum and transportation 
fees and raised the prices of iron and steel, chemical 
fertilizer, postal and telecommunications services and waterway 
freight charges in 1992, it once again made relatively large 
strides in readjusting the price structure in 1993. (1) In order 
to stimulate the production of petroleum, expand the capacity in 
producing crude oil, economize on the use of petroleum and 
change the situation in China where oil price was relative low, 
30 million tons of "average grade petroleum were processed to 
become high-grade petroleum," and the price of processed oil was 
duly raised in 1993. (2) In order to further raise funds for 
construction and accelerate the development of railway 
transportation, the railway freight charges for one ton of cargo 
was increased by 1.5 fen per km from 3.85 to 5.35 fen in 1993. 
(3) The price of electricity was raised in order to rectify the 
price structure for electricity and do away with the 
unreasonable utility price. (4) The state-controlled price of 
lumber from state-owned forest districts in Northeast China, 
Inner Mongolia, Sichuan and Yunnan was increased. (5) The 
ex-factory prices for copper and zinc products produced within 
the state plan were raised. According to a preliminary estimate, 
The measures adopted by the state in readjusting the prices in 
1993 had directly pushed the general level of commodity prices 
approximately 2.5 percent upward. The successful adoption of 
these aforementioned measures had played a significant role in 
improving China's irrational price structure and developing its 
basic industries. 
  6. The system of exercising the macro-control over market 
price was further improved. Since 1993, our national economy 
registered rapid growth on the basis of the progress made in the 
previous year in the fields of production, construction, 
commodity circulation and consumption. At the same time, some 
new problems and contradictions have also become more 
outstanding. Particularly the excessive issuance of currency on 
the market, the chaotic financial order, the rapidly increasing 
demand for investments and consumption and the "bottleneck" 
effects of infrastructural facilities and basic industries had 
caused the market price to increase on a large scale, and 
further aggravated the inflationary trend. Under this situation, 
the party central committee and the State Council took command 
of the entire economic situation, and followed the guiding 
thought that, "in doing economic work, it is necessary to seize 
the opportunity, accelerate the development and pay attention to 
adopting reliable measures while avoiding losses, particularly 
great losses." They decided to adopt a series of measures to 
improve and strengthen the macro-control by deepening reform and 
perfecting the market system. They used economic, legal and 
necessary administrative means to effectively control the 
economy. After a certain period of time, they had attained 
preliminary results in exercising the macro-control. The main 
signs were as follows: (A) The practice of illegal interbank 
short-term loans was curbed. (B) Various kinds of illegal 
fund-raising activities were preliminarily controlled. Saving 
deposits increased on a large scale, and the excessive issuance 
of currency was checked. (C) The exchange rate of the RENMINBI 
had become reasonable. (D) The price of producer goods declined 
to a certain extent, while the price of real estate dropped by a 
large margin. (E) The residents were less worried about the 
inflationary trend. 
<H5>  II. Forecast of Trend of Market Price Regulation in 1994 </H5>
  After going through the two years of high-speed growth, 
China's economy had undergone tremendous changes in its 
macro-economic environment. The role of its market mechanism is 
gradually being bolstered. The overall national strength has 
been notably enhanced. Initial results have been attained in 
exercising macro-economic control, and problems in the economic 
life have been solved to a certain extent. The national economy 
is developing healthily, and favorable conditions are being 
created for the development of the reform and opening program in 
an overall manner. The 1990s are the crucial stage for 
developing China's socialist modernization. China is faced with 
an opportunity rarely seen in history. In face of the new 
situation and task, we must not hesitate to promote the reform 
and opening program. We must quicken our tempo in building the 
socialist market economic system and develop our economy 
continuously, rapidly and healthily in 1994. For this, we must 
still maintain a relatively high growth rate in developing our 
national economy in 1994. According to a forecast made by a 
relevant expert, the growth rate of GNP will be over 10 percent, 
that of investments in fixed assets and that of retail sales 
will exceed 20 percent. Reform will be actively carried out in 
the fields of fiscal levy, finance, pricing, investment, foreign 
trade and enterprise system in 1994. All these will have a great 
impact on the market price in 1994. Meantime, we should not 
ignore the effect of the excessive currency issued in 1993 and 
forget the inertia of the sharp price increases in 1993. If we 
carefully examine the current environment which will affect the 
1994 market price, we will come to realize that there are 
factors which are conducive to stabilizing the market price, 
while there are also factors which will push the market price 
upward. 
  Factors that are conducive to stabilizing the price are as 
follows: 
  1. The financial order had improved, and the financial 
situation became stabilized. (A) Indiscriminate short-term 
interbank loans, arbitrary fund-raising activities and the 
random establishment of financial institutions were basically 
stopped. (B) Residents' savings deposits rose every month. As of 
the end of September in 1993, the amount of savings deposits had 
reached 1.3867 trillion yuan, an increase of 232.2 billion yuan 
as compared with that at the end of 1992. (C) The trend of 
excessive bank financing was curbed, and the supply of currency 
notably slowed down. (D) The specialized banks' capability to 
make payments was improved. As of the end of September, the rate 
of reserve for the deposits of the specialized banks had reached 
the normal rate of 7.2 percent. 
  2. The order in fiscal levy improved, and initial results 
were attained in further increasing revenue and reducing 
expenditures. The order in fiscal levy had notably improved, and 
the situation whereby the economy during the first half of the 
year was rapidly growing while the state revenue declined was 
initially solved by stopping irrational tax remission and 
reduction practices and dealing severe blows at various 
activities of tax evasion. At the same time, the rapid rise in 
state expenditure was controlled to a certain extent. 
  3. The order in the producer goods market, the stock market, 
the futures market, the foreign exchange market, the real estate 
market and the development zones also improved. The announcement 
of measures to exercise macro-economic control such as 
regulating the money market and cleaning up the real estate 
market and the development zones had notably curbed the 
activities of a speculative nature and the effects of the 
"bubble economy." The signs were: (1) the speculative activities 
on the producer goods market had notably weakened, the supply of 
producer goods became more abundant and their prices dropped. 
(2) Some of the development zones which failed to meet the 
specified requirements were abolished, and measures to 
continuously clean them up were being carried out. (3) There 
were less investments in developing commercial housing projects. 
The prices of real estate in the coastal areas dropped by 
approximately 20 percent. (4) The stock market and the futures 
market gradually became stabilized. (5) The exchange rate of 
U.S. dollars to the RENMINBI on the foreign currency swap market 
was stabilized around US$1 to 8.8 yuan. 
  4. Some factors which affected the market price were 
changing.(A) The prices of grain, fuel for civilian use and 
building materials which greatly affected the general level of 
retail prices were basically decontrolled in recent years. Their 
effect will become less outstanding on the market price in 1994. 
(B) The prices of many types of producer goods were close to or 
exceeded the average prices on the international market. Their 
prices are expected to stabilize and remain at a higher level. 
(C) The residents' psychology on spending became more matured. 
There were more rational purchasing than panic buying. Consumer 
goods were often purchased in a planned manner. (D) Notable 
changes took place in income distribution. More money was set 
aside for savings, housing and purchasing stocks and bonds, 
while spending on consumer goods was often postponed. 
  5. The rapid growth in national economy increased the 
effective supply of the market, and provided a solid material 
foundation for the society to maintain a basic balance between 
supply and demand. 
  6. All kinds of reform programs were being developed to 
gradually and basically solve problems left over by the old 
system, and ease off the potential inflationary pressure. 
  The factors which caused the prices to rise were as follows: 
  1. The total demand in society remained strong. From the 
point of view of investment demand, the growth of investment in 
fixed assets was somewhat weakened during the second half of 
1993, but it was far from being ideal. It was still notably 
higher than the normal amount. This was harmful to maintaining 
stable and healthy development of the economy and stabilizing 
the market. From the point of view of consumer demand, the 
incomes of urban and rural residents continued to increase on a 
large scale. Between January and September, the incomes of urban 
residents used as living expenses grew 29 percent. The actual 
rate of growth was 12 percent if price increases were factored 
in. The cash net incomes of rural residents rose 17 percent. The 
actual rate of growth was about 5 percent, if price increases 
were factored in. The consumer demand during the fourth quarter 
remained relatively high. All these would create a fairly strong 
pulling effect on the market price in 1994. 
  2. As seen from the financial and monetary situation, the 
new 
loans extended by the banks and the net money supply in 1993 
greatly exceeded the targets of the state plan formulated at the 
beginning of the year. There was just too much currency on the 
market, which might bring out inflation at any time. Our past 
experience proved that excessive money supply in a certain year 
will affect not only the inflation rate of the same year, but 
also that in the next year. In forecasting the 1994 inflation, 
we must not only examine the plan for the supply of money in 
1994, but also how much extra currency was put on the market 
beyond the state plan in 1993. 
  3. The financial situation brooks no optimism. Although the 
present financial situation has improved somewhat, state revenue 
is still relatively difficult. 
  4. The sharp price increases for energy and raw materials 
and 
the high costs of capital, foreign exchange and labor in the 
past two years have pushed up production costs, which in turn 
pushed up prices. Enterprises paid more than 30 percent for 
energy and raw materials they used in 1993 as compared with 
1992. The cost of money rose 10 percent, while that of foreign 
exchange by over 20 percent. All these factors will inevitably 
push up production costs, and jack up the price. Due to the fact 
that the pressure of cost-push price rises is of a rigid nature, 
this pressure will not become lower in 1994. Nor will it 
decrease because of the macro-economic control. 
  5. While the economic growth was holding up, the market 
prices remained high because of the after-effect of the 
excessive currency on the market. 
  6. The situation in agriculture also brooks no optimism. 
Although the party central committee and the State Council 
attached great importance to agriculture, adopted many specific 
measures and policies to protect agricultural production, and 
attained some remarkable results in 1993, some factors which 
made agricultural production unstable still existed. These 
factors were as follows: (A) The acreage of farmland planted 
with grain, cotton and sugar-bearing crops declined. According 
to statistics, the total area planted with all kinds of crops in 
the whole country during 1993 was 1.28 million hectares or 0.9 
percent less than that in 1992. (B) Investment in agriculture 
was awfully insufficient. (C) The growth rate of peasants' 
income remained low, and the gap between incomes of urban 
residents and those of peasants continued to widen. Whether 
agricultural production is stable or not and whether the supply 
of farm products is abundant or not would affect the market 
price. The situation in agriculture during 1993 will definitely 
affect the prices on the market in 1994. 
  From an overall point of view, both positive and negative 
factors which will affect this year's market prices objectively 
exist. Will this year's market remain healthy? The key lies in 
whether we can exercise our macro-control appropriately. So long 
as we unify our thinking, face squarely at the existing problems 
at present, carry out our work in all fields ahead of schedule, 
we will be able to run our market healthily and head off serious 
inflation. 
<H5>  III. Choices of Macro-Economic Control Policies for 1994 </H5>
Market Price Regulation 
  From the point of view of macro-economic policies, there are 
mainly three choices for 1994 market price regulation as follows: 
  The first one is to adopt a overall deflationary 
macro-economic policy similar to the ones in 1988 and 1989. The 
advantage of this kind of policy is that it would quickly lower 
the excessively high commodity prices, but the disadvantage is 
that it would seriously hamper the normal economic growth. 
Meantime, it would make the market weak for a considerably 
longer period. 
  The second one is to purely seek a high economic growth rate 
for a short period, and adopt a laissez-faire attitude to market 
price. At the end, it may bring about serious inflation. Finally 
measures must be taken to lower the rate of economic growth. 
This kind of economic fluctuations with drastic ups and downs 
will not only undermine the national economy, but also affect 
social stability. 
  The third one is to adopt the "soft landing" macro-economic 
policy. That is to continuously strengthen and improve the 
macro-control over the national economy, and gradually lower the 
excessively high prices while maintaining a sustained, rapid and 
healthy economic development. 
  We believe that the third choice is desirable, because the 
1990s are the crucial years for the development of China's 
modernization program, and it is necessary to maintain a 
relatively high growth rate in developing the national economy. 
  From the macro-economic policy point of view, we should pay 
attention to the following tasks in order to make sure that we 
have a healthy market in 1994: 
  1. Correctly handle the relation between the economic 
development, the reform program and price stabilization. It is 
necessary to exercise the macro-control appropriately and head 
off serious inflation, while maintaining a sustained and rapid 
development of the national economy. We should strive to control 
the rate of economic growth and the general index of price 
increases to approximately 10 percent, and pay attention to the 
following two cordons. The first one is that the growth rate of 
urban and rural residents' regular incomes should not be lower 
than the rate of price increases. The second one is to help 
residents prevent their savings from losing their value. The 
interest rate of their deposits must be higher than the rate of 
inflation. At the same time, it is essential to implement the 
price reform policy of combining relaxed control with 
readjustment and making steady advance; and do away with the 
practice of eagerly seeking quick results and scoring 
achievements with a single stroke. 
  2. The key to strengthening and improving macro-control lies 
in deepening reform. In the course of deepening reform, 
particular attention must be paid to making comprehensive use of 
finance, credit, interest rate, commodity price, taxation, wage 
and exchange rate as economic levers and to linking short-term 
readjustments with long-range reform measures. Meanwhile, 
efforts must be made to bring into full play the role of the 
State Planning Commission in working out overall plans. 
  3. Adopt positive measures, strengthen macro-control over 
investment in fixed assets and enthusiastically optimize the 
investment structure. (1) It is necessary to resolutely stop 
those projects which do not conform with the state industrial 
policy or those with unreliable or improper source of funds, 
those with neither prerequisites for construction nor definite 
future market in order to release some funds for the support of 
major construction projects. (2) It is essential to place the 
newly started projects under strict control. (3) Efforts must be 
made to resolutely strengthen the macro-control over the real 
estate business and the development zones. (4) It is necessary 
to further standardize the source of funds which are used in 
self-provided investments, and strengthen supervision and 
control over the use of foreign loans. (5) It is imperative to 
quicken the tempo in reforming the investment system, 
  4. Strengthen the control over the basic money supply from 
the central bank. 
  5. Lose no opportunity in promoting price reform, and 
maintain a sustained, rapid and healthy development of the 
national economy. The guiding ideology for carrying out the 
price reform in 1994 is to carry out the reform program in an 
appropriate manner, and actively and reliably promote the price 
reform while making sure that the general level of market prices 
in 1994 is lower than that in the previous year. The following 
measures should be carried out: (1) Further establish and 
improve the price mechanism with which the price should be 
regulated by the market.(2) Further improve the price system, 
raise the prices of basic industrial products and solve the 
problem of excessively low prices for basic industrial products 
in accordance with the requirements for the development of 
socialist market economy. It is necessary to appropriately and 
timely raise the price of farm products, rationally adjust the 
state-controlled prices of some of the farm products in order to 
create conditions to gradually decontrol the prices of such 
products. In the course of carrying out price reform on farm 
products, particular attention must be paid to protecting the 
interests of the peasants. 
  6. Improve the government system of exercising indirect 
macro-control over the market price. (1) It is necessary to 
gradually establish and improve the price control system at the 
central level and at the provincial, autonomous regional and 
municipal level. (2) It is essential to make comprehensive use 
of the economic, administrative and legal means to strengthen 
the administrative work in decontrolling the price. (3) Efforts 
must be made to establish the system of price regulation funds 
and the system for the storage of important commodities at the 
central and the local levels; and enhance the capability of the 
state in exercising macro-control over the market price. (4) It 
is necessary to further improve the inspection and alert system 
for market price regulation, and provide reliable information 
and data for making policy decisions on price formation and 
regulation. (5) It is essential to improve and work out laws and 
regulations for market price control. 
  7. Earnestly implement the policy and measures formulated by 
the central government on promoting agriculture and strive to 
stabilize agricultural production. As seen from the current 
situation, we should carry out the following tasks well: (1) We 
must firmly implement the various measures to stabilize and 
strengthen agricultural production after the meeting held by the 
party central committee on rural work. (2) We must continue to 
deepen reform in the countryside, regard market development as 
the main task and further improve the market system. We must 
strengthen our guidance in an overall manner, regard the 
protection of agriculture as our central task, and quicken our 
tempo in establishing a mechanism and an administrative system 
for the development of rural economy according to the 
requirements in building socialist market economy. (3) We must 
ensure that the governments at all levels spend more money in 
support of agricultural production. They must meet the urgent 
needs for the development of agriculture even if they have to 
temporarily postpone some of their industrial projects. We must 
appropriately raise the price of farm products in order to 
arouse the enthusiasm of the peasants in developing agricultural 
production. 


</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66197 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpcar030___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  20 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Case Study on Transforming Medium, Small-Sized Enterprises </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Case Study on Transforming Medium, Small-Sized Enterprises </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0427A Sanming ZHONGGUO JINGJI WENTI [CHINA'S ECONOMIC 
PROBLEMS] in Chinese No 1, 20 Jan 94 pp 34-37 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0427A </F>
<F P=104>  Sanming ZHONGGUO JINGJI WENTI [CHINA'S ECONOMIC 
PROBLEMS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Liu Dehua (0491 1795 5478), affiliated with the </F>
Tongling Municipal People's Government in Anhui Province: 
"Reform Practice and Thoughts on the Leased Operation of 
Tongling City's Medium-sized and Small Enterprises"] 
  [Text] Tongling City is one of the eight comprehensive, 
economic-system, related-reform experiments throughout China. 
To run state enterprises well, Tongling has seized "the bull 
by the horns" in enterprise property-rights system-reform, 
focusing on reform of midsize and small state enterprises. As 
part of my work, I have been fortunate enough to participate in 
and learn about this city's reform of medium-sized and small 
enterprises. I am reporting here all that I saw and learned, as 
thoughts on and a case study in converting the operating forces 
of large state enterprises. 
<H8>  I </H8>
  Tongling City, located along the lower Chang Jiang [Yangtze 
River], is one of Anhui Province's subordinate cities that 
produces mostly mineral resources. As it was rich in copper, it 
was named the Tongling "SEZ" in the 1950s, to practice a uniform 
ownership form and a highly centralized planned-management 
model. Since China's urban economic reform, it had carried out 
enterprise reforms, such as streamlining administration and 
devolving authority to lower levels, introducing the contract 
system, and merging superior enterprises with inferior ones. 
While these reforms had all generally had a certain positive 
impact in invigorating enterprises, none of them had touched on 
the property-rights system. While the dominant profit 
mechanisms of a market economy had not yet been established, 
with enterprise operating efficiency still poor, other 
simultaneously-developing enterprise-ownership forms, such as 
the three kinds of foreign trade enterprises, and private and 
household operations, were as dynamic as wildfire. By the end 
of 1992, the city had 356 independently accounted state 
industrial enterprises at the township level and above, of which 
88, or 24.8 percent, were reporting book losses, with this 
percentage reaching 42 percent of enterprises throughout the 
city when including potential and hidden losses. Once the new 
financial system went into effect, the real percentage would be 
even larger, with one-half of these enterprises in particular 
trouble, being nothing but "empty shells." If this continued, 
state enterprises would have had ever-narrowing prospects 
with, in contrast to the private economy, equivalent input not 
bringing commensurate output, and real advantages not being 
brought into full play. So how could these state enterprises 
have played their dominant role? 
  After the 14th CPC Congress, Tongling City investigated and 
analyzed the status quo of its state enterprises, finding that 
the apparent causes of its large-scale enterprise losses were a 
heavy historical burden (debt and [over]staffing), the great 
inertia of the old system, and the independent decisionmaking 
power provided by the regulations on converting enterprise 
[operating] forces not only not implemented, but impossible to 
implement. The substantive problems were that government 
administration had not been separated from business management, 
the conversion of government functions was lagging, and 
responsible government departments were holding enterprises on a 
tight string in areas such as organizational structure, 
investment decisionmaking, labor employment, and personnel 
distribution, making it hard for enterprises to escape their 
subordinate status. On the other hand, enterprises were beset 
with difficulties, so needed government "protection." While they 
might take a half-step outward, they would finally be forced to 
retreat and ask for government help, making it truly a case of 
"while the cord was not yet cut, things remained in chaos." So 
we were forced to ask: While collective land ownership remained 
unchanged, how had the contract system been able to stimulate 
peasant initiaive to develop the agricultural productive forces? 
And in the same economic climate, how had private and so many 
township enterprises grown so prosperous? The crux of the 
matter was the establishment of an ownership form suited to 
productive-forces development, to find an optimum model 
combining the workforce with capital goods. The property-rights 
system was the "intermediary point" of this combination. The 
in-depth connotation of ownership form was that the legal 
ownership rights to socialist state enterprises belonged to the 
state. The rights to the economic benefits of state ownership 
were realized through market-economy subjects--enterprises 
managing their assets. Enterprises, as an aggregate of their 
quantitative employees, represented the state in protecting and 
increasing the value of state assets, while representing their 
employees in ensuring steadily higher incomes. As market 
subjects, enterprises needed to be commodity producers and 
managers independent of government. As our traditional 
state-enterprise, state-run system evolved under a planned 
economy, its historical burden was great. The current need to 
convert enterprise operating forces to become market oriented 
was also inseparable from government help and promotion. 
During the conversion of losing enterprises to shareholding, 
who would subscribe to the shares? If they were offered for 
sale, how many would be able or willing to buy? It was very hard 
for enterprises themslves to acquire such motivation. The issue 
was what and how the government should help. Government 
assistance could only create the "initial promotional factor" 
for market access, merely helping to get started and clear 
obstacles. While it could deliver a part, it could not deliver 
over the long term. This is what produced the idea of leased 
operation of medium-sized and small state enterprises. 
<H8>  II </H8>
  In July 1992, the first leased operation began with the 
municipal silk factory. This plant had been in operation for 
82 years, having over 1,100 employees, fixed assets worth 9.8 
million yuan, and by the end of 1991, accumulated losses of more 
than 13 million yuan, leaving the enterprise in a state of less 
assets than liabilities, and over 90 percent of its employees 
drawing welfare benefits to get by. So in July 1992, the 
municipal party committee and government decided to begin leased 
operation of this factory. In just four months of leased 
operation, efficiency improved and, by year's end, profits and 
taxes had reached 193,700 yuan, with the enterprise beginning to 
revive. 
  By the time the silk-factory experiment had begun to 
succeed, 
the municipal party committee and government had learned an 
important lesson: that in order for its many medium-sized and 
small losing enterprises to escape their plight, the adoption of 
the leasing form, with full corporate authority for management 
and operation, was probably a good way to convert [operating] 
forces and effectively reverse losses. Without changing 
ownership form, this attracted the maximum vital forces of the 
private economy, gradually establishing enterprise operating 
subjects suited to a market economy. In early 1993, the 
municipal party committee and government drew up the pertinent 
provisions and implementation regulations, which began the 
widespread reform throughout the city of leased operation 
targeted at medium-sized and small industrial and commercial 
enterprises. By September, this city had 40 leased-operation 
enterprises (including sub-factories and shops), leasing 51.39 
million yuan of state assets and 19.44 million yuan of 
collective assets, distributed in the 11 industries and systems 
of silk, textiles, nonferrous [metals], industrial chemicals, 
power, machinery, coal, light industry, commerce, supply and 
marketing, and grain, and involving 6,212 employees, of whom 
4,711 were working in leased-operation enterprises, with the 
other 1,501 under the responsibility of the labor sector for 
management, training, and reemployment. While the experimental 
enterprises had been practicing this reform for only a few 
months, they were all beginning to show vigorous and exuberant 
vitality, with a great change in the spirits and appearance of 
lessees and employees, an improvement in enterprise operating 
state, and generally better efficiency. The first 24 
experimental enterprises averaged 30 percent better labor 
productivity, with clearly higher employee incomes and, in 
addition to payments to the state for leasing contracts, 
realized profits and taxes of more than 1.3 million yuan. 
  The basic operating practices of Tongling City's 
leased-operation reform were: 
  -- Evaluation of assets, inventory of resources, and setting 
forth of leasing terms. Based on the operating state of the 
various enterprises, the municipal government leased the assets 
of midsize and small, state and collective, industrial and 
commercial enterprises to individual operation in a compensated 
form. The leases could be of an enterprise's whole assets, or 
of part of them, such as a shop or a production line. Before 
leasing enterprises, the lessors evaluated enterprise assets 
according to pertinent state provisions and market criteria, 
setting forth the leasing terms. Based on the principle of 
protecting and increasing the value of state assets, the leasing 
fee rates were set based on the reference standards of 
prevailing bank interest rates and the fixed-assets profit rate 
for the trade, or the average fixed-assets profit rate for 
interrelated industries, combined with enterprise realities, 
making them more scientific and fair, to avoid the arbitrary 
"one-on-one" negotiations of the contract system. 
  -- Public solicitation, and competitive selection of 
lessees. 
Open solicitation of prospective lessees, through inspection of 
bidders' leasing terms and qualifications, selected the best 
leasing operators. Leasing contracts signed by lessors and 
lessees became valid upon notarization by the notary public 
sector. Leasing terms were generally three-10 years, with 
lessees having to pay lessors leasing fees of 5-10 percent of 
assets, and venture guarantees of 1-10 percent of assets. 
  -- Employee arrangements. Once enterprises began leased 
operations, the former enterprise employee status, cadre 
ranking, grade wages, state-set labor insurance welfare, and 
pertinent wage adjustmnets and subsidies all remained unchanged, 
recorded in employee personnel files, as grounds for determining 
wage grades and transfer and retirement treatment once leasing 
terms expired. Operators had the authority to reorganize former 
employees, signing set-term job contracts. From the day on 
which employees began jobs, operators paid their wages and 
determined their incomes on their own. Pensions of employees 
retiring during leased-operation terms operated according to the 
overall regulations on social old-age insurance, with 
overall insurance payments being the responsibility of 
lessees. Employees leaving or waiting for jobs were paid 
unemployment insurance, with the labor sector helping lessors in 
their management, training, reemployment, and job choice. 
  -- Bonded debt and tax policy. While the former enterprise 
bonded debt was the liability in principle of the lessors, it 
could also be entrusted to the lessees. New bonded debt 
incurred during the leasing term was the liability of the 
lessees. Once enterprises became privately run, their tax 
system, rates, and burdens, and all other rates, were dealt with 
as private enterprises. All collected leasing-fee, 
depreciation-charge, and legal tax-exemption income was used to 
pay debts, or treated as reproduction-development income. 
  -- Profit distribution. Leased-operation enterprise 
distribution was based on the contract principle of "adequate 
payments to both the state and enterprises, with all of the rest 
belonging to operators and employees." 
  -- Financial system. In order to ensure that 
leased-operation 
enterprises had real cost accounting, rational assets liquidity, 
and accurate financial statements, lessors assigned personnel to 
factories. But while these personnel carried out oversight, 
examination, and verification, they did not interfere in any 
enterprise decisionmaking or operating activities, with their 
wages and all remuneration being the responsibility of the 
assigning units. 
  -- Operating rights. As to the 14 operating rights provided 
to enterprises in the regulations, except for assets-disposal 
rights (which needed the consent of the lessors), all others 
were transferred to lessees, as well as given legal protection, 
with no department, unit, or individual allowed to infringe upon 
them. 
  -- Jurisdiction over newly added assets. The jurisdiction 
over newly added assets was set according to the principle of 
the investor being the owner and beneficiary. As to assets 
bought with personal income out of aftertax profits, as well as 
with other self-owned lessee funds, the property rights and 
their disposal belonged to the lessees. 
  -- Party and mass organizations. Party, CYL, and labor union 
organizations in leased enterprises had to be sound. While 
they were elected according to their respective charters, 
whether such organizational personnel were full- or part-time 
was decided by lessees. 
<H8>  III. </H8>
  The reform practice of Tongling City in the leased-operation 
model for medium-size and small industrial and commercial 
enterprises was of farreaching significance in improving 
enterprise operating conditions, raising state-enterprise 
economic efficiency, reversing state-enterprise losses, 
converting enterprise operating forces, promoting and perfecing 
the socialist-public-ownership property rights system, speeding 
up the conversion of government functions, and fostering 
enterprise subjects suited to socialist markets. 
  1. It clarified property rights relations, resolving the 
issue of the lack of ownership-rights status in public 
ownership. Through leasing contracts, the state-assets 
representative, the state, through government or 
government-entrusted lessors, was made the representative agency 
for public assets, exercising ownership rights. These owners 
leased assets in compensated form to individual operation, 
acquiring corresponding ownership benefits, while lessees, upon 
fulfilling leasing promises, enjoyed full leased-assets 
possession, control, and use rights. In order to ensure the 
protection and increase in value of assets, and the operators' 
own interests, lessees managed public assets as if they were 
their private assets. In other words, as to operating form, this 
showed the subjectivization of operating activities. In our 
traditional property rights relations, in which the state was 
both owner and manager, everyone owned assets, while being 
unable to possess them, with all being the enterprise owners, 
but noone being liable for enterprise operating consequences. 
Governments knew only the number of enterprises, but were 
unclear about the amount of assets. So the leased operation and 
inventorying of resources subjectivized the representatives 
and managers of public assets, to overcome the 
enterprise-subject sham. 
  2. It remolded the "four independent" market-access 
subjects. 
Operators not only acquired from contracts widespread operating 
autonomy, but also broke free from the administrative 
subordinate relations between enterprises and government, 
leaving only profit-contract relations tied to property rights. 
Operator job advertisements were not divided by grade. While 
Tongling's 40 leasing operators had been divided into 
office-level, department-level, and ordinary workers and cadres, 
they were now all operating on the same level, facing the same 
markets. As to what, how much, and how they would produce, they 
looked only to markets, not to the government. On the other 
hand, the contracts clearly delimited government behavior, 
clarifying what government should and should not do, and 
converting the relations between government and enterprises from 
the former one of the leaders and the led to one of the servers 
and the served, thus speeding up the conversion of government 
functions. The government assumed liabilities, such as 
pre-leased enterprise bonded debt, and post-leased training and 
reemployment of those who lost or were waiting for jobs, thus 
sending enterprises into the fray with lightened packs. The 
"four independents" of market subjects, independent operations, 
independent liabiliy for profits and losses, and independent 
self-development and -restraint forces, became a geunine 
possibility. The contract system had pluralized enterprise 
targets, often making sweeping assessments of enterprise 
personnel, distribution, hiring, and even employment, education, 
and sanitation, making government behavior more businesslike, 
while leaving enterprises with no autonomy, not having to be 
liable for operating consequences. 
  3. It combined effective growth and restraint forces, 
overcoming the contract system's "shortsighted behavior." With 
enterprise behavior marketized and enterprise operations 
subjectivized, the prime responsibility of operators was to 
preserve and add to the value of managed assets. Tongling City's 
leasing contracts provided that lessees pay 1-10 percent of 
leased assets as venture guarantee funds, 10 percent of leased 
assets as leasing funds, and 10 percent of aftertax profits as 
assets-guaranty funds, as well as setting aside depreciation 
fund per provision. This sharply increased the contractors' 
sense of urgency and pressure, while giving operators 20-50 
percent of aftertax profits as operating returns. This 
genuinely consolidated operators' duties, rights, and interests. 
With rigorous accounting and auditing systems, leased 
enterprises could no longer become "empty shells." Meanwhile, 
sharp market competition and profit-incentive forces generally 
kept lessees from "shortsighted behavior" that divided and ate 
everything up. Tongling City generally set contract terms at 
seven to 10 years. With lessor consent, 80 percent of operators 
upgraded their leased assets, adding related equipment to expand 
production. The earliest experiments, the Jinxing and Jinshan 
silk factories, invested 170,000 yuan and 200,000 yuan 
respectively in new fixed assets, as well as setting aside 
development funds per provision. Employee incomes all 
conscientiously adhered to the distribution principle of being 
lower than both labor productivity and profit growth. 
  4. This perfection and development of leasing was a turning 
point in China's socialist ownership, enterprise structural 
adjustment, and property rights reform. As a market economy is 
a free economy, legal and free operations and assumption of 
liability are features of market-economy subjects--enterprises. 
"Market economy development creates a nonpublic economy, whose 
growth in turn speeds up market-economy growth, giving natural 
ties between the market economy and the non-public economy" (in 
the Seventh NPC work report by the industrial and commercial 
alliance). The ownership structure that evolved under China's 
planned economy, eliminating the level-by-level upgrading of 
individual and private ownership, was very unsuited to the needs 
of a socialist market economy. Meanwhile, as most medium-sized 
and small state enterprise operations are linked to daily lives 
in light industry and textile products, being small in scale, 
diversified in category, widespread in distribution, and subject 
to sharp change, leasing is more suited to these features, which 
is a key mission of China's ownership and enterprise structural 
adjustment. Leasing avoids the erosion of public assets, while 
assimilating the maximum private-economy advantages. Tongling 
City also provided that after leasing, lessees could use 5 
percent of their aftertax income for enterprise shareholding, 
with 20-50 percent of employee afterincome-tax profits converted 
to shares for investment in enterprises. In this way, these 
enterprises will gradually become jointly owned by the state, 
the operators, and individuals, converting to shareholding or 
shareholding-cooperative systems. Based on their conditions, 
the state (government) can then either take out its shares or 
increase its investment, while responsible departments or 
industrial departments can gradually be converted to 
state-assets operating companies, ultimately better suiting 
China's industrial structure, ownership system, and property 
rights system to market economy development needs. 
  While Tongling City's leasing reform of medium-sized and 
small enterprises has just begun, with many issues not yet 
having fully shown up, it is undoubtedly a valuable and bold 
attempt to speed up the conversion of public-enterprise 
operating forces. As to its initial operation, it is still 
subject to certain problems that need solved, such as: 
  -- How to set scientific and fair lease-fund percentages. 
  -- The matter of the inequity between lessee-assumed risk 
and 
state-assets loss risk. 
  -- The fund shortage, with lessees having great difficulties 
resolving working capital shortages on their own. 
  -- The relations of enterprise party, labor union, and CYL 
organizational establishment and activity to private operators. 
  Another problem is that concepts do not convert easily. 
While enterprise losses brought hard times, this was considered 
an unavoidable matter, with no use in placing blame. While 
leased enterprises have turned losses into profits, so that 
times are better, there are invariably hangups and 
misunderstandings about converting public enterprises to the 
lessee's profitmaking mindset, leaving lessees with concern 
about possible disturbances. Losses left an easy conscience, 
while profits cause uneasiness, which is also a conflict. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66198 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  4 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Former Official Comments on Enterprise Reform </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Former Official Comments on Enterprise Reform </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0395A Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 4 Mar 94 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0395A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Special Correspondent Xiao Siru (5135 0934 1172) </F>
and Staff Reporter Liao Guoliang (1394 0748 5328): "Difficulties 
and Countermeasures In the Macroscopic Basic Mix: An Interview 
With Zheng Yuliang"] 
  [Text] Zheng Yuliang was born in 1934 in Shanghai. 
After graduating from China People's University in the History 
Department's undergraduate course in July, 1961, he studied 
Western European economics at Fudan University, Shanghai, and 
for eight years studied Western economics at Fudan University's 
Capitalist Countries Economic Research Institute. In October, 
1985, he was appointed as CP General Secretary in Xuzhou City, 
and in March, 1990, he was appointed Mayor of Shenzhen. In 
October, 1992, he was appointed Deputy Governor of Jiangxi 
Province. He now holds concurrent appointments as Professor at 
Fudan University and the China People's University. 
  Question: In a market economy, self-operated 
enterprises and consumers making consumption choices of their 
own free should be the microscopic foundation of the entire 
market economy. With the cancellation of commodity supply 
licenses and development of a consumption area, consumers' 
sovereign rights are being fulfilled. Therefore, the most 
prominent feature of China's microscopic structural foundation 
is this point of self operation and vitality problems for 
enterprises. What do you think are the difficulties and problems? 
  Zheng: The greatest success of the past more than 
a decade's reform has been the breakthrough in the situation of 
state-owned enterprises dominating the economy, enlivening the 
nonstate-owned economy (especially the privately owned economy) 
encouraging it to survive through market competition and to 
develop. Contrasted to this, the achievements of reform in the 
key area of state-owned enterprises have turned out to be not 
very satisfying. For many years, cities which centered their 
reform efforts on state-owned enterprises tried out many reform 
plans: these range from invigorating self-operational rights, 
implementing multiple pattern responsibility systems, converting 
profits to taxes, reorganizing the external environment for 
industries by making price reform breakthroughs, down to the 
present contracting system and joint stock system experiments. 
Although the production and operations system in state-owned 
enterprises has improved, the problems of sluggishness, low 
efficiency, lack of ability to self-adjust and a slow pace in 
adjusting the mix are still very prominent. 
  The key to integrating the socialist system with the market 
economy lies in finding a way to fulfill state-owned property 
rights under the market economy. And this is also the 
difficulty. In a market economy situation, some enterprises 
become bankrupt, but more enterprises are started and develop. 
becoming the motive power for adjustment of the industrial mix 
and technological progress. The state-owned enterprises we have 
now are hard to match up with this sort of adjustment procedure. 
This is most prominent in the two features of administrative 
restrictions brought on by social restrictions and the twisting 
of government's role because of enterprise adjustment under the 
old pattern of distribution. 
  In the first place, the state-owned enterprises that we have 
built up over several decades are at the same time a society. 
Employment of family members, education of the children, 
housing, providing for the elderly, and cultural life all became 
a part of enterprise management. This is determined once an 
enterprise is formed, it must develop steadily, it is difficult 
to bankrupt and clear accounts. Although we have come a long way 
in invigorating enterprises since implementing reform and 
opening, a tendency to be short of revenue has meant that 
matters which should have been handled by society have continued 
to be left to enterprises. Financial pressures and social 
burdens on enterprises grew constantly, and certainly placed 
obstructions in the path of reform moving on to free 
competition. Therefore, 1) enterprises bear heavy burdens with 
low ability to self-develop, and with old facilities and 
technology. They lack the ability to adjust themselves to suit 
market competition, referred to as being "old, weak, and 
frequently ill." If this fact is not taken into account, it 
will be hard for any kind of measures for converting the 
operational system to work. 2) Employment: since we chiefly 
consider it from the standpoint of social stability, pursuing 
the employment rate becomes our objective, and we often put two 
and even more people in a single job; staff and their family 
members have a relationship with enterprises which cannot be 
severed. 3) State-owned enterprises have very little capital of 
their own: their production and operations are dependent for the 
most part on loans from state-owned banks, and for some 
enterprises which lack sufficient capital to repay their loans, 
banks are their biggest creditors, so that bankruptcy means 
bankruptcy for the bank too. Although the laws governing 
dismissal of staff and enterprise bankruptcy are clearly 
defined, they are very hard to implement. 
  A second point is that it is currently impossible to sever 
the relationship that exists between government and the 
development of enterprises: first, because the government relies 
on enterprises to resolve social problems, so that when losses 
by enterprises harm the staff's social lives, they will 
definitely turn to the government to resolve their difficulties. 
Second, the government still has the right to review and approve 
projects, and can influence bank loans. Three, the government 
holds allocation rights for energy, transportation, and 
important good resources. Fourth is the subjective relationship 
that exists between operators named by the government and 
government at higher and lower levels, a situation where 
organizational reform lags behind the conversion of governmental 
functions. This is a long-standing problem with state-owned 
enterprises, and it has to a considerable degree restricted 
enterprise reform and the pace of converting the operational 
system. 
  Question: In these circumstances, how do we speed 
up converting the operational system in state-owned enterprises? 
  Zheng: The key to speeding up converting the 
operating system of state-owned enterprises lies in fulfilling 
state-owned property rights. The way to do this is to reorganize 
state-owned enterprises into a modern enterprise system. All the 
regulations and laws of market economics are based on clear 
property relationships; strictly speaking, they are all property 
laws and regulations. The separation of ownership rights and 
operating rights should be a separation which is founded on 
clear property rights and under the condition of property 
restriction. The state-owned enterprises should have not only 
the operators' initiative power system, but also a system of 
balances; this is not just to invigorate the enterprises, but 
also to maintain the state's restrictive function as the owners' 
representative. So, it can be implemented on two levels of 
separation: separation between final ownership rights and legal 
person ownership rights; and separation between legal person 
ownership rights and enterprise operational rights. 
  The ultimate owners will become enterprise shareholders, 
owning stocks, and the enterprises will have legal person rights 
as independent legal bodies undertaking civil responsibility. In 
this level of separation, enterprise boards of directors act as 
legal owners responsible for ultimate ownership, having the 
occupational rights to enterprise property, rights of use and 
handling, while the ultimate owners have the right of ultimate 
profit income. The ultimate owners only undertake responsibility 
for debts of enterprises limited by the amount of pledged assets 
in that enterprise; based on the shareholders trust in them, the 
board of directors will have full powers to run enterprise 
property and undertake operational responsibility. This forms 
the property organizational system in modern enterprises. The 
second level of separation of two rights is appropriate 
separation of operating rights and ownership rights. This means 
that the enterprise management is nominated by the board of 
directors, and production, supply and sales, personnel, 
property, and goods are managed in detail by managerial staff, 
and they are responsible for implementing operating policy, 
having enterprise operating rights. The ultimate ownership 
restricts operations and management in enterprises by means of 
the modern enterprise organizational form, letting them endeavor 
to make maximum profits and in the end continue to both the 
state's and the individual's property. 
  In China, enterprises are going in the direction of system 
reform which will establish a new type of enterprise system in 
which the modern joint stock corporation is the substance, 
realizing a separation of property rights under value formation 
and material object formation and unification of socialization 
of property and clarification of enterprises' property rights. 
This direction for reform of the enterprise system in China 
shows that reorganization of joint stock enterprises should 
become a major content of enterprise reform. 
  In reorganizing state-owned enterprises into a modern 
corporate system, the key is to accomplish the separation of 
ownership rights and legal person ownership rights restricted by 
the state-owned property rights responsibility. In corporations, 
the state acts as the stockholder or one of the stockholders, 
entrusting the directors to act as its agent, participating or 
forming the board of directors, while the board of directors 
independently assumes civil responsibility for enterprises' 
property. Having the right of property handling, they can pay 
off debts with their property and make up losses. As the 
ultimate owner, the state assumes only limited responsibility 
for enterprises, which completely removes the enterprises from 
the state's "big iron pot." The state reviews the performance of 
the board of directors and makes decisions on its members' 
appointment and dismissal on the basis of value preservation and 
value added to assets authorized by the state and profits gained 
from the property; the board of directors makes the decisions 
concerning the selection and appointment of managers. A system 
of mutual encouragement and balance among owners, operators, and 
workers will be established inside enterprises. To form an 
association between property rights and responsibilities, 
actually pushing the state-owned enterprises to market will not 
only protect the state-owned property rights, and restrict 
enterprises' short term activities, it will also not directly 
interfere with enterprises, completely implementing their 
self=operating rights. 
  Question: What are the difficulties involved in 
converting the state-owned enterprises in accordance with the 
modern enterprise system? 
  Zheng: Besides having to resolve the social 
restrictions on enterprises, there are many complex problems 
involved with running the enterprise which must be resolved. The 
first of these is, how to form the state-owned assets property 
rights representatives (members of the board of directors)? The 
problem here lies in the operational system which produces 
cadres: can the current personnel system guarantee the selection 
of talent who are not only responsible to the state but also 
good at operations in leadership positions in enterprises? The 
second is, how do we delineate quantity and quality of property 
rights? Meanwhile we must reject nonmanagement factors concerned 
with enterprises' achievements. There is a question here 
concerned with perfecting the information and evaluation system 
and making it fair. The third is, how to establish relationships 
of responsibility, rights and profits between members of the 
board of directors and losses or profits of state property 
rights: by what means do state property rights management 
departments restrict them? These three questions are unavoidable 
for us in the joint stock system trial, and must be resolved 
after thorough study. From this, we can see that reform of the 
state-owned enterprises is actually involved with reform in 
every aspect of the political and economic systems, and relies 
on perfecting the market system. 
  Question: What points should we work on in order 
to speed up converting to the new enterprise system? 
  Zheng: The reform practice of making the state 
ownership system match up with the market economy both overseas 
and in some parts of China has provided us with experience for 
probing into the problem of accomplishing state-owned property 
rights in the market economy. 
  1) Continue to encourage development of the nonstate-owned 
economy (including the nonpublicly owned economy), thereby 
putting the state-owned enterprises increasingly into the 
environment of nonstate-owned economic market competition. The 
leading role of the public economy cannot be judged simply on 
the bases of its proportion and quantity; even more important 
are territory, quality, its status and role in the joint stock 
economy. 
  2) We should first of all do a good job of perfecting 
state-owned asset increments. One, have state projects raise 
capital by floating shares, which means that the state pledges a 
part of its assets and other economic component parts to form 
joint stock enterprises under the management of joint stock 
system regulations; two, manage newly invested production lines, 
workshops, and branch plants of enterprises through the new 
operating system implement a contractual system and hiring 
system for staff and cadres, protecting socialization. Three, 
encourage joint mutual stock among enterprises to build up new 
enterprises or workshops, under joint stock system management. 
  3) On the basis of delineating property rights for large and 
medium scale state-owned enterprises, through the gradual 
distribution of property rights, gradually change over to 
multi-patterned enterprise structures with the state owning 
property rights, the state holding shares, and the state 
participating in stocks. In the present situation where the 
state has a bigger portion of the capital for running 
enterprises, we can go the way of dispersing it into the 
different main parts of property rights profits; for example, 
exchanging some of a creditor's rights for stock equity, 
breaking down the state capital enterprise into joint stock 
enterprises in which shares are held by the central government, 
localities, commercial banks, industrial departments or 
enterprises, with the different profit groups assigned members 
of the board of directors by the amount of shares they have, and 
the enterprises managed by joint stock system regulations. 
  4) As for small scale state-owned enterprises, it would be 
inappropriate to adopt the enterprise system as their property 
organization system. They can adopt such forms as "state 
ownership, run by local people" or sell the state-owned property 
rights, transferring the operating system. Lease the legal 
person ownership to local people (natural persons or operational 
bodies of a joint stock cooperative system) and let them run the 
enterprises. Some small scale state-owned enterprises which are 
unsuitable for state joint stock system management can go the 
way of auction, selling and transferring property rights with a 
charge as one sort of direct and effective means. We should 
realize that auctioning state-owned enterprises is not a 
reduction, and still less a loss, but rather a transformation of 
state-owned assets from material objects to a form of value; 
indeed, it is a kind of structural adjustment, a means of 
perfecting the distribution of assets. 
  5) For basic industries and public utilities which must be 
jointly managed and operated by the state, such as posts and 
telecommunications, railways, water conservancy, etc., and for 
large scale resource industries, the key lies in improving their 
operating model. The state controls management staff by clearly 
defined regulations concerning responsibilities, rights and 
profits, appointing and dismissing managers according to their 
operational performance, while management of internal personnel 
and property must suit the market, to form a competitive 
initiative system. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66199 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  24 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Statistics Bureau Researcher on Further Macroeconomic </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Statistics Bureau Researcher on Further Macroeconomic </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Regulation 

<F P=102>   94CE0367A Beijing GUANLI SHIJIE [MANAGEMENT WORLD] in 
Chinese No 1, 24 Jan 94 pp 54-59 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0367A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUANLI SHIJIE [MANAGEMENT WORLD] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Qiu Xiaohua (6726 2556 5478) of the State </F>
Statistical Bureau; edited by Jiang Dongsheng (5592 2639 3932): 
"The Current State of the Economy and the Next Stage of 
Macroeconomic Regulation and Control Countermeasures"] 
  [Text] As 1993 is history and 1994 is here, a review of 
China's economic operations over the past year leads to the 
general conclusion that our economy is operating on a sustained 
high-speed track, with our 1993 GDP up about 13 percent from 
1992; our macroeconomic regulation and control has begun to 
bring results, with some improvement of the excessive chaos in 
our economic order, and the overall situation developing in a 
positive direction. But existing problems remain glaring, and 
we are still waiting for the arrival of a good economic cycle. 
In the next stage, we will need to pay attention to 
controlling our macroeconomic regulation and control dynamics, 
by continuing to adjust and optimize our economic structure, 
striving for development in the midst of intensified reform, and 
solving existing problems while developing, in an effort to keep 
our national economy developing both quickly and soundly. 
<H5>  I. Our Macroeconomic Regulation and Control Brought </H5>
Positive Results, With Our National Economy Continuing To Grow 
Rapidly 
  In 1993, the Chinese economy went through an operating 
process of sharp change, with our macroeconomic climate 
gradually easing up, and the situation tending to stabilize. 
  At the beginning of 1993, all parties were full of 
enthusiasm 
for seizing opportunities, starting projects, and striving for 
speed, with a great amount of construction going on, and 
accelerated economic growth. In the first quarter, our GDP was 
up 14.1 percent from the same period in 1992, with all 
reproduction links showing strong growth momentum. Meanwhile, 
our macroeconomic climate was showing signs of being too tight, 
with the overall assessment of our prosperity being that we had 
entered a "red-light" zone, our finance, banking, commodities, 
and foreign exchange all showing signs of being out of balance, 
and all parties beginning to worry about whether our economy was 
too booming. 
  By the second quarter, pushed by high investment and a large 
money supply, our economic fever did not subside, forming a 
climate of getting going and going all out, with all of our key 
economic indicators in a skyrocketing state. By June, our 
industrial production growth rate had reached 30.2 percent, with 
our fixed assets investment growth rate at 76.7 percent, our 
retail commodity sales growth rate at 28.4 percent, and our 
money supply growth rate at 54.1 percent, all at peak values for 
the economic cycle, and the overall assessment of our prosperity 
being a continued flashing of the "red light." Meanwhile, 
inflationary pressures began to be released faster, with market 
price rises entering the 10-percent warning zone, and all 
parties beginning to feel that our economic operations had begun 
to deviate from a basically normal track. 
But by the third quarter, the center took a series of steps to 
tighten macroeconomic regulation and control, beginning to 
produce certain results in economic activities, which could be 
seen mainly in the following three areas: 
<H5>  A. Our Economic Disorder Definitely Improved, With Our </H5>
Macroeconomic Climate Gradually Stabilizing, and All 
Investment Components Restrained Somewhat. 
  1. Our financial order improved, with our financial 
situation 
tending to stabilize, which could be seen in a clear rise in 
savings deposits, and in the curbing of arbitrary lending, 
fundraising, and establishment of financial institutions. 
Starting in May, savings deposits grew more each month than in 
the same months in 1992. They grew 20.8 billion yuan in May, 
33.2 billion yuan in June, 40.5 billion yuan in July, 36.2 
billion yuan in August, and 31.1 billion yuan in September. By 
July, overall savings deposits had begun to reverse their state 
that had appeared for a time since the beginning of the year of 
less growth than in the same period in 1992. From June through 
September, they grew 141 billion yuan, 80.3 billion yuan more 
than in the third quarter of 1992, growing again in October and 
November 36.4 billion yuan and 33.6 billion yuan respectively, 
for respective growth higher than in the same months of 1992 of 
20 billion yuan and 19.7 billion yuan. This played a very 
crucial role in changing the conflict of the overall shortage of 
bank fund sources. For the first half, bank loans increased 
slowly, due mainly to the appearance in our economic activities 
of "a plate with no funds," exactly opposite to 1992's "funds 
with no basket." And then in the two months of July and August, 
we had to implement the spirit of recouping loaned funds, so 
that until 15 August, our whole banking system was essentially 
controlling quite tightly the granting of loans. By the end of 
August, our banking system's net loan-fund balance was only 55.2 
billion yuan, which had been 105.9 billion yuan at the beginning 
of the year. But by the end of October, as our overall 
specialized-bank provision-fund-rate had picked back up to over 
10 percent, higher than normal, with banks equipped with the 
possible terms to maintain stable credit-fund growth, our 
financial situation had tended to improve. Meanwhile, on our 
foreign exchange conversion market, the exchange rate of the RMB 
to the U.S. dollar had stabilized at a more rational position of 
8.7:1. 
  2. Our tax-revenue order improved, with progress in 
increasing revenues. On one hand, we had overfulfilled our 
treasury-bill sales, bringing 30.5 billion yuan into the 
treasury by August, with tax revenues clearly up. Our revenues 
for the third quarter were up 27.3 percent from the same period 
in 1992, changing the situation of high economic growth with low 
revenue growth, with our overall revenue growth up from the 
first half's 1.4 percent to 11.4 percent for the first three 
quarters. By the fourth quarter, with the approach of 
tax-sharing reform, state revenue for October and November grew 
at a sustained rate of over 40 percent. State revenues were up 
for the first 11 months 18.3 percent from the same period in 
1992. Of course, in our revenues, certain localities did a 
crash job of storage to expand their revenue bases, resulting in 
some false components. 
  3. Our circulation order began to improve, with capital 
goods prices down but stable, and our overall capital goods 
supply and demand having undergone a great change, in which the 
phenomenon of profiteering and speculating in capital goods was 
clearly restrained, with prices back down. Construction-use 
rolled steel prices are now back down from June's 4,100 yuan a 
ton to 3,050 yuan, and are in a sustained decline. 
  4. Our stock market, futures market, real estate, and 
development zone order improved, beginning to get onto a more 
standardized control track. In our eight coastal provinces, 
autonomous regions, and municipalities, the number of 
development zones was down from 1,200 to only a little over 200, 
with others still being inventoried. Our real estate also 
cooled down, with real estate prices in the coastal zone back 
down about 20 percent, now in a basically stable state. Our 
futures and stock markets grew stably, with our overall economic 
order beginning to improve, and speculation clearly down. 
<H5>  B. Our Economy That Had Been Overheated for a Time Began To </H5>
Cool Down, While Generally Still Maintaining a High Growth Rate. 
  1. Our excessively high industrial growth rate receded 
somewhat. Our industrial growth rate dropped from June's 30.2 
percent to 25.2 percent for July, 23.4 percent for August, only 
19.1 percent for September, and down to 16.4 percent by October. 
Later, as the state eased credit, the enterprise fund-shortage 
conflict improved somewhat, with production growth halting its 
drop to rebound to 18.9 percent by November, for growth of 22.7 
percent for the first 11 months. 
  2. Investment expansion was controlled somewhat. Our 
national investment rate peaked in June at investment growth of 
76.7 percent for state units, then dropping to 71.3 percent for 
July, 58.1 percent for August, and further to 56.5 percent by 
September. 
  New project starts were also definitely controlled, down by 
3,300 for the third quarter. In October and November, 
state-unit investment growth basically stabilized, for an 
average growth rate of about 56 percent, with investment for the 
frst 11 months at 552.7 billion yuan, up 63.9 percent from the 
same period in 1992. Meanwhile, national priority construction 
certainly increased, with sharply increased investment in the 
transportation and post and telecommunications industries in 
particular, where growth for the first 11 months was more than 
double that for the same period in 1992, to top 20 percent of 
overall investment for the first time. 
  3. Markets were brisk but stable. Consumer goods markets 
grew more stable by the month, with consumer purchasing 
intentions changing from the first half's buying of 
basically expensive, high-quality commodities as a hedge 
against inflation to more normal consumption starting in July, 
when the prices of expensive, high-quality commodities clearly 
fell back to stabilize the overall consumer goods market. Our 
retail commodity sales growth rate of 28.4 percent for June and 
26.5 percent for July dropped to 23.8 percent for August and 
further to 21.6 percent by September. And while it was 21.1 
percent in October and 22.9 percent for November, for a certain 
pickup, it was up only 22.3 percent for the first 11 months as 
compared to the same period in 1992 and, when adjusted for 
inflation, the last half's consumer goods purchases were down, 
showing that consumption had cooled somewhat. This was more 
evident in group consumption, where the first half's high growth 
of more than 30 percent dropped back to a little over 20 percent 
for August and September, and further to under 20 percent by 
October and November. In capital goods markets, the sales drop 
was even more obvious, with the first half's capital goods sales 
growth of almost 50 percent back down to 27.3 percent by the 
third quarter, including a sharp drop of 3.6 percent for 
September, with some capital goods changing to oversupply, which 
was more evident particularly in the motor vehicle market. 
  4. Government spending was controlled somewhat, with 
spending 
growth for the first half at 12.5 percent, but only 1.3 percent 
for July through September, bringing the growth down to 7.3 
percent for the first three quarters, for a definite change in 
the high growth of spending. But in October and November, 
stimulated by tax-sharing reform and affected by the peak 
spending period, spending grew at a sustained high rate of over 
30 percent, bringing growth for the first 11 months to 13.9 
percent. 
  5. Our money supply growth rate was clearly down. As to the 
available M[.sub]1[/] that reflects the money supply (in the 
narrow sense), the M[.sub]1[/] growth rate was basically 
normal for July, at 19.7 percent for August, 20.4 percent for 
September, and also basically stable at about 20 percent for 
October and November. This shows that potential inflationary 
pressures had begun to weaken. For the third quarter, 19.2 
billion yuan less currency was put into circulation than in the 
same period in 1992 and, while this figure rose somewhat in 
October and November over the previous months, it was still 
lower than for the same period in 1992. This monetary state 
shows that the fastest results achieved in this macroeconomic 
regulation and control were a clear control of overall monetary 
demand, the response to which in economic activities will show 
up gradually. 
  As our economy cooled down, the tight relations between 
supply and demand began to improve with the gap down nearly four 
points from the first half. Our macroeconomic-monitoring 
index-system shows that our overall economic operations have 
dropped back from the middle and upper limits of the "red-light" 
zone to the upper limit of the "yellow-light" zone. 
<H5>  C. Our Reform and Opening Intensified Steadily. </H5>
  1. A high tide of reform was surging, with macroeconomic 
reform plans about to go into effect throughout China, overall 
national market reforms making clear progress, and the 
enterprise mechanism-conversion having begun. Our 
market-regulation role is now growing sharply, with 
regulation-establishment in intense progress. 
  2. Our opening to the outside world was vigorous but stable. 
(a) We spent more foreign investment. For the first four to 
five months, foreign investment in China was brisker, with our 
signed foreign-investment agreement amounts and actual spending 
of foreign investment both essentially doubling and redoubling. 
In the first 10 months, we actually spent over $17 billion in 
foreign investment. (b) Our foreign trade grew steadily, 
grossing $164.2 billion for the first 11 months, up 16.5 percent 
from the same period in 1992 which, in light of the overall 
international situation, was not bad. (c) Our international 
tourism maintained its good momentum, with the numbers of 
visitors to China and foreign exchange earnings both growing 
faster. 
<H5>  II. The Problems Facing Us Remained Quite Glaring, Which </H5>
Could Be Seen in Three Areas: 
  A. Market Prices Rose Sharply, Making 1993 the Third Year 
Since Reform in Which They Rose More Than 10 Percent. 
  In the first 11 months of 1993, our national retail prices 
rose 12.4 percent, with cost-of-living prices up 13.9 percent, 
of which new price-rise factors made up over 80 percent. Prices 
rose more than 10 percent in all 30 provinces throughout China. 
Urban prices rose even more, with employee cost-of-living 
prices for the first 11 months in the 35 large and medium-sized 
cities up 19.3 percent from the same period in 1992. Glaring 
price problems remained prevalent. But why was our economy 
cooling down while prices remained high? And why were over 90 
percent of our consumer goods markets in long supply or 
basically balanced as to supply and demand while market prices 
were still rising sharply? My personal view is that the 
contrast or lack of synchronization between high price rises and 
a cooling economy was due mainly to: 
  1) As prices are a lagging indicator, the high prices were 
an 
aggregate lagging reflection of previous high economic growth, a 
loose money-supply policy, and sharp price-reform dynamics. As 
to economic growth, price levels are tied to economic 
prosperity, which phenonenon exists not only in developing 
countries, but also in developed ones where, every time economic 
growth accelerates, inflation worsens. In 1992, once we began to 
enter a stage of high-speed growth, prices also rose faster, 
with 1992 price rises picking up to 5.4 percent, reaching 6.8 
percent by December. In 1993, prices rose 8.4 percent in 
January, 10.2 percent in March, 10.9 percent in April, 12.5 
percent in May, 13.9 percent in June, 14.9 percent in July, 15.1 
percent in August, and 14.5 percent in September, which was tied 
to the previous sustained high-speed economic development. As 
to the money supply, 1988 growth of the money supply in the 
narrow sense, M[.sub]1[/], fell below 10 percent, bringing 
correspondingly lower prices. But beginning in 1992, 
M[.sub]1[/] accelerated to 20-30 percent, reaching a high of 
41 percent by April, bringing corresponding price rises. But as 
M[.sub]1[/] growth for August 1992 was down to 19.7 percent, 
it is estimated that this began to impact 1993 prices in the 
second quarter. Of course, supposing that fourth-quarter 
M[.sub]1[/] growth did not rebound too sharply, to jump to 
about 30 percent, with prices not falling, then the linkage 
between M[.sub]1[/] and prices was even tighter. As to 
reform dynamics, by the end of 1992, our prices were market 
regulated for over 90 percent of our overall market consumer 
goods, about 80 percent of our capital goods, and around 95 
percent of our foreign-trade commodities. As over 80 percent of 
our whole market commodity prices were market regulated, it 
could be said that our commodity price-reform was basically 
completed. Such a large reform dynamic was bound to impact 
future prices. But as the price-reform dynamic weakens, the 
lagging effect will also abate, bringing less market price 
pressures. 
  2) The difference between market prices and commodity 
consumption elasticity and consumption structure was linked to 
the resulting difference in the commodity price-rise structure. 
On one hand, consumer goods consumption elasticity differed, 
bringing varying price rises. When consumption elasticity is 
large, rising prices lower purchasing volume, but when 
consumption elasticity is small, prices rises do not bring sharp 
changes in purchasing volume, as demand remains relatively 
stable (basically constant). Most of the faster rising prices 
were for commodities or services with less consumption 
elasticity which, whether supply and demand were balanced, rose 
as much as state policy-rises. For instance, as grain, water and 
power, and gas were all indispensable to daily life or 
replaceable only on a small scale, once the government raised 
prices, their prices went up too. In the first three quarters, 
basic-necessity prices rose about 20 percent, with the impact of 
price rises for food commodities alone accounting for over 50 
percent of overall price rises. Just the opposite, price rises 
were lower for commodities with greater flexibility, including 
popular goods of dependable quality, such as ordinary clothing 
and articles for daily use, for which price rises were mostly 
under 8 percent, with some even falling. Let this be a warning 
to policymakers that basic-necessity prices must not be 
decontrolled, in order to prevent constant market price rises 
that would affect livelihood stability. 
  On the other hand, consumption-structure differences also 
affected prices. As incomes rose, consumption grades also went 
up, with attention to watching higher market price rises for 
expensive commodities, new products, new designs, and new 
styles, such as name-brand color TVs and dress fashions, showing 
the impact of high consumption by the high-income strata, making 
one feel that prices were changing and rising sharply. These 
two factors reflected cost-drive as well as demand-pull. 
  3) The RMB was sharply devalued. The exchange rate to the 
U.S. dollar was only a little more than 7 yuan at the beginning 
of 1993, but had reached 11 yuan by June, and has now stabilized 
at about 8.8 yuan. This devaluation was also a factor in higher 
price rises. With import costs up sharply, the lack of 
confidence in the RMB brought market instability and price 
rises. As these price rises involved both normal and abnormal 
factors, they need a conscientious and detailed analysis. 
<H5>  B. Our Macroeconomic Regulation and Control Remained </H5>
Subject to Unresolved Problems, Conspicuously in the Following 
Four Areas: 
  1) Funds were tight and shortages large. After June 1993, 
enterprise deposits fell monthly, down 73.3 billion yuan for 
June through August. By the end of August, enterprise deposit 
growth was at 4.1 percent, nearing the danger point. And while 
enterprise deposits rose somewhat after October, their growth 
remained at only a little over 5 percent. This fund shortage was 
caused by: (a) The overall structure was stil too large. 
Accumulated investment growth was over 60 percent, with 
industrial growth above 20 percent, still too high, with fund 
demand also too high. (b) The fund-orientation structure was 
irrational. All sorts of rebates turned some funds into consumer 
funds, "losing a piece"; finished-product funds increased, 
"tying up a piece"; enterprise bankruptcies and losses "wasted a 
piece." (c) Large price rises (with enterprise purchasing price 
rises of 35.5 percent in the first three quarters for raw 
materials and power) "ate up a piece." (d) While side doors were 
closed, main doors were not opened promptly, bringing slow 
results, with overall supply "down a piece." Lending growth 
was nearly 40 billion yuan less for the first eight months. 
This included a working-capital-loan ratio of only 33.7 
percent, one half normal. In September, conditions improved 
somewhat, with the working capital loan ratio up clearly, which 
was estimated to have eased the enterprise fund shortage. 
  2) Production was divorced from sales, with additional 
arrears. By the end of November, the accounts-due balance for 
budgeted state enterprises throughout China had topped 220 
billion yuan, up more than 50 billion yuan from the same period 
in 1992. Enterprise mutual arrears once again grew conspicuous. 
And funds tied up in finished products also rose quickly, up 
18.4 percent from the same period in 1992. 
  3) Production stoppages or semi-stoppages increased. Not 
only were large and medium-sized state enterprises operating 
under capacity, but certain small enterprises were also having 
trouble operating at full capacity. Not only was the 
manufacturing industry seeing limited production, but the raw 
materials industry also had unused production capacity. Not 
only heavy, but also light industry, was suffering from 
underproduction. 
  4) Efficiency was down. The realized profits of budgeted 
state industrial enterprises dropped 22.1 percent from July to 
August, more than 10 percent from August to September, and 
another 20+ percent from September to October. By the end of 
November, losing enterprises had expanded further to 37.3 
percent. Our overall efficiency improvement was clearly 
falling, with increasing losses. While this was caused partly 
by new financial systems in certain enterprises, as well as by 
other factors, the weakening of the "speed" and "price-rise" 
type efficiency was also a key factor. 
<H5>  C. Our Economic-Development Imbalances Remained Glaring, </H5>
With No Clear Structural-Adjustment Progress. 
  1) Our regional-development imbalance further sharpened, 
with 
our eastern region's production, construction, consumption, and 
income growth clearly higher than in our midwest region, and the 
coastal-interior gap continuing to widen. For the first three 
quarters, coastal-zone production, construction, and consumption 
growth accounted for over 60 percent of our national growth. 
  2) Our industrial-development imbalance remained glaring. 
While we reaped better agricultural harvests, with grain and 
edible oil output setting new records, the enterprise lack of 
stamina did not improve, with the imbalance between industry and 
agriculture still existing, still no great improvement in our 
supply shortages of transportation, power, and key raw 
materials, and "bottleneck"-industry limitations still troubling 
national economic development. 
  3) Our urban-rural income-distribution imbalance grew more 
severe. While rural incomes grew slowly, with rural 
market-realization remaining low, our urban residents had not 
yet broken free from the "big-pottism" setting, so were 
continuing to eat out of the "two big pots" of the state and 
enterprises, taking advantage of all sorts of dexterous means to 
squeeze out public interests, which gave them sustained high 
income growth to sharpen the gap with rural residents. 
  4) Our international payments imbalance sharpened. Exports 
grew slowly on one hand, while imports increased quickly on the 
other, making our trade imbalance more evident, and making 1993 
our first year of trade deficit since 1990. Our trade deficit 
for the first 11 months of 1993 topped $7 billion and, without 
effective control, will increase further. Meanwhile, our 
export-earnings rate was low, with our import-payments rate 
high, reducing the amount of foreign exchange that the state 
could amass, and posing a new threat to our maintenance of the 
necessary foreign exchange reserves. 
  These many imbalances show that our economic system and 
operating forces remain obviously irrational. While these 
imbalances may not have a sharp short-term impact on our overall 
economic development, they are still a hidden peril that might 
touch off national economic instability. So if we do not 
eliminate them promptly, but rather let them grow, they are 
likely to have an adverse impact on China's economic 
development, as well as having a negative effect on our social 
stability. 
<H5>  III. Thoughts on Macroeconomic Regulation and Control Policy </H5>
Measures for the Next Stage 
  As to the current state of our economic operations, we need 
to pay attention to preventing two deviations: (a) Impatience to 
make our high economic growth and price rises fall back, by 
taking steps to increase our overall regulation and control 
dynamic, instead of making a structural monetary adjustment, 
which might cause our economy to cool down too quickly, and lose 
us the chance for stable growth. (b) Overemphasis on enterprise 
problems, instead of an appropriate easing of our overall 
regulation and control dynamic, particularly by making credit 
too easy, which might affect our economic "soft landing," to set 
off another economic overheating. So we hold that our general 
1994 economic principles should be to consolidate our overall 
regulation and control successes, expand our 
structural-adjustment dynamic, sharply raise our economic 
efficiency, continue to rectify our economic order, and go all 
out to intensify all reforms. Our overall 1994 economic plans 
should remain as set forth in 1993 in Central Document #6: GDP 
growth rate and price rises both under 10 percent, with a 
corresponding fixed assets investment scale of 1.4 trillion 
yuan, up about 20 percent from 1993's estimated figure (with the 
rough growth of real work volume at about 8 percent); retail 
consumer goods sales growth remaining around 20 percent; loan 
scale controlled at 500 billion yuan, currency issue controlled 
at 150 billion yuan, and money supply in the narrow sense 
(M[.sub]1[/]) growth rate controlled at about 25 percent; 
export growth maintained at approximately 10 percent, 
essentially balanced with imports; the ratio between overall 
supply and demand controlled at under 5 percent. In order to 
keep our economy growing at an appropriate rate while further 
controlling inflation, we hold that our macroeconomic regulation 
and control in the next stage should pay attention to grasping 
the following areas: 
  1. We need to appropriately grasp our regulation and 
control dynamics. Generally, while the three+ months of 
macroeconomic regulation and control of our economy since July 
1993 have essentially stabilized our macroeconomic operations, 
bringing some improvement to our overall relations between 
supply and demand, we are still not on an essentially normal 
track, with our 1993 ratio of demand exceeding supply probably 
still higher than the rational level of 5 percent. Meanwhile, 
our microeconomic problems are growing. So we need to pay great 
attention to grasping the macroeconomic regulation and control 
dynamic, focusing our energies on our structure. 
Quantitatively, the key will be to control money-supply 
channels, by tightening control of fixed assets investment, and 
strictly controlling new-project starts. As to fund 
orientation, we need to tighten ordinary-assets investment, 
while easing basic-industry investment and working-capital 
loans. We suggest maintaining our 1994 ratio of working 
capital to all new loans at about 50 percent, while raising our 
basic-industry investment-loan ratio up to approximately 20 
percent. 
  2. We need to continue to rectify our economic order 
and improve our macroeconomic management. Rather than 
saying that the most glaring problem in our previous economic 
operations was "overheating," we had best say that it was "too 
much chaos." While our previous rectification has somewhat 
improved our current economic order, the source of the "chaos" 
has not yet been rooted out, so that the chaos is stil likely to 
recur once control is eased. Our current priorities for 
further clearing up and rectification are: (a) We need to 
genuinely and thoroughly dislink banks from the entities that 
they are running, in order to keep them from remaining actually 
connected. (b) Along with an appropriate easing of credit, we 
need to firmly stop bank funds from infiltrating through various 
means into large "bubble-economy" fields, such as stocks and 
real estate, while continuing to recoup all illegally loaned 
funds; (c) We need to tighten tax-collection management, to stop 
up tax "flight, fraud, dripping, and avoidance," with the 
priorities being to better control enterprise value-added taxes 
and individual income taxes. (d) We need to tighten our foreign 
trade management, in order to maintain stable export growth, in 
an attempt to basically balance or keep a slight surplus in our 
international payments, to maintain the necessary foreign 
exchange reserves. (e) We need to tighten our market pricing 
control, with our priorities being to strengthen our policy 
guidance of basic daily necessity prices, by curbing arbitrary 
price rises and fee collections, so that living standards are 
not affected sharply. 
  3. We need to intensify our structural adjustment, by 
investing more in basic industries. Incrementally, we could 
consider at least the following three ways to ensure that basic 
industry gains: (a) We could appropriately pool finances to 
raise the percentage of spending on basic-industry investment, 
which should now be raised gradually to more than 10 percent. 
(b) We could issue special bonds with preferential interest 
rates, and intensify shareholding-system reform or set up 
special funds, to provide long-term and stable fund sources for 
basic industrial development. (c) In line with our banking 
system reform, we could speed up our establishment of a policy 
bank with the main function of raising funds for basic industry. 
As to reserves, we should mainly use enterprise operating-forces 
conversion and property-rights system reform to activate asset 
reserves, in order to achieve the optimum disposition of public 
resources. 
  4. We need to continue to stabilize our agricultural 
production to increase peasant income. (a) After the 
central rural-work conference, we need to conduct an overall 
one-time investigation of pertinent rural-work principles and 
policies, in order to better implement all steps to stabilize 
and strengthen agriculture. (b) We need to increase the fund 
investment in agricultural production by governments at all 
levels, making a determination to go forward with the building 
of key water conservancy facilities on farmland. (c) We need to 
pass on to peasants as soon as possible the signals about higher 
purchasing prices for farm and sideline products, in order to 
stimulate peasant development and production initiative, so that 
they can make all advance preparations to rationally adjust 
their cultivation intentions. (d) Based on stable agricultural 
production, we need to continue to vigorously develop township 
enterprises, in order to accelerate the shift of the surplus 
agricultural workforce to nonfarm industry. 
  5. We need to do a conscientious job of all pre-reform 
preparations, in order to advance all reforms actively and 
reliably. While our current tighter macroeconomic 
regulation and control has already created a favorable climate 
for further reform progress, the problems exposed through 
regulation and control are also calling for as early reforms as 
possible. Our overall reform thinking has now been essentially 
clarified, with the priorities being to do a good job of all 
early-stage preparatory work: (a) We need to do a good job of 
overall work related to reform timing, pace, and all aspects, in 
order to ensure orderly reform progress. (b) We need to do a 
good job of all media-orientation work, in order to create a 
suitable social climate. (c) We need to study the psychological 
and economic sustainability of all parties for reform actions, 
by grasping the rational dynamic to reduce social repercussions. 
(d) We need to do a good job of preventing conflicts and errors 
that might arise in the course of reform-plan implementation, by 
drawing up the necessary contingency plans in preparation for 
implementation mishaps. (e) We need to do a very good job of 
combining reform with growth, in order to promote reform, while 
maintaining the appropriate economic growth rates. (f) We need 
to combine reform with anti-corruption and advocacy for honesty, 
in order to ensure public support for reform, by eliminating the 
disruptive impact of corruption on reform. (g) We need to 
combine reform with a sound legal system, by developing legal 
institutions to promote smooth reform implementation, in order 
to put reform and opening on a legal track to prevent reform 
mistakes. (h) We need to combine reform-plan uniformity with 
regional-development imbalances, paying attention to dealing 
with each case on its merits, to ensure that reform actions take 
real effect to become the voluntary behavior of all areas. (i) 
We need to better combine macroeconomic reform with 
microeconomic reform, by ensuring that macroeconomic reform 
truly becomes a motivation for intensified microeconomic reform, 
in order to pave the way for further stimulation of our 
productive forces. (j) We need to better combine reform with 
opening, by pushing China's economic system to operate better 
according to international practice, in order to pave the way 
for the Chinese economy to more smoothly enter the international 
market. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66200 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  16 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Experts Comment on Growth, Investment Rates </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Experts Comment on Growth, Investment Rates </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0394A Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 16 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0394A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhang Shuhong (1728 2562 4767): "Thoughts on Two </F>
Percentages: For Development, `Look to Nine,' for Stability, 
Look to `Ten'"] 
  [Text] Listening to a Chinese People's Political 
Consultative Conference committee deliberate a "government work 
report," I was often reminded of two figures, one is the nine 
percent 1994 economic growth rate index and the other is the 10 
percent 1994 price control index (that is, to control price 
inflation to below two digits). A committee member said these 
are two crucial percentages concerning whether the economy can 
sustain rapid healthy growth and overall stability. 
  So, what are the implications of the two percentages, and 
what do they signify? 
<H5>  Starting Out With Two 13 Percent </H5>
  The evening before the "two meetings" [the Second Session of 
the Eighth NPC and the Second Session of the Eight National 
Committee of the CPPCC] convened, the State Statistical Bureau 
published statistical reports on 1993 national economic and 
social development, in which most attention was drawn to two 
percentages: one, gross domestic product grew 13.4 percent over 
1992, and two, the retail price index rose 13 percent over 1992. 
  Two 13 percents: one good, one worrisome. The good news is 
that the national economy continued to sustain a relatively high 
growth rate on top of 1992's high rate. The 13.4 percent implies 
that 1993 had the highest one-year growth since 1985. This 
growth was higher than the world's liveliest economic 
region--the average Asian economic growth rate is seven 
percentage points, enough to astound the world. The worrisome 
thing is that price inflation was too high and inflationary 
presure has not completely subsided. Committee Member Zhou 
Zhiying [0719 0037 5391], deputy director of the economic 
research center of the state statistical committee, explained 
that price inflation greater than two digits occurred in 1993 
for the fourth and fifth times since the country was founded. 
  One good, one worrisome news also can be regarded as both 
good and bad. The committee members believe that rapid growth is 
good but it brings along such issues as serious restraint 
"bottlenecks," too large a scale of fixed asset investment, and 
severe inflation. The secret worry of an "overheated economy" 
lies behind the high speed. Overly high price increases are bad 
but at the same time in 1993 a rather large step was taken in 
price reform. The situation of rather low base product prices 
and infrastructure charges is changing. This is of important 
significance for promoting the formation of market mechanisms, 
so the situation also can be called happiness amidst worry. 
  Nine Percent: The Best Integration Between Pace and 
Results 
  Committee Member Xiong Xingmei [3574 1840 5019], executive 
director of Nankai University's International Economic Research 
Institute is working on the research topic of "economic growth 
and forecasting." He brought along a research paper in which 
they concluded from a model analysis that in 1994 an economic 
growth rate of about nine percent (eight percent to 10 percent) 
was the best choice. Committee Member Xiong was entirely happy 
that the results of their research happened to coincide with 
state planning goals. 
  Committee Member Xiong feels that growth rates greater than 
10 percent are unsuitable, otherwise, we will pay a price for 
sustaining overly high growth rates. Actually, such a price has 
begun to emerge. Input growth rates far and away surpass actual 
economic growth rates and economic results are fal ling. The 
contradictions of an irrational economic structure and 
imbalanced national economic sectors are more prominent each 
day. The pressure of inflation clearly is great. Overly fast 
growth also has given rise to export growth reductions and 
faster import growth. Furthermore, high speed growth allows no 
optimism for the resource and environmental situation. 
  It will not do to have rates too fast yet slower speeds are 
unacceptable. Low speed is contrary to the people of the 
nation's desire to seize good opportunities and accelerate 
growth. Furthermore, overall, China's economy still is a "speed 
and efficiency type" of economy; improved results depend on 
higher speed. Deceleration naturally means slumping results, 
greater losses for enterprises and less fiscal income, or 
overall tension in the economic situation. Likewise, this is 
something we do not wish to see. 
  The way for China's economy to sustain steady, fast, healthy 
growth is to unite high speed with high results. Committee 
Member Xiong believes that the best mixture of speed and results 
is about nine percent. 
  What is the basis for "10 percent"? 
  During the discussions a committee member asked: is there 
any 
basis for proposing the price index be held below 10 percent? 
Was it chosen arbitrarily? 
  Of course there is a basis. Committee member Zhao Haikuan 
[6392 3189 1401 ] explained, according to current international 
standards, a price index below three percent is acceptable 
inflation. Medium range inflation is between four percent and 10 
percent. Serious inflation is over 10 percent. Thus, 
theoretically, 10 percent is the dividing line between general 
and serious inflation. 
  Committee Member Zhao believes that considering the broad 
desires of the masses and cadres, controlling the price index to 
10 percent still is rather high. However, seeing that in 1993 
the growth rate was 13 percent, and at the same time we also 
want to maintain a relatively high growth rate, thus, in see 
king truth from facts, controlling the price index within 10 
percent is not a bad result. It is a positive goal. 
  Although in 1993 such a high price rate did not give rise to 
social problems, would it be alright to exceed 10 percent in 
1994? Commit tee Member Wang Shiying [3769 0013 5391] replied: 
No. Practice proves that the theory of inciting economic growth 
with infl ation is untenable. We must not forget that this index 
is based on the price levels of 1993 which rose too quickly and 
wild ly rather than merely seeing that 1994 goals are in no 
great danger. We cannot overestimate the masses' forbearance. 
  Another critical 30 percent 
  We must both allow the economy to sustain a rather high rate 
of growth and also control the tendency of prices to rise too 
quickly. This is a dilemma. A common critical factor affecting 
the realization of these two goals is the matter of the scale of 
investment in fixed assets, concretely expressed as investment 
rates. 
  The so-called investment rate is a ratio between the scale 
of 
fixed asset investment and gross domestic product. This is a 
commonly used international index to measure whether the 
rationality of fixed asset investment scales. Committee Member 
Zhou Zhiying explained, referring to foreign practices, summing 
up China's economic growth experience and lessons of the past 10 
or so years, an investment rate less than 30 percent is 
appropriate. If over 30 percent, all economic relationships will 
become tense. In 1987 and 1988 investment rates exceeded 30 
percent and the economy was "overheated." There was double digit 
inflation for two consecutive years. 
  What has been the situation in the past several years? In 
1992 the investment rate reached 32.7 percent. At the beginning 
of 1993 when plans were formulated, the need to control 
investment rates to within 30 percent was proposed. But in the 
course of implementation investment scales rose. Ultimately, in 
1993 the investment rate reached 37.7 percent, up five 
percentage points over 1992. In 1994, plans call for fixed asset 
investment of 1.3 trillion yuan. The investment rate still will 
be higher than 32 percent based on a nine percent forecasted 
gross domestic product. The effect on all economic relationships 
cannot be called optimistic. 
  Therefore, Committee Member Zhou Zhiying emphasized that we 
definitely must really do a good job of macroeconomic 
readjustment and control. In particular we must strictly control 
overly r apid growth in the scale of fixed asset investment and 
truly stress a superior investment structure, ensuring that each 
development and construction goal is met, providing a relaxed 
environment to promote reform. 


</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66201 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpcar030___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  10 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Wu Jinglian Advocates Earnest Implementation of Reform </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Wu Jinglian Advocates Earnest Implementation of Reform </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Measures 

<F P=102>   94CE0453A Beijing JIDIAN RIBAO in Chinese No 2, 10 Mar 94 pp 
7-9 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0453A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JIDIAN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wu Jinglian (0702 2417 8834): "On the </F>
Infeasibility of an Inflationary Policy, and Basic Ways To 
Implement All Reform Measures"] 
  [Text] The situation facing the Chinese economy in 1994 may 
be described in the phrase: Vast opportunities coexisting with 
huge risks. If this assessment is right, when drawing up 
macroeconomic policies, we will have to act on the principle of 
seizing opportunities for a great leap in reform and 
development, while avoiding too sharp risks. 
  We say that China now has better opportunities than other 
countries because 15 years of reform and development have 
established certain economic-system, material, and technological 
grounds for much future development, enabling the current 
bursting forth of the long-suppressed potential vitality of our 
ancient civilization. In particular, the long-awaited reform 
assault decided on by the 14th CPC Congress and the Third 
Plenary Session of the 14th CPC Central Committee has made it 
possible for the Chinese economy, through market economy 
development and operation, to overcome certain deeper conflicts 
still troubling it. If the program of the 14th CPC Congress and 
the Third Plenary Session of the 14th CPC Central Committee is 
implemented successfully, the Chinese economy will be able in 
the near future to get onto a path of sustained, valid, and 
rapid growth. 
  But our path to an economic takeoff and a new upsurge will 
not be smooth. While the change in tactics as a refuge from 
past storms that we have adopted through reform in the past 
dozen or so years had its positive aspects, it has also left 
blind spots in certain crucial sectors of our national economy, 
accumulating a number of deeprooted conflicts that are 
obstructing the smooth progress of reform and development. 
  In particular, the two conflicts of inflation and the lack 
of 
vitality of state enterprises, not only are causing many public 
complaints but, if not dealt with promptly, could easily affect 
our economic and social stability. 
  Faced with this situation, some economists are advocating 
the 
adoption of tactics that could be called "curbing recession with 
inflation." They say that while inflation is harmful, the losses 
created by currency devaluation are the same for everyone and, 
while everyone will complain about them, noone will be 
particularly discontented, nor will anyone take the lead in 
making trouble about them. But recession differs in that if 
factories operate under capacity, causing lower wages or 
unemployment, it will be hard to avoid a negative impact on 
social stability. So they favor the adoption of a "loose" 
monetary policy, by providing plenty of funds and market demands 
to state enterprises that are now in trouble, to maintain their 
operations and worker employment. But while those in favor of an 
expansionary monetary policy based on protection of state 
enterprises argue it plausibly and at length, it is certainly 
hard for me to agree with such an argument for the following 
reasons: 1) It is wrong to say that inflation does not have 
severe social consequences. While overall price rises certainly 
create the same devaluation losses for every yuan of money, the 
harm they cause to various individuals is absolutely different. 
In an inflationary state, commerce is better than industry, 
with hoarding and profiteering in turn being better than 
commerce. The group most negatively affected is the 
wage-earning and salaried strata, while profiteers on the other 
hand can fish in the troubled waters to get very rich by foul 
means. These not only are facts that we all know, but even 
more so are history that we of this generation have experienced 
personally. 2) Using monetary expansion to alleviate the 
difficulties of state enterprises is like drinking poison to 
quench one's thirst. While the current difficult plight of 
state enterprises has many causes, the main one is system 
factors. The only way to ensure that they essentially overcome 
these difficulties to recover their glory is by determining to 
reform our enterprise system and overall economic climate. 
While enterprises of course need help out of their immediate 
difficulties, if they need subsidized relief, then it should 
come through "open subsidies," not the "large-scale irrigation" 
method of universally providing low-interest loans (actually 
negative-interest loans). This is because that can only lower 
fund-use efficiency, forming a vicious cycle of inflation--lower 
efficiency--worse inflation, even evolving into a difficult and 
complicated case of macroeconomic inflation coexisting with 
microeconomic enterprise recession. 3) The theoretical grounds 
of the abovementioned policy proposal, the theory that low 
unemployment can be maintained only at the cost of high 
inflation, have long since been debunked by Western economics as 
a misapplication of the "Phillips curve." All modern economics 
textbooks say that even based on the Phillips theory of a 
negative correlation between unemployment and inflation, a 
society's unemployment depends not only on inflation, but even 
more importantly on its place in the Phillips curve. In some 
economies, the maintenance of zero inflation comes only at the 
cost of very high unemployment, while in others, zero inflation 
is not accompanied by too high unemployment, which is absolutely 
possible to keep within socially sustainable limits. So 
Western economists seem to have learned a lesson from the 
disastrous effect of "stagnant expansion" caused by the use of a 
macroeconomic policy of displacing unemployment with inflation. 
Noone any more regards an inflationary policy as a panacea for 
curing recession and unemployment, seeking rather for remedies 
in areas such as promoting technical advances, optimizing 
economic structures, enhancing competitive capability, and 
paying attention to human resources development. As to China, 
in addition to striving to upgrade our own modern economics 
knowledge, we had best assimilate certain lessons from the 
ultimate consequences of the 1987 plan to ease difficulties by 
the "flooding-of-the-pump method." 
  In light of this, our current strategy should be to reassert 
the consensus reached in mid-1992, that to overcome immediate 
difficulties and avoid greater risks, the basic way is through 
reform. In this respect, a currently very popular viewpoint 
seems to be wrong. This viewpoint sums up the cause of the 
severe inflation danger as the many reform measures taking 
effect in 1994, correspondingly holding that a valid means to 
prevent severe inflation is to slow reform. This viewpoint is 
wrong primarily because it does not conform to the facts. We 
know that there is a 10-month process of inflationary pressures 
from excess monetary accumulation to release through price 
rises. Once inflationary pressures begin to be released, they 
accelerate steadily. China's current round of inflationary 
pressures has accumulated in the course of our early-1990 reform 
delay and growth acceleration. These pressures began to be 
released in the last half of 1992, being somewhat eased through 
the tighter macroeconomic control of July and August 1993, but 
then reaccelerating due to the loosened monetary policy of 
September through November 1993. Market economoy operating 
principles tell us that the direct cause of inflation, or 
steadily rising overall prices, is invariably an excess money 
supply causing an imbalance between overall supply and demand. 
Without this condition, rising prices for any particular 
commodity cannot cause a steady rise in overall prices. But with 
it, certain reasons (such as tax rate adjustments and interest 
rate changes) can always be found to raise prices. Moreover, 
as prices have been essentially deregulated, even without 
excuses, sellers' higher prices can always be accepted by some 
buyers. So the attempt to slow reform to curb inflation and 
ease enterprise difficulties basically cannot achieve its 
objectives. On the contrary, as China's economic inflationary 
pressures and enterprise difficulties are created essentially by 
lagging reform in crucial sectors and the coexistence of dual 
systems, adopting such a roundabout method to overcome 
difficulties could result only in just the opposite of what we 
wished. 
  The basic thinking of the "Resolution" by the Third Plenary 
Session of the 14th CPC Central Committee on proceeding with 
overall reform in all areas was right. While the application 
plans for reforms in all areas drawn up in the spirit of this 
programmatic document still contain certain flaws and loopholes, 
they are still generally right. The current issue is whether 
these reform measures can be genuinely implemented. 
  Organizing the implementation of such major reform actions 
in 
1994 will be a very difficult task. 
  On one hand, as our economic system is an overall system, 
with mutual ties and restraints among its various systems and 
system links, all reform actions need to be closely coordinated. 
  Particularly in launching such a large-scale 
reform-offensive 
campaign as in 1994, coordination among all front armies will be 
decisive. For whatever reason, if the actions of a front army 
or even a small platoon are obstructed, so that it cannot reach 
its scheduled position at the designated time, this will check 
the actions of other units, even causing the whole campaign to 
fail. As to the reforms that are taking effect in 1994 in 
areas, such as tax revenue, banking, foreign exchange, 
enterprises, and social security system, in whatever aspect or 
link that does not keep pace, the economic system cannot work 
effectively in that area. If reform does not occur in one 
area, the whole market economy system cannot operate 
effectively. Taking banking reform for instance, its basic 
substance is to upgrade our investment system on planned economy 
terms to a financing system in a market economy, including 
items, such as making sound central bank functions, 
commercializing specialized banks, establishing financing 
markets, marketizing deposit and loan interest rates, and 
setting up a policy financing agency. If only one of these 
reforms does not occur, none of the others can achieve the 
expected results. For instance, while various new financial 
institutions have been established in line with banking-reform 
application plans, as long as deposit and loan interest rates 
remain under hard regulation by administrative organs, retaining 
the low and even negative interest rates on planned economy 
terms, the newly established financial institutions may be 
called "commercial banks," but can only be old wine in new 
bottles, meaning that the effort was in vain. This is because 
artificially prescribed low-rate terms can mean only an open or 
covert rationing system, not commodity circulation through free 
market exchange. This is an unchangeable rule. With man-made 
maintenance of real negative-interest rates for bank loans, 
funds can be distributed only with certain administrative 
authority. At which time, if the planned investment system has 
been abolished, things can turn even worse. This is because on 
planned-economy terms, administrative fund distribution has to 
occur in principle through certain plans formulated to achieve 
balance while, with neither money markets or investment 
planning, all is dependent merely on "patting the heads" of the 
administrative officials who make the examination and approval 
decisions. When the public financing system cannot work 
effectively, this makes it hard for all reforms in other areas 
to succeed, as well as having a severe impact on economic 
operations, including normal enterprise operations. 
  On the other hand, as there are so many uncertain factors in 
economic activities, we need to pay close attention to the 
development of events, responding promptly to changing 
circumstances. Especially when carrying out such a reform 
offensive as in 1994, as there are not precedents to follow, we 
can neither require all measures to to be designed flawlessly in 
advance, or expect their execution to be exactly right or 
perfectly done. Moreover, in the course of implementing 
predetermined measures, misunderstandings or conflicts of 
interests may produce deformities and distortions. And when 
there are new situations, issues, and flaws that had not been 
considered in advance, there is even more need for prompt 
adoption of forceful emergency steps to resolve them. 
  All of this shows that the key to seizing opportunities and 
avoiding risks is earnestly implementing all reform measures 
that have been put into effect. In this respect, firm command, 
oversight, and coordination are the most decisive factors. If 
this is done well, our overall reforms will have won their first 
victory, laying real ground for the smooth growth of the Chinese 
economy. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66202 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  18 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> PROVINCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Causes, Effects of Unbalanced Sex Ratio </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Causes, Effects of Unbalanced Sex Ratio </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0308A Hong Kong NAN PEI CHI [PERSPECTIVE] in Chinese No 
238, 18 Jan 94 pp 52-53 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0308A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong NAN PEI CHI [PERSPECTIVE] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Ch'i Miao-miao (7871 3267 3267): "Mainland's 70 </F>
Million `Bare Sticks'!"] 
  [Excerpts] [passage omitted] In 1992 the population surveys 
in some provinces and the fourth national census showed: On the 
mainland the male-female sex ratio has already become 
unbalanced. In the total population, males accounted for 51.45 
percent and females 48.55 percent, and there were over 36.8 
million more males than females; in the 25- to 49-year-old age 
group, the number of single males was 15 times the number of 
single females, accounting for 7.78 percent of the total 
population of males in the same age group. In Jiangsu Province 
more than 720,000 males of marriageable age have not yet 
married, and for females the same figure is only 42,000; in 
Ningwu County, Shanxi Province, the male-female sex ratio in the 
rural population is 121:100, and in the 20-35 age group the 
ratio is 150:100. What is noteworthy is: The younger the age, 
the higher the proportion of males rises and the lower the 
proportion of females falls. In Hunan Province, there are 2.5 
million more males than females, and among children aged one to 
nine there are 460,000 more males than females; in Jiangling 
County, Hebei Province, before 1984 the ratio of male and female 
births was 105:100, in 1989 this ratio rose to 127.45:100, and 
by 1991 males accounted for 75 percent of the total number of 
births in that year. The rapid increase in the proportion of 
newly born male children constitutes a new, serious threat to 
the balance between the two sexes in the mainland population. 
  The results of the census and the surveys showed the 
mainland 
population's birth rate was 19.68 percent and the male-female 
birth ratio was 114:100; of the over 23 million persons born 
every year, over 3.6 million more males were born than females. 
Making calculations based on these figures, by the end of this 
century the mainland will have over 30 million more males, and, 
coupled with the present over 36 million, at that time there 
will be the large contingent of 70 million "bare sticks"! 
[passage omitted] 
  However, who is tolling the alarm bell? 
  China is a country that for several thousand years has had 
the idea of regarding men as superior to women, and many people, 
to this day, believe that "there are three major offenses 
against filial piety, among which not producing an heir is the 
gravest." 
  Following the implementation of the basic national policy of 
family planning, the idea of "extensive cultivation" lost its 
market. Therefore, people found a new path and wrote a 
"composition" on the target of having only one baby. After the 
"secret recipes" and "tricky moves" of quacks and herb doctors, 
witches and sorcerors did not work, "B-Ultrasound," which sees 
clearly into the human body, has become the "secret weapon" for 
distinguishing the sex of a fetus. 
  For a time the "B-Ultrasound" room became the most popular 
clinic in a hospital. Before daylight, outside a "B-Ultrasound" 
room a long line would form, a line in which one young pregnant 
married woman after another, accompanied by husband or family 
member, waited for the "verdict" given by the "B-Ultrasound." 
  No matter whether you admit it or not, "B-Ultrasound" has 
already entered the mistaken area of interfering with the 
gradual increase in human births, and is now becoming, or has 
already become, one of the latent factors in throttling the life 
of female fetuses, ruining the health of pregnant women, and 
causing an imbalance in the male-female sex ratio. 
  Perhaps more grevious is that science has succumbed to the 
lure of money. Certain "B-Ultrasound" operators whose medical 
ethics are on a slippery slope, at the least serious, do 
relatives and friends a favor by giving them, without 
authorization, the "answer" to a fetus' sex; at the most 
serious, under the offensive of money, they lose their 
principles and, with this as a condition, take bribes, break 
rules, and reveal the results of "B-Ultrasound" fluoroscopy. 
Isn't this a corruption of medical ethics and conscience? 
  Drowning, abandoning, as well as maltreating to death girl 
babies are also important causes of the unbalanced male-female 
sex ratio. To give birth to a male child who whill "continue the 
family line" and also to not need to pay a large fine for 
exceeding the birth quota, some familes who have already given 
birth to a girl child have taken extremely cruel 
countermeasures. At depots, docks, as well as by the side and 
under the eaves of residences, one often sees abandoned baby 
girls crying. In Xinhuang Dong Autonomous county, from 1987 to 
1989 a total of 103 abandoned babies were discovered, 98 percent 
of them girl babies; in the past year the Oujiangcha Agency of 
Suiyang County took in and cared for 110 abandoned babies, all 
of them female. [passage omitted] 
  In certain poor and backward mountain areas, the problem of 
"bare sticks," caused by the serious imbalance in the sex 
ration, has already become quite serious. 
  The effects caused by the unbalanced sex ratio--the loss and 
harm--are difficult to predict and impossible to remedy; they 
not only run counter to the principles of demographic biology, 
but are also a factor that increases social instability. In poor 
mountain areas, where there are many males and few females, 
there are many fantastic anecdotes that cause people to not know 
whether to laugh or cry; there are cases of losing morals and 
ethics, of going against laws and regulations, and even of 
causing inhuman tragedies. [passage omitted] 
  On a mountain range where the borders of Shanxi and Shaanxi 
provinces meet, there is a six-member family: an old man nearly 
70 years old and five young and vigorous sons. It is an 
homogenous male world. The five brothers of the He [0149] family 
are "bare sticks" who had experiences to the fullest the 
bitterness of solitary life. One day Brother Five took a wife to 
share his bed. The remaining four brothers were both envious and 
jealous; physiological impules caused them to do some things in 
front of their sister-in-law that were very unseemly and that at 
time even made spectacles of them. The old man knew the reason 
for all this very well, and he did a "job" on Brother Five, 
saying: "A white steamed bun that one person has exclusive 
possession of is not savory; let everybody share in eating a 
little of it." Ignorant Brother Five unexpectedly agreed to this 
unreasonable request made by his father. [passage omitted] 
  Hong Juan [4767 1227], a girl from west of the Huang He and 
Xiang Yun [4382 7189], a boy from east of the Huang He, were 
fellow students in a junior middle school. They studied and 
played together; they had a quite harmonious relationship. Three 
years after graduation Hong Juan gave her love to Xiang Yun. 
  Hong Juan's love for a boy from another place and another 
clan was resolutely opposed by her family, clan members, and 
fellow villagers. There was every reason for their opposition: 
in this clan and village, the ratio of unmarried men to 
unmarried women was nearly 2:1, i.e., out of every two men one 
could not get a wife. To thoroughly block any opportunity for 
Hong Juan and Xiang Yun to meet, they put Hong Juan under house 
arrest and forced her to become betrothed to one Ren Lin [0088 
2651] of this village. 
  On a pitch-black night, Xiang Yun led some men to make a 
"suprise attack" on Hong Juan's house and snatch the girl away 
to east of the Huang He. Seeing that his "quasi-bride" had been 
snatched away, Ren Lin mustured a force of over 100 clansmen 
from this village to wage a hot pursuit. East of the Huang He a 
defense had early been prepared, and a force of close to 100 men 
had been mustered. On the embankments east and west of the Huang 
He the two sides engaged in a tense confrontation. Fortunately, 
leaders of villages and towns and comrades of the public 
security police substations rushed up in good time and 
restrained the two sides from engaging in a vicious fight. 
[passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66203 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  3 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> PROVINCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jiangxi Provincial Government Work Report </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Jiangxi Provincial Government Work Report </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0260A Nanchang JIANGXI RIBAO in Chinese 3 Mar 94 pp 1, 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0260A </F>
<F P=104>  Nanchang JIANGXI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by Jiangxi Governor Wu Guanzheng (0702 1351 2973): </F>
"Government Work Report Delivered at the Second Session of the 
Eighth Jiangxi Provincial People's Congress on 25 February 1994"] 
  [Excerpt] [passage omitted] This year [1994] will be a 
crucial one in pushing forward with system reform to establish a 
socialist market economy, as well as an important one for 
focusing our energies on building our infrastructures faster to 
push Jiangxi's economy as quickly as possible to new heights. 
We must certainly take Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory on 
building socialism with distinct Chinese characteristics and the 
Party's basic line as our guides, as well as fully implementing 
the spirit of the 14th CPC Congress and the Third Plenary 
Session of the 14th CPC Central Committee, by speeding up our 
pace of building a socialist market-economy system, opening up 
wider to the outside world, and tightening and improving our 
macroeconomic regulation and control, in order to maintain the 
sustained, rapid, and sound development of our national economy, 
preserve political stability, and promote the establishment of 
our spiritual civilization and overall social progress. 
  In 1994, premised on improving our economic efficiency, 
adjusting our economic structure, and pushing ahead with 
technical advances, we will strive to continue a provincial 
economic growth rate that is higher than the national average. 
Our key national economic and social development missions are: 
GNP growth of 12 percent over 1993, striving for 14 percent; 
GVIAO [Gross Value of Industrial and Agricultural Output] growth 
of 18 percent, with agricultural growth of 5 percent and 
industrial growth of 23 percent; local revenue growth of 12 
percent, striving for 14 percent; average peasant net income 
growth of 100 yuan, striving for 130 yuan; a birthrate 
controlled within the state-assigned planned target. Everyone 
at all levels throughout Jiangxi must grasp well the relations 
among reform, development, and stability. While economic 
development is the focus of all our work and the grounds for 
social stability and long-range national security, with reform 
and opening being a powerful motivation for economic 
development, preserving social stability is an indispensable 
condition for economic development and smooth reform progress. 
We need a strong sense of historical responsibility and a high 
degree of epochal urgency, to seize opportunities, advance with 
the tide, and push our national economy to new heights within a 
few years. 
<H5>  I. On Earnestly Implementing the "CPC Central Committee </H5>
Resolution on Certain Issues Involved in Building a Socialist 
Market-Economy System," by Losing No Time in Pushing Forward 
With Reform 
  We will implement the resolution of the Third Plenary 
Session 
of the 14th CPC Central Committee, by doing a good job of 
combining priority breakthroughs with overall advances, and 
striving to make greater progress in areas, such as building a 
modern enterprise system, developing [key production] factor 
markets, and converting government functions. 
  1. In line with uniform national plans, we will push ahead 
actively with tax revenue, banking, and investment system 
reforms. We will practice a tax-sharing fiscal system, reforming 
and improving our tax system, and reforming our profit 
distribution system for state enterprises. We will gradually 
establish risk liability for corporate investment and bank 
credit. We will evolve financing mechanisms to guide public 
fund orientation toward infrastructures, basic industries, and 
priority production and circulation enterprises. In line with 
national banking reform, we will continue to rectify our 
financial order, by reorganizing rural and urban cooperative 
banks, developing and improving rural cooperative foundations 
and large enterprise-group financial corporations, and speeding 
up capital financing. 
  2. Focused on converting state enterprise operating forces, 
we will explore the establishment of a modern enterprise system 
with distinct property rights, clear rights and liabilities, 
government administration separate from business management, and 
scientific management. We will do a better job of running state 
enterprises, particularly large- and medium-sized ones, by 
speeding up our pace of "one experiment and two applications." 
We will make substantive progress in 1994 in areas, such as 
corporate experiments, "state ownership but private operation" 
of small state enterprises, and a shareholding cooperative 
system for urban collective enterprises and township 
enterprises. Meanwhile, we will organize large trans-regional, 
industrial, and ownership-system enterprise groups, speeding up 
the development of our individual, private, and foreign-invested 
economies. We will conscientiously lighten enterprise burdens, 
tightening state-assets management, and preventing assets 
erosion. 
  3. Focused on factor markets, we will develop and cultivate 
a market system. We will better rationalize our price 
relations, developing and standardizing all commodity markets, 
speeding up our pace of production-factor marketization, and 
actively developing markets, such as money, labor, technology, 
construction, and information. We will set up an experimental 
property rights [equity] transaction center, promoting optimum 
enterprise organization. We will vigorously develop and improve 
our bond and currency markets, standardizing financing 
activities, such as stocks, bonds, fundraising, and lending. We 
will actively adopt various job forms, speeding up our evolution 
of a new jobs order. We will practice a land-sale system with 
compensation and limited terms, developing and standardizing our 
real estate market. We will develop a uniform, open, 
competitive, and orderly market system. 
  4. We will conscientiously convert government functions, 
continuing to tighten and improve macroeconomic regulation and 
control, and doing a good job of overall coordination of 
economic operations. We will reform in 1994 provincial 
(municipal) and county (municipal and district) government 
organs, speeding up our conversion of government 
business-management-sector functions, reducing specialized 
economic departments, and enhancing the overall coordination 
capability of comprehensive economic departments. 
  In reforms, such as rural, regional, housing, and social 
security system, we also need to experiment boldly and intensify 
steadily. Our rural shareholding cooperative system in 
particular needs promotion in an orderly way on a broader scale. 
<H5>  II. Further Developing Our Productive Forces Distribution, </H5>
by Focusing Our Energies on Building Better Infrastructures, 
Such as Power, Transportation, Communications, and Water 
Conservancy 
  We will seize the favorable opportunity of the national 
opening and development along the Chang Jiang [Yangtze River] 
and construction of the Beijing-Kowloon railway, backing and 
strengthening our might in the region along the Zhejiang-Jiangxi 
railway, speeding up development of our northern region, 
particularly the Nanchang-Jiujiang industrial corridor and the 
Nanchang-Jiujiang-Jingdezhen triangle, reinforcing development 
in the region along the Beijing-Kowloon railway line, and 
striving by the end of the century to basically evolve a 
networked productive-forces distribution order along the Chang 
Jiang and the Zhejiang-Jiangxi and Beijing-Kowloon railways. 
In the Nanchang-Jiujiang industrial corridor, based on an 
effort to essentially make it the first region in Jiangxi to 
achieve modernization in three decades, we will further speed up 
development, striving in 1994 for GVIAO growth of 20 percent, 
and a real use of foreign investment exceeding $300 million. 
We will accelerate our upgrading of cities and enterprises 
along the Zhejiang-Jiangxi and Anhui-Jiangxi railway lines, 
giving all large and midsize cities along these lines one or two 
obviously superior industries, so that the area can become 
Jiangxi's main east-west productive-forces layout. We will 
emphasize the opening and development of cities, such as 
Ganzhou, Ji'an, and Fuzhou, arranging in a planned way several 
large- and medium-sized construction projects, to speed up the 
development of our productive-forces distribution from north to 
south. 
  In recent years, the provincial government has put great 
effort into infrastructure construction, achieving marked 
successes. We will continue in 1994 to amass funds for building 
infrastructures, such as power, transportation, 
communications, and water conservancy. In addition to 
emphasizing a number of ongoing large- and medium-sized 
construction projects, such as seven power plants, five 
railways, three airports, five national highway upgradings, 
2,500 km of fiberoptic cable microwave communications arteries, 
and the overall control of Poyang Hu [lake], we will start 10 
new large projects in 1994. These are the Fengcheng thermal 
power plant, the third phase of the Jiujiang power plant, the 
second widening of the Nanchang-Jiujiang expressway, the linking 
of the bridge over the Chang Jiang at Jiujiang to the 
Nanchang-Jiujiang highway, an expressway from Gaofang Mountain 
to Wenjia [port in Fujian], an expressway from Jiujiang to 
Hukou, the Hukou bridge, a new railway station in Nanchang, a 
new airport in Nanchang, and 600,000 computerized telephones. 
These will make 1994 the year of Jiangxi's most priority 
construction starts since the founding of the PRC, with an 
investment of up to 10 billion yuan. The provincial government 
has ordered the pertinent departments, prefectures, and cities 
to emphasize this job, by starting the projects according to 
plans. The provincial party committee and government have also 
decided recently to spend about a decade and invest nearly 10 
billion yuan in building the Nanchang-Zhangshu-Ji'an-Ganzhou 
expressway to Jiangxi's border with Guangdong, to form an 
expressway artery across the whole province linking the Chang 
Jiang in the north to Guangdong, Hong Kong, and Macao in the 
south. This will be a grand cross-century project, with one-time 
planning, construction in sections, and the construction of the 
first section from Nanchang to Zhangshu to start in 1995. The 
construction of this priority project will greatly improve 
Jiangxi's looks, sharply upgrade Jiangxi's investment climate, 
and immensely enhance public confidence and Jiangxi's economic 
development stamina. 
  In order to further develop our productive forces layout, 
and 
speed up our pace of priority construction, we will have to pay 
attention to efficiency, improving and enhancing management, 
maintaining a rational investment scale, and optimizing our 
investment structure. We need to emphasize projects right from 
the early-stage work, providing detailed demonstrations project 
by project, and selecting those with market, efficiency, and 
repayment capabilities. In all project starts, we need to 
practice the enterprise corporate liability system, conserving 
energy, strictly controlling construction costs, and shortening 
building periods. Priority projects need to be organized even 
more meticuously, in a conscientious effort to prevent duplicate 
construction and lax management. Ongoing projects must be 
turned over for use on schedule and per quality specifications, 
with completed ones coming up to operating standards as quickly 
as possible. We need to reward those that are up to operating 
standards and are efficient, while making those that go 
over-schedule correspondingly liable. 
<H5>  III. On Focusing on Recruiting Business and Attracting </H5>
Investment Faster, in an Effort To Open Up Wider to the Outside 
World 
  Further escaping the fetters of our closed and conservative 
ideology, to open up further to the outside world, is a 
strategic mission. We need to speed up our pace, emphasizing 
practical results, using more domestic and foreign funds, 
resources, technology, and markets, and developing an externally 
oriented economy, so that all of Jiangxi can make greater 
advances in opening up to the outside world. 
  We will further expand our channels for the use of foreign 
investment, continuing our all-dimensional introduction of funds 
from north, south, and east, bringing a sharp increase to our 
real use of foreign investment in 1994 over that of 1993. In 
addition to actively winning more foreign government and 
international financial organization loans, efficient projects 
can also make use of international commercial loans. We are 
placing our business recruitment and investment attraction 
priority on attracting direct foreign investment, paying 
attention to winning investments in Jiangxi by large financial 
consortiums and commercial agencies, and encouraging foreign 
firms to set up wholly foreign-owned enterprises. We will 
emphasize the attraction of Taiwanese investment. We will 
carefully organize business recruitment and investment 
attraction activities, striving for greater success in the three 
areas of contracted amount, foreign-invested ratio, and 
individual project size. We will intensify foreign-invested 
project demonstrations, selecting projects that are efficient, 
high-tech, high added-value, high export-earning, large scale, 
and low energy-consumption. Our priorities in the use of foreign 
investment will be to emphasize attraction of funds, 
implementation of related funds, businesses going into operation 
coming up to production standards, improved efficiency, and 
prompt repayment. 
  We will continue to improve our investment climate. In 
addition to building better infrastructures and implementing and 
improving all preferential policies, we need to pay particular 
attention to upgrading our urban planning, municipal 
administration, and urban management. All large and midsize 
cities throughout Jiangxi will make breakthroughs in rectifying 
"dirt, chaos, and flaws," conducting overall improvements of 
transportation order, sanitation and public health, and urban 
appearance. We will act in accord with modern urban needs, by 
expanding new zones and upgrading old ones. We will reinforce 
our environmental protection and pollution prevention, creating 
a clean, comfortable, and fine climate that will help to attract 
foreign investment and enable people to live and work in peace 
and contentment. We will further emphasize port development and 
construction. 
  We will intensify our foreign trade reform, further 
expanding 
foreign trade, and striving for more export earnings. We will 
vigorously develop externally oriented enterprises, striving 
to win more international market share for enterprises and 
products with resource and technology advantages. We will do 
all possible to import new technology, equipment, and materials, 
paying particular attention to importing applicable patents and 
"tricks of the trade." We will expand our foreign economic and 
technical cooperation, doing a good job of project contracting. 
We will expand friendly overseas dealings, intensifying 
cultural exchanges. We will actively develop tourism, 
soliciting more overseas and Hong Kong, Macaon, and Taiwanese 
tourists. And we will tighten our lateral economic links, doing 
a good job of regional cooperation and business coordination. 
<H5>  IV. On Focusing on Higher Peasant Income, Through Better and </H5>
Faster Development of Three-High Agriculture and Township 
Enterprises 
  We will continue to implement the principle of making 
agriculture our foundation, by placing firm emphasis on the 
primacy of agriculture in economic activity. We will make 
vigorous improvement of the rural productive forces, accelerated 
rural economic development, and a steady incease in peasant 
income our basic rural-work starting and stopping points. 
  In line with market needs, we will continue to adjust our 
internal agricultural and rural economic structures, earnestly 
organizing agricultural development of our sixth overall 
strategic campaign. We will emphasize grain production, 
vigorously cultivating and disseminating high-grade rice, 
raising per unit yields, and doing a good job of refining 
conversion. We will actively expand our diversified economy, 
further increasing production in areas, such as cotton, 
oil-bearing crops, sugarcane, and silkworm cocoons. We will 
develop our breeding industry faster, doing a good job of 
specialty aquatic products and livestock raising with local 
advantages, and guiding peasants to make further breakthroughs 
in the livestock, poultry, and aquatic products industries. In 
1994, we will maintain our overall grain output at over 30 
billion jin, strive for a ginned cotton output of 4 million dan, 
achieve double-digit growth in livestock, poultry, and aquatic 
products, and put more energy into developing our forestry, 
fruit, tea, and mulberry industries. As 1994 is one of 
decisive engagement in reforesting barren hills, we need to 
organize carefully, to ensure the implementation of our aim to 
basically eliminate barren hills suited to forestry, by 
emphasizing tree planting and reforestation along both sides of 
key transportation arteries, such as the Beijng-Kowloon railway, 
the Zhejiang-Jiangxi railway, and the Nanchang-Jiujiang 
expressway, as well as in flatland regions, and stopping 
indiscriminate tree cutting. We will do a good job of water and 
soil conservation, to improve our ecology. We will emphasize 
the Sangao [Three-High] agricultural demonstration zone, 
agricultural development projects, development bases, and water 
conservancy works, intensifying the establishment of our second 
group of rural electrification experimental counties, and 
raising our capability to combat natural disasters. 
  We will absolutely and unswervingly develop and improve 
sharply our township enterprises. Premised on improved economic 
efficiency in 1994, we will work for continued and effective 
large-scale growth of township enterprises. We will further 
optimize township enterprise mechanisms, encouraging peasants to 
buy shares with funds, labor, technology and capital goods, and 
urging people from all walks of life to participate in township 
enterprise shareholding, to develop shareholding cooperative 
enterprises. We will speed up our construction of township 
industrial zones, guiding township enterprises to concentrate in 
small cities and towns and, in coordination with our development 
of county economies, form dominant industries with distinct 
local features. Governments at all levels should make 
accelerated development of township enterprises a major focus of 
their economic work, organizing departmental and industrial and 
mining enterprise counterparts to help in the development of 
township enterprises in counties, districts, and townships. We 
will invest more in township enterprises, raising funds through 
diversified means, and establishing a township enterprise 
development fund. We will export more labor, doing a good job 
of building export-earning agriculture and export-commodity 
bases. We will speed up our development of farm-reclamation 
enterprises. 
  We will better implement all policies to stabilize 
agricultural development, making efforts at all levels in 
guidance, support, protection, and adjustment, to fully 
stimulate peasant initiative. We will invest more in 
agriculture. As the agricultural investment amassed and planned 
in 1994 by the state and the province is up somewhat, with farm 
credit, rural collective input, and peasant labor accumulation 
more than in previous years, we need to use these better and 
more efficiently. We will take effective steps to 
conscientiously reduce peasant burdens, firmly cracking down on 
illegal economic activities that cheat and infringe upon 
agriculture. We will mobilize all trades and professions to 
support agriculture, sharply intensifying our establishment of a 
multi-level and -form socialized service system, doing a good 
job of circulation service and credit guidance, and establishing 
a number of production and marketing economic entities that link 
markets and production, to improve peasant market-access 
organization and socialization. We will protect agriculture 
better, by setting up a reserve system and development fund for 
key farm products. We will carry out strict land management, 
emphasizing protection of cultivated land. We will intensify 
development of old and poor areas, using well funds to provide 
work as a form of relief, and implementing well the "1987 
anti-poverty assault plans," to consolidate and develop our 
anti-poverty successes. We will further intensify our family 
planning work, particularly strengthening our rural two-grade 
basic network, to ensure fulfillment of Jiangxi's 
population-control plans. 
<H5>  V. On Focusing on Product Development, Enhanced Management, </H5>
and Technological Upgrading To Run Large- and Medium-sized State 
Enterprises Well, Promoting Rapid and Efficient Growth of 
Industrial Production 
  To maintain both rapid and effective industrial growth, we 
will need to sharply adjust our product mix, developing products 
with brisk market sales and good economic efficiency, to ensure 
that our industrial growth is grounded in market demand. All 
enterprises need to intensify market surveys, emphasizing 
product renewal and exchange, striving to develop new products, 
and emphasizing efficiency of scale, to evolve competitive 
hot-selling products. We will organically combine product 
development with flexible and varied sales-operation tactics, 
boldly using talent that knows operations, is good at strategy, 
and can open up markets, to create a corps of entrepreneurs that 
has ideals and ambitions, dares to pioneer and take risks, and 
is hardworking and law-abiding. 
  We will organically combine the conversion of enterprise 
operating forces with enhanced internal management, thoroughly 
launching the increased output through conservation movement of 
"conversion of forces, emphasis on management, internal 
exercises, and increased efficiency." We will bring the 
initiative of our vast numbers of employees into full play, 
demanding quality and efficiency from management. We will take 
hard-line steps to achieve sound and strict enterprise systems 
for quality, production, finance, cost, and operating 
management, enforcing strict labor discipline. In line with 
average or advanced domestic standards for the same industry, we 
will set forth specific targets for improving quality, speeding 
up sales of overstocked inventories, conserving energy and 
lowering consumption, and turning losses into profits, 
implementing them one by one, to set the best local or unit 
standards for better quality, higher efficiency, more energy 
conservation, and less consumption, and reduce losses to a 
minimum. We are calling in 1994 for Jiangxi's industrial 
production-sales rate to reach 96-97 percent, our energy and 
material use to be down 3-5 percent, and our fund turnover to be 
10-15 days faster. 
  These high minimums and standards will promote enterprise 
technological upgrading. Jiangxi will strive in 1994 to invest 
5 billion yuan in upgrading the technology of state enterprises, 
which will be focused on projects crucial to optimizing product 
mix, cultivating key industries and superior products, and 
saving energy and reducing consumption for higher efficiency. We 
will put priority on speeding up the upgrading of our 
automobile, metallurgy, machinery, electronics, industrial 
chemicals, food, and building materials industries, supporting 
the development of our pharmaceuticals, ceramics, silk, and 
tobacco industries. Our 40 priority technological upgrading 
projects throughout Jiangxi must be speeded up and put into 
standard operation on schedule. And all prefectures, cities, and 
departments must also emphasize enterprise technological 
upgrading, so that our industrial growth is grounded in 
technological progress. 
<H5>  VI. On Intensifying Circulation Reform, Further Opening Up </H5>
Markets, and Stimulating Circulation, To Promote the Formation 
of a New Market-Circulation System and Operating Forces 
  To develop a socialist market economy, we will have to 
intensify our market development, developing new circulation 
industries, and continuing to make efforts in the three areas of 
intensifying circulation reform, enhancing circulation 
management, and going all out to develop our individual and 
private economies. 
  We will continue to emphasize the "four deregulations" and 
"state ownership but private operation" for state-owned 
commerce, as well as commercial enterprise reform. We will 
actively explore paths of organizational and structural 
adjustment in the field of circulation, forming a group of key 
enterprises with strong might and market competitiveness, to 
bring the dominant role of state-owned circulation enterprises 
into full play. We will speed up our pace of upgrading 
circulation enterprises to shareholding, focusing on developing 
limited liability companies with corporate shareholding, and 
striving to turn one or two limited liability companies into 
listed ones. We will actively explore forms, such as mergers, 
property rights transfers, auctions, and bankruptcies, to 
further stimulate small circulation enterprises. We will 
speed up our wholesale-enterprise reform, establishing at key 
commodity production and marketing sites or distribution centers 
a group of wholesale markets for farm products, manufactured 
consumer goods, and capital goods. We will develop commodity 
futures trading in a step by step way. 
  We will develop large-scale markets, stimulating large-scale 
circulation, and developing large-scale trade. We will 
organize various forms of sales promotions, doing a good job of 
getting manufactured goods to the rural areas, expanding border 
trade, and developing domestic, particularly southwestern and 
northwestern, markets, to expand the market coverage rate of our 
province's products. We will better establish mostly 
market-formed pricing mechanisms, maintaining relative overall 
price stability. We will emphasize the "food basket" project 
and farm and sideline product purchasing, doing a good job of 
non-staple food supply. All circulation enterprises should 
invigorate their operations and raise their efficiency. 
State-commerce losses must be sharply reduced in 1994, with 
grain enterprises strictly controlling new losses, as well as 
gradually digesting accounts that have accumulated over the 
years. We will tighten our market regulation and control 
capability, instituting a graded reserves system for key 
commodities. We will enhance and improve our market management 
and oversight, doing a good job of opening circulation-facility 
construction and our warehouse industry to the public, focused 
on promoting production development, improving our market 
system, and making life easier for our residents, we will 
vigorously develop tertiary industries. 
  We will make faster development of our individual and 
private 
economies our key economic-work mission. In all areas suited to 
individual and private economic development, we will lift 
industrial restrictions, deregulating operating limits, and 
giving free rein to expand. Particularly in areas with lower 
levels of circulation and economic development, we need to pay 
even more attention to the development of the individual and 
private economies. We will firmly crack down on the production 
and sale of fake and shoddy commodities, continuing to clear out 
and rectify customs barriers, and breaking down market barriers, 
to ensure free goods circulation. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66204 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  4 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> PROVINCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jiangxi Provincial Economic, Social Development Report </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Jiangxi Provincial Economic, Social Development Report </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0261A Nanchang JIANGXI RIBAO in Chinese 4 Mar 94 p 
2 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0261A </F>
<F P=104>  Nanchang JIANGXI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by Wang Mingshan (3769 2494 0810), chairman, Jiangxi </F>
Provincial Planning Commission, given on 25 February 1994 at the 
Second Session of the Eighth Jiangxi Provincial People's 
Congress: "Report on the Implementation of the 1993 Economic and 
Social Development Plan"] 
  [Excerpts] During 1993, high and low throughout the entire 
province continued to implement the spirit of Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping's important speeches, of the 14th CPC National 
Congress, and of the Third Session of the 14th CPC Central 
Committee. It was a year of further liberation of minds, seeking 
truth from facts, seizing opportunities, and accelerating 
developments. As the economy developed rapidly, attention was 
paid to strengthening and improving macroeconomic regulation and 
control and to creatively launch new undertakings. The entire 
province experienced economic development, accelerating reform, 
as well as political stability and social progress. This year 
the growth rate of main economic indices was the fastest since 
the initiation of reform and opening to the outside world, and 
continued to be higher than the national average. Total national 
output value of the province was 68.6 billion yuan, which 
amounted to an increase, computed at comparable prices, of 15.8 
percent over the preceding year. This increase was composed of 
4.5 percent in the primary industries, 31.2 percent in the 
secondary industries, and 12.5 percent in the tertiary 
industries. The total national output value per capita reached 
1,742 yuan, which was a net increase of 307 yuan over the figure 
in the preceding year. The total industrial and agricultural 
output for the first time exceeded the 100 billion yuan mark as 
it reached 122.1 billion yuan, an increase of 27.5 percent over 
the preceding year, while the total amount of retail sales of 
social commodities reached 27.9 billion yuan, an increase of 
21.2 percent over the preceding year. Fiscal revenue was 6.56 
billion yuan, an increase of 30.8 percent. The rate of natural 
population increase had been controlled to within plan figures. 
Main norms in the 1993 economic and social development plan for 
Jiangxi Province, as approved at the First Session of the Eighth 
Provincial People's Congress, have been essentially fulfilled 
and in some cases overfulfilled. 
  Agriculture has overcome the effects of various natural 
calamities and has again achieved an abundant harvest, thanks to 
the preceding four consecutive years of steady development. 
Total agricultural output value for the entire province was 33.8 
billion yuan, an increase of 5.1 percent over the preceding 
year. Grain production was 15.17 billion kg, which was 670 
million kg above the assigned norm of the state plan, cotton 
production was 156,000 tons, an increase of 5.1 percent, and 
fairly large increases were also achieved in the production of 
edible oils, cured tobacco, fruit, and other products. Animal 
husbandry and the aquatic products industry experienced 
continuous development. Total production of meat was 1.575 
million tons, an increase of 11.7 percent, while production of 
aquatic products was 490,000 tons, an increase of 18.6 percent. 
The rural economy experienced all-round developments, with the 
total output value of village and township enterprises 
throughout the province reaching 57.94 billion yuan, an increase 
of 92.2 percent over the preceding year. New progress was made 
in the structural adjustment of the rural economy: the 
proportion of industrial crops in the total agricultural output 
value was raised by almost 3 percentage points, and the output 
value of nonagricultural production in the rural areas for the 
first time exceeded total agricultural output value, as its 
proportion reached 58.8 percent of rural total social output 
value, an almost 10 percentage points increase over the 
preceding year. 
  Industry overcame the difficulties in energy sources, 
communications, and stringency in capital funds and maintained 
its speedy growth. Total industrial output value of the entire 
province was 88.3 billion yuan, 24.7 billion yuan more than in 
the preceding year, an increase of 38.8 percent. Output value of 
the secondary industries for the first time exceeded that of the 
primary industries, its proportion in the national output value 
showing an increase of 3.4 percentage points. Economic returns 
improved further. The production-sales ratio for industrial 
products manufactured at the village and higher than village 
levels throughout the province reached 96.5 percent, an increase 
of 2.4 percentage points over the preceding year. Sales income 
from budgeted industrial enterprises increased 40.7 percent, 
creating 46 percent more profits and taxes. Large increases were 
registered in the production of main industrial products, 
especially in investment-type products and well-selling 
high-quality products, compared with the preceding year. Village 
and township industrial production achieved a value of 38.15 
billion yuan, an increase of 90.2 percent. The new increases in 
village and township industrial output value accounted for 73 
percent of the newly added industrial output value of the entire 
province, and has become a major sector of increase in the fast 
economic growth throughout the province. 
  It was a year of record investments in fixed assets and of 
the completion of a record number of projects, the investment 
structure was continuously improved, and key constructions were 
further strengthened. According to initial statistics, 
society-wide investments in fixed assets were completed to the 
amount of 17.85 billion yuan, an increase of 42.2 percent over 
the preceding year, and of these 12.32 billion yuan were 
investments by state-owned units, an increase of 49.7 percent, 
which was a record for the last five years. In the investments 
of the state-owned units, capital constructions accounted for 
6.3 billion yuan and technological transformations for 4.5 
billion yuan, increases of 41.6 and 48.2 percent, respectively, 
over the preceding year. Fixed asset investments further tended 
to be directed toward infrastructure, key industries, and 
technological transformations. The proportion of investments in 
projects of the electric power, transportation, and 
communication industries, and in agriculture in relation to the 
total key project investments of all state-owned units was 7.4 
percentage points higher than in the preceding year. Investments 
in key construction projects were substantially strengthened, 
and the completion of such constructions proceeded smoothly. The 
whole length of the Jiangxi sector of the Beijing-Jiulong 
Railway is under construction, and last year a section involving 
an investment of 1.89 billion yuan was completed. This had 
comprised completion of one bridge and 18 tunnels on the 
Ji'an-Ganzhou-Dingnan section, completion of work on the 
Xiangwu-Jian section, about to be opened to traffic, while 
double-tracking of the Zhejiang-Jiangxi railway is being speeded 
up. There, a length of 89 km on the Jiangxi side has been 
completed. On the Hengfeng-Nanchang railway, work has started on 
the Shangrao section and on a railway station at Shangrao. Two 
sets of 125,000 kilowatt generators of the Pingxiang power plant 
and four sets of 3,200 kw generators of the Jinggangchong power 
station have been linked up with the network and are generating 
electricity. The large bridge at Nanchang and the Nanchang-Jiao 
section of the Nanchang-Jiujiang expressway have been completed. 
The Qingyun Waterworks in Nanchang have gone into operation and 
are supplying water. The new building of the provincial library 
has also been officially completed last year. Construction of 
other projects, such as the Xinyu power plant, the Jingdezhen 
power plant, the Huangjin airfield at Ganzhou, the Luojia 
airfield at Jindezhen, the Mahuiling airfield at Jiujiang, the 
large chemical fertilizer project at Jiujiang, the paper factory 
at Yichun, the epoxy-propane projects at the Jiujiang chemical 
plant, and the Jiangxi salt mine, are being energetically 
pursued. The 45 priority technological transformation projects 
listed in the plan have progressed as required. Among these, 18 
projects, among them the long fiber polyester production line at 
the Jiangxi chemical fiber and chemical engineering plant, the 
Jiangxi Hongmei architectural ceramics production line, the 
vaccine production line at the Jiangxi pharmaceutical plant, and 
the Jiangxi traditional Chinese medicine plant, have all been 
completed and started production, construction of all the other 
projects is smoothly progressing. 
  There is brisk buying and selling in urban and rural 
markets, 
and the living standard of the people is continuously rising. 
All through 1993, there was a brisk and flourishing trade in 
urban and rural markets, and the growth of total retail sales of 
social commodities accelerated month after month. For the entire 
province, total retail sales of social commodities achieved the 
amount of 27.9 billion yuan, an increase of 21.2 percent over 
the preceding year. Commodity retail prices increased 11.1 
percent. Sales in rural markets looked better month after month, 
retail sales of commodities in counties and their subordinate 
administrative entities increased 22.5 percent over the 
preceding year, and were by 1.3 percentage points higher than 
the growth rate of total social commodity retail sales. Sales of 
means of production continued brisk, and aggregate sales of the 
materials system throughout the year amounted to 9.37 billion 
yuan, an increase of 54.8 percent over the preceding year. 
Following the economic upswing, incomes of urban and rural 
residents continued to go up. Average per capita net income of 
peasants reached 870 yuan, a 102 yuan increase over the 
preceding year, which amounted to a real, inflation factor 
discounted, increase of 4.6 percent. The living expenditure 
income of city and town residents was 1,800 yuan, an increase of 
380 yuan, or 26 percent, showing a real, inflation discounted, 
income increase of around 10 percent, and making this the year 
of the fastest increase since the initiation of reform and 
opening to the outside world. The average per capita salary and 
wages of staff and workers was 2,450 yuan, a 296 yuan, or 13.7 
percent, increase. Savings deposits of surplus money by urban 
and rural residents amounted to 32.165 billion yuan, of which 
8.385 billion had been newly added during the year, making this 
also a record year for new deposits in Jiangxi. The average per 
capita savings deposit was 811 yuan, an increase of 205 yuan 
over the preceding year. 
  Exports continued to increase, and efforts were intensified 
to attract merchants and capital. During the first half of 1993, 
exports were affected by the adverse situation in the 
international and domestic markets and declined for a time. 
However, after May, the provincial government took effective 
measures which again improved exports month after month. Total 
provincial exports amounted to $883 million, an increase of 14 
percent over the preceding year. Last year the government held 
trade talks in Hong Kong, Singapore, and other places to attract 
merchants and capital to Jiangxi, and did so with evident 
success. During the year, 1,293 new "three-capital" enterprises 
were approved, and contracts involving $1 billion of capital 
funds were signed. The amount of foreign capital actually used 
was $343 million, an increase of 72 percent over the preceding 
year. In this amount, $135 million were loans from foreign 
governments or international monetary organizations, while $208 
million were direct investments by foreign enterprises. 
  Continued development in various social fields. Smooth 
progress was made in the application of science and technology 
to promote agriculture and enterprises, also in priority 
undertakings and in "torch plan" projects. Throughout the year, 
a total of 420 achievements were gained in scientific and 
technological fields. Development of the high-tech production 
and development zone at Nanchang made good progress. 
Construction and reforms at the Nanchang University made smooth 
progress, and the university was granted authority to confer 
doctoral degrees, which put an end to the long history of 
Jiangxi being without any institution authorized to grant 
doctoral degrees. The institutions of higher learning and 
secondary professional training colleges throughout the province 
enrolled 46,800 students from higher and middle technical 
schools, an increase of 8,000 over the preceding year, and newly 
added several much needed undergraduate and technical 
college-level schools, also appropriately expanded the admission 
ratio of officially assigned and self-paying students. Planned 
parenthood work is continuously strengthened; the natural growth 
rate of the population throughout the province was 13.33 per 
thousand. Fresh developments were also registered in all such 
social affairs as cultural activities, public health, sports, 
broadcasting, television, information services, and publishing. 
  Delegates, the above-stated circumstances indicate that 
implementation of last year's economic and social development 
plan has in general been satisfactory. An excellent foundation 
was laid for the fulfillment five years ahead of time of the 
quadrupling of national production output value decided upon by 
the provincial party committee and the provincial government. 
This is the result of party committees and governments at all 
levels throughout the province firmly adhering to the 
fundamental line of "one central task and two basic points" 
[economic development plus adherence to the four cardinal 
principles and implementation of reform and the open policy]. It 
is also the result of conscientiously implementing all general 
and specific policies of the CPC Central Committee and of the 
State Council, and the result of the solidarity, struggle, and 
common effort of all the people of the province. 
  However, we must also realize that new contradictions and 
problems exist in our economic processes: First, the very 
conspicuous contradiction in the capital supply-demand 
situation; second, the uneven way in which economic 
profitability has been restored, many state enterprises are 
still incurring losses; third, the excessively high rate of the 
commodity price inflation during the second half of the year, 
which is having a painful effect on the livelihood of the 
lower-paid part of the population; fourth, the weakness of 
agriculture in its ability to withstand natural calamities. We 
shall in the future adopt effective measures and make a 
conscientious effort to resolve all these contradictions and 
problems. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66205 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  3 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> PROVINCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Guizhou Provincial Government Work Report </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Guizhou Provincial Government Work Report </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0212A Guiyang GUIZHOU RIBAO in Chinese 3 Feb 94 pp 1, 2, 
3 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0212A </F>
<F P=104>  Guiyang GUIZHOU RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> ["Government Work Report Delivered by Governor Chen </F>
Shineng (7115 1102 5174) at Second Session of Eighth Guizhou 
Provincial People's Congress on 21 January 1994"] 
  [Excerpts] [passage omitted] Nineteen Ninety Four is the 
first year of the current provincial government. Under the 
leadership of the Guizhou Provincial CPC Committee, we have 
persistently followed the basic line consisting of "one focus 
and two basis points," further implemented the guideline laid 
down by Comrade Deng Xiaoping's important talks which he gave in 
his South China inspection tour, earnestly carried out the major 
policy decision made by the central authorities in strengthening 
the macro-economic control, and energetically fulfilled the 
various tasks assigned us by the First Session of the Eighth 
Provincial People's Congress. We have overcome difficulties, 
thanks to the strenuous efforts made by all the people in the 
province. The whole province of Guizhou has witnessed a fine 
tendency of rapid economic growth. It is expected that Guizhou's 
GNP will increase by 9 percent, the output value of the primary 
industry 4 percent, that of secondary industry by 10.6 percent 
and that of the tertiary industry by 15 percent as compared with 
the previous year. All social undertakings have made new 
progress. 
  -- Rural Economy Continues To Develop. 
  Guizhou has successfully fulfilled its plans for the 
increase of the total output value in agriculture, that of 
peasants' income and that of the major farm products. The total 
output value in agriculture reached 18.48 billion yuan, up 4.1 
percent; the per capita net peasants' income 579 yuan, an 
increase of 73 yuan; total grain output 8.695 million tons, an 
increase of 10.2 percent; the total output of cured tobacco 
508,000 tons, up 13 percent; and the area planted with trees 
4.75 million mu, up 18 percent as compared with 1992. Township 
enterprises energetically promoted the shareholding and 
cooperative system, and established more than 100 small 
industrial districts with their total output value expected to 
reach 11.6 billion yuan, which represented an increase of 32.3 
percent. Funds totaling 280 million yuan were invested in 1993 
for the development of water conservancy projects. Over 580,000 
mu of sloping fields were converted to terraced fields and 
500,000 mu of farmland were planted with greenery. Peasants in 
the province added, improved and restored irrigation on 915,000 
mu of land. The development of bare land had started. The plan 
for the first-stage comprehensive agricultural development was 
over-fulfilled, and all the results were checked and accepted by 
the state. The use of science and technology to revitalize 
agriculture was continuously expanded. Major grain crops of fine 
strain were grown in more than 90 percent of the farmland in the 
province. Strenuous efforts were exerted to raise funds for 
purchasing farm and sideline products. Such funds were basically 
available. The policy to reduce peasants' burdens was earnestly 
implemented, and the irrational fees and charges which the 
central authorities had specifically abolished and those 
collected by the province were screened and sorted out, and good 
results were obtained in helping people eliminate poverty. A 
total of 610,000 mu of farmland were set aside for the 
development of the "feeding and clothing project." In addition, 
there were another 700,000 poor people whose per capita net 
income had exceeded 300 yuan. 
  --Steady Growth in Industry and Transportation. 
  The total industrial output value in 1993 is expected to 
reach 38 billion yuan, up 13 percent over 1992. The ratio of 
production and marketing was 93.3 percent. The large- and 
medium-sized state-owned enterprises played their role well as a 
mainstay, and turned out industrial products totaling 21.9 
billion yuan, which made up 58 percent of the total industrial 
output value in the province. Heavy industry witnessed a rapid 
growth. The output of major heavy industrial products such as 
iron and steel, aluminum ingot, raw coal and ferroalloy had 
increased on a fairly large scale. The annual power generation 
output reached 14.2 billion Kwh, an increase of 10.75 percent, 
of which the annual power generation output within the electric 
network totaled 12 billion Kwh, and the province sold 11 billion 
Kwh of electric power, up 10 percent in each instance. The 
province also sold electric power of 240 million Kwh to other 
provinces. The railways in the province handled freight totaling 
21.5 million tons, an increase of 700,000 tons over 1992. 
Structural readjustment was made in support of the transport of 
important materials. 
  --Realm of Circulation Continues To Expand. 
  The total volume of retail sales in the province in 1993 
is expected to reach 13.12 billion yuan, an increase of 12.7 
percent, of which the volume of retail sales of consumer goods 
rose 15.2 percent. Funds earmarked for the development of 
various markets reached 130 million yuan in 1993. There were 
2,633 markets of all kinds with their volume of business 
reaching 6.2 billion yuan, which indicated a growth of 14 
percent over 1992. There were 71 markets for producer goods with 
their volume of business totaling 2.42 billion yuan. The amount 
of inter-banks loans continued to increase. Securities 
registration companies were newly set up. Trading markets for 
real estate, technology and human resources were also 
established. 
  --Development of Nonstate Economy Accelerated. 
  The number of individual industrial and commercial 
establishments increased from 286,700 to 317,400, and their 
capital totaled 1.134 billion yuan. The number of private 
enterprises reached 3,733 with their registered capital totaling 
1.134 billion yuan. There were 740 Sino-foreign joint ventures 
and cooperative and foreign-funded enterprises with their 
registered capital totaling US$1.25 billion and total 
investments reaching US$1.563 billion. The rates of growth of 
collectively run and township-run and other types of industries 
rose by 23.7 percent, 43.9 percent and 26.7 percent 
respectively. The share of nonstate economic sector accounted 
for 28.3 percent of the total industrial output value, their 
market share in sales 48.3 percent and their investment share 
23.4 percent. 
  -- New Progress in Major Construction Projects. 
  Investments on fixed assets totaled 9.5 billion yuan, an 
increase of 34 percent, and that on local technical innovations 
totaled 1.22 billion yuan, up 13 percent. Progress was made in 
17 on-going major construction projects, and two of the projects 
were already completed. The Dana Highway was already completed 
and open to traffic. The Guizhou-Zunyi Highway for Motor 
Vehicle, the Guiyang East Exit Highway and the first stage of 
the Panbei Highway had already started. The Guizhou Section of 
the Nanning-Kunming Railway and the Longdongbao Airport were 
under construction. The telephone exchange capacity in the 
province was expanded by 65,000, and the three optical cables -- 
the Guizhou Section of the Nanning-Kunming cable, the Guizhou 
Section of the Fuzhou-Chengdu cable and the Guizhou-Xingyi cable 
had officially started. Nearly 1.3 billion yuan were invested 
for power generation. The first power generator set of the 
Panxian Power Station had gone into operation, the construction 
of the Dongfeng Power Station was accelerated. The Guiyang Power 
Station successfully developed technical innovations, and 
expanded its power generation capacity by 248,000 Kw. The 
national electric power grid had supplied electricity to 60 
counties in the province. Initial results were attained in 
renovating major cities such as Guiyang and others. The 
Huaguoshu Overpass in Guiyang was completed and open to traffic. 
The construction of public facilities in various townships was 
accelerated. Remarkable results were attained in geological 
prospecting. Excellent progress was made in prospecting for 
alumyte in northern part and diamond drilling in southeastern 
part of the province. 
  -- Remarkable achievements made in financial circles. 
  Although the province was faced with difficulties when 
revenues dropped at one time, the financial targets were 
nevertheless over-fulfilled, thanks to the joint efforts made by 
the party committees, governments and relevant departments at 
all levels. The revenues reached 5.62 billion yuan in 1993, up 
18.87 percent. The expenditures totaled 6.81 billion yuan, an 
increase of 12.33 percent. The national bank had a total deposit 
of 25.08 billion yuan in the province at the end of 1993, an 
increase of 4.48 billion yuan. The total balance of its loans 
reached 32.41 billion yuan, up 5.85 billion yuan. The banks and 
the financial departments had actively readjusted the structure 
in the supply of funds, vigorously supported the key 
construction projects, and had enough funds to pay for major 
expenditures. 
  -- Township Reform Further Deepened. 
  With the improvement of the responsibility system, the main 
form of which is the household contract that links remuneration 
to output, and the system of unified management combined with 
independent management, the network of collectivized services 
for agriculture was set up. The system of stockpiling and 
regulating grain reserves and that of venture capital were also 
set up. Progress was made in changing the way the enterprises 
operate, allowing them to have more power in production and 
management. The reform of the shareholding system was carried 
out quite well. The stocks of the two companies authorized to 
issue securities were already on the market. Twenty companies 
with limited liabilities were authorized to raise funds 
publicly, and more than 160 companies with limited liabilities 
were established. The department in charge of the reform of the 
circulation system continued to promote the "four opening-ups." 
Some state-owned and cooperative enterprises specialized in 
commodity circulation joined their efforts to "let the civilian 
sector run state-owned enterprises" on an experimental basis, to 
reform the shareholding system, to decontrol the prices for the 
purchase of grain and edible oil, and to allow more stores to 
sell and buy grain and cooking oil. The prices of nearly 95 
percent of consumer goods and 85 percent of producer goods are 
market regulated. New developments were made in reforming 
housing and the social security system. The reform of the system 
for the use of land had started in rural and urban areas. 
Twenty-two county (prefectural) level and three provincial-level 
units had carried out structural reform and tried to implement 
the civil service system. 
  -- Open Wider to the Outside World. 
  A total of 674 contracts were signed in state-run and 
provincial-run development zones with joint investments totaling 
2.29 billion yuan. Some of the funds had already arrived. Both 
hard environment and soft environment for investment were 
gradually improved. Investments were made in the Beihai Guizhou 
Economic Development Zone. Water, electric power and roads were 
connected, and ground was leveled for all construction sites. 
Remarkable results were attained in attracting foreign 
investments. Funds totaling 270 million yuan were attracted into 
the province. Foreign capital totaling US$49.2 million were 
actually in use in Guizhou, an increase of 37.7 percent over 
1992. Six prefectures and cities and 11 enterprises were newly 
added to the list of those which were authorized to handle 
import and export business. Their total volume of imports and 
exports reached US$351 million of which US$240 million came from 
exports, marking increases of 4.8 percent and 7.2 percent 
respectively. The province received 100,000 tourists from 
abroad, earning more than US$10 million of foreign exchange. The 
province also received 10 million domestic tourists, and 
recovered 400 million yuan from circulation. 
  -- New Strides Made in Vitalizing Guizhou by Relying 
on Science and Technology 
  The tempo in reforming the system of science and technology 
had quickened. A number of scientific research institutions had 
gradually become business-oriented. Nongovernmental scientific 
research institutions and organizations totalled 340 in number. 
New scientific and technological achievements including seven 
awards were made in 1993. Excellent results were attained in the 
development of the "Spark Program" and "Torch Program." Guizhou 
had selected and dispatched deputy county magistrates (city 
mayors) in charge of science and technology to 81 counties and 
cities. The CPPCC chapters, various democratic parties and the 
Federation of Industry and Commerce had done a great deal of 
work to support the border region and poor people and to 
revitalize Guizhou with science and technology. Basic education 
was strengthened, and 93.6 percent of school-age children 
attended schools. The share of students who received vocational 
education accounted for 47 percent of all the senior middle 
school students. Institutions of higher learning were readjusted 
and reinforced. Ordinary colleges added more than 40 special 
fields of study which meet the requirements for social and 
economic development. Remarkable achievements were made in 
promoting the "hope project." Eight Hope primary schools were 
built, helping 22,000 children deprived of education to go back 
to school. The problem of middle and primary schools teachers 
not getting paid on time was basically solved. 
  -- All Social Undertakings Continue to Develop. 
  The program for family planning was well implemented. The 
natural population growth rate was maintained at 14.7 per 
thousand, which was below the state target. Investments on 
environment protection were increased, and achievements made in 
attaining environmental and ecological balance. Public health 
undertakings strengthened the public health network at the 
county, township and village levels. Sports departments scored 
magnificent achievements at the Seventh National Sports Meet. 
Progress was registered in the press and publishing, radio and 
television, books and reference materials and archives. The 
supervisory, auditing, public security, judicial, industry and 
commerce, land control, statistics, civil affairs, 
nationalities, foreign affairs, religious, overseas and Taiwan 
Affairs departments had done a great deal of work for economic 
construction and for the reform and opening-up program. 
  -- Spiritual Civilization and Democratic Legal System 
Further Strengthened. 
  Various activities to learn from Lei Feng were launched 
throughout the province. Emphasis was placed on the development 
of professional ethics. All kinds of mass activities to promote 
spiritual civilization were developed. A total of 63 rural 
community centers to develop spiritual civilization, more than 
400 radio and television relay stations and 295 FM radio 
stations were built. Socialist democracy was further promoted 
and the legal system strengthened. Guizhou had formulated 25 
local administrative regulations, and submitted three laws of a 
regional nature to the provincial people's congress for approval 
in 1993. Positive results were attained in strengthening public 
security, and new achievements registered in protecting 
railways. Struggles of all forms were firmly waged against 
criminals, and measures taken to eliminate the factors of 
instability in the society and unflinchingly maintain political 
and social stability. Achievements were registered in combating 
corruption and maintaining a clean government. Breakthroughs 
were made in investigating and cracking down major criminal 
cases. The supervisory organs had accepted and put 1,273 cases 
on file for investigation; winded up 1,204 cases; and taken 
disciplinary actions against 972 persons. 
  Fellow deputies: 
  During the past year, Guizhou was faced with more problems 
in 
economic development. Funds were in shortage at all times, and 
revenues were once dropping. The "bottleneck effect" in 
hampering economic growth was particularly prominent. In 
addition, there were some new changes in the economic 
environment. Our economic work was carried out under 
considerably difficult conditions. We had concentrated our 
efforts in solving the outstanding problems in economic 
development and grasped the key link of fund shortage. While 
earnestly rectifying the financial order, strictly enforcing 
financial and economic discipline and strengthening 
macro-economic control and by winning the support of the state, 
vigorously attracting deposits, developing normal inter-bank 
financing and attracting more business investments, we had 
increased the total amount of funds, energetically purchased 
farm and sideline products, and supported key enterprises in 
production and key construction projects. In light of the grim 
situation of declining revenues, the provincial government 
timely organized a leading group to strengthen tax collection 
and financial work and established a multi-level tax collection 
management system whereas the province paid attention to the 40 
key tax-paying enterprises, while the prefectures and cities 
directed their attention to the major taxpayers. We had also 
solved the outstanding problem of the declining sales of 
cigarettes, timely readjusted the tax collection plans in 
various localities and ensured the tax payments from key 
enterprises. The cadres at all levels went to various localities 
to understand the situation, and various relevant departments 
made use of all available funds, electric power and 
transportation facilities and joined their efforts in overcoming 
all difficulties, and overfulfilling the target of balancing the 
budgets. When the term of the governments at all levels expired, 
the succeeding governments had timely stabilized and 
strengthened the government leading groups, maintained the 
continuity in implementing various policies, whipped up the 
enthusiasm of the cadres and the broad masses, and done a good 
job in fulfilling the plan for economic and social development 
in the province. Here, on behalf of the provincial people's 
government, I wish to pay my highest respect and express sincere 
appreciation to the broad masses of workers, peasants, cadres, 
intellectuals, PLA and armed police commanders and fighters 
stationed in Guizhou, public security police and bailiffs, 
militiamen and military reserve officers and men; to various 
democratic parties, the Federation of Industry and Commerce, 
mass organizations, patriotic personage without party 
affiliation, and to those compatriots from Hong Kong, Macao and 
Taiwan, overseas Chinese and foreign friends who had supported 
the construction projects in Guizhou! 
  While we reaffirm our achievements, we must also soberly 
realize the existing problems. The main problems are as follows: 
  1. The comparative advantage in agriculture is low. So is 
the 
rate of growth of peasants' actual income. Some of the 
preferential policies in support of agriculture were not well 
implemented. The contingent of agro-technicians at the basic 
level is not stable enough, and the development of the network 
of collectivized agricultural services was not fast enough. 
  2. The way the state-owned enterprises operate is not 
flexible. Some enterprises have experienced difficulties in 
operation, while others were running with low efficiency. The 
number of enterprises which suspended or slashed production was 
on the increase. Safety precautions were not well taken in the 
field of industry and transportation. 
  3. Funds are still in shortage. Money is extremely tight in 
some projects. Some counties are faced with financial 
difficulties. 
  4. Commodity prices have increased on a large scale. The 
general retail price rose by 15 percent in 1993, adversely 
affecting the living standard of some of the people. 
  5. Not enough efforts are made in carrying out reform in 
some 
fields and in opening up to the outside world. The state policy 
is not promptly implemented. 
  6. Some government organizations have not worked with high 
efficiency. A small number of government employees even abuse 
their authorities to carry out unhealthy practice, and some 
individual cadres are corrupt. In doing our work, we have not 
worked hard to investigate and study the new situation and new 
problems which have cropped up when the new system was replacing 
the old. We have miscalculated some of the problems which have 
emerged in the course of developing the economy. Nor have we 
timely and resolutely adopt measures to solve such problems. In 
this connection, we must earnestly sum up our experience, 
energetically improve ourselves and work hard to carry out our 
work well. 
  The year 1994 is a crucial year to continuously develop our 
economy in a fairly rapid pace and establish the socialist 
market economy. The main tasks of the government work in Guizhou 
this year are as follows: 
  -- We must energetically implement the guidelines laid down 
by the 14th National CPC Congress and the Third Plenary Session 
of the said congress; fulfill the tasks set by the Seventh 
Guizhou Provincial CPC Congress; quicken our pace in 
establishing the socialist market economic system; and 
concentrate our efforts in deepening reform, opening wider to 
the outside world. We must readjust our structure; strengthen 
our management; raise our efficiency; and achieve the three 
goals in ensuring that government functionaries are honest and 
hardworking. We must ensure that the growth rate of our GNP is 8 
percent, 9 percent if possible; that of the primary industry 2.2 
percent, 3.2 percent if possible; that of the secondary industry 
9.5 percent, 10.8 percent if possible (that of total industrial 
output value 12.5 percent, 13.5 percent if possible); that of 
the tertiary industry 14 percent, 15 percent if possible; and 
that of local revenues 9 percent, 10 percent if possible. In 
addition, we must develop all kinds of social undertakings in an 
all-round manner. 
  We have many favorable conditions to fulfill all the 
aforementioned targets, but we too are faced with many 
difficulties, particularly in reforming the system whereby tax 
revenues are shared by central and local authorities. Within a 
short period of time, this system will have a greater impact on 
the increase of the local revenues. Due to the implementation of 
the unified income tax system, enterprises will meet more 
challenges in market competition. It will be harder to check the 
price increases, solve the contradictions in the supply of funds 
and transportation, and fulfill the task of making structural 
readjustment. How to take the initiative in keeping pace with 
the new economic operational environment will be a severe test 
to all the sectors concerned. All departments must emancipate 
their thought, seek truth from facts, deepen the reform, open 
wider to the outside world, enhance revolutionary vigor, carry 
out their work in a down-to-earth manner, promote economic 
development, and maintain political and social stability while 
working hard to solve contradictions. In carrying out our work 
in 1994, we must pay attention to the following tasks: 
  (1) We must persistently regard the "three conducives" as 
the basic criterion in determining all policies and measures and 
in checking the merits and demerits of our work. In the field of 
ideology, we must guard against the rightist tendency. What is 
more important is to guard against the "leftist" tendency at the 
same time. We must dare to break with convention and carry out 
our work creatively. We must implement fully the policies 
clearly defined by the central and provincial authorities; and 
dare to explore and carry out on an experimental basis these 
policies which have not been clearly defined but are conducive 
to the development of the productive forces. We must also boldly 
use the experience of the coastal areas in developing market 
economy. 
  (2) We must persistently uphold the theory that "only 
development is a valid reason." While subordinating ourselves to 
the macro-economic control exercised by the central authorities, 
we must try our best to invigorate the local economy; face up to 
the imbalance of the economic developments in different regions; 
and encourage those areas where economic development is fast to 
develop even faster. We must strive to maintain a fairly high 
speed in developing the national economy, and increase local 
revenues while taking the situation as a whole into 
consideration. Efforts must be made to readjust our economic 
structure and raise our economic efficiency; try to find some 
realistic new ways to develop our economy, expand our existing 
financial resources and open up and cultivate new financial 
resources. 
  (3) On the basis of the principle that we should carry out 
our reform safely and reliably, we must exert even greater 
efforts in developing the reform program in all fields. 
Particular efforts must be made to make breakthroughs in 
developing the local economy. We must work out a policy to 
coordinate with the major reform programs which the state wishes 
to develop with a faster speed. We should pay attention to the 
way the new structure replaces the old; and take the interests 
of all parties into consideration when the major reform program 
affects some parties with vested interests. 
  (4) We must handle well the relations among reform, 
development and stability; use the results of economic 
developments to judge the effects of the reform program; and 
list the task of maintaining stability as an important item in 
the government work. We should strive to create a good 
environment to carry out reform, and persistently "grasp two 
links at the same time and attach equal importance to both." We 
must make arrangements to do our government work well and in an 
overall manner; work for material progress and at the same time 
ethical progress and for economic progress and at the same time 
social progress. In the course of marching forward, we must 
timely discover and solve new problems, particularly those of a 
tendentious nature; guide and give full play to the enthusiasm 
of the broad masses of cadres and people. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66206 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  15 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Features of New Tax System </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Features of New Tax System </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0364A Hong Kong TANG TAI [CONTEMPORARY] in Chinese No 
34, 15 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0364A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong TANG TAI [CONTEMPORARY] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Tian Li (3944 0500)] </F>
  [Text] Since 1 January 1994, information on a new tax 
system for Mainland China (PRC) has been emerging. According to 
news releases, reforms are being made in categories of tax 
classification, tax rates, and tax collection policy. 
<H5>  A New Tax System Based Primarily on the Turnover Tax System </H5>
  In December of last year, the PRC announced a set of 
temporary regulations pertaining to tax collection which are 
used to set up a new system of turnover taxes. This new system 
which includes a value-added tax, a consumption tax, and a 
business tax will be replacing the unified business tax system 
presently in use. These turnover taxes will apply to all 
enterprises and the products of their operations. These 
enterprises include state-owned enterprises, collective 
enterprises, shareholder enterprises, individual enterprises, 
foreign enterprises, and Chinese-foreign joint ventures engaged 
in production, marketing, and management operations from which 
their income is derived from Mainland China. The taxes are 
levied against this income. 
  After reforms have been initiated, turnover taxes will 
include the value-added tax, consumption tax, and the business 
tax which apply to enterprises funded both by domestic and 
foreign investment. The value-added tax will be levied on 
commodity traded and import items, a consumption or excise tax 
on selected consumer goods, and a business tax on productive 
labor and service industries, where no value-added tax is levied. 
  According to reliable sources, the value-added tax will be 
implemented apart from the price of an item; that is, basing the 
tax on the price of goods without including the value-added tax 
as the tax base. The taxpayer should take all the income from 
his orders and combine it with operating income to figure the 
value-added tax. At the same time, a tax credit system should be 
implemented where tax noted on the invoice may be offset. All 
steps taken before goods are sold must be priced according to 
the notation made on their invoices--whether or not the 
value-added tax was included. All invoices without notation of 
tax, or if the invoice used does not meet specifications, or if 
the invoice is not filled out as specified, no tax is offset. 
After reforms have been made, the basic rate for the value-added 
tax is set to be 16 percent, though a lower tax rate of 13 
percent will apply for basic food staples and agricultural 
production materials. 
  The PRC expects to levy a consumption tax on some goods that 
are specially regulated. Products determined preliminarily to 
have consumption taxes levied on them include tobacco, alcohol, 
color television sets, videorecorders, automobiles, limousines, 
jewelry, air conditioners, refrigerators, gasoline, diesel fuel, 
firecrackers and fireworks etc. The consumption tax, broken down 
to 12 categories, will be calculated according to the set quota 
and the set price for the product. 
  The business tax after reforms is directed primarily toward 
the tertiary industry, in the fields of transportation, finance 
and insurance, telecommunications, entertainment, construction 
and various service industries. For high-consumption karaoke 
music parlors, a high-rate business tax should be levied on them 
in accordance with local laws, or based on the volume of 
business generated by them, as determined by the local 
authorities. 
<H5>  New Classes of Tax Added </H5>
  One feature of the new tax system established by the PRC is 
the addition of some new classes of tax. 
  -- Real estate value-added tax beginning 1 January. Though 
the PRC will not tax income from rents on land leased out by 
local authorities, it does require such income to be included in 
the fiscal budget for management purposes. However, with respect 
to domestic and foreign enterprises engaged in real estate 
operations, not only will a business tax and an income tax be 
levied on them, they will also be subject to a real estate 
value-added tax. In the real estate transaction, a four-stage 
progressive tax rate is used on the value-added tax that is 
levied on the part of the real estate that has appreciated. The 
lowest rate of this progressive tax is 30 percent; the highest, 
60 percent. 
  -- A tax on trades of stock. The stamp tax presently levied 
on trades of stock is changed to become a tax on stock trades, 
at a tax rate ranging from 3 percent to 10 percent, that applies 
to both buyer and seller. 
  -- A real estate tax and a tax on motor vehicle and boat use 
by foreign enterprises and foreign personnel, with the 
possibility that the tax rate and taxes may be raised. At the 
same time, the local real estate tax and the tax on their 
permits to operate a motor vehicle or a boat will be canceled. 
  -- A public works tax on foreign enterprises, based on their 
sales income, at a rate of 0.5 percent to 1 percent. 
<H5>  An Increased Tax Burden and the Central Government's Tax </H5>
Income 
  In explaining this new tax system, the PRC states its 
purpose 
is to unify the tax laws, equalize the tax load for all, 
simplify the tax system, assign rights logically, and iron out 
allottment relationships, to assure financial income establish a 
tax system that meets the needs of a market economy. However, in 
reality, it is achieving two goals: One is increasing the tax 
load, so that taxes collected, in proportion to the total 
domestic national product, are increased. Second is that of the 
total amount of taxes collected, the proportion going to the 
central government is increased. 
  In Mainland China, about a third of the state-owned 
businesses operate at a loss. Besides problems to do with the 
system, an important reason for this state of affairs is the 
heavy tax load which does not allow enterprises to have 
sufficient capital to develop new products and improve their 
techniques. In facing such a great deficit, the Mainland Chinese 
Government does not exert any great effort to reduce 
expenditures, cut down on its bureaucratic work force, stop the 
improper use of public funds for meals, trips, entertainment, 
purchase of luxury cars etc. As it continues this policy of tax 
increases on enterprises already reeling from lack of vitality, 
it is like killing the goose that lays the golden egg. 
<H5>  Increasing Contradictions Between the Central Government and </H5>
Local Authorities 
  Another feature of this new tax system that is being 
implemented is its stab on the local authorities by clearly 
stating what are central government taxes, local taxes, and 
joint central-local government taxes. To assure that local 
authorities will turn in the central government's taxes on time, 
it has further ordered the establishment of two tax collecting 
agencies on the local level--one to collect for the central 
government, and the other, for the local government. Not only 
does such a move opt more of local benefits to the central 
government, it also dilutes the power of the local authorities. 
This move has led to much dissatisfaction among the locals. Some 
local areas, such as a few in Guangdong Province, have required 
enterprises to turn in, ahead of time, their central government 
taxes that are due on 1 January by the end of December to their 
local tax collection agency. Some local areas are very unhappy 
with this tax apportionment system and the establishment of two 
tax collecting agencies, and are dragging their feet 
implementing this order. It appears that such contradictions 
between the central government and local authorities on this tax 
collection matter will become greater as time goes by. It is 
serious enough that in several meetings, the PRC's vice premier 
Zhu Rongji has appealed to all local authorities in asking them 
to understand and support the tax apportioning system and not 
allow it to abort. 


China's New Tax System (Implemented on 1 Jan 1994) 

Three Reforms    Reform Goals            Practical          Tax Rate 
                                         Measures 

Taxation         Establish               Three new 
system           "circulation taxes"     classes of 
                 as heart of new         taxes: 
                 system 

                 Replacing               Value-added tax    Serves as main 
                 "centralized business                      body of 
                 tax" used in past                          circulation 
                                                            taxes 

                 Business tax            Tax 
                                         non-commodity 
                                         operations 

                 Consumption tx          Tax on luxury 
                                         items 
                                         (altogether 15 
                                         grades) 

                 Standardizing income    Standardization    Implement 
                 taxes of all            based on           proportional 
                 enterprises             circulation        tax rate of 33% 
                                         taxes, 
                                         eliminating 
                                         taxes listed 
                                         below: 

                                         Income tax for     Lowering 
                                         state-operated     enterprise 
                                         enterprises        income tax, but 


                                         Collective         Canceling fund 
                                         enterprise         for energy 
                                         income tax         sources and 
                                                            transportation 
                                                            construction 

                                         Private            Canceling fund 
                                         enterprise         for budget 
                                         income tax         adjustment and 

                                                            raising 
                                                            individual 
                                                            income tax at 
                                                            the same time 

                 Standardizing income    Eliminating 
                 tax on foreign and      "centralized 
                 domestic enterprises    business tax" 
                                         levied on 
                                         foreign 
                                         enterprises 

                 Standardizing           Combine three      About 5-45% 
                 "individual income      classes of tax: 
                 tax" 

                                         Individual         Levying 
                                         income tax         progressive 
                                         (foreign           taxes over set 
                                         citizens)          limit 

                                         Regulatory tax 
                                         on individual 
                                         income 
                                         (hinterland 
                                         residents) 

                                         Individual 
                                         business income 
                                         tax 

                 New kinds of taxes      Levying: 
                 added 

                                         Real estate        4-stage 
                                         value-added tax    progressive 
                                                            system, from 
                                                            30-60% 

                                         Bond transaction   3-10% levy on 
                                         tax                buyer and 
                                                            seller 

                                         Public works tax   0.5-1% based on 
                                                            sales income 

Tax              Increasing central      Establishing 3     Gradual 
apportionment    government's            tax classes        takeover in 
system           financial resources     (Note 1)           three years 

                 Avoiding unequal        Central            In transition 
                 regional tax burdens    government taxes   to tax 
                                                            apportionment 
                                                            system 

                 Delineating             Local government   60% for central 
                 central-local           taxes              government 
                 government rights 

                 Replacing               Shared taxes       40% for local 
                 all-inclusive                              government 
                 financial system of 
                 past 

                                         Taxes for          (Note 2) 
                                         central and 
                                         local 
                                         governments 
                                         collected and 
                                         managed 
                                         separately 

Profit           Changing the            Implementation 
apportionment    centralized method of   method to be 
for              collecting/expending    announced 
state-owned      used in past 
enterprises 

                                         Emphasis on 
                                         "enterprise 
                                         accounting 
                                         criteria" and 
                                         "general rules 
                                         of enterprise 
                                         finance" to 
                                         model the 
                                         relationship 
                                         between the 
                                         state and 
                                         enterprise 


Note 1: 
  Central government taxes: Includes custom duties, 
state-owned enterprise income tax, consumption tax, commodity 
tax, pooled income from railway, banking, and insurance 
operations, income tax from financial centers granted license 
from the People's Bank of China, and income from special items 
such as tobacco and alcohol. 
  Local government taxes: Business operation tax (after 
deduction for railway and banking insurance), local enterprise 
income tax, individual income tax, agricultural tax, town public 
works tax, market tax, and tax on prizes and awards. 
  Shared taxes: Value-added tax, stock transaction tax, 
resources tax (taxes on marine and aquatic resources go to the 
central government). 
Note 2: 
  First Year (1994): The central government will levy taxes 
based on its proportionate share of 60%, but it will 
return to 
the local authorities the same amount based on each province's 
obligation for this year. 
  Second Year (1995): The central government returns to the 
local government 10% of the tax collected in accordance 
with 
the proportional 40% retained by the central government. 
  Third Year (1996): The central government collects the full 
60% from the tax system. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66207 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  13 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Treasury Bond Market Boom Predicted </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Treasury Bond Market Boom Predicted </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0405 Beijing JINRONG SHIBAO in Chinese 13 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0405 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINRONG SHIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhao Jian (6392 0256)] </F>
  [Text] In two days, responsible government departments will 
announce to society arrangements for 1994 treasury body 
issuance. According to reli able news, on this occasion treasury 
bonds worth 100 billion yuan will be issued, newly increasing 
three-year term treasury bond collection receipts and two-year 
term material treasury bonds. Markets look good for both in 
terms of interest rates and circulation rates, in particular 
for making it easier for the ordinary masses to make purchases. 
This is the first boom of China's bond market in 1994. It has 
the attention not only of high level leadership but individual 
investors also are givi ng it the utmost consideration. 
  Treasury bonds have a good reputation, stable earnings and 
no 
income tax is paid on interes t. In most countries, they are are 
favored by investors who crown them "golden bonds." Since China 
first issued treasury bon ds in 1981, there were 10 years of 
apportioned issuance as an "arranged marriage." In 1991, after 
contracted buying and sel ling and competitive bidding were 
adopted, there were two years in the market of "free love." In 
1991 and 1992, treasury bo nd issuance was at 10 billion and 
eight billion, respectively, a honeymoon stage of "love at first 
sight." In 1993, due mai nly to interest rates unsuited to 
concurrent changes in financial markets, there was a hitch in 
treasury bond issuance; matchm akers cried out in alarm: they 
are "bitterly losing their golden luster." Nevertheless, after 
the appearance of state macroeconomic policy measures, since the 
end of January 1994, there has been a boom in Shanghai's 
treasury bond spot market. Bet ween 29 Jan and 11 Mar, all major 
types of 1991 to 1993 treasury bonds rose betwen 1.74 percent 
and 3.48 percent. Most investors and experts agree, 1994 will be 
the year of the treasury bond in China's bond market. 
  People's good view of the 1994 treasury bond market is not 
without reason. There is no exception whatever from advanced 
western econom ies by state fiscal treasury bond market measures 
providing long-term stable fund accumulation. The Chinese 
Government has clearly announced that as of 1994 central 
government financing will no longer directly provide overdrafts 
or loans from the Central Bank of China, but treasury bonds will 
make up fiscal deficits, accumulate construction funds, readjust 
and control the economy, and hold down inflation. This 
necessarily will expand the volume of treasury bonds issued, 
providing policy assu rances to establish a richly vital and 
effective bond market. The fiscal government and banks are now 
joining hands to improve on places in the past where 
second-grade markets were imperfect. For example, increasing the 
kinds of treasury bonds to one-half year, one year, two year and 
three year terms; raising interest rates and stressing sales to 
individuals; allowing certain kinds of bonds to be transferred 
on the market for short time periods and allowing transfer 
prices to fluctuate alo ng with the market. To make purchases by 
the masses and supervision easier, banks will open a network of 
74,000 bond purchase sites where customers can convert or obtain 
cash at any time. Banks also will concentrate a network of 
43,000 sites to handle reselling. The Central Bank of China will 
join market operations at an appropriate time. 
  Experts predict that expanding treasury bond issuance and 
exchange under conditions of stock market underselling for a 
certain time period may spur on currency circulation and affect 
stock prices while at the same time providing to most investors 
a kind of high-earnings safe financial commodity which could 
provide currency to three families [huo bi sanjia 6303 3024 0005 
1367], thereby inciting investors to stress investment, reducing 
speculation and making companies on the market more efficient 
and stress outstanding achievements. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66208 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  31 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FOREIGN TRADE, INVESTMENT </F>
<H3> <TI>   Leaders Attend Hi-Tech JV Inauguration </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Leaders Attend Hi-Tech JV Inauguration </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94P30040 Beijing BEIJING RIBAO in Chinese 31 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94P30040 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing BEIJING RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Editorial Report] Chinese leaders Tian Jiyun, Huang Hua, 
Zhang Baifa, Yang Xianzu, and Xiao Rong, as well as Yun 
Tong-yun, ROK minister of communications, attended the 28 March 
inaugural ceremony of the Jinggao Comprehensive 
Telecommunications Equipment Co., Ltd, a high-tech enterprise 
jointly financed and established by the Beijing 
Telecommunications Management Bureau and ROK's Kohap Group. This 
company will introduce advanced technology from the INC company 
of the United States to develop, produce, and sell credit card 
verification equipment and other telecommunications 
equipment. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66209 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  18 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FOREIGN TRADE, INVESTMENT </F>
<H3> <TI>   International Trade Institute Meeting Summarized </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    International Trade Institute Meeting Summarized </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0380A Beijing JINGJIXUE DONGTAI [ECONOMIC DYNAMICS] in 
Chinese No 1, 18 Jan 94 pp 32-35, 14 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0380A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJIXUE DONGTAI [ECONOMIC DYNAMICS] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Summary of the China International Trade Institute's 1993 </F>
academic year annual meeting, a joint symposium on articles 
solicited on "China's Foreign Trade Development and Reform" and 
"Thoughts and Explorations on Further Intensifying Foreign Trade 
Reform"] 
  [Text] The China International Trade Institute and the 
Chongqing Foreign Economic Relations and Trade Institute jointly 
held on 26-29 October 1993 in Chongqing City the China 
International Trade Institute's 1993 academic year annual 
meeting, a joint symposium on articles solicited on "China's 
Foreign Trade Development and Reform." MOFTEC Vice Minister Shi 
Guangsheng [4258 1639 3932] presented a written address at the 
symposium. Concerned experts and academics, such as Ji Chongwei 
[1323 1504 1218] [executive director of the State Council's 
Economic, Technological, and Social Development Research 
Center], He Fang [0149 2455], Chen Luzhi [7115 7627 4160], Huang 
Fanzhang [7806 5400 4545], and Li Fengting [2621 7364 0080] 
[vice president of the China National Chemicals Import and 
Export Corporation (SINOCHEM)], gave special reports on matters, 
such as the current international situation and China's foreign 
relations, economic cooperation in the Asia-Pacific region, 
China's foreign trade development strategy and intensification 
of foreign trade reform, and the conversion of operating forces 
and implementation of shareholding-system experiments by foreign 
trade enterprises. And over 100 participants from 28 provinces 
and cities throughout China held a heated discussion on the 
symposium's theme of "Ways To Establish a New Foreign Trade 
System and New Foreign-Trade-Enterprise Operating Forces 
Suited to the Needs of a Socialist Market Economy and 
International Trade Norms, To Promote the Sustained, Rapid, and 
Sound Growth of China's Foreign Trade." The major viewpoints 
were as follows: 
<H5>  I. Basic Views on China's Current Foreign Trade System </H5>
  The participating delegates held that through the last 15 
years of steady reform, while China's foreign trade system, 
particularly our export system, essentially conforms to 
international trade norms, with our export management and 
operations basically suited to the current need to establish a 
socialist market economy, certain unsuited parts still of course 
exist, which need to be gradually improved through intensified 
reform to meet the needs of developing a socialist market 
economy. The major issues that now need emphasis and 
intensified study to resolve are: 1) Our import-management 
system is severely backward, still managed through many 
administrative means of examination and approval. 2) Faced 
with "GATT reentry" and market economy development, many foreign 
trade enterprises are slow at converting their operating forces. 
In particular, the state-published "Regulations on Converting 
the Operating Forces of State-Owned Industrial Enterprises" and 
the foreign trade and economic cooperation sector's detailed 
implementation rules and regulations are not yet being 
implemented in many places, so need intensified implementation 
to ensure that foreign trade enterprises genuinely become 
import-export-commodity operators with independent operations, 
liability for profits and losses, and self-restraint and 
-development forces, to enhance their vigor and vitality, and 
improve their economic efficiency; 3. Our foreign trade 
legislation is weak, with its legal institutions and 
establishment in sharp need of strengthening, through forming as 
quickly as possible a complete legal system for socialist 
foreign trade and economic cooperation, in order to maintain a 
normal foreign trade order and ensure legitimate enterprise 
rights and interests, and to ensure that foreign trade reform is 
intensified steadily and our foreign trade and economic 
cooperation develop soundly. 4) Our foreign trade 
service-coordination mechanisms remain imperfect, meaning that 
we need to speed up reform of our Foreign-Trade-Commodity 
Chamber of Commerce to strengthen its service-coordination 
function, as well as bringing into full play the role of 
research and advisory bodies, such as foreign trade and economic 
cooperation research organs, colleges and universities, 
institutes, and associations. 5) Many local grass-roots foreign 
trade operations remain in difficulty, with system problems not 
yet essentially solved, requiring a faster pace of reform. 6) 
Regional barriers have not yet been dismantled fully, requiring 
the formation as quickly as possible of a consolidated policy 
and a uniform market, to adapt to expanded commodity circulation 
and deregulated operations. 
<H5>  II. Thoughts and Ideas on Further Intensifying Foreign Trade </H5>
Reform 
<H5>  1. On Establishing an Overall Foreign-Trade-Reform </H5>
Ideology, To Strengthen Related Ideas and Measures 
  The participants held that while our foreign trade reform is 
aimed at speeding up foreign trade growth, our foreign trade 
growth is faced with two large markets, domestic and overseas, 
subject to sharp and complex market competition, and restricted 
by many factors, both domestic and external. Our new foreign 
trade system needs to be suited not only to the needs of our 
socialist market economy and international trade norms, but also 
to those of domestic and overseas business and trade conditions, 
overseas business and trade developments (such as increased 
export earnings), and high foreign-trade economic efficiency. 
So we need to look at the overall situation, by working in 
close cooperation with other system reforms, such as of our 
overall national economy, particularly banking and foreign 
exchange, revenue and taxation, investment, and state-assets 
management, and by making overall plans for intensified related 
reforms. We need to emphasize the four related reforms of 
further improving our foreign trade macroeconomic regulation and 
control system, converting the operating forces of foreign trade 
enterprises, strengthening foreign trade service-coordination 
mechanisms, and establishing and perfecting legal safeguards and 
oversight mechanisms, by dovetailing them, making them 
complementary, operating them effectively, and bringing the 
functions and roles of all mechanisms into full play for a 
comprehensive effect. Meanwhile, we need to emphasize overall 
planning with due consideration for all concerned in foreign 
trade reform at all levels from the center to the local 
grass-roots, considering the real conditions and interrelations 
among foreign trade enterprises of all varying categories and 
various economic components, and by combining foreign trade with 
overseas business and investment, and our import and export 
systems, for overall related reforms. 
  Some papers summarized the substance of our new foreign 
trade 
system as follows: A new foreign trade system in a socialist 
market economy combining opening to the outside world with 
internal opening, mostly state-owned foreign trade enterprises 
with diversified economic components, standardized macroeconomic 
state management with independent enterprise operations, export 
incentives with correspondingly open import markets, and a 
consolidated, legalized, and internationalized national foreign 
trade policy with transparency. 
  Some participating delegates suggested that in the next five 
to seven years, we should take full reform steps that supplement 
each other for "three deregulations and two controls": 1) We 
should gradually deregulate our foreign trade operating 
authority, to ultimately elminate our examination and approval 
system for foreign trade operating authority. 2) We should 
gradually deregulate our import market, to realize the principle 
of import-export balance. 3) We should gradually deregulate our 
exchange rates and foreign exchange control system, by 
practicing a market-based single floating exchange rate system, 
and changing our quota system to a cash system, so that the RMB 
will be a convertible currency. 4) Based on stronger legal 
institutions, we should practice effective foreign trade 
control, so that our foreign trade policy becomes more uniform, 
legal, internationalized, and transparent. 5) We should tighten 
our foreign trade macroeconomic regulation and control 
capability, by using mostly economic means to bring the role of 
large- and medium-sized state enterprises into full play, while 
taking the necessary administrative and organizational steps. 
  Other papers suggested that our foreign trade and economic 
cooperation sector should be a relatively independent system, 
with reform operations needing macro-micro coordination and 
import-export consolidation, and that we should try a 
systems-analysis methodology to find the particular steps and 
necessary prerequisites for perfecting China's foreign trade 
system. And yet other papers used the evolution of the "general 
business and trade" order to study and explore ways to further 
intensify foreign trade reform. 
<H5>  2. On Further Perfecting Our Foreign Trade Macroeconomic </H5>
Regulation and Control System 
  The improvement of our foreign trade macroeconomic 
regulation 
and control system is aimed at using mostly economic, legal, and 
policy means supplemented with the necessary administrative ones 
to exercise effective macroeconomic regulation and control over 
foreign trade, so that it can grow in a sustained, rapid, and 
sound way with better economic efficiency. This will mean: 
  1. We need to speed up the conversion of 
responsible-government-department foreign trade functions, to 
strengthen their macroeconomic regulation and control 
capability. Some papers suggested that while the direction is 
separation of government administration from enterprise 
management, the conversion of enterprises from government 
subsidiaries to relatively independent commodity operators will 
require a process, to which the keys are how to take timely 
separation steps and correctly grasp the government-sector 
functional-conversion dynamics. It was suggested that we adopt 
the principles of "dividing up functions, demarcating status, 
making the best use of the situation, and succeeding when 
conditions ripen," with priorities being: A) To rationalize 
property rights relations, by separating government 
administration from business management, leaving the government 
functional sector to manage well state-owned assets. B) To 
reform our personnel system, by strengthening auditing 
oversight, leaving the government functional sector to select 
and appoint good managers. C) To tighten macroeconomic 
regulation and control, by ensuring fair competition, to force 
the government functional sector to enhance its trade 
management; the government functional sector needs to enhance 
its service-coordination in areas, such as credit funds, foreign 
trade shipping, foreign exchange management, information 
forecasting, and sending of personnel abroad. 
  2. We need to speed up reform of our foreign trade planned 
management system, using mainly macroeconomic planning and 
guidance targets to guide enterprise operating targets; for 
particularly important foreign trade commodities of importance 
to the national economy and the people's livelihood, we need to 
exercise quota control, to coordinate and balance domestic and 
overseas market supply and demand relations. Some participating 
delegates suggested that the state should draw up and publish 
national foreign-trade-export macroeconomic annual guidance 
plans, with all provinces, municipalities, and autonomous 
regions drawing up midlevel-economic foreign-trade-export 
guidance plans, leaving enterprises to set their own export 
plans based on macroeconomic targets and operating aims; planned 
quota control and distribution should be gradually converted to 
the Chamber of Commerce controlling overall export-commodity 
volume on its own under state guidance; we need to 
scientifically draw up mid- and long-term development plans for 
foreign trade exports, practicing a matched externally oriented 
industrial-development policy, to lay the industrial grounds for 
long-range growth of foreign trade exports. 
  3. We need to bring into full play the regulatory impact on 
foreign trade of economic leverage, such as exchange rates, 
credit, and taxation. We need to accelerate reform of our 
foreign exchange management system. Based on ensuring a 
national foreign exchange balance, we need to strive to realize 
as quickly as possible a controlled, unitary, floating exchange 
rate system; the central bank should set up a foreign exchange 
levelling fund, to regulate and control foreign-exchange-market 
supply and demand and exchange rates; exchange rates should be 
essentially adjusted to float according to market forces. Some 
participating delegates suggested that we should basically 
stabilize the RMB market exchange rate at a level slightly lower 
than its real value, while eliminating our method of foreign 
exchange quotas and enterprise payment to the state without 
compensation of some foreign exchange quotas; we should 
eliminate our foreign exchange sharing system, and establish an 
export tariff system; we should establish a uniform foreign 
exchange conversion market and a state import-export special 
bank; while maintaining the basic stability of the RMB exchange 
rate, we should gradually make it convertible, by beginning 
convertibility first in trade, and then gradually moving to 
capital convertibility. 
  As to the use of credit and tax leverage, some participating 
delegates suggested directly linking credit scale to export 
scale, and linking loan interest rates to export growth rates; 
the tax-rebate budget should be matched with export plans, with 
prompt and adequate rebates based on export achievements; income 
tax payments by foreign trade enterprises should use the 
export-growth progressive-regressive tax rate; tax-revenue 
reform should be speeded up, to achieve separation of taxes from 
profits; foreign trade company profits, except for tax payments, 
should be mostly kept by enterprises to make up working-capital 
shortages; China's overall tariffs should be adjusted down to 
the proper rational level for a developing country; the 
tariff-rate gap should be widened between finished products and 
raw materials, semi-finished products, and parts. 
<H5>  III. Thoughts and Suggestions on Converting the Operating </H5>
Forces of Foreign Trade Enterprises 
  Many participating delegates noted that converting 
enterprise 
operating forces is the central link in and grounds for 
promoting our socialist market economy establishment. In order 
to speed up the conversion of operating forces by foreign trade 
enterprises, the current key task is to intensify the 
implementation of the "Regulations" and the foreign trade and 
economic cooperation sector's detailed implementation rules and 
regulations, so that foreign trade enterprises can genuinely 
become independent foreign-trade-commodity operators with the 
"four independents," to put enterprise operations onto a 
market-economy track. Mainly the following thoughts and ideas 
were set forth to accomplish this: 
<H5>  1. Basic Thoughts on Converting the Operating Forces of </H5>
Foreign Trade Enterprises 
  Some participaing delegates noted that converting the 
operating forces of foreign trade enterprises means that foreign 
trade enterprises will have to meet the needs of market economy 
development as quickly as possible, by making operating autonomy 
their premise, liability for profits and losses their 
motivation, markets their orientation, economic efficiency their 
focus, optimum composition their grounds, and development of 
foreign trade and business their aim. New operating forces for 
foreign trade enterprises means establishing overall related 
mechanisms, such as decisionmaking mechanisms, development 
mechanisms, business accounting and financial management 
mechanisms, information collection and feedback mechanisms, and 
ideological and political work guarantees. 
  The key current steps for converting the operating forces of 
foreign trade enterprises are separating government 
administration from business management, and dividing up the two 
powers. This means rationalizing property rights relations, by 
inventorying the assets and funds of foreign trade 
enterprises, correctly assessing state assets, establishing an 
enterprise incorporation system and, through practicing 
shareholding, ensuring that foreign trade enterprises evolve 
internal plural property rights relations, thus cutting off the 
subsidiary relationship of enterprises to responsible government 
departments, and paving the way for foreign trade enterprises to 
achieve the "four independents." 
<H5>  2. Speeding Up the Conversion of Operating Forces by Large </H5>
and Medium-sized State-Owned Foreign Trade Enterprises 
  Through converting operating forces, we need to actively 
cultivate and develop large state-owned foreign trade 
enterprises (or groups), by bringing their dominant role into 
full play, in order to strengthen our socialist market economy 
foundation. Through intensified internal enterprise reform, we 
need to establish a modern business management system, to raise 
enterprise quality and shift the development focus of large and 
midsize state-owned foreign trade enterprises to a track of 
higher economic efficiency, so that they can make greater 
contributions to national export earnings. The state needs to 
provide the climate and grounds for fair competition to large 
and medium-sized state-owned foreign trade enterprises, 
supporting and encouraging enterprises to take the route of 
conglomeration, industrialization, and internationalization. 
Some papers suggested that domestic credit should be slanted 
toward large state-owned foreign trade enterprises; control of 
overseas loans to large foreign trade enterprises should be 
appropriately eased; the state-owned asset appreciation rate, or 
operating scale and efficiency, should be the basic criterion 
for assessing the proficiency of large and medium-sized 
state-owned foreign trade enterprises. 
<H5>  3. Sharply Improving Management Within Enterprises </H5>
  We need to establish and improve all internal-management 
rules and regulations, particularly strengthening financial and 
fund management, control of subordinate and overseas enterprises 
at all levels, and oversight and control of investment and 
shareholding enterprises; we need to emphasize the development 
of the employee ranks, finding ways to stop the talent outflow. 
Some papers suggested that foreign trade enterprises need to 
establish a talent concept, by setting up ability mechanisms, to 
raise enterprise-employee quality; we need to intensify reform 
of enterprise personnel and labor-wage systems, advertising for 
company managers based on the principles of "openness, equality, 
competition, and excellence," and eliminating enterprise 
administrative rankings; we need to make company managers more 
professional and group-oriented, to form a rational professional 
management group structure, by regarding management as a 
specialized profession, to achieve professional management; we 
need to adopt diversified forms of regular specialized education 
and training for enterprise employees, by steadily upgrading 
employee knowledge and skills, to meet the personnel needs of 
foreign business and trade and enterprise operating development 
in various stages, so that enterprises can maintain strong vigor. 
<H5>  4. On Actively Promoting Enterprise Structural Reorganization </H5>
  We need to use forms, such as shareholding and holding 
[companies], to form many subsidiary companies, joint-venture 
enterprises, and enterprises with domestic links, to achieve the 
optimum disposition of human, financial, and material factors; 
we need to develop shareholding group-enterprises with 
integrated production, supply, and sales, moving in the 
direction of multi-functional, industrialization, multipurpose, 
and internationalization; we need to organize a comprehensive 
business association to achieve operation of scale. 
  The symposium discussed the matter of shareholding 
experiments by foreign trade enterprises, suggesting the 
problems that need attention in experimental work. The 
participating delegates held that while the work of conducting 
shareholding experiments in China's foreign trade enterprises 
had begun rather late, it was developing very quickly, with the 
current issues needing attention being: experiments must 
strictly adhere to the pertinent state-set rules and 
regulations, being conducted according to state-provided policy 
and examination and approval formalities and standards; we need 
to experiment actively and boldly, first experimenting and then 
disseminating, moving from the easy to the hard for steady 
development; the current priority is to do a good job of 
attracting enterprise employees to buy shares in 
limited-liability company experiments, with qualified 
enterprises allowed to conduct limited-company experiments 
through directed or public fundraising; experimental enterprises 
must conduct objective assets assessments according to pertinent 
provisions, correctly dividing up and dealing with the matter of 
state assets and enterprise assets. As enterprise shareholding 
in China is still a new thing, with how to organically combine 
the successful experience of advanced Western countries with 
China's national conditions and foreign trade enterprise 
realities being a new problem, we need to act in the light of 
practical experience, while continuing to study and explore. 
  Some of the symposium's papers and deliberation statements 
also studied and explored matters, such as policy and strategic 
problems related to intensified foreign trade reform, and 
foreign trade operations, presenting certain thoughts and 
suggestions. In addition, this symposium also explored the new 
state of economic cooperation in the Asia-Pacific region and the 
matter of strengthening cooperation in the Asia-Pacific region, 
as well as analyzing and studying the Fifth APEC Ministerial 
Conference that would be held in mid-November in Seattle, and 
the idea put forth by U.S. President Clinton for the 
establishment of a "New Asia-Pacific Community." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66210 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  24 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FOREIGN TRADE, INVESTMENT </F>
<H3> <TI>   International Balance of Payments During 1993, 1994 </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    International Balance of Payments During 1993, 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0377A Beijing GUANLI SHIJIE [MANAGEMENT WORLD] in 
Chinese No 52, 24 Jan 94 pp 83-87 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0377A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUANLI SHIJIE [MANAGEMENT WORLD] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wang Zhichao (3769 3112 6389), Investigation </F>
Statistics Department, Chinese People's Bank Head Office: 
"Analysis of the 1993 International Balance of Payments 
Situation, and Forecast for 1994"] 
  [Text] The national economy saw sustained growth during 
1993 as a follow-on to 1992. Vigorous domestic demand produced a 
situation in which the domestic economy was able to absorb more 
than it could supply. This produced a rise in prices that became 
the main reason for limiting exports and the encouraging 
imports. A substantial adverse balance between imports and 
exports occurred during 1993. China's international balance of 
payments took a pounding, but high speed economic growth 
produced an in-flow of foreign capital that made up the deficit 
in current accounts. Foreign exchange reserves increased 
slightly, the central bank's foreign exchange holdings remaining 
basically stable. 
<H5>  1. Changes in the International Balance of Payments </H5>
  Customs statistics show maintenance of a fairly rapid growth 
momentum in China's foreign trade between January and November 
1993, imports and exports totaling $164.2 billion, up 16.5 
percent from the same period in 1992. Export growth slowed to 
$78.25 billion while imports increased greatly to $85.95 billion 
in a respective 6.2 and 27.8 percent increase over the same 
period in 1993. The growth rate difference between the two was 
21.6 percentage points, and the adverse balance of trade was 
$7.7 billion. However, in 1992 China had a favorable balance of 
trade. This and other favorable balance of payments made up for 
the 1993 adverse balance. By October 1993 the national foreign 
exchange balance was $260 million more than at the end of 1992. 
  Inasmuch as total trade receipts account for more than 70 
percent of China's international balance of payments in today's 
outwardly oriented economy, an analysis of changes in trade 
receipts will substantially reflect changes in the country's 
international balance of payments today. An analysis of 1993 
shows the following several characteristics: 
  1. Change from a favorable to an unfavorable balance between 
imports and exports beginning at the end of 1992, the 
unfavorable balance running to $2.021 billion. Except at the 
beginning of the year, 1993 showed an unfavorable balance, the 
unfavorable balance for the first three quarters of the year 
amounting to $1.173, $2.321, and $3.007 billion respectively. 
October and November showed an adverse balance of $586 million 
and $613 million respectively. 
  2. The adverse balance of trade resulted from lackluster 
exports and a dramatic increase in imports. Since August 1991, 
imports have increased faster than exports. In 1991, exports 
increased by 15.81 percent and imports increased by 19.57 
percent, exports being 3.76 percentage points less than imports. 
In 1992, exports increased 18.2 percent and imports increased 
26.35 percent, exports being 8.15 percentage points less than 
imports. During the first three quarters of 1993, exports were a 
respective 17.94, 19.9, and 28.9 percentage points less than 
imports, and during October and November, the difference was a 
respective 16.63 and 21.7 percentage points. 
  3. During 1993, imports and exports were characterized as 
follows: 1) Generally slow growth of trade; however, 
compensation trade, trade from the processing of imported raw 
materials, and foreign trader investment in enterprises, which 
required investment in imported equipment and goods, and a 
supply of imported materials and parts for processing into 
products for sale within China, increased more rapidly. 2) 
Imports and exports of primary products declined over the same 
period in 1992, but imports and exports of industrial 
manufactures increased. However imports were far greater than 
exports. 3) In terms of different kinds of enterprises, a sharp 
increase occurred in the imports and exports of the three kinds 
of partially or wholly foreign-owned enterprises, while the 
exports of state-owned enterprises, which are China's main 
exporters, showed negative increase. 4) Changes in the regional 
make-up of foreign trade included a fairly rapid increase in 
China's exports to neighboring countries and territories 
stemming from the strong growth of the southeast Asian economy, 
and a rapid increase in imports from developed countries. 
  4. Since July, China has inaugurated a series of 
macroeconomic structural readjustments. The state intervened in 
foreign exchange swap markets, the swap market price gradually 
stabilizing at $1 to 8.80 yuan renminbi. This price was 
extremely beneficial both in promoting the export trade and in 
ensuring foreign exchange availability for key projects. This 
eliminated the effect of the dual pressures that the foreign 
trade sector faced from rising prices paid to goods suppliers 
and foreign traders demanding a lower price on goods they 
purchased, a situation that stemmed from large rises and falls 
in swap market foreign exchange prices during the first half of 
the year. Structural readjustments also lowered the temperature 
of the hot real estate and development zone markets. Thus, the 
amount of foreign exchange needed for construction materials 
imports declined, and inventories of raw and processed materials 
such as processed steel products rose. The increase in urban 
resident and social group consumption also abated. Because of 
the shortage of capital and structural readjustments, fixed 
assets investment growth momentum gradually declined thereafter, 
and all macroeconomic indicators gradually improved, creating a 
relaxed environment for imports and exports. With improvement of 
the macroeconomic situation, imports and exports will enter a 
fairly stable growth stage after the beginning of the fourth 
quarter; however, a basic reversal in the adverse balance 
between imports and exports for the whole year will be very 
difficult. For the year as a whole, a certain adverse balance 
between imports and exports will remain, and a demand for 
foreign exchange that is greater than the amount of foreign 
exchange that exports generate will continue into 1994. However, 
because of the acceleration of capital inflow in the short run, 
plus the country's current foreign exchange holdings and the 
Bank of China's foreign exchange supply, continuation of the 
present adverse balance between imports and exports poses no 
risks. 
<H5>  2. Analysis of the Reasons for Changes in Current Accounts </H5>
  The year 1993 was one of high speed growth for the national 
economy. Thanks to the inertia provided by a 12.8 percent growth 
in GDP during 1992, GDP for the first three quarters of 1993 
increased 13.3 percent over the same period in the previous 
year. Forecasts call for approximately 13 percent growth for the 
year as a whole. Without doubt, the current adverse balance 
between imports and exports is attributable to changes in the 
operation of the economy in 1993. This is another way of saying 
that strong domestic investment demand and consumption demand 
pulled a rise in prices, which delivered an enormous pounding to 
the balance of foreign trade, holding down exports and 
increasing imports. Specifically, the following reasons apply: 
  1. A Cumulative and Easy Money Policy, and Too Large a 
Supply 
of Currency 
  The adverse effect of money on an economy is caused by too 
great an amount of money becoming available within a short 
period. Following the retrenchment between October 1988 and 
October 1989, China pursued an easy money policy beginning in 
1990. Between 1990 and 1992, the central bank increased the 
basic money supply by 26.9, 29.1, and 17.4 percent each year. 
This showed that total money supply in the broad sense, 
M[.sub]2[/], also reached 27.9, 26.8, and 31.3 percent, 
thereby basically exceeding the sum of both economic growth and 
the rise in prices for the same year. One might assume that the 
pessimistic forecasts of principal economic entities regarding 
the overall operating environment caused a blockage of channels 
for the transfer of currency to the economy. The currency supply 
became a cumulative force waiting to be released. 
  In 1992, the economy began to liven up. It became quite 
apparent at this time that the money supply was beginning to 
move in the direction of highly fluid currency levels such as 
M[.sub]0[/], and M[.sub]1[/]. This meant that during 1993, 
M[.sub]2[/] fell from 31.3 percent at the end of the year to 
30.3 percent at the end of March, 26.5 percent at the end of 
June, 22.2 percent at the end of September, and 24.2 percent at 
the end of November. Despite the month-by-month slide, it 
remained high over the long run. Meanwhile, growth of money in 
the narrow sense was fast at 19.2 percent in 1990, 24.2 percent 
in 1991, and 35.8 percent in 1992. During 1993, it remained 
substantially stable at a 35 percent increase for the first half 
of the year, beginning to slow only during the last half of the 
year. Beginning from 34.2 percent in June, it declined to 20.5 
percent in September, and 20.9 percent in November. During the 
same period, M[.sub]0[/] -- the amount of money in 
circulation -- exceeded 40 percent for 8 months, going from 31.3 
percent early in the year to 54.1 percent at its height in June 
and returning to 38.2 and 35.3 percent respectively in October 
and November. 
  As the government gradually relaxed trade restrictions and 
China's economy became linked more and more to the world 
economy, monetary policy played an increasingly stronger role on 
the international balance of payments. This has been attested to 
by the central bank's balance sheet in recent years. We know 
that the basic money supply equals net assets abroad and 
domestic credit. This is a simple identical equation used in 
accounting. When the money demand constant remains stable, 
meaning that the basic money supply remains stable, changes in 
domestic credit will be made up by net assets abroad. The 
cushioning effect of net assets abroad partially vitiates the 
effect of central bank monetary policy, limiting the extent of 
its effectiveness. Of course, in addition to considering the 
amount of assets available at this time, one must also take into 
account the following: the economic entities holding the assets, 
ability to draw on them quickly, and the psychological effect of 
the state's drawing on foreign exchange assets. Since 1992, the 
basic amount of currency put into circulation has varied, e.g., 
it declined from 26.5 percent at the beginning of 1992 to 17.4 
percent at the end of the year, and to 6.5 percent at the 
beginning of 1993 after which it began to climb again. It went 
from 19.8 percent in February to 20.8 percent in June, 23.2 
percent in August, and 34.8 percent in October. This 
corresponded to the amount of domestic credit for the most part, 
which went from 18.3 percent at the end of 1992 to 33.9 percent 
in October 1993. Since 1993, foreign exchange holdings have 
remained basically unchanged. Foreign exchange savings increased 
hardly at all between November and the beginning of 1993. One 
can conclude that the effect of currency on the economy, 
particularly in the foreign trade sector where transfers require 
a certain amount of time, is gradually producing an effect on 
the international balance of payments. 
  2. Speed of Investment in Fixed Assets Fairly High 
  This is one of the main features of the current economic 
cycle. The pull of investment became the main force spurring 
high speed operation of the entire economy. In 1992, investment 
in fixed assets owned by the whole people reached 40.7 percent. 
Since 1993, there has been no abatement in enthusiasm for 
starting projects by all jurisdictions and all sectors because 
of the returns that can be made, nor hast there been any marked 
improvement in the kinds of projects in which investments are 
being made. During the first half of the year, state-owned units 
investment in fixed assets increased by more than 70 percent. 
Despite a downturn following readjustment and control, the 
cumulative 10 month increase was still 65.2 percent. The 
domestic economy cannot stand an increase of investment in fixed 
assets on such a scale; thus, expansion of imports was needed to 
satisfy domestic demand. 
  3. Sustained Rise in Domestic Prices, Particularly in Large- 
and Medium-Sized Cities 
  Pulled by overly high fixed assets investment demand and 
stable yet rising consumption demand, nominal variates changed 
in the face of shortages, the price level rising to check the 
gap between supply and demand. Moreover, change in the price 
level pulled imports and exports in turn, bringing about 
changes. On the one hand, the rise in prices brought the 
prospect of profits, which stimulated hot selling goods such as 
building materials and electrical appliances. On the other hand, 
the rise in prices caused a rise in the foreign exchange cost of 
exports. A shortage of major export commodities occurred, 
foreign trade corporations finding it more difficult to assemble 
exports. In March 1993, retail prices of social commodities 
broke the double digit mark to reach 10.2 percent after 
increasing 5.4 percent in the previous year. By September, 
prices rose a cumulative 12.1 percent to 14.5 percent for the 
month. Meanwhile, the staff member and employee 14.8 percent 
cost of living index reached 16.9 percent in September. As the 
economy heated up, once again it became more profitable to see 
commodities in the domestic market rather than export them. 
  4. Decline in Export Foreign Exchange Conversion Rate; Large 
Outflow of State-owned Assets 
  Foreign exchange receivable from exports for the period 
January through July 1993 totaled $36.798 billion, but only 
$20.306 billion, or 55.18 percent, of foreign exchange was 
converted. In addition to an increase in exports by three kinds 
of partially or wholly foreign-owned enterprises, and an 
increase in the percentage of exchange settlements not handled, 
the main reason for the decline in the rate of foreign exchange 
conversions was an increase in foreign accounts receivable, 
which were retained abroad for investment. Furthermore, 
insufficient attention was paid to follow-up work in verifying 
and writing off exports after the fact, so where large amounts 
of foreign exchange went was a mystery. 
  5. External Economy Unsatisfactory 
  Foreign trade corporations export difficulties increased as 
a 
result of the general economic slump and recession in Western 
industrial countries, a rise in trade protectionism, current 
trade frictions between China and the United States, and trouble 
from constant anti-dumping investigations in the E.C. 
  The world economic situation has declined continuously since 
the beginning of the 1990s. In 1992, world GNP increased only 
0.7 percent, and the 1993 increase is forecast at 0.9 percent. 
In 1994, the world economy may begin to revive. Forecasts call 
for a 2.6 increase in world GNP then. In recent years, 
international trade has been in a similar slump. Forecasts call 
for a respective 4.3 and 6.2 percent increase in world trade 
volume in 1993 and 1994. 
  Forecasts call for a 1 percent increase in the GNP of 
developed market economy countries. This includes a 2.7 percent 
increase in North America, and a 0.4 percent decline in the EC. 
The main reason for the economic recession in developed 
countries is insufficient domestic and foreign demand. In 1993, 
developed countries' exports declined 0.1 percent and imports 
increased 0.1 percent. In developing countries -- particularly 
in southeast Asia -- economic growth is strong. In 1993, GNP 
increased 5.3 percent in developing countries, and imports and 
exports increased by 9.9 and 8.4 percent respectively. During 
the next two years, an even more booming development trend will 
continue. Since the economy of East Europe is in a period of 
change of economic systems, all sorts of political and economic 
conflicts are extremely glaring there. Its economy is in severe 
recession, both production and exports declining. 
  The world economic recession has a direct effect on China's 
foreign trade. First of all, domestic demand is insufficient in 
numerous countries. This limits the increase in China's exports. 
Second, owing to the insufficient domestic demand in countries 
undergoing an economic recession, products must be exported in 
order to be sold. Consequently, international market competition 
is more intense, adding to China's export difficulties. Finally, 
the intense export market competition makes it easier for China 
to import. 
  In summary, the effect of the world economic slump on 
China's 
foreign sector is: bad for exports; good for imports. 
<H5>  3. Capital Receipts and Expenditures </H5>
  China's 1992 international balance of payments schedule, 
which was drawn up in 1993, shows -$25 billion for capital. This 
includes long term capital of $65.6 billion and short term 
capital of -$90.6 billion. The long term capital is a positive 
figure that reflects foreign investors' view of the China 
market's development prospects. During the first half of 1993, 
China approved 43,632 foreign trader investment projects calling 
for the investment of $58.756 billion. The actual amount of 
foreign capital used was $9.396 billion. This was a respective 
234.3, 300.3, and 179.8 percent increase over the same period in 
1992. In addition was other long-term capital obtained. 
Long-term capital for January through August should also be a 
positive figure. 
  The -$90.6 billion in short-term capital reflects not only 
an 
increase during 1993 in the amount of short-term foreign loan 
capital and interest that China paid, but foreign capital's use 
of the China market for speculation should also evoke serious 
attention. The net inflow of China's foreign borrowing has 
decreased relatively in recent years, and the foreign debt 
balance has slowly increased. By comparison with the initial 
period of foreign borrowing, the debt repayment burden will 
increase. In view of the present import-export situation and the 
country's foreign exchange reserves, we must strictly control 
the flow of short-term capital in order to prevent a situation 
that is detrimental to the internal economy. 
  Capital has always been closely related to the use of 
foreign 
capital, but China is guilty of seriously abnormal behavior in 
its current use of foreign capital. According to a Shandong 
branch bank survey, the main problems are in the following 
regards: 
  1. Rather blatant issuance of IOUs by the foreign party in 
concerns in which foreign traders have invested. This show up 
strongly in the low percentage of investment funds that the 
foreign trader provides. According to Qingdao Port Business 
Department survey statistics on concerns in which Chinese and 
foreign traders have invested, foreign traders provide only 46 
percent of funds, a 23 percent decline from the same period in 
the previous year. 
  2. High debt businesses in which foreign traders shift risks 
to China. In enterprises in which foreign traders have invested, 
Chinese banks provide the registered capital of both parties, 
with the result that the foreign party's actual capital 
investment is a very small percentage of the total capital 
invested in the enterprise -- approximately 10 percent. In order 
to do business on a proper scale, enterprises in which foreign 
traders invest obtain large amounts of capital from inside 
China, incurring a lot of debt. This creates a situation in 
which foreign capital makes use of domestic capital. 
  3. Existence of phony joint ventures. Not only are their 
phony joint venture enterprises that have no foreign investment, 
but there are also joint venture enterprises in which the 
Chinese party invests nothing or very little. Five of the nine 
joint venture enterprises founded since 1992 in Qihe County, 
Shandong are phony joint enterprises. This is 56 percent of all 
enterprises and 58 percent of all foreign-invested enterprises. 
  4. Some foreign-invested enterprises borrow back foreign 
debt 
under the guise of a joint venture. The method used is as 
follows: Although both parties to the joint venture have signed 
a joint venture agreement, this is simply a formality for the 
foreign party. Both parties also secretly sign an additional 
agreement that provides that no matter whether the enterprises 
shows a profit or a loss, the Chinese party must return to the 
foreign trader the foreign trader's investment with interest. 
  5. Imbalance between foreign exchange receipts and 
expenditures in concerns in which foreign traders invest 
becoming increasingly serious. Even though concerns in which 
foreign traders have invested take more foreign exchange foreign 
exchange swap markets than they put in, a substantial portion of 
what they take out is investment money and not foreign exchange 
earnings from exports. Therefore, as the number of enterprises 
in which foreign traders invest increases, the pressure they 
exert on the swap markets will become greater, causing 
instability in swap prices. 
<H5>  4. Changes in Foreign Exchange Reserves, and Changes in Swap </H5>
Market Prices 
  Inasmuch as Chinese trading system is not an entirely open 
market economy system, and since the exchange rate system is not 
a freely floating exchange rate system, changes in China's 
international balance of payments are ultimately expressed in 
changes in the quantity and price of foreign exchange. 
Adjustments in quantity and price bring balance to the 
international balance of payments. 
  China's definition of foreign exchange reserves has changed 
since 1993. Prior to this time, foreign exchange reserves 
included both the national foreign exchange balance and the 
banks foreign exchange supply In a planned economy, such a 
definition is doubtlessly a correct one; however, since China's 
specialized banks do some foreign exchange import-export 
settlement business, and with the founding of a socialist market 
economy system, naturally a new definition of foreign exchange 
reserves is needed. The International Monetary Fund definition 
is that a country's foreign exchange reserves are foreign 
exchange than can be taken without compensation and used freely. 
Therefore, China's current definition of foreign exchange 
includes the state's foreign exchange balance. 
  China's foreign exchange reserves have changed but little 
since 1993. Starting at $19.443 billion at the beginning of the 
year, they stabilized at about $19 billion in October. Within a 
short period, foreign exchange reserves exhibited a declining 
trend, but in July the central bank conducted open market 
trading for the first time. It began to intervene in the foreign 
exchange market to hold down too greatly fluctuating price 
changes. Since the quantity of foreign exchange changed but 
little, foreign exchange swap market prices changed greatly. As 
imports increased sharply and exports weakened, the effective 
supply of foreign exchange decreased and the shortfall between 
supply and demand increased. Exchange prices fluctuated 
substantially, thereby creating a bad effect on imports and 
exports. Because the government acted to limit trading at the 
end of February, swap markets did no business for a time. Some 
major players took the opportunity to hoard foreign exchange in 
anticipation of steady profits from rises in swap price quotes. 
Following price deregulation on 1 June, foreign exchange trading 
volume steadily rose. However, it was during this period that 
the rise in foreign exchange swap prices was also greatest. In 
the principal foreign exchange swap markets throughout the 
country, the weighted average price of $1 reached a maximum of 
10.90 yuan renminbi. In Hainan Province, the price reached 11.20 
yuan per $1.00. After the government intervened directly in the 
market in July, the exchange price stabilized very quickly at 
8.80 yuan per $1, and this price has remained until the present. 
<H5>  5. Assessment of the Current Overall International Balance </H5>
of Payments Situation and 1994 Situation Forecast 
  Currently, import and export fluctuations are still within 
the normal economic range. Since domestic demand is greater than 
current supply capabilities, imports must be expanded in order 
to raise the standard of living and welfare of the citizenry as 
a whole, and fluctuations in imports and exports per se also 
show that the domestic economy is growing at full tilt, and that 
the economy has entered a new round of expansion. 
  Nevertheless, the long-term trend of changes in imports and 
exports suggests no cause for optimism about future prospects. 
Historically, once the domestic economy shows signs of 
overheating, the possibility is very slight that macroeconomic 
regulation and control measures can fine tune the economy. 
Should this adverse balance between imports and exports last for 
a fairly long time, foreign exchange reserves dwindling as a 
result and making it necessary to slam down on the economic 
brakes, great ups and downs will occur in the operation of the 
economy. Looked at from this angle, the main problem that 
imports and exports face today remains dependence for survival 
on good operation of the domestic economy and normal operation 
of the microeconomy. Only when all latent factors leading to 
large ups and downs in imports and exports are brought under 
control will imports and exports attain the goal of serving 
development of the domestic economy to the maximum extent. 
  A look at the world economic situation: The world economy 
may 
gradually get out of its predicament in 1994. Prospects are that 
the economy of all countries will enter a slow growth stage. 
Forecasts call for a 2.5 percent growth of world GNP in 1994, 
the average annual GNP growth rate for developed countries 
reaching 4 percent, and economic growth of developing countries 
being markedly faster than that of developed countries. A 5 
percent GNP growth rate is forecast for developing countries in 
1994. In 1994, the economy of the former Soviet and East 
European countries will begin a weak revival in 1994, and 
gradually exhibit a fine growth momentum. Their 1994 GNP will 
increase 1.5 percent. As the world economy revives and gradually 
enters a normal development stage, prospects are that the entire 
world trade situation will rapidly improve. Estimates call for 
an approximately 6.9 percent increase in world exports in 1994. 
The world economic situation is moving in a direction that is 
favorable to China's foreign trade balance. 
  A look at the domestic supply and demand situation: As a 
result of the macroeconomic regulation and control measures 
instituted in July 1993, the high speed economic growth express 
train will slow don in 1994. Inasmuch as this is a one-time 
rather than a continuing readjustment of the economic structure, 
the economy will continue to operate in high gear during 1994. 
This will provide conditions to easing bottlenecks (including 
finance bottlenecks and resources bottlenecks). Total supply 
may be more than the domestic market can absorb in 1994; 
therefore, foreign demand will gradually play an important role. 
  At look at the international balance of payments situation: 
Because of the substantial adverse balance of foreign trade in 
1993, China's foreign exchange balance will decline. Therefore, 
the use of foreign exchange for imports will decline in 1994, 
holding down an increase in imports. Weakening of growth 
momentum in domestic investment demand will also restrict the 
importation of means of production making the speed of increase 
in commodity imports less during 1994 than in 1993. Moreover, 
because of an upswing in international market demand and a 
slowing of domestic demand, forecasts call for exports to 
increase more in 1994 than in 1993. However, since the base 
figure for 1993 exports was small, and since the base figure for 
1993 imports was large, China may still show a trade deficit in 
its foreign trade balance for 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66211 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  25 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> POPULATION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Lopsided Sex Ratio Among Older Unmarried Persons </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Lopsided Sex Ratio Among Older Unmarried Persons </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0459B Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO in Chinese 25 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0459B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Du Yong [2629 3144]: "What Do We Know About </F>
Our Older Single Population?--China's Older Single Population 
Between the Ages of 30 and 44 Has Reached 7.86 Million"] 
  [Text] The most recent data from the State Statistical 
Bureau shows that by 1990, China's older unmarried [single] 
population between the ages of 30 and 44 had reached 7.86 
million, more than the population of Hainan Province (6.55 
million), including 7.4072 million men and 454,600 women, 
meaning that the men outnumbered the women by [nearly] 16.4 to 1. 
  As to the unmarried rate of this older population, the 
single 
rate in the 30-44 age group is 6.09 percent for men, but only 
0.4 percent for women. 
  Of the older single population, 77 percent (over 6 million) 
are aged 30-39, while only 23 percent are 40-44 years old. 
  The urban-rural distribution of China's older single 
population contrasts sharply by sex: the men are located mainly 
in rural areas, numbering 6.04 million, or about 81.62 percent 
of the older single male population; the women are located 
mostly in cities, numbering 300,000, or approximately 67 percent 
of the older single female population. 
  As to the numbers of older single people living in urban and 
rural areas, rural males (6.04 million) outnumber urban males 
(1.36 million) by [nearly] 4.5 to 1, while urban females 
(300,000) outnumber rural females by 2 to 1, leaving the sex 
ratio for the rural single population even more glaringly 
lopsided, with men outnumbering women by 40 to 1. Among the 
older male population, the single rates are highest for 
illiterates and semiliterates, reaching 22.02 percent and 21.65 
percent for urban and rural areas respectively, meaning that 1 
of 5 older illiterate and semiliterate [men] are unmarried; the 
unmarried rates for men with grade school educations are 
obviously lower, respectively at 5.05 percent and 7.73 percent; 
the single rates for men with high school and technical 
educations are lowest, respectively at 1.45 percent and 0.07 
percent; the unmarried rate for college-educated men is about 3 
percent. The impact of educational level on the single rate 
for older women is: the unmarried rates are highest for 
college educated women, at 2.07 percent in the rural areas and 
4.98 percent in the cities, meaning that 1 of 20 older urban 
women with college degrees are unmarried; the single rates for 
older illiterate and semiliterate women are lower (0.29 percent 
for the rural areas and 0.73 percent for cities); the unmarried 
rates are lowest for women with grade school educations (0.09 
percent for the rural areas and 0.31 percent for the cities). So 
China's current 2.02 million older, single, illiterate and 
semiliterate men (of whom 1.81 million live in rural areas), and 
48,000 college-educated, older, single women (of whom 45,000 
live in cities), have become the priority and difficulty of our 
older single population. 
  While our older single population are generally manual 
workers, this is not so by sex. Census data show the unmarried 
rate to be high for older male manual workers, as well as for 
older female mental workers. The unmarried rates for older 
working men by occupation are: as high as 7.95 percent for 
workers in farming, forestry, livestock raising, and fishery, 
and 2 to 7 percent for other manual workers, but at only 0.33 to 
1.37 percent for mental workers, such as all types of 
specialized technicians, obviously lower than for manual 
workers. But the single rate for older working women by 
occupation is just the opposite, averaging the highest at 1.35 
percent for all types of specialized technicians, office 
workers, and related personnel, but lowest at only 0.31 percent 
for workers in farming, forestry, livestock raising, and fishery. 
  Editor's postscript: This information tells us that 
the crux of the difficulty in solving the spouse problem of the 
older single population are the gaps in features, such as 
numbers of men and women, distribution, and social, economic, 
and educational level. If marriage perceptions continue to 
follow the tradition of "men not marrying up and women not 
marrying down," the problem will be even harder. Meanwhile, 
under China's current socio-economic situation of still 
incomplete social security and service systems, as time passes, 
millions of older single people will gradually reach middle and 
old age, with their health, feeding, and housing bringing 
varying degrees of particular difficulties. So how to care for 
and help them will be a crucial matter requiring the attention 
of our whole society now and for a long time to come. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66212 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  23 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> POPULATION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Population Growth Rate Decreases Slightly </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Population Growth Rate Decreases Slightly </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0459A Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO in Chinese 23 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0459A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wu Chao [2976 6389]: "China's Population </F>
Growth Is Steady but Declining Slightly"] 
  [Text] A 1993 sampling of China's population change showed 
that China's population growth is steady but declining slightly. 
Our birth rate is 1.809 percent, with a death rate of 0.664 
percent, and a natural growth rate of 1.145 percent. Projected 
from this, Mainland China's population at the end of 1993 was 
1.18517 billion. 
  Projected from this sampling, 21.26 million people were born 
in China in 1993, for a birth rate of 1.809 percent, or down 
0.015 points from 1992. In 1993, 7.8 million people died in 
China, for a death rate of 0.664 percent, the same as in 1992. 
And our natural growth rate was down 0.015 points from 1992, 
giving us a net population increase for 1993 of 13.46 million, 
20,000 less than the 13.48 million for 1992. 
  Our 1993 real birth rate was 0.249 points lower than 
planned, 
giving us 3.06 million less real births than planned; our real 
natural population growth rate was 0.234 points lower than 
planned, for a real net population increase of 2.94 million less 
than planned. 
  Analysis of this population-change sampling showed that of 
the 713 children born in Beijing, 35, or 5 percent, were born to 
the floating population that had come to Beijing from other 
parts of China. A survey of Wuhan's floating population showed 
that the average birthrate for women in the floating population 
from other parts of China was twice that of women from Wuhan. So 
conscientiously tightening family-planning control of the 
floating population will be a glaring future problem that will 
need to be solved. 
  While China has achieved great population-control successes, 
with the number of women at their childbearing peak having 
topped out and begun a sustained decline in 1992, China's large 
population base means that over 100 million women a year will 
still be at their childbearing peak from 1994 to the year 2000. 
So population figures say that we need to keep cool heads 
about the protracted nature and difficulty of China's 
population-control mission, by emphasizing family planning 
persistently and well. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66213 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  12 May 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   From Contract Responsibility System to Right-Scale Operations </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    From Contract Responsibility System to Right-Scale Operations </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0371A Beijing ZHONGGUO JINGJI TIZHI GAIGE [CHINA'S 
ECONOMIC STRUCTURE REFORM] in Chinese No 2, Feb 1994 pp 20-22 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0371A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO JINGJI TIZHI GAIGE [CHINA'S 
ECONOMIC STRUCTURE REFORM] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Mao Meng (3029 5492): "From Contract </F>
Responsibility System to Economy of Scale--Outline of the Reform 
of Agriculture Toward Economy of Scale in the Suburban Districts 
of Beijing"] 
  [Text] The reform of agriculture toward economy of scale in 
the suburban districts of Beijing is a most heartening 
development and has shown most gratifying achievements. At 
present, 2,887 village cooperatives are conducting economies of 
scale in different forms. They comprise 73.4 percent of all 
villages in the suburban districts, and they cultivate over 3 
million mu of grain-growing farmland, which is 73.1 percent of 
the total grain-growing farmland. Economy of scale is also 
gradually becoming widespread in orchards, animal husbandry, and 
fisheries. Presently, all orchards together cover an area of 1.7 
million mu, ponds for fish-farming 120,000 mu, and there are 
also 1,034 modernized pig farms. 
<H5>  Developments Toward Economy of Scale Agricultural Operations </H5>
  Economy of scale agricultural operations started in the 
suburban districts of Beijing with the transformation of soil 
cultivation patterns, and from there branched out into other 
areas of agriculture. The said transformation of soil 
cultivation patterns occurred essentially in two phases; in the 
initial stage of the reform, it was the output-related system of 
contract responsibility, and later the system of specialized 
contracts and economy of scale. 
  As early as 1978, some communes and production brigades in 
Changping, Daxing, and other counties in the suburbs of Beijing 
tried out the output-related system of contract responsibility. 
In 1982, 84.2 percent of the basic accounting units in farm 
production practiced the output-related contract responsibility 
system. Later, on the basis of experiences so far gained, they 
adopted the all-round responsibility system, and by 1983 the 
crop-growing industry working large fields was to 71.1 percent 
on the all-round contract responsibility system, which figure, 
by 1985, had reached 96.9 percent. The various pursuits outside 
of grain farming also one after the other adopted the contract 
responsibility system. Most of the vegetable growing was 
contracted out to specialized teams, some also for special job 
performances or to individual households. Orchards were 
generally worked under contract by specialized production 
brigades or teams, or by specialized individual households. 
Village production brigades in the mountainous and 
semi-mountainous districts that mainly engaged in fruit 
production generally subcontracted such cultivation to 
individual households. Because of the strength of the former 
collective economy in the suburban districts of Beijing, and 
because of the extent of advanced production methods and 
application of science and technology, there were still, at the 
time when the output-related contract system was being promoted, 
15 percent of the communes and production brigades that had not 
contracted out any of their land to individual households, 
because of the high level of their internal specialized division 
of labor. They had rather made the specialized production 
projects themselves--projects that had come about in the 
division of labor and division of technologies in the former 
collective economy--the objects of contractual undertakings. It 
means that they merely transformed the organizational pattern, 
which had been "so loudly acclaimed," and then developed one 
step further the degree of specialization that had formerly 
existed in the rural areas. 
  However, because the method of land distribution applied at 
that time was one based on the number of heads, each rural 
household got to cultivate only 5 to 6 mu of segmented and 
fragmented lots of arable land. In addition huge changes had 
occurred in the meantime in the setup of rural production in 
Beijing. By 1985, the proportion of the secondary and tertiary 
industries in the output value of the rural economy had reached 
71 percent, and the proportion of nonagricultural manpower in 
the rural economy had reached 53 percent. The development of 
rural industrialization demanded a rapid improvement in 
agricultural productivity, as it demanded a move toward economy 
of scale and more intensive cultivation. On the other hand, the 
system of egalitarian, dispersed family operations gave cause to 
an increasingly serious trend in agriculture of peasants seeking 
other, concurrent jobs. It led to a decline in enthusiasm for 
grain growing among the peasants, to a reduction in input, and 
to a decline in the quality of manpower devoted to agriculture. 
It has also led to stagnation and fluctuations in agricultural 
developments during the two years, 1985 and 1986. However, while 
existing under the same conditions, a small number of township 
brigades did not conduct egalitarian land distribution to 
households, but rather practiced the specialized contractual 
system, and thereby could maintain a steady increase in grain 
production. For instance, the Nanhanji production brigade in the 
Fangshan district was able to maintain for ten years, 
consecutively since 1982, the same grain yield per mu, a state 
of things which was highly enlightening to leading cadres of all 
ranks. 
  To alleviate pressure on the government created by the 
agricultural crisis and by the unbearable burden of huge 
subsidies to the rural cooperative organizations, the suburban 
districts of Beijing started, from the second half of 1985 on, 
trials with econmy of scale management of farmland. On the 
foundation that had been laid by leading cadres of all ranks, as 
they reviewed what had occurred at the basic levels, also due to 
the realities of the situation and accurately guided by the true 
state of affairs, economy of scale attained very rapid 
development. Computed for grain-growing fields in the plains, 
the extent of economy of scale reached 16 percent in 1986, 31.6 
percent in 1987, increased to 60 percent in 1988, and was all 
along steadily maintained at around 70 percent after 1989. At 
the same time, equal progress was made in economy of scale in 
nonstaple food production, such as in fruit-tree farming, animal 
husbandry, and fishery. 
  Throughout the process of promoting economy of scale in the 
suburban districts of Beijing, attention has always been given 
to integrate the policies of the central authorities and certain 
basic principles of economy of scale with the specific 
conditions faced by agriculture in the suburban districts of 
Beijing. It was through exploration and practice that a specific 
way was found for the modernization of such agricultural 
pursuits that are suited to the special conditions of Beijing. 
The specific methods and the understanding gained may be 
summarized as follows: 
  1. Upholding the standards of productive forces. At all 
times, from the output-related system of contract responsibility 
to the economy of scale, and in whatever specific form, at 
whatever time, and by whatever method economy of scale are being 
promoted, the principle of always acting in the interest of 
developing the productive forces must be upheld. 
  2. Upholding the principle of starting out from the 
realities. Basing on the differing economic conditions and 
different levels of development in different regions, 
agricultural economy of scale have to be pursued at different 
levels and in different forms. Where conditions are mature for 
the purpose, economy of scale shall be pursued, and where 
conditions are not yet ripe for such, one must refrain from 
their introduction. Economy of scale must be pursued to the 
extent that favorable conditions will permit. 
  3. Arousing enthusiasm in both in the collectives as well as 
in the individuals involved. Desires and choices of the masses 
must be respected, but attention must also be paid to taking 
full advantage of the strength of collective forces in the 
Beijing region and their great capacity for unified operations. 
We must not miss the opportunity for effective guidance, we must 
promote the concentration of landholdings, must conduct internal 
adjustments and render internal services, so that economy of 
scale will become the common desire and demand of leadership as 
well as masses. 
  4. While upholding modernization as the objective, we must 
give equally serious attention to economy of scale as well as to 
intensive operations. 
  5. Successful experiences in economy of scale must be 
promptly disseminated among all rural industries, to achieve a 
harmonious development in all lines of agriculture and a benign 
cycle in the economy. 
  The practical experiences of the last ten years allow us to 
say that there have already formed the beginnings of a feasible 
guidance-type policy in the suburban districts of Beijing. This 
is an important precondition to ensure the healthy development 
of economy of scale. 
<H5>  Main Forms of Economy of Scale </H5>
  Beijing is located on the northwestern border of the 
North-China plain. It is to 38 percent flatland and to 62 
percent mountainous. According to the level of productive forces 
and of socioeconomic development, one may roughly divide the 
area into three districts: the suburban district, the plains, 
and the mountainous district. There are, however, some 
differences within each of these districts, resulting in 
differences also in the forms of economy of scale that apply to 
each. The following are in broad outline the main forms of 
economy of scale: 
  1. Collective farms (also called cooperative farms). 
  Generally speaking, they are most developed in the suburban 
district and in the plains. In these districts, the readjustment 
of production, social division of labor, shifts of manpower, as 
well as capital accumulation and material equipment have reached 
a comparatively high level of development, which facilitated the 
introduction of intensive forms of operation with the employment 
of much inanimate labor. Typical and representative forms of 
these types may be seen in Dudian and Nanhanji villages in the 
Fangshan district, in Zhangxinzhuang village of Tongxian county, 
in Gaoliying village and Tianzhuzhen township in Shunyi County, 
and in Dongdian village in Daxing county. Most of these farms 
had been established with support from the village cooperative 
organizations. Some villages had only one, some had several 
farms. Their sizes were generally between 200 and 800 mu. A 
lesser number had been established by the township 
organizations, mainly with the backing of production service 
organizations (agricultural companies, farm machinery stations, 
production brigades, etc.), renting land from various villages 
for unified cultivation, at sizes from between 1,000 to 4,000 
mu. The contract forms of most collective farms were of a 
two-stage type, namely farms contracting from the collectives 
and the staff and workers contracting from the farms, but there 
were also cases where farms contracted in a one-stage procedure 
from the collectives. Township and village collectives provide 
the farms with part of their means of production and certain 
services, while the farms guarantee to fulfill their obligations 
under the contract and to turn over a certain amount of 
accumulations. These farms are essentially independent 
accounting units, responsible for their own profits and losses, 
and operate on businesslike principles; a few of them also 
operate as cooperatives on the shareholding system. Internally, 
they mainly operate with labor-production contracts, and the 
relationship between peasant and soil is a very stable one. The 
farms generally have unified control of income and expenditure, 
their distribution is centralized and is using such methods as 
computing salaries on the basis of production, by stages of 
effective performance, or by benefits accruing, with additional 
encouragement rewards. This form is characterized by sound 
organization, relatively clear and definite economic relations, 
and a very sensible operational mechanism. The special 
characteristic of unified management in the operation of these 
farms is clearly evident. 
  2. Specialized Production Brigades 
  When contracts are signed by households or labor as units 
directly with the village commune-collective and these units 
submit to unified management by the collective organization 
(some of these being agricultural companies), it is primarily 
important that the system of management, internally, be one of 
separate accounting for each household, that contracts are 
labor-performance related, and that each unit bears full 
responsibility for its own profits and losses. This form 
occurs mainly in intermediary areas where there is stable 
employment and redeployment of manpower, and where, furthermore, 
there is a tendency toward gradually moving toward collective 
farming. This form of operations is based on family-run 
operations, where there is one administrative level between 
household and village, to strengthen the servicing and 
administering of the different plots of land through centralized 
contracting, and it will, as a consequence, effectively 
integrate family-run operations and a more specialized 
administration. The special characteristic of dual-level 
management is clearly evident in this form. 
  Another form which is close to the specialized production 
brigade type are the specialized villages and specialized 
townships which, within the sphere of village and township 
commune areas, have management contracts contracted for by 
families, and where the village and township cooperative 
organizations render production and marketing services and 
engage in cultivation and breeding. 
  3. Specialized Farming Households 
  They mainly occur in areas where the collective economy has 
not been well developed, where the development of 
nonagricultural industries had been slow, and where agricultural 
production has essentially remained at the level of traditional 
family-run operations. Through the application of economy of 
scale a development was set in motion as from "small and 
complete" to "small and specialized," promoting "socialization" 
of the division of specialized labor, which had been extant as a 
potential in the family-run operations. The main form is one by 
which the peasant as unit contracts from the village brigade 
collective, where the peasants keep separate accounts, are 
responsible for their own profits and losses, and at the same 
time rely on the services provided by the cooperative management 
service organization to accomplish their production processes. 
This form is beneficial for a more concentrated and effective 
use of the soil, beneficial for the adoption of advanced 
production technologies, for speedier division of specialized 
labor in agriculture, and it represents a further advance beyond 
the family-run operations of the period of the "all-encompassing 
contracts." Compared to the formerly mentioned two forms, in 
this form the function of the peasant is clearer defined, but it 
is still a dual-stage type of operation. 
  At present, the total grain-crop acreage in the suburban 
districts under economy of scale management is 2,997,000 mu, 
which is 73.7 percent of the area's total grain-crop acreage of 
4,066,000 mu. Out of the grain-crop acreage under economy of 
scale management, 43.9 percent are under farm management, namely 
1,316,000 mu, now counting over 1,400 farms; 25.8 percent are 
specialized brigade-operated, managing 773,000 mu of grain-crop 
fields, and having around 1,400 specialized brigades; 30.3 
percent are operated by specialized households, working 908,000 
mu of grain-crop fields, with somewhat over 1,000 specialized 
households. Among the above-mentioned three forms of operations 
there are also a few that are operated as joint entities and 
cooperatively on a shareholding basis. 
<H5>  Remarkable Effect of Transformation to Economy of Scale </H5>
  Promotion and continued perfection of economy of scale in 
agriculture has brought about a thoroughgoing transformation and 
very rapid development in collective agriculture in the suburban 
districts of Beijing. It has caused new vigor and vitality to 
shine forth and has at the same time conducted valuable 
explorations toward the further development of a socialist 
agriculture with Chinese characteristics. In concrete terms, its 
achievements have been mainly in the following directions: 
  -- It prevented a contraction of agriculture and greatly 
increased grain production. Economy of scale put an end to the 
fluctuations in grain production and ensured a continuing 
tendency of increases. In 1987 the total grain production for 
the first time exceeded the 2.25 billion kg mark with a 4.87 
percent increase over the preceding year. In 1988 another 
increase of 3.35 percent was achieved with a yield of 520 kg per 
mu. In 1992, total grain production was 2.819 billion kg with a 
yield of 657.9 kg per mu, an increase of 30.2 percent and 42.1 
percent, respectively, compared with 1986. Economy of scale have 
made us see the potential and has raised our hopes for further 
grain production increases. 
  -- It has led to increased input and to improvement of the 
quality of agricultural equipment and technology. During the 
period from 1985 to 1988, investments in agriculture by Beijing 
Municipality and by its collectives has increased by over 200 
million yuan. In Shunyi alone, one of the main grain producing 
counties, investments in agriculture since the start of economy 
of scale have always been around 50 million yuan per year, which 
amounts to a total of over 300 million yuan. Increased 
investment has resulted in better agricultural equipment. In 
1988, there were 700 more wheat-harvesting combines, as compared 
to 1986, and they were harvesting around 60 percent of the 
summer wheat crop. By 1992, the total motive power used by 
agricultural machinery in the suburban districts was 65.2 
kilowatt per mu of grain fields, the rate of mechanical plowing 
was 72 percent, the rate of mechanical seeding was 71 percent, 
and the rate of mechanical harvesting was 51 percent. In the 
plains, mechanization of grain production had essentially been 
realized at a fairly rapid pace. In Shunyi County, mechanization 
has been introduced for the whole process from seeding to 
harvesting of both wheat and corn crops. All grain fields 
throughout the county are essentially irrigated by water 
sprinklers, which is a water-saving way of cultivating. At the 
same time, developments of a breakthrough nature have also 
occurred in the dissemination of new agricultural technologies 
and their application, in the reform of the cropping system, as 
also in intensive farming operations, and in the more scientific 
nature of operations, promoting the modernization of 
agricultural production. 
  -- In promoting the development of production in the various 
different lines, it has increased the degree of specializations 
to a very large extent. During the three-year period from 1986 
to 1988, when economy of scale were rapidly introduced in the 
suburban districts of Beijing, 400,000 mu of fruit-bearing trees 
were newly added, 80,000 mu of farmland were added at the 
vegetable bases in the outlying suburbs, and there has also been 
a rapid increase in the various kinds of livestock and poultry. 
The villages have further distanced themselves from the 
small-scale production setup which had been combined with the 
taking up of other, concurrent jobs. There has been an 
accelerated adjustment of the manpower structure in the rural 
areas, and an additional 93,000 persons were shifted and added 
to the labor force of the secondary and tertiary industries. 
Division of labor within agriculture has been comparatively 
stable, and there has been an evident tendency toward 
specialization in production. 
  -- It markedly improved productivity of the agricultural 
labor force with the effect of initially improving profitability 
in the agricultural economy. It brought increases in peasant 
incomes and increases in agricultural accumulations, while the 
logistics of agricultural development were also markedly 
strengthened. Follow-up investigations have shown that labor 
productivity in most farms on economy of scale in the suburban 
districts of Beijing, and incomes of the labor force engaged in 
farming, have all along been maintained at a relatively high 
level. In 1992, grain production per unit of labor and income 
per unit of labor have evidently been at a higher than average 
level. Income per unit of labor has more or less been equal to 
staff and workers' incomes in township and town enterprises. 
Investigations over several consecutive years show: In 1988, the 
average net income per mu in 635 farms investigated had reached 
212 yuan; in 1989, out of 759 farms investigated, 734 farms, 
i.e. 96 percent, were operating profitably. In 1990, 
accumulations from 317 farms investigated reached 110 yuan per 
mu. In the past, during the time of the household responsibility 
system, the collectives had to pay a subsidy of 50 yuan for each 
mu of land each year. After the introduction of economy of 
scale, it is now possible to turn over to the collectives every 
year 80 yuan for every mu of land as accumulation. Throughout 
the county, grain production can provide almost 50 million yuan 
as accumulation every year. Add to this the more than 100,000 mu 
of land producing nonstaple foods and used in other economic 
diversifications, the collectives can obtain every year from 
agriculture over 60 million yuan in accumulations. Economy of 
scale has had the effect of initially transforming agriculture 
from a subsistence-type and welfare-type of pursuit into one of 
profitability. It has brought new hope for resolving the 
long-standing problems troubling agriculture, namely of very low 
profits in agricultural production, the widening price scissors 
as between industrial and agricultural products, and the slow 
pace at which the peasantry evolves toward prosperity. 
  At present, the agricultural organizations operating on the 
economy of scale principle in the suburban districts of Beijing 
are now, responding to the demand for the establishment of 
modernized enterprise systems, engaged in further explorations 
in their progress. They will gradually mature into operational 
entities working as business enterprises and will become an 
important force in the move toward socialist market economy. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66214 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  25 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liaoning Crop Area Reported </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Liaoning Crop Area Reported </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0397S Shenyang LIAONING JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 25 Mar 
94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0397S </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang LIAONING JINGJI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] According to a survey of 1,150 rural households 
in Liaoning Province, the grain area will be about 303 [as 
published] hectares, a 0.3 percent decrease from 1993; and the 
cash crop area will be about 250,000 hectares, a 2.8 percent 
increase. The cotton area will be 36,000 hectares, a 32 percent 
increase over 1993. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66215 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  23 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article Urges Government Intervention in Price Scissors </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Article Urges Government Intervention in Price Scissors </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0412A Beijing NONGYE JINGJI WENTI [PROBLEMS OF 
AGRICULTURAL ECONOMY] in Chinese No 1, 23 Jan 94 pp 48-53 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0412A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing NONGYE JINGJI WENTI [PROBLEMS OF 
AGRICULTURAL ECONOMY] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Lin Xiangjin (2651 4382 6855): "Government </F>
Intervention Necessary to Eliminate Price Scissors"] 
  [Text] In early 1993 Comrade Wang Zhonghai [3769 1813 3189] 
had his article "Leave the `Price Scissors' Erroneous Zone" 
(abbreviated hereafter as Wang Zhonghai's article) published in 
the 1993 No 1 issue of JINGJI YANJIU and the 1993 No 2 issue of 
NONGYE JINGJI WENTI. The article contends that the emergence of 
the price scissors has nothing to do with the operations of the 
market economy, that it was merely one of the economic policies 
of the former Soviet Union, that the price scissors cannot come 
about in the absence of government price-setting, and that 
elimination of the price scissors is just "around the corner" 
since China has decontrolled agricultural prices. Misled by his 
own erroneous thinking about the price scissors, the writer 
argues that the entire academic debate about the price scissors 
in the country since the PRC was founded was "misguided." 
Because it was published in some of the more authoritative 
scholarly journals in China, the article will have a substantial 
impact on policymaking. I believe, therefore, that it is 
necessary to comment on some of the major mistaken viewpoints in 
the article so as to clarify the issue and facilitate the 
development of a socialist market economy. 
  1. Price Scissors as Product of Imperfect Competition 
  Two questions need to be asked here. First, why does 
imperfect competition give rise to the price scissors? Second, 
why do the price scissors typically operate in the exchange 
between industrial and agricultural products and not in other 
industries? 
  According to the conventional theories of the market 
economy, 
when an economy is in a state of perfect competition, there are 
usually a large number of factories and farms, all fairly evenly 
distributed. Not one of them is in a position to influence 
prices. On the contrary, every single producer is at the 
receiving end of prices, meaning that he must sell his products 
at prevailing market prices. Under these circumstances, the cost 
of a product which a producer is willing and able to supply is 
exactly equal to the marginal cost (that is, the total cost 
incurred by the production of the last product) as well as to 
the price. It also equals marginal efficiency, namely the price 
consumers are willing to pay. In a state of perfect competition, 
the economy operates under what has been called the "Pareto 
efficiency," where allocation efficiency has been achieved with 
the result that the only way to increase an individual's 
well-being is to reduce another's by the same amount. However, 
since the prices of every factory or farm equal the lowest 
average cost as well as marginal cost, the factories, farms, and 
industries are driven to a state of zero profit (after deducting 
the opportunity cost return on investment). In a state of 
perfect competition, therefore, the circumstances of an 
individual or an industry will not worsen for no reason to the 
benefit of another individual or industry, and hence there is no 
unequal exchange between industry and agriculture. In other 
words, there is no price scissors. 
  However, things are different under imperfect competition, 
particularly where there is a monopoly. When most of the output 
in a trade or industry is concentrated in a handful of sellers, 
they will be in a position to manipulate prices to a certain 
extent, thus introducing imperfect competition into their 
particular trade or industry. Suppose all incomes have been 
distributed properly among all social groups. Factory A is the 
sole imperfect competitor in this particular economic society, 
all others being perfect competitors, that is, their marginal 
costs equal prices. Under these circumstances, A, being an 
imperfect competitor (someone who deviates from the conventional 
rules or is a monopolist in a particular industry) has some 
control over prices because he faces a demand curve that slopes 
downward toward the right. In the absence of external 
restraints, he will, prompted by self-interests, make his 
products a little scarcer, at the same time raising their prices 
beyond the marginal cost to give himself extra profits. He will 
not increase output to a level where marginal costs equal 
prices, which also happens to be the level where market prices 
are decided by consumer wishes. Thus, relative to the social 
cost incurred by A's product, society does not obtain A's 
product in as large a quantity as it would really want. The 
upshot is unequal exchange. If A's product is an input required 
by B, a perfect competitor, B would discover that the same 
amount of money now purchases a lesser quantity of inputs. When 
his inputs drop, his output also decreases. Furthermore, since B 
has no power over prices, he must continue to sell his output at 
the old price, which translates into a lower income for him. 
  Unfortunately, the industrial sector is better positioned to 
create imperfect competition. In other words, it wields more 
clout on the market, as mainly demonstrated in the following two 
ways: 
  1) Economies of scale. Market competition, we know, has one 
tendency: the larger the scale of production, the greater the 
profit. This tendency leads to accumulation and concentration, 
culminating in a monopoly. The reason is this. When large-scale 
production makes possible significant savings, large factories 
can engage in production more economically than their smaller 
counterparts and sell their products more cheaply than the 
latter, rendering it impossible for the smaller companies to 
survive. Thus, when economies of scale become widespread, there 
will only be a handful of sellers; that is, monopolists. In many 
industries, such as steel, automobile, chemical industry, 
plastics, and glass, producers can keep reducing their fixed 
cost per unit of output by endlessly expanding their plants, 
installing larger and larger boilers and machines, buying more 
and more specialized equipment, enlarging their labor force, and 
improving labor productivity. Let's suppose the vertical axis 
represents the average fixed cost and the horizontal axis 
represents output. The average fixed cost curve will then 
resemble a hyperbola whose asymptotic curve is the 
horizontal-vertical axis. That is, the fact that the fixed cost 
is distributed among a rising number of output units brings the 
fixed cost curve closer and closer to the horizontal axis. 
However high the demand curve in the industry in question, for 
the producer the most efficient scale of production is always 
the largest. Thus it is out of question for the tens of 
thousands of competitors at the mercy of prices to compete on a 
level playing field. To put it differently, in an industry where 
economies of scale are significantly notable or which is 
sensitive to economies of scale, the market is predisposed to 
monopolism. In agriculture, however, the significance of 
economies of scale is severely crimped because of the 
constraints imposed by the finiteness of land and the fact that 
it is where natural reproduction and economic reproduction 
converge. 
  2) Legal constraints. We know that regardless of whether a 
country is socialist or capitalist, the government finds it 
necessary to restrain competition in certain industries for a 
variety of reasons. In most cases such restraints take the form 
of entry restrictions, patents, and foreign trade restriction. 
As we can see, almost all these restrictions are confined to the 
industrial sector. 1) entry restrictions. Under the former 
Soviet model, all factories, mines, railroads, and banks were 
state-owned and entry by individuals into these industries was 
prohibited. The result was a high degree of administrative 
monopoly in industry. This is one example of legal constraint. 
Moreover, in many developed nations such as the United States, 
Japan, and those in Europe, the government believes that a high 
efficiency is possible in public utilities including telephone, 
water supply, gas, electricity, and roads only when the company 
enjoys a monopoly or a near-monopoly. Therefore, it has granted 
a special monopoly to the companies in those industries. In 
return for the special monopoly, a company agrees to submit to 
government regulation of their prices and operations. 
Nevertheless, by taking advantage of the official monopoly, the 
companies over the years have succeeded in almost completely 
shutting out other competitors. In contrast, similar privileges 
or entry restrictions are a rarity in agriculture. 2) Patents. 
To encourage inventions, the governments of many nations grant 
patents to investors, thus giving them the prerogative to use a 
patented product or production process exclusively or 
monopolistically. This is a legal way to limit entry into a 
particular trade or industry. However, it has led to some 
companies monopolize the production of a certain article for 
years and years. Most patents thus far have gone to industrial 
products. 3) Foreign trade restrictions. Almost all governments 
around the world seek to curb imports by imposing high tariffs 
or quota restrictions on foreign producers. The exclusion from 
the market of large numbers of foreign suppliers and buyers also 
reduces perfect competition up to a point. The principal 
beneficiaries of restrictive tariffs are those industries with a 
high degree of concentration. In other words, some parts of the 
industrial sector, thanks to reduced foreign competition, have 
been able to create a monopolistic situation. 
  Because of the factors noted above, many countries that were 
the first to adopt a market economy have seen numerous of their 
industries come under the control of a handful of companies. In 
the United States, for instance, the four-company concentration 
rate (the output share of the four largest companies in a 
specific industry) in 1977 was 100 percent in the tobacco 
industry; 96 percent, automobiles; 91 percent, breakfast 
cereals; 90 percent, electric light bulb; 79 percent, aluminum; 
61 percent, soap; 30 percent, iron and steel; and 22 percent, 
meat processing. In contrast, agriculture has a long long way to 
go before it achieves concentration of this magnitude. 
  The above analysis shows that the price scissors emerge as a 
result of market forces when some companies behave without 
restraint. It is a product of imperfect competition. Because of 
a stronger objective tendency in some industries toward 
concentration, that is, monopoly, the companies in those 
industries are able to earn a higher profit than if the 
government makes them compete like perfect competitors. Their 
excess profit, furthermore, mainly comes from the pockets of 
perfect competitors, primarily agricultural producers. So we 
cannot but have to conclude that wherever there is imperfect 
competition, there are the price scissors. 
  Wang Zhonghai writes in his article, "The price scissors 
were 
one of the economic policies of the former Soviet Government," a 
phenomenon unique to a specific nation (former Soviet Union) and 
a specific economic model (the socialist economy fashioned by 
Stalin). It is argued that in capitalist nations, in old China, 
and in China today now that it has jettisoned the Soviet model, 
either the price scissors do not exist or its disappearance is 
just "around the corner." This, it should be said, is where the 
real mistake occurs. Wang Zhonghai confuses government functions 
with the workings of the economy. To Wang Zhonghai, the price 
scissors is the brainchild of some policymakers, not the product 
of unrestrained monopolistic market forces. According to his 
logic, government only needs to end the practice of 
participating in the collection of the price scissors without, 
however, limiting or regulating imperfect competition, and the 
price scissors will disappear automatically. The analysis below 
will show that this point of view is wrong. 
  2. Only Government Control Will Eliminate Price Scissors 
  As explained above, the existence of imperfect market 
competition has deep historic roots, including both what is 
inherent in market competition itself (economies of scale) and 
legal restrictions adopted by the state. As soon as a monopoly 
comes into existence, it will prevent the economy from achieving 
the kind of high-efficiency resource allocation possible under 
perfect competition and prevent society from deriving the most 
satisfaction from its finite resources. Unequal exchange between 
monopolists and perfect competitors will then naturally occur. 
Economists refer to this situation as "market malfunctioning." 
What is needed here is for the government to step in to offset 
market malfunctioning by opposing monopolies and unfair 
competition and preserving an orderly environment for 
competition using legal and administrative tools. This indeed is 
a paramount responsibility of government. Many industrialized 
market economies have anti-monopoly laws and corresponding 
executive agencies. Some countries regulate a small number of 
monopolistic resource products and public utilities, most 
importantly by determining the prices to be charged by the 
monopolistic companies. In the United States, furthermore, a 
rural cooperative law has been passed to make farmers better 
able to fend for themselves by helping them participate in the 
supply of inputs and the sale of their products. It may be said 
that the price scissors do not exist, or exist only marginally 
in industrialized market-economy nations, but that is because 
they have at various points created a market economy that 
includes macro-management and government intervention, the 
so-called "mixed economy." The cornerstone of a mixed economy is 
market regulation of resources. At the same time, however, the 
government and other public institutions regulate economic 
activities through fiscal and monetary policies and by using a 
mix of legal and administrative tools. 
  It should be said, therefore, that it is in countries where 
government malfunctioning is most extensive that the price 
scissors are the largest. "Government malfunctioning" is also 
known as "nonoptimal intervention." What it means is that not 
only does government intervention fail to correct market 
distortions, but, on the contrary, thanks to misguided policies 
and conduct, the distortions are exacerbated, further 
undercutting economic efficiency. In this way, with government 
malfunctioning compounding market malfunctioning, the price 
scissors will only worsen. Meanwhile, the failure to put 
agriculture on a sound footing leads to food shortages and, 
ultimately, workers' discontent. This was probably what happened 
in the former Soviet Union in 1923, as noted by Wang Zhonghai in 
his article. This being the case, to suggest, as Wang Zhonghai 
has done, that the price scissors will not come into existence 
in the absence of government administrative price-setting is to 
reject all government intervention indiscriminately. Here we 
need to distinguish between two issues. One, there is no direct 
causal relationship between government administrative 
price-setting and the price scissors. This issue has been 
analyzed above. Two, justifiable and appropriate administrative 
price-setting not only will not cause the price scissors, but 
will on the contrary diminish or eliminate the price scissors. 
  Perhaps Comrade Wang Zhonghai means to say that in a 
socialist market economy, natural monopolies will not occur, so 
there will be no such thing as imperfect competition. But if 
that is the case, wouldn't we need even more precise government 
administrative price-setting to prevent the emergence of the 
price scissors? In any case, among all those countries which 
have tried the socialist market economy, which has managed to do 
just that? 
  3. Decontrol of Agricultural Prices Not the Same as 
Elimination of Price Scissors 
  Wang Zhonghai writes in his article, "The price scissors 
have 
not been eradicated completely, but since the 14th CPC National 
Congress has made the creation of a socialist market economy the 
objective of economic restructuring in China, it will be 
eliminated any day now. This can be achieved by accelerating the 
decontrol of agricultural prices and transforming the mechanism 
of price formation." His assumption is that provided we 
decontrol the prices of agricultural products, leaving it up to 
the market to regulate them (that is, transforming the price 
formation mechanism), we can get rid of the price scissors lock, 
stock, and barrel. What will happen if we go down this road? Let 
us begin by examining a number of important facts: 
  In Shaanxi Province, the procurement prices of agricultural 
byproducts were raised 11 percent, 0.3 percent, and -1.8 percent 
in the several years between 1988 and 1991, respectively. During 
the same period, the retail prices of rural industrial goods 
rose 22.7 percent, 2.8 percent, and 2.8 percent, respectively, 
widening the price scissors 10.5 percent, 2.5 percent, and 4.7 
percent for a total of 18.6 percent for the 3-year period, or 
5.9 percent annually on the average. After adjusting for 
inflation, agricultural inputs by peasant households rose a mere 
3.2 percent each year, far short of the investment demand. Owing 
to the widening price scissors, the ratio of peasant incomes and 
those of urban households deteriorated from 1:2.38 to 1:2.75. 
  In Guizhou Province, the price ratio index for the exchange 
of industrial and agricultural products shrank sharply in 1993: 
The wheat-salt price ratio index retreated to the level of the 
mid-1970's, a drop of 109 percentage points compared with the 
peak reached in 1990; the wheat-plain white cloth price ratio 
index fell to the level of the early 1960's, down 11.48 
percentage points from the peak in 1982; the wheat-coal and oil 
price ratio index retreated to the level of the mid-1970's, a 
loss of 56.22 percentage points from the peak in 1990; the 
wheat-chemical fertilizers price ratio index sank to a new low, 
shedding 45.1 percentage points from the peak in 1987. 
  In Xuzhou Shi in Jiangsu Province, unequal exchange between 
agricultural and industrial products in recent years has driven 
up the costs of farming excessively. If we look at the real 
return on farming one mu (0.0667 hectare) of each of seven major 
crops, only wheat yields a tiny profit (25.75 yuan), while the 
others are all money-losers: rice, 27.47 yuan; corn, 10.94 yuan; 
soy bean, 5.13 yuan; rapeseed, 86.14 yuan; cotton, 44.79 yuan; 
and silkworm, 87.47 yuan. 
  The decline in the price ratio index in the exchange between 
industrial and agricultural products everywhere has also had a 
depressing effect on the price ratio index in livestock 
products-industrial goods exchange. In Guizhou Province, for 
instance, the pork-salt price ratio index has fallen back to the 
level of the mid-1970's, down 468.42 percentage points from the 
peak in 1988; the pork-plain white cloth price ratio index has 
retreated to the level of the mid-1950's, down 96.79 percentage 
points from the peak in 1988; the pork-coal price ratio index 
has fallen to the level of the mid-1970's, down 263.54 
percentage points from the peak in 1988; the pork-chemical 
fertilizers price ratio index has hit a new low, down 305.40 
percentage points from the peak in 1987. (Gong Yong [7895 0516], 
"Steep Decline in Price Ratio Index in Guizhou for the Exchange 
between Major Agricultural Products and Industrial Products in 
1993," GUIZHOU DIAOYAN, 1993 No 2.) Then there are the data on 
nine cities in Jiangsu Province. The prices of mixed feeds for 
cows have jumped 29.3 percent on the average since 1993, while 
the prices at which milk is procured and at which sterilized 
milk is sold have risen only 2.0 percent and 2.3 percent, 
respectively. As the raising of milk cows becomes less and less 
profitable and downright unprofitable, milk production is in 
decline in seven provinces and municipalities to date. The 
prices of coal, water, electricity, petroleum, and 
transportation have gone up by various extents in numerous 
places, greatly boosting the costs of livestock products and 
hobbling the animal husbandry industry. 
  The situation described above occurred amid the gradual 
decontrol of agricultural prices. In 1992, 22.8 percent of all 
agricultural products sold by peasants had state-set prices, 
down from 92.6 percent in 1978; 20.0 percent had state-guided 
prices, up from 1.8 percent; and 57.8 percent had 
market-regulated prices, up from 5.6 percent. Thus the 
contention by Comrade Wang Zhonghai that the price scissors will 
disappear provided agricultural prices are decontrolled is not 
consistent with reality. 
  A wealth of facts proves that a major reason for the decline 
in agricultural goods-industrial goods price ratio index is the 
extraordinary increase in the prices of industrial resources 
that are in short supply and in the charges of public utilities, 
including steel, coal, water, electricity, oil, and freight 
charges. According to observations at 11 points in Jiangsu, for 
instance, the costs of producing 100 kilograms of wheat rose 
9.94 percent in 1993 from a year ago, spending on diesel oil 
jumped 28.28 percent compared with 1992, and the costs of 
producing 100 kilograms of rapeseed were also up 6.30 percent, 
including a 31.43 percent increase in diesel oil costs. Or take 
the case of Jinghai Fishery Company in Rongcheng Shi, Shandong 
Province. Its fishing fleet consumes 15,000 tons of diesel oil 
each year, yet the company is allocated only 460 tons of diesel 
oil under the plan. Diesel oil accounts for about 50 percent of 
the fishing inputs. A fishing trip lasts from 15 to 20 days on 
the average and a small or medium-sized vessel burns about 1 ton 
of diesel oil a day, which works out to be 20 tons of diesel oil 
per fishing trip. With the price of diesel oil as high as 2,000 
yuan per ton, a fishing trip costs 40,000 yuan in fuel alone. 
The catch of a small or mid-sized vessel per trip ranges between 
25 and 30 tons, which translates into a total income of anywhere 
from 50,000 to 100,000 yuan. Add the other expenses and a 
fishing trip may end up costing more than it earns. The fishing 
industry in Shandong Province has been unprofitable since 1992 
and things got worse in 1993. To cut losses, fishery companies 
up and down the coast have suspended operations and auctioned 
off their fishing vessels. 
  The extraordinary increases in the prices of scarce 
industrial products and the charges of public utilities have 
also directly driven up the costs of industries making articles 
for agricultural use, which, in turn, has exacerbated the 
unequal exchange between industrial and agricultural products. 
According to statistics, of the 55 mid-sized nitrogen fertilizer 
enterprises in the nation, 27 lost money in the first quarter of 
1993 because of endless hikes in the prices of raw materials, 
electricity, and transportation costs. Unable to absorb these 
massive price increases by tapping internal potential alone, 
they have passed them onto agriculture. 
  Thus, without strengthening macroeconomic regulation and 
control, the decontrol of agricultural prices in itself will not 
get rid of the price scissors at its root. On the contrary, 
there is a tendency for the price scissors to expand. This 
proves that in China's socialist market economy, imperfect 
competition may result from the absence of the right kind of 
government intervention. As I see it, imperfect competition in 
Chinese industry to date may occur in either one of these two 
scenarios: 1) the transitional economic system inherits some of 
the administrative monopolistic habits of the past in the course 
of reform. At present, about 30 percent of all capital goods 
sold have administratively set prices, including energy (crude 
oil, coal), raw materials (iron, steel, and chemical industrial 
raw materials), and rail freight. Still under the influence of 
the old system, these sectors may engage in "rent-searching" 
activities and squeeze profits from price differences, which 
distorts prices, which, in turn, gives rise to imperfect 
competition. 2) The growth of the nonstate economy. Due to 
economies of scale and improvements in managerial and sales 
techniques, a number of large companies now account for a 
substantial share of the sales of the decontrolled part of some 
products, such as petrochemicals, coal, and steel, and in doing 
so manage to control the prices of products with negotiated 
prices. If this and other kinds of imperfect competition are not 
brought under government regulation and control, the price 
scissors will not go away. 
  There was a time in the history of capitalism when 
laissez-faire and nonintervention policies were considered the 
best. With the emergence of imperfect competition and the 
consequent economic dislocations, the notion that capitalist 
nations must intervene in economic life to solve inflation, 
unemployment, and other problems became widely accepted. In 
other words, laissez-faire economics has long been discarded in 
the West. In China, people have suffered long and hard under the 
planned economic system. So they assume, understandably, that 
everything will be fine if only there is decontrol across the 
board. But it will not be long before we realize that decontrol 
alone unaccompanied by the right degree of government 
intervention will not work either. Therefore the only conclusion 
we can arrive at is this: We must make the most of the market 
economy in resource allocation and, at the same time, step up 
proper government intervention in economic life to ensure the 
realization of economic efficiency. 
  4. Measures To Narrow Price Scissors 
  As noted above, the price scissors are a product of 
imperfect 
competition. Price decontrol cannot completely prevent the 
emergence of some forms of imperfect competition, namely 
monopolies. To eradicate the price scissors, therefore, we must 
take the following steps: 
  1) Impose price controls on a small number of monopolistic 
resources and the products of public utilities. Among them are 
crude oil, natural gas, a handful of rare metals, urban public 
transportation, running water, coal, integrated network 
electricity, rail transportation, and posts and 
telecommunications. The markets of these products are basically 
monopolistic resource markets, natural monopolistic markets, or 
public utilities markets. Without government intervention, 
enterprises in these markets will take advantage of their 
inherent monopolistic status or some other prerogatives to set 
high monopolistic prices and reap excessive monopolistic 
profits. Since the role of prices in the sound allocation of 
resources on these markets is restricted, regulation by an 
outside force, namely the government, is needed. These products 
come under government price-setting in just about every country 
in the world. Today, China is in the process of decontrolling 
the prices of most coal and petroleum products and increasing 
the share of steel with market prices. It is the plan of the 
departments concerned to completely decontrol the prices of 
competitive sectors by 1994 or 1995. In my opinion, the policy 
of totally scrapping price controls and decontrolling prices 
wholesale militates against the sound allocation of resources 
and the reduction of the price scissors in the exchange between 
industrial and agricultural goods. It should be reconsidered. 
  2) The government helps enhance the peasants' 
self-protection 
capability. As noted above, because there are so many of them 
and because they operate on a small scale, peasants are in a 
weak bargaining position when it comes to selling their 
products. At the same time, they are confronted with imperfect 
competition in the acquisition of inputs. If they are not 
organized properly, peasants will remain in a defenseless 
position. A peasants' supply and marketing cooperative may give 
them a tool through which they can participate in the 
acquisition of agricultural inputs and a means whereby they can 
enter the arena of agricultural products processing and 
marketing. In the United States, for instance, cooperatives 
purchased 20 percent of all inputs and accounted for 31 percent 
of all agricultural products sold in 1980. The farmers' 
cooperative provides a dependable market where farmers can sell 
their goods and purchase inputs, strengthens their bargaining 
position in those transactions, and maximizes their return while 
minimizing the costs of inputs and services. To make sure the 
cooperative truly represents farmers' interests, government 
regulations require that the cooperative be owned and managed by 
agricultural producers themselves. In elections, every member of 
a cooperative can cast only one vote so as to prevent large 
investors or consumers from taking over the cooperative. The 
interest rate on cooperative investment must not exceed the 
interest rate state banks pay on deposits, the idea being to 
ensure that most investment goes to improving the efficiency 
with which agricultural products are marketed and sold and 
imports are purchased, not to earning more interest for the 
cooperative. At least 50 percent of the volume of business 
conducted by the cooperative must be handled by cooperative 
members, again to ensure that it is cooperative members that 
really benefit from the cooperative. We can learn a lesson from 
all of that. 
  3) Introduce a protective procurement price system for major 
agricultural products and livestock products. Because of the low 
comparative advantage of growing bulk agricultural products, 
their growers need price support. Protective procurement prices 
should be held at a level where peasants derive an income from 
agricultural production roughly equal to that of laborers in 
other social strata, or at least enough to ensure the normal 
operations of simple reproduction in agriculture and animal 
husbandry and to prevent them from being hurt. When grain prices 
on the market drop below protection prices, the state must 
purchase the grain on peasants' hands within the scope defined 
by government regulations on protective price procurement. 
  (Writer's unit: Rural Development Studies Institute, Chinese 
Academy of Social Sciences (Beijing 100020) 
  Responsible editor: Li Yukun [2621 3768 0530] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66216 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94025" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  28 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> SOCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Nationwide Study Evaluates Public Education </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Nationwide Study Evaluates Public Education </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0233B Beijing LIAOWANG [OUTLOOK] in Chinese No 9, 28 Feb 
94 pp 4-5 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0233B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing LIAOWANG [OUTLOOK] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Special Correspondent: "New Ideas About </F>
Educational System Reform -- Investigation and Research Report 
on the Socialist Market Economy and Educational System Reform"] 
  [Excerpts] [passage omitted] For the past nearly half a 
year, the State Education Commission's National Education 
Development Research Center has conducted a special study in 
conjunction with the education sector in more than 20 provinces, 
municipalities, and autonomous regions, and with central 
government ministries and commissions, holding various kinds of 
workshops with them. It has reached a consensus with leaders in 
units in charge of education and with economic and scientific 
and technical units, experts, and people doing actual work about 
major problems in correlating the socialist market economy with 
reform of the educational system. 
<H5>  Change From the Old to the New System: Development Faces </H5>
Conspicuous Problems 
  The development and reform of education faces numerous new 
problems in the current process of changing from the old to the 
new system. Some of these problems are still very prominent. 
They are manifested in the following three regards: 
  1. The priority development of education has not truly been 
accorded a strategic position. The emphasis on inputs of 
material resources and the slighting of the development of 
manpower resources that has long existed in China's economic 
construction has still not been fundamentally reversed. Some 
comrades in charge regard development of the economy as a 
mandatory task, but development of education as an optional 
task. In the process of accelerating economic construction, a 
mistaken idea has developed that "the economy must be improved 
rapidly but education need not be looked after," and that 
"education must yield to the economy." In the zeal to get on 
with economic projects, build office buildings, auditoriums, 
guest houses, and hostels, and put up development zones, 
investment in education is slighted, or money for education is 
even diverted to other purposes, and a serious situation exists 
everywhere of teachers not receiving the wages they should 
receive. 
  2. Reform of China's present educational system still lags 
behind the need for economic system reform. On the one hand, 
schools still do not have the mechanisms they should have to 
operate as they see fit, to develop themselves, and to restrain 
themselves. On the other hand, government functions have not 
been genuinely transformed. No effective macroeconomic control 
system has begun to be built; new troubles and problems have 
risen in education; and overall direction, regulation, and 
control are not vigorous. The subject matter, the precepts, and 
the teaching methods used in education in China today do not 
meet needs for building socialism and developing a socialist 
market economy; the number, the make-up and caliber, and the 
standards set for human talent being trained do not satisfy 
requirements for development of the economy and the society; and 
overall returns from education and returns from the operation of 
schools are not high. 
  3. Getting money for education has become harder. The 
problem 
of a lack of continuity and an outflow of personnel from the 
teaching corps is serious. Fiscal outlays for education have 
long languished around a low 12 percent. The inauguration of 
some measures of a political nature in recent years has actually 
put a damper on the raising of funds for education through many 
channels. Not only does the level of investment in education not 
meet the ever increasing need for education in the development 
of a market economy and society, but it can hardly satisfy basic 
needs for development of existing educational endeavors. During 
1992, public expenditures for middle school and primary school 
education in more than half of the country's provinces showed 
negative growth. Only 8.4 percent of the experimental equipment 
needed in primary schools was made available, and in five 
provinces and cities, it was less than 1 percent. Nationwide 15 
million square meters of middle and primary schools are in 
dangerous buildings, and in some provinces and autonomous 
regions, the percentage of dangerous middle and primary school 
buildings has taken varying degrees of upturn. Because of the 
increase in the population base figure, during the final 7 years 
of the twentieth century, the number of pupils in middle and 
primary schools will increase by 34 million. Unless effective 
measures were taken, the goal of 9 years of compulsory education 
nationwide will be difficult to attain. Money for institutions 
of higher education is extremely scarce. For quite a few 
schools, after deducting for price rises, the actual amount of 
money for school operation has decreased year after year. The 
problem of the overly low salaries of professors has remained 
unsolved for a long time. In 1992, several hundred thousand 
middle and primary school teachers nationwide left the teaching 
profession, most of them first-rate teachers having advanced 
degrees. A survey of 95 institutions of higher education showed 
the loss of 27 percent of young teachers between 1981 and 1989. 
In addition to those who went abroad, 48 percent went into high 
salary corporations and firms. 
  [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66217 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94026" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  15 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> SOCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Phenomenon of Christianity Fever </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Phenomenon of Christianity Fever </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Explained 

<F P=102>   94CM0209A Hong Kong TANGTAI [CONTEMPORARY] in Chinese No 34, 
15 Jan 94 pp 54-56 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0209A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong TANGTAI [CONTEMPORARY] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Pi Ming (3968 2494): "Mainland Christian Fever"] </F>
  [Text] [Excerpts] [passage omitted] Editor's 
Note: [passage omitted] This article was originally 
published in Issue Number 918 of China and Church. 
For reasons of editing, it is slightly abridged in this 
publication. 
  [passage omitted] Fang Litian [2455 4539 1131], a scholar in 
the mainland, points out that the regions of "alarming" growth 
for Christianity include Huaiyin City, Jiangsu (in 1981 the 
approximate number of Christians was more than 20,000. It 
increased by 20,000 every year until 1986, and by 1990 it had 
increased to 140,000); the Wenzhou region of Zhejiang (in 1981 
the approximate number of Christians was 200,000. By 1990 it had 
increased to more than 300,000); and Lai'an County, Anhui (the 
county only had eleven believers in the early 1950s; by 1976 
there were only 77, but by 1990 there were upwards of 1,000 
people). Mr. Fang believes that this phenomenon illustrates two 
points: 1) Since the 1950s, religious believers have increased 
the fastest in the last ten years. 2) Some regions of China 
truly have developed a "religion fever." [passage omitted] 
  Although these data alarm people, there is no denying this 
religious "upsurge." But the majority of people in religious and 
scholarly circles in the mainland do not want to look upon this 
as an "ailment." Wang Weifan [3076 4850 5672] of Nanjing 
University's Institute for the Study of Religion believes that 
although the growth of Christianity has exceeded that of other 
religions in recent years, it is essentially normal. It has not 
reached a "fever" level, and there is no need to be 
"panic-stricken." 
  According to recent statistics (or estimates) of mainland 
Christian circles, the approximate number of Christians 
(Orthodox) currently in China is 6 million to 9 million. And 
Hong Kong and overseas estimates of the number of mainland 
Christians vary from 20 million to 50 million. 
  There are more women than men and more old people than young 
in typical mainland churches.... But estimates of the proportion 
of young believers have notably increased.... In addition, many 
rural believers are illiterate, estimated at half or more. The 
educational level of urban believers is rather high. There even 
are professors and famous physicians among them.... 
  What was described above, however, is the general situation. 
The mainland certainly also has many atypical examples. As 
regards the age structure of believers, there is a report that 
indicates that in churches in certain areas of Henan and Shanxi, 
80 percent of believers are 18 years of age or under. As regards 
the educational level of believers, in urban churches, the 
proportion of young intellectuals is constantly rising. In 
academic circles, there even are quite a few students who are 
trying to introduce Christian culture. They do not attend 
church, but are "Christian sympathizers." [passage omitted] 
  People's zeal for Christianity began from the mid-1980s. 
"Religious fever" or "Christian fever" is by no means a post 
"June 4" incident phenomenon. In summarizing the reasons for 
"Christian fever" among mainland students and Christians, they 
can be divided into the following four aspects: 
  1. Traditional and historical factors: Most of the regions 
with rapid growth of Christianity and a concentration of 
believers have a rather long history of dissemination of 
Christianity. For example, in such localities as Wenzhou, 
Zhejiang and Fuqing, Fujian, the share of rural believers could 
be the highest in the nation, and these regions both have a long 
history of Christianity. In another respect, family's 
traditional beliefs also are an important factor bringing young 
people into the church. Parents give their children religious 
instruction from when they are small. According to an 
investigative report, the choir of a certain Shanghai church has 
more than twenty young people, and "almost all of them are 
children of believers." 
  2. Social and economic factors: Concepts of ghost are still 
widespread, especially among farmers with a rather low level of 
education. Some think that the more rapid growth of rural 
Christianity than urban actually is the transfer or ("change of 
sentiments") regarding ghost concepts. In another respect, 
Chinese society has always emphasized men and slighted women. 
Especially in the countryside, women have not been able to be 
economically independent and they cannot decide for themselves 
on family issues. They often are dissatisfied with their daily 
lives. So, they go to church to seek satisfaction, to the point 
that in some villages the ratio of female believers is as high 
as 80 percent. For example, in Gaozuo township, Suining county, 
Jiangsu, there are 1,248 Christians in the whole township and 
1,185 are women, making up 92.8 percent of the total. 
  3. Psychological factors: A number of reports reveal that 
the 
majority of believers are believers because of illness. 
According to a 1985 sample survey at the Puzhou Church in the 
Longwan district of Wenzhou, 57 percent of believers entered the 
church because of illness. According to a survey the same year 
in Anhui's Bangbu, 126 of 160 Christians were believers because 
of illness. And 1,620 of 2,500 Christians from Guzhen county 
were believers because of illness. A survey of a village in 
northern Jiangsu also indicated that 60 percent to 70 percent of 
believers believed because of illness. In addition, some 
believers who encountered setbacks in love, marriage, family, 
school, or careers received spiritual consoling at church, and 
this was a reason for them to become believers. 
  4. Other factors: For a long time during the Cultural 
Revolution period, religion was forbidden. That could be a 
reason for the "rebound" after the churches reopened in the 
1980s. The more believers were repressed the more it brought 
about regeneration and solidarity, triggering an opposite 
effect. [passage omitted.] 
  Those in the mainland concerned with "Christian fever" are 
mainly in three categories: academic circles, Christian circles, 
and people in party and government departments concerned with 
religion. Because people in the three categories have different 
backgrounds and goals, their reactions to "Christian fever" are 
naturally somewhat diverse. 
  The first "panic-stricken" group probably are some cadres 
who 
supervise religion. It is their duty to "normalize" religion and 
attack "abnormal religious activity." Any religious activity 
that is not registered with the government can be looked upon as 
being illegal or abnormal. 
  Those concerned with "Christian fever" naturally also must 
include people from Christian circles. They play up a lot the 
evaluation of the positive aspects of religion and its 
contribution to society and oppose the sweeping "opiate theory." 
  After it was proposed to establish a totally new concept of 
religion in the mid-1980s, it brought openness to academic 
research on religion and church circles strived more strongly to 
implement a policy of "religious freedom," believing that 
religious freedom included study, discussion, and criticism of 
religion. Religious people should not be excluded from 
participating in research on religion (indicating that in the 
past there was this exclusion). In addition, they also 
emphasized that a policy of freedom of religious belief should 
not be a tactic to abolish religion. 
  As regards the reaction of academic circles to "Christian 
fever," we can probably say that they gradually left the 
"ultra-leftist" line and made significant breakthroughs in the 
study of religion. In the past, the orientation of religious 
studies completely obeyed the Central Committee of the Chinese 
Communist Party. (For example, the "World Religion Research 
Institute" was established in Beijing in 1964 because Mao Zedong 
appointed them to criticize theology.) By the mid-1980s, 
research on religion no longer was bogged down in philosophical 
discussions of the nature of religion, but the focus shifted to 
an investigation of the actual situation and gradually changed 
to combining "theory" with "practice." This was mainly the study 
of Christianity. The main content of the investigation was: The 
growth in the number of believers, the age structure, the sex 
ratio, the reasons for believing, the family background of 
believers, and the affect of religious belief on family life and 
social ethics concepts. Most of these types of survey reports of 
the actual situation in churches were published in the two 
biennial journals Religion and Modern Studies 
on Religion. Between 1987 and 1992, nearly twenty of these 
survey reports on the current state of Christianity were 
published. Although some only contributed extremely sketchy data 
and could by no means be considered rigorous in their research 
methodology, as regards the Chinese Communist attitude toward 
religion, this kind of research report was a very great 
breakthrough. [passage omitted] 
  Regarding the study of religious theory, the "opiate theory" 
no longer has a dogmatic position. In its place is the renewed 
development of the early 1950s' "five natures theory" proposed 
by people such as Zhou Enlai and Li Weihan: That religion is of 
the masses, democratic, international, long-lasting, and 
complex. The previous insistence on the argument that religion 
would very quickly die out in socialism was changed to exploring 
the possibility of religion becoming the superstructure of 
socialism, conditions for cooperation between religion and 
socialism, and the social function of religion. The most 
difficult to change was the past close affiliation of religious 
studies with the philosophical sphere. Moreover, ideological 
issues often extended to political contention. But in recent 
years, the study of religion has begun to be relatively 
independent and have broadened to several fields of social 
science research, including religious phenomenology, the 
sociology of religion, religious anthropology, and the 
psychology of religion. 
  In sum, in recent years academic circles' study of religion 
and evaluation of Christianity have generally become open and 
positive and people from church circles and religious workers 
simultaneously participate in research projects. But the general 
orientation of research and form of reporting still are rather 
influenced by the party and government climate. The current 
respected mainland authority on religious issues is Luo Zhufeng 
[5012 4554 7364], the head of the East China Religious Affairs 
Office in the 1950s. From the 1980s to the present Mr. Luo has 
held such positions as vice president and advisor to the China 
Religion Society, president of the Shanghai Municipal Religion 
Society, and honorary head of the Institute for the Study of 
Religion of the Shanghai Social Studies Academy. Religious 
Issues in China's Socialist Period, of which he is the 
chief editor can be considered representative of present 
mainland opinion on religious issues. Mr. Luo is an old cadre 
administering religious affairs. Obviously research on religion 
still is essentially led by the party and the government. 
[passage omitted.] 
  The sudden increase in the number of Christians in recent 
years obviously caused greater interest and acceptance of 
Christianity from people in various circles of Chinese society 
and also helped churches and believers in various localities to 
strive for their basic rights and freedoms. After churches in 
the name of "uniting the broad masses of believers" contended in 
the "democracy movement," the government exerted pressure on 
Christianity. I am convinced that Christian doctrine and church 
life can continue to attract the large number of Chinese people 
who do not have any belief and have lost their ideals. I 
estimate that in the next few years the number of believers will 
continue to rise. As regards the clash of Chinese Christianity 
and Chinese culture, mainland scholars, using Taiwan 
Christianity as a precedent, believe that it would be difficult 
for the churches to become a force clashing with Chinese 
culture. The Christian churches in Taiwan also grew rapidly for 
a period. Although Taiwan has freedom to spread religion, after 
several decades of development, Christianity still is an 
extremely small minority religion, not to mention 
"Christianization" of the culture. As to Chinese Christianity's 
being assimilated by the Chinese culture, it also will not 
happen to a very great extent. In the past, Christianity's 
development in China was not at all assimilated into the Chinese 
culture or integrated with native religions like Buddhism. 
Because Christianity's world view and the world view of the 
Chinese people clash, China's Christian fever probably will 
gradually stabilize. Christianity quite probably will be able to 
maintain its basic characteristics in China and become a bit of 
a decoration for Chinese culture. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66218 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94027" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  15 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY, PUBLIC SECURITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Two Analyses of T-72 Tank Performance in Gulf War </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Two Analyses of T-72 Tank Performance in Gulf War </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    T-72 Losses Attributed to Abandonment </H4>

<F P=102> 94CM0251A Beijing BINGQI ZHISHI [ORDNANCE KNOWLEDGE] in 
Chinese No 2, 15 Mar 94 pp 20-23 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0251A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing BINGQI ZHISHI [ORDNANCE KNOWLEDGE] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Kong Lingtong (1313 0109 6894): "Experts' Vision </F>
Sharp in the Final Analysis"] 
  [Text] The so-called "Desert Sword" ground warfare in the 
Gulf War ended abruptly leaving many non-participants with a 
sense of unfulfillment. Chinese weapons experts, who had hoped 
to sift some useful information from the give and take of real 
battle and fighting at close quarters between the two sides, 
were particularly disappointed. They were very much dissatisfied 
with CNN's constant transmission of pictures showing laser 
guided devices locking on and hitting targets. They felt that 
this was scare tactics to a certain extent, and might even be 
showing off or bravado. 
  Finally, they obtained some relatively firsthand material in 
the form of a stack of photographs taken on the spot by the 
Chinese observers that the UN had sent to the Iraq border to 
supervise the cease fire. When the war first ended, the scorched 
earth and the wreckage of tanks and armored personnel carriers 
as far as the eye could see conveyed the feeling of an enormous 
graveyard. Naturally, the Chinese observers' cameras focused 
mostly on Iraqi T-72 tanks inasmuch as these tanks were closest 
to China's own equipment in terms of historical background and 
performance. Thus, they were of greater interest to them. 
  The scene in one photograph was rather sorrowful. The 
wreckage of a T-72 tank lay twisted in a destroyed desert 
revetment, its tracks buried in the desert sand, its large 
caliber gun wrenched to the side, but its anti-aircraft gun 
facing straight ahead. In the middle of the armor on the front 
of the tank was a large shell hole torn by the steel core of a 
low-grade uranium armor piercing shell from an American M1A1 
tank. From a cursory glance, this seemed to confirm that the 
T-72 tank was not the equal of the M1A1. It had been hit 
straight on. However, our tank experts are not simpletons who 
parrot the views of others. After scrutinizing the photograph, 
they found the real reason this tank had been destroyed. 
  "Look. Here's a clue," said one research institute tank 
expert explaining a detail he had found. "In the photograph, the 
T-72's gun barrel is not facing in the direction of fire of the 
American tank like the muzzle of the machine gun, but 45 degrees 
to the right.... What does this show? It shows that before it 
was hit by the M1A1 shell, the crew had run away. One feature 
of the T-72 is that the tank driver entry hatch is located under 
the gun barrel, so unless the turret is moved a certain amount, 
the personnel inside the tank cannot raise the hatch to get out. 
Clearly, the destroyed tank was not in combat mode at the time. 
It had been abandoned. How would you judge this kind of 
destruction? Should you blame the personnel or blame the tank?" 
This expert made a conclusion: "I do not feel this was a real 
tank war inasmuch as the morale of one side was undermined and 
it abandoned its equipment. They did not resist." 
  The American M1A1 is one of the world's most advanced land 
warfare weapons. Of this, there is no doubt. However, the 
difference between it and the T-72 is by no means the difference 
between heaven and earth. For psychological warfare reasons, 
long before the ground warfare began, the American army 
conducted a lot of propaganda through the news media, claiming 
that it had "an effective range twice that of Iraq's best T-72 
tank." 
  Was it really all that wonderful? Our experts had 
reservations from the very beginning. They believed real data 
more. The fire control systems of the two tanks are on a par; 
they both use smooth-bore guns, and the T-72's gun diameter is 
125 mm while the M1A1's is 120 mm. The T-72's armor piercing 
shells have an muzzle velocity of 1,800 meters per second; the 
M1A1's 1,650 mm per second. What is more, the T-72's trajectory 
is flatter; thus, it has a very high hit rate without using its 
complex fire control system. Therefore, our exports were 
anxious to find out whether these two weapons really battled 
each other in a true sense. Was the overnight collapse of the 
Iraqi armored corps, which was equipped with more than 1,000 
T-72 tanks, because its personnel did not stand the test or 
because the tanks did not stand the test? 
  The experts had sharp eyes. The above problems could not be 
approached solely from the angle of a confrontation between 
weapons. The Iraqi high command robbed the tank corps of its 
assault and maneuverability advantages by placing in defensive 
fortifications, where it became a target, a fine weapon that 
might have been able to fight off the enemy. Even when the enemy 
moved several hundred kilometers westward, leaving his flanks 
exposed, it did not organize a powerful counterattack. The 
soldiers carrying out the combat mission had also not recovered 
from the suffering and exhaustion of the war between Iraq and 
Iran before being sent into battle again. They also had a 
muddled idea about the goals of Iraq's invasion of Kuwait and 
about this war. In addition, after the war broke out, command 
was paralyzed, supplies were cut off, and many soldiers were 
semi-starved or had no fresh water to drink, so how could their 
morale be good? Consequently, during 100 hours of ground 
warfare, the multi-national forces captured 2,100 Iraqi soldiers 
for every man they lost. For every tank they lost, they 
destroyed 1,878 tanks and armored personnel carriers. Certainly, 
this was unique in the annals of modern warfare. Nevertheless, 
anyone who knows anything at all about warfare also realizes 
that surrender without fighting, and abandonment of vehicles was 
also a very large factor. 
  The detail that our tank experts revealed should not be 
belittled. It sets to rights the ballyhoo of some press media as 
well as the acceptance of this ballyhoo as true by some people. 
One should take the evaluation of the victors with a grain of 
salt! This is because the "one-sidedness" of this war did not 
stem completely from the too great technical backwardness of one 
of the contestants. The personnel were not tough enough. Even 
though the T-72 is slightly inferior to the M1A1, both can 
inflict severe damage on each other. The cost of manufacturing 
each M1A1 is $2 million, but a T-72 costs much less. Even a 
"gold dollar empire" cannot afford this expense except for a 
death-defying struggle. To regress at bit, the Iraqi army 
relied on the laying of more than 20 million land mines 
(including some high technology smart mines) in a defense zone, 
and the use of T-72s to organize several pretty good battles to 
oppose their removal (unfortunately they did not!). Naturally, 
in considering the above, the experts subconsciously thought 
something they did not say and that is not nice to say, namely: 
"No question about it; things would have been different had it 
been our troops in the same T-72s." 
  Having said this, the writer feels a statement that Mao 
Zedong made some years ago in "On Protracted War" would be most 
appropriate: "Soldiers are the foundation of an army. Unless the 
armed forces are infused with political spirit, and unless 
progressive political work is done to make this infusion, the 
will to resist cannot be aroused to the maximum in officers and 
men, and the best technical and tactical foundation cannot be 
obtained for making the most of their effectiveness." 
(Selected Works of Mao Zedong). 
  Truth may sometimes fade from people's memories, but it can 
never be eradicated. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66219 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94028" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  15 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY, PUBLIC SECURITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Two Analyses of T-72 Tank Performance in Gulf War </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Two Analyses of T-72 Tank Performance in Gulf War </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    M1A1 Deemed Superior in Four Aspects </H4>

<F P=102> 94CM0251B Beijing BINGQI ZHISHI [ORDNANCE KNOWLEDGE] in 
Chinese No 2, 15 Mar 94 pp 23-24 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0251B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing BINGQI ZHISHI [ORDNANCE KNOWLEDGE] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Li Renye (2621 0088 2814): "A Pair of </F>
Outstanding Weapons Tested in the Desert. Can the T-72 Stand Up 
to the M1A1?"] 
  [Excerpts] Tanks have been used in many limited wars since 
the end of World War II; however, in terms of quantity, quality 
and intensity of combat, the 23-27 February 1991 ground warfare 
in the Gulf War may be rated the mother of all tank battles. 
  Admittedly, the combat reports published today are 
explanations that the United States Department of Defense makes 
to Congress and the public; thus, they are bound to be biased. 
Nevertheless, it is still possible to make an evaluation of the 
tanks on the basis of these reports and a technical analysis. 
This article seeks to use technical analysis to find ways to 
remedy shortcomings in existing tanks and to develop technology 
for future combat tanks. [passage omitted] 
  Battlefield Performance of M1A1 and T-72 Compared 
  After the Gulf War was over, the Soviet-made T-72 and the 
American-made M1A1 tanks became an object of much verbal 
sword-crossing both in China and abroad. The main focus of 
remarks was on the following four things: 
  Sighting and Aiming Equipment. If the decisive 
factor in the M1A1 tanks destruction of the T-72 tanks were to 
be listed in order of priority, the high performance thermal 
imaging sighting and aiming device would have to be placed 
first. This is also the reason that the American forces do a lot 
of night fighting, and even pick bad weather when visibility is 
very poor to fight surface warfare. The M1A1 tank's thermal 
imagining sighting and aiming device is a passive sighting and 
aiming device that can be used both during the day and night 
that the Hughes Corporation produces. It employs a single target 
periscope. Not only does the device provide images of targets, 
but it also displays range and various kinds of firing data that 
a laser range finder figures out. Night performance 
characteristics are as follows: Ten-fold magnification when the 
field of vision is 5 degrees; three-fold magnification when the 
field of vision is 16 degrees; and an effective night-sighting 
distance of 2,000 meters under ordinary circumstances. During 
serious sand storms, the sighting distance falls to 900 meters. 
  The Iraqi Army's newest model T-72M1 tank uses an 
Iraqi-manufactured aiming device whose performance is 
substantially identical with that of the Soviet-manufactured 
TPN-1-49-23 infra-red night sighting and aiming device. 
  The TPN night-sighting and aiming system employs an active 
infra-red system in which in the infra-red rays from an 
infra-red searchlight are reflected back from the target on 
which they shine. The receiving device for the TPN system, which 
is mounted to the left front of the gun turret, processes the 
reflected infra-red image to lock the aiming device on the 
target. Under ordinary weather conditions, its effective 
night-sighting distance is between 600 and 800 meters (at a 
5.5-fold magnification), which is one-third that of the M1A1. In 
a severe sand storm, when visibility with the naked eye is less 
than 200 meters, the effective sighting distance declines to 
around 300 meters. Its most fatal weakness is that the infra-red 
rays that its infra-red searchlight emit amount to giving the 
M1A1's passive thermal imager a target to shoot at. Clearly, the 
T-72 is vulnerable day or night. 
  Of course, the M1A1 tank's thermal imaging aiming device is 
not the acme of perfection either. For example, the thermal 
imagining device's image may darken at times; thus regulations 
provide that it is to be used a maximum of 8 hours per day. 
Furthermore, the thermal imagining system is unable to identify 
friend from foe. This resulted in American army tank's regularly 
damaging each other by mistake during the Gulf War. 
  Long Distance First Round Hit Rate. The first 
round hit rate is of crucial importance in live warfare. This 
was amply demonstrated in the Gulf War. According to American 
Captain Jibeina [phonetic], company commander of D Company of 
the 1/35 Armored Battalion, First Armored Division: "Our 
company's 14 M1A1 tanks can unerringly hit T-72 tanks." 
  A report from A Company of the 2/4 Cavalry Battalion of the 
American 24th Mechanized Infantry Division said: "Our company is 
equipped with 12 M1A1 tanks and 14 M3 cavalry tanks. During an 
engagement with an Iraqi Army T-72 tank, Corporal First Class 
Sinide's [phonetic] M3 Bradley cavalry tank came under attack 
from a T-72 tank at a distance of 600 meters. A shell from the 
T-72s 125 mm gun landed 10 meters away from the M3 without 
hitting it. The M3 only received a shock wave from it. Next, the 
Iraqi T-72 tank was destroyed by a shell from an M1A1 tank that 
was supporting the M3 tank from the rear." This is a classic 
example of what can happen when the first round fails to hit. 
  During the Gulf War, the poor performance of the Iraqi 
tanks' 
fire control system, which led to inability to aim and fire 
quickly, provided the American tanks with opportunities. 
Reportedly, it takes an M1A1 tank 6.2 seconds to fire its first 
round. Although we do not know how long a T-72 takes, British 
Chieftain tanks, which are of the same generation as the T-72s, 
take 13 seconds. 
  An American army report said that two M1A1 tanks that T-72 
tanks hit could have been repaired, but the American army 
destroyed them on the spot for security reasons. It should be 
noted that these two tanks were hit at a range of less than 
1,000 meters and that their armor was not penetrated. 
  An American army investigator verified that most of the 
Iraqi 
army tanks that M1A1s hit with the first round were at a range 
of between 2,000 and 3,650 meters. 
  Armor Piercing Power. The American M1A1 tank's gun 
fires an M829A1 armor piercing, fin-stabilized, descending sabot 
(APFSDS). This shell weighs 18.7 kilograms. Its core weighs 7.16 
kilograms (including the sabot). The core is made of a low-grade 
uranium alloy, is 24 mm in diameter, and has a 20:1 length to 
diameter ratio. Its muzzle velocity is 1,675 meters per second, 
and the muzzle energy is slightly higher than 9 megajoules. At a 
range of 1,000 meters, it can pierce armor to the equivalent of 
600 mm thick rolled homogenous steel armor. At 2,000 meters, it 
can pierce the equivalent of 550 mm thick armor of the same kind. 
  The Soviet-made tank's 125 mm, long APFSDS has been 
developed 
for at least three generations. This includes the first BM-12, 
which had a total projectile weight of 29.9 kilograms, whose 
core was made of tungsten alloy, and whose diameter was 44 mm. 
Since the weight of the core is somewhat lighter than of the 
American-made armor piercing core (4.5 kgs), muzzle velocity is 
also somewhat higher (1,720 meters per second). However, because 
the core is light, muzzle power is also less at only 6.6 
megajoules, and projectile velocity falls off fairly rapidly. 
This is particularly disadvantageous for long-range combat. In 
addition, the length to diameter ratio of the BM-12 is only 
10:1, and the core diameter is greater. Therefore, core mass is 
less per unit of armor area, meaning that armor piercing energy 
per unit of area is less. At a range of 2,000 meters, its 
vertical armor piercing ability is only equal to 400 mm thick 
homogeneous steel armor. 
  The shells that the Iraqi army used in the Gulf War may have 
been either the old BM-9s (whose production was halted in 1973), 
or the old style BM-11 armor piercing shells. The BM-9s core 
weighs 3.6 kgs; the shell's velocity is 1,800 meters per second, 
and its shell core length-to-diameter ratio is 9:1. Their 
remaining velocity capacity is poor. At a range of 1,000 meters, 
their velocity falls to 142 meters per second. At a range of 
2,000 meters, the loss of projectile energy is even greater. 
Their armor-piercing power is much less than that of the BM-12, 
being only 24 mm. The BM-11 shell's armor piercing strength is 
300 mm. 
  It should be strongly emphasized that there is still room 
for 
improvement of Soviet-made 125 mm gun ammunition. Nevertheless, 
even the old BM-9 ammunition's muzzle energy is greater than 
that of the west's 105 mm gun's armor-piercing shells. The 
Middle East War showed that when an American-made second 
generation tank such as the M-60 was the adversary, all it took 
was the T-62's 115 mm gun to deal with it. The war in the Bakka 
Valley also showed that Israel's Merkava tank, which was 
designed with extremely close attention to survivability, 
likewise was unable to escape destruction from the T-72's 125 mm 
gun. 
  These circumstances show that the APFSDSs that are used 
today are capable of dealing with an adversary that does not 
have the most up-to-date composite armor. 
  Armor Defense It may be inferred that a material 
such as a fine mesh nylon fiber is placed between two layers of 
titanium high quality, double strength plates to make the M1A1 
tanks' composite armor. The low-grade uranium material mixed 
into the M1A1HA tank's armor is 2.5 times as dense as steel. 
  Unlike the composite armor of the traditional M1A1 tank, the 
new armor of the M1A1HA uses new materials, and it also uses a 
new form of construction. The new generation of composite 
armor no longer consists solely of layers of different materials 
with space in between, but adds a separating layer that is able 
to absorb shock or reduce damage. This layer is made up of 
extremely elastic honeycomb or corrugated material. It can 
absorb the shock energy of kinetic energy ammunition. It has a 
cushioning effect, and it can diffuse the kinetic energy 
throughout the entire construction material that braces the 
armor plate. No longer are the materials that form the composite 
armor plane joined by a bonding agent or welded together. 
Instead, layers of different materials simply overlap, each 
layer being able to move. This serves both to break up the core 
of the kinetic energy ammunition and to diffuse the explosive 
shell's metallic jet flow. 
  By using this kind of construction, when a damaged piece of 
armor is changed or a new kind of composite armor is used, all 
that is required is to open the composite armor's external weld. 
The enter process of changing a piece of armor takes less than 
15 minutes. Furthermore, this replacement of the low grade 
uranium armor can make the most of modern armor's best 
protection capability. 
  By inference, the protection capability of an M1A1HA tank's 
armor against an APFSDS is equal to approximately 600 mm thick 
steel armor. In dealing with a high explosive squash head, it is 
equivalent to 1,300 mm thick steel armor. 
  Therefore, a BM-11 armor piercing shell that a T-72 tank 
fires, which can only penetrate 300 mm of armor plate, naturally 
cannot penetrate the front armor of an M1A1 tank. Even a BM-12 
cannot penetrate it. Reportedly, the front of the T-72M1 tank's 
turret has not only the main armor consisting of rolled steel 
armor plate, but also several layers of special armor having a 
maximum thickness of 280 mm. This special armor consists of 
three layers. The outer layer is armor steel; the second layer 
is glass fiber/ceramic material; and the third layer is also 
armor steel. According to an American army analysis, the 
T-72M1's armor not only can be penetrated by an American M829A1 
shell, but it has no defense against a 125 mm shell. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66220 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94029" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  16 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY, PUBLIC SECURITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Journal Profiles Beijing Military Region Officers </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Journal Profiles Beijing Military Region Officers </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Commanding Officer Li Laizhu </H4>

<F P=102> 94CM0245A Hong Kong KUANG-CHIAO CHING [WIDE ANGLE] in 
Chinese No 258, 16 Mar 94 pp 66-68 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0245A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong KUANG-CHIAO CHING [WIDE ANGLE] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Li Zhongluo (2621 0022 3157): "Li Laizhu Takes </F>
Command as Commander of Beijing Military Region"] 
  [Text] In January this year, 62-year old Lt.Gen. Li Laizhu 
replaced Wang Chengbin to become the eighth commander of the 
Beijing MR. Yang Yong was the seventh commander of the Beijing 
MR for nine years. His tenure was the longest of all. Chen 
Xilian and Qin Jiwei were next. Both of them stayed on the post 
for seven years. The tenure of both Li Desheng and Zhou Yibing 
was the shortest one for less than three years. Wang Chengbin 
was at this post for three years and nine months, and the first 
commander of the Beijing MR Yang Chengwu stayed on his post for 
three and half years. 
<H5>  Li Laizhu Comes From 2d Field Army </H5>
  Just like Yang Yong, Li Desheng, Chen Xilian and Qin Jiwei, 
Li Laizhu comes from the PLA 2d Field Army which was under the 
command of Liu Bocheng and Deng Xiaoping. The only difference is 
that all the several predecessors of his were veteran Red Army 
members who fought hundreds of battles during the 10-year civil 
war, while Li Laizhu, just like his predecessor Wang Chengbin, 
were cadres of the 1938 era who joined the army in the later 
stage of the War of Resistance against Japanese Aggression. 
<H5>  Li Laizhu's Hometown in Northwest Shandong </H5>
  Li Laizhu was born in 1932 in Shenxian County, located 
in northwest Shandong Province. Shenxian County was a part of 
the anti-Japanese base area in northwest Shandong built by the 
Chinese Communists during the War of Resistance against Japanese 
Aggression . The Northwest Shandong District was originally 
under the administration of the Sixth Prefectural Commissioner's 
Office in Shandong Province, which has jurisdiction over 12 
counties including Liaocheng, Chiping, Boping, Tangyi, Kouxian, 
Shouzhang, Yanggu and Shenxian County. The district cut across 
the Yellow River and was located along the border of Hebei, 
Shandong and Honan. 
  In November 1936, Fan Zhuxian was appointed Commissioner 
of the Sixth Shandong Provincial Special District of the 
Kuomintang Government. 
  After the "Lugouqiao Incident" in 1937, Zhang Linzhi, 
Director of the Organization Department under the Shandong 
Provincial CPC Committee, led more than 70 Chinese Communist 
Party members and students who were forced to leave their native 
places to go to the Liaocheng Prefecture to carry out activities 
against Japanese aggression and for national salvation. They 
also built fine relations with Fan Zhuxian and formed a united 
front with him. Liaocheng fell into the Japanese hands on 15 
November 1938. Fan Zhuxian, CPC member Zhang Yuguang and 600 
soldiers and civilians died for the country during this campaign. 
<H5>  Yang Yong Opened Up Northwest Shandong Base Area </H5>
  The Western Shandong Regional CPC Committee was 
established in January 1938. Zhang Linzhi was appointed 
secretary of the committee. The 686th Regiment of the 115th 
Division of the Eight Route Army (Regiment Commander Yang Yong 
and Political Commissar Su Zhenhua) moved into the region and 
spread the War against Japanese Aggression to areas west of the 
Yun River. The main military forces boldly drove to the areas 
west of the Tai Mountains in April. In July, those PLA units in 
areas west of the Yun River became an independent brigade of the 
115th Division. Yang Yong was appointed the brigade commander 
and concurrently political commissar of the brigade. Then, the 
area west of the Yun River and that west of the Tai Mountains 
joined together. The 
Juancheng-Juye-Heze-Jiaxiang-Wenshang-Yuncheng Border Region was 
established in August 1939. It stretched further toward 
northwest Shandong. In the winter of 1939, the Eighth Route Army 
troops which entered northwest Shandong opened up base areas in 
Shouzhang, Fanxian, Yanggu, Liaocheng, Shenxian, Chaocheng and 
Guancheng. The West Shandong Military District was established 
in April 1940. The 343rd Brigade (which became the 3rd Training 
Brigade later) with Commander Yang Yong and Political Commissar 
Xiao Hua was stationed in the district. The area under its 
jurisdiction covered Jinan, Yanzhou, Juye, Juancheng, Guantao 
and Yucheng. At the end of 1940, this area was developed into a 
western Shandong anti-Japanese base area which covered the areas 
west and east of the Yun River, the area west of the Tai 
Mountains and the Northwest Shandong District . At that time, 
Shenxian was under the jurisdiction of the Northwest Shandong 
District. In addition to Shenxian, this district also covered 
Guanxian, Guantao, Chaocheng, Linqing, Qiuxian and other 
counties. After the founding of the West Shandong Military 
District, the Northwestern Shandong District became the 3d 
Military Sub-Command (Commander Bai Yun and Political Commissar 
Wang Leting). In April 1940, the Chinese Communist Party held a 
congress of representatives from 52 counties in western Shandong 
and set up the Western Shandong Administrative Office. Xiao Hua 
and Duan Juni were elected director and deputy director of the 
office. 
<H5>  Li Laizhu Took Part in Revolution in Later Stage of War </H5>
Against Japanese Aggression 
  In July 1941, The Western Shandong District and the 
Hebei-Shandong-Henan District merged. After that, they were 
placed under the command of the Hebei-Shandong-Henan 
Anti-Japanese Base Area. In May 1944, the Hebei-Shandong-Henan 
District merged with the South Hebei District, and the Northwest 
Shandong District became the 7th Hebei-Shandong-Henan 
Sub-District (Sub-District Commander Chao Jian-min and Political 
Commissar Xu Mengxia). Li Laizhu was doing some local 
anti-Japanese work in the 7th Sub-District in May 1944. He was 
only 12 years old at that time. 
<H5>  Li Laizhu Joined PLA in February 1947 </H5>
  After Japan surrendered in October 1945, the 7th 
Hebei-Shandong-Henan Sub-District was incorporated into the 
southern Hebei area and became the 1st Southern Hebei 
Sub-District (Commander Bai Yun and Political Commissar Xu 
Mengxia). At the same time, the main army units in the Southern 
Hebei Military District formed the 2d Column (Commander Chen 
Zaidao and Political Commissar Song Renqiong) of the 
Shanxi-Hebei-Henan Military District (Commander Liu Bocheng and 
Political Commissar Deng Xiaoping) in Handan, Hebei. After the 
civil war between the Kuomintang and the Chinese Communists 
started, this column took part in the Juancheng, Huaxian and 
other campaigns. In February 1947, the 2d Column and other 
columns moved to the north, and crossed the Yellow River for 
regrouping. They stationed in the areas northwest of Chaocheng 
and east of Daming which were under the command of the 1st Henan 
Sub-District. During the period of regrouping, the 2d Column 
recruited several thousand soldiers from southern Hebei. At that 
time, Li Laizhu who was doing some work for the 2d Southern 
Hebei Sub-District officially started to work for the army, and 
joined the PLA. He was 15 years old at that time. He joined the 
11th Regiment (Regiment Commander Luo Chongfu and Political 
Commissar Li Xianzhong) of the 4th Brigade (Brigade Commander 
Kong Qingde and Political Commissar Liu Minghui) of the 2d 
Shanxi-Hebei-Shandong-Henan Column as a fighter. 
<H5>  Participate in Battles in Southwest Shandong and in Huaihai </H5>
Campaign 
  Since then, Li Laizhu followed the column took part in 
the Northwestern Shandong Battle and the Dabieshan, Wanxi, 
Wandong, Huaihai and other well-known campaigns, and was 
promoted to deputy platoon leader and then platoon leader. 
  During the Huaihai Campaign, the 11th Regiment of the 
4th Brigade of the 2d Column of the Central Plains Field Army, 
to which Li Lanzhu belonged, checked the assault from the 
Kuomintang Huang Wei Army Group at Dengjiadeng, northwest of 
Mengcheng. It fought for five hours and killed more than 300 
enemy soldiers. The regiment distinguished itself in the entire 
Huaihai Campaign. 
<H5>  Took Part in Yangtze River Crossing and Southwestern </H5>
Campaigns 
  The Central Plains Field Army changed its name to the 2d 
Field Army on 26 January 1949. The 2d Column of the Central 
Plains Field Army changed its name to the 10th Army of the 2d 
Field Army (Army Commander Du Yide, Political Commissar Wang 
Weigang and Deputy Army Commander Fan Chaoli). Li Laizhu was a 
platoon leader of the 83rd Regiment of the 28th Division 
(Division Commander Chen Zhongmin and Political Commissar Yao 
Keyou) of the 10th Army. Later, Li Laizhu fought one battle 
after another, and took part in the campaign of crossing the 
Yangtze River, the Southwestern Campaign and others. 
<H5>  Follow 29th Division from Southwest China to North China </H5>
  Following the founding of New China, the 29th Division 
of the 10th Army was transferred back to the 15th Army in 
February 1951 (Army Commander Qin Jiwei and Political Commissar 
Gu Jingsheng). After that, the division took part in the Korean 
War. In march 1951, Li Laizhu was promoted to deputy political 
instructor of a company under the 83rd Regiment of the 28th 
Division of the 10th Army. In April 1952, the 28th Division of 
the 10th Army was once again placed under the command of the 
23rd Army Corps (Commander Dong Qiwu and Political Commissar Gao 
Kelin). Li Laizhu was promoted to a company-level political 
instructor. At that time, the official designation of the 10th 
Army was abolished, and the 30th Division originally placed 
under its command was transferred back to the Navy. Then the 
23rd Army Corps was placed under the command of the North China 
Military District. 
  The 23rd Army Corps was reorganized into the 69th Army 
and placed in command of the 28th Division and the 107th 
Division. Dong Qiwu was the Commander of the army. The 69th Army 
was under the command of the North China Military District. It 
was later under the command of the Beijing MR. Li Laizhu was 
promoted to deputy regiment political commissar and then 
regiment political commissar, regiment chief of staff, deputy 
regiment commander and then regiment commander of the 83th 
Regiment under the 28th Division. He later became the Division 
Commander of the 28th Division. 
<H5>  Graduated from the PLA Military and Political College in 1976 </H5>
  Li Laizhu graduated from the PLA Military and Political 
College in 1976. The college was established on 6 August 1970 
during the "Cultural Revolution" for the training of military, 
political and logistics commanders at and above the division 
level and a few outstanding officers at the regimental level in 
the PLA. Located in Beijing, the college was placed under the 
direct command of the Military Commission of the CPC Central 
Committee. Huang Yongsheng, Xiao Ke and others were presidents, 
and Zhang Xiuchuan, Tang Liang, Liu Xingyuan were political 
commissars of the college. The college had departments of 
military affairs, political affairs, logistics and others. (The 
college was closed on 7 November 1979.) After graduating from 
the college, Li Laizhu was promoted to Commander of the 28th 
Division of the 69th Army. 
<H5>  Assume Posts as President of Infantry School of Beijing </H5>
Military District and President of Shijiazhuang Army School 
  On 7 November 1977, the Infantry School of the Beijing 
Military District located in the city of Shijiazhuang in Hebei 
Province was reorganized. (This school was reorganized first on 
22 June 1962 and closed on 19 February 1969 during the "Cultural 
Revolution.") At that time, Yuan Jie was President, and 
Political Commissar was Song Shuanglai. Soon after that, Li 
Laizhu was transferred to become Deputy President of the school 
and concurrently Director of the school's Training Department. 
The Beijing MR Infantry School was renamed the Shijiazhuang Army 
School. Li Laizhu was appointed President of the school. The 
school had training classes for company commanders, political 
instructors, platoon leaders and quartermasters and for students 
specialized in communications, logistics and financial affairs. 
The school provided undergraduate studies and professional as 
well as on-the-job training. 
<H5>  Promoted to Deputy Commander of Beijing MR in 1985 </H5>
  In June 1985, Deng Xiaoping reduced China's armed forces 
by one million men. The 11 major military regions were reduced 
to seven. At that time, Qing Jiwei remained commander of the 
Beijing MR. Yang Baibing replaced Fu Chongbi as Political 
Commissar of the Beijing MR. Former deputy commanders of the 
Beijing MR Pan Yan, Wang Yang, Ma Weihua, Xiao Xuanjin, and 
former deputy political commissar Wu Lie, Luo Yinghuai, Qu 
Jingji and other group of veteran Red Army and Eighth Route Army 
members either moved back to the second line or retired. 
Sixty-three year old Zhou Yibing (who replaced Qin Jiwei as 
Commander of the Beijing MR) and Yan Tongmao, 53-year old Li 
Laizhu and 62-year old Liu Yudi and others were reappointed or 
promoted to deputy commanders of the Beijing MR; and 58 year old 
army-level political commissar Chen Peimin was promoted to 
Deputy Political Commissar of the Beijing MR; and 50-year old 
Zhang Gong became the head of the Political Department of the 
Beijing MR. 
<H5>  Awarded Rank of Lieutenant General in October 1988, Elected </H5>
Member of CPC Central Committee 
  In March 1988, Li Laizhu was elected Deputy of the 7th 
National People's Congress (PLA deputy). The Chinese Communists 
restored the military rank system in October 1988. Li Lanzhu was 
awarded the military rank of A lieutenant general. A major 
reshuffle took place among Chinese Communist high-ranking 
military officers in April 1990. Sixty-two year old former 
Deputy Commander of the Nanjing Military Region Lt.Gen. Wang 
Chengbin replaced Zhou Yibing as Commander of the Beijing MR; 
and Zhang Gong replaced Liu Zhenhua as Political Commissar of 
the Beijing MR. Li Laizhu was promoted to First Deputy Commander 
of the Beijing MR. 
  At the 14th National CPC Congress held in October 1992, 
43 military officers were elected members of the CPC Central 
Committee. Li Laizhu was one of officers. 
<H5>  Promoted to Commander of Beijing MR in 1994 </H5>
  On 4 February 1994, the JIEFANGJUNBAO revealed that 
accompanied by Director Fu Quanyu of the General Logistics 
Department, Secretary Hu Fuguo of the Shanxi Provincial CPC 
Committee, Acting Governor of Shanxi Sun Wensheng and Commander 
of the Beijing MR Li Laizhu, General Secretary of the CPC 
Central Military Commission Jiang Zemin conducted an inspection 
tour on work in Shanxi. This news proved that Li Laizhu had been 
promoted to Commander of the Beijing MR in January 1994. 
<H5>  He Daoquan Appointed Commander of Beijing Garrison Command </H5>
  The 4 February JIEFANGJUNBAO in the same dispatch also 
reported that He Daoquan, who was elected alternate member of 
the CPC Central Committee at the 13th National CPC Congress, but 
failed to gain any seat at the 14th National CPC Congress, was 
promoted to Deputy Commander of the Beijing MR and concurrently 
Commander of the Beijing Garrison Command. He Daoquan, age 58, 
was born in Huangpi, Hubei. He joined the PLA in July 1951. He 
graduated from the Seventh Infantry School in 1954 together with 
Liu Jingsong. He was a division commander, army chief of staff 
and army commander of the well-known 23rd Army Corps. He was 
awarded the military rank of a major general in 1988. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66221 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94030" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  16 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY, PUBLIC SECURITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Journal Profiles Beijing Military Region Officers </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Journal Profiles Beijing Military Region Officers </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Deputy Commander He Daoquan </H4>

<F P=102> 94CM0245B Hong Kong KUANG-CHIAO CHING [WIDE ANGLE] in 
Chinese No 258, 16 Mar 94 pp 64-65 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0245B </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong KUANG-CHIAO CHING [WIDE ANGLE] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Li Zhongluo (2621 0022 3157): "Newly Appointed </F>
Commander of Beijing Garrison Command He Daoquan"] 
  [text] In early February 1994, the JIEFANGJUNBAO carried a 
news about the leader of the CPC Central Military Commission, 
accompanied by He Daoquan, visited the PLA troops under the 
command of the Beijing MR to extend his Spring Festival 
greetings. This news proved that He Daoquan has been appointed 
Deputy Commander of the Beijing MR and concurrently Commander of 
the Beijing Garrison Command. He predecessor Lt.Gen. Zhang 
Zhijian was transferred to take the post of Political Commissar 
of the Chengdu MR. 
<H5>  Joined Army in Hubei in 1951 </H5>
  Lt.Gen. He Daoquan was born in Huangpi County, Hubei 
Province. He was born in the same county as Xu Haidong who was 
granted the military rank of a full general when the Chinese 
Communists first started the military rank system in 1955. 
However, they were military officers of two different 
generations. When Xu Haidong led the 25th Army of the Red Army 
to march from Hubei, Henan and Anhui to northern Shaanxi, He 
Daoquan was born in that year. He had never participated in any 
of the campaigns in that year. In July 1951, two years after the 
founding of the PRC, He Daoquan, who was a 17-year old middle 
school student, joined the PLA in Hubei. He, together with 
Lt.Gen. Liu Jingsong who later became his superior, were sent to 
study at the PLA 27th Infantry School in Qiqihar, Heilongjiang. 
The 27th Infantry School grew out of the Military and Political 
Academy of the Northeastern Military District. It trained 
infantry company and platoon-level commanders. The 27th Infantry 
School was renamed the 7th Infantry School. In the school, the 
students received strict training from Soviet instructors and 
were prepared to fight in Korea at any time. 
<H5>  Graduated From Infantry School in 1954 </H5>
  He Daoquan graduated from the infantry school in 1954. 
One of his veteran instructors was an officer who used to work 
for Gen. Feng Yuxiang. He hoped that all the graduates of this 
class would become generals. Soon after that He Daoquan was 
assigned to the 23rd Army Corps of the Chinese People's 
Volunteers Army as a platoon leader. The Korea War stopped on 27 
July 1953. In order to prevent the war from breaking out once 
again, the Chinese Communists left some troops in North Korea. 
The 23rd Army Corps was one of the PLA units left in Korea. This 
army corps entered the Korea War on 5 September 1952. Originally 
it was the 4th Column of the East China Field Army officially 
formed in January 1947. It grew out of the guerilla units left 
in Fujian, Zhejiang and Jiangxi when the Red Army started the 
Long March in 1934. In the early stage of the War of Resistance 
against Japanese Aggression, it was reorganized to become the 2d 
Detachment of the New 4th Army. Later, it became the 1st 
Division of the New 4th Army and the 1st Division of the Central 
China Field Army. It fought many battles under the direct 
command of Su Yu. When the civil war between the Kuomintang and 
the Chinese Communists broke out in an overall manner, it took 
part in the Suzhong, Laiwu, Menglianggu, Eastern Honan, Huaihai 
and Yangtze River Crossing campaigns. It remained one of the 
main forces of the 3d Field Army. Prior to the Korean Armistice, 
the 23d Army Corps took part in the third offensive campaign in 
the summer of 1953. At that time, Zhong Guochu was Corps 
Commander and Lu Sheng the Corps' political commissar. When he 
stationed in Korea with the 23d Army Corps, He Daoquan took the 
post of a staff training officer and department head in an 
infantry battalion. 
<H5>  Withdraw From Korea With 23d Army Corps in 1958 </H5>
  He Daoquan withdrew from Korea with the 23d Army Corps 
and returned to China in March 1958. After returning to China, 
the 23d Army Corps stationed in Heilongjiang for a long time. It 
was placed under the command of the Shenyang MR. He Daoquan was 
the corps' deputy director and then director of its training 
department and Deputy Divisional Chief of Staff. During the 
Sino-Soviet border clash, he went to the frontier command post 
to direct the PLA units under his command. 
<H5>  Outstanding Contributions to Automating Army Command System </H5>
  In 1975, He Daoquan held the post of divisional chief of 
staff. Later he was promoted to Deputy Division Commander and 
then Division Commander. During that period, he strived to 
achieve automation for the command system. After 1977, China's 
first automated military command vehicle appeared in his 
military compound. The automation engineering project for the 
command system was further developed after 1980. He Daoquan was 
promoted to Chief of Staff of the 23d Army Corps in 1983. Not 
long after that, he personally led the staff members in his 
office to visit the Academy of Military Sciences in Beijing, the 
National Defense University, the Air Force Academy, the Armored 
Force Engineering Institute and other military academies. Later 
he went to Xian and Changsha to learn from the experience of the 
University of Science and Technology for National Defense, and 
worked hard for command system automation. 
<H5>  Build a Quick Response Regiment in the Army </H5>
  He Daoquan was promoted to Commander of the 23d Army 
Corps in 1985. On 8 February 1985, the JIEFANGJUNBAO carried a 
report on its frontpage, entitled: "A Battlefield without Smoke 
of Gunpowder." It reported on the automated command system 
network which included one army, three divisions and one 
regiment. The network was developed by the group army led by He 
Daoquan. Their "Battlefield No. 1" model was sent to Beijing for 
exhibition, attracting the attention of many foreign military 
attaches. Later, He Daoquan decided to establish a quick 
response regiment in the army, adding a pair of skis to the 
standard equipment for each soldier. His immediate target was to 
train this regiment to enhance its mobility on snow-covered 
land. His long-term target was to use motorized sledges with 
which all military equipment and personnel could move quickly 
from one place to another. The establishment of the quick 
response regiment and He Daoquan's concept on quick response won 
approval from Commander Liu Jingsong and Chief of Staff Li Haibo 
of the Shenyang MR. In the next winter, the division to which 
the quick response regiment belonged was supplied with skiing 
equipment. Each soldier got a pair of skis as a part of the 
standard equipment. 
  At the 13th National CPC Congress held in November 1987, 
He Daoquan was elected an alternate member of the CPC Central 
Committee. After the PLA resumed the rank system in October 
1988, he was awarded the rank of an army major general. At the 
14th National CPC Congress held in October 1992, He Daoquan did 
not get elected as an alternate member, because he had left the 
23d Army Corps and worked for the PLA General Staff 
Headquarters. Wu Yuqian, who replaced He Daoquan as the 
commander of the 23d Army Corps, was elected alternate member of 
the CPC Central Committee. 
<H5>  Promoted to Army Lieutenant General in 1993 </H5>
  He Daoquan became Deputy Commander of the Beijing MR and 
concurrently Commander of the Beijing Garrison Command in 
January 1994. Prior to this, he was promoted to army Lieutenant 
General. This shows that his position in the army is rising. 
  The Beijing Garrison Command which was established in 
January 1951 mainly shoulders the heavy responsibility of 
performing garrison duties and guarding the capital. Right now, 
it is placed under the command of the Beijing MR. At the same 
time, it is a department of the Beijing Municipal CPC Committee 
in handling military affairs. It is placed under the dual 
leadership of the Beijing MR and the Beijing Municipal CPC 
Committee. Chen Xitong, Secretary of the Beijing Municipal CPC 
Committee and member of the Political Bureau of the CPC Central 
Committee, is concurrently the First Secretary of the Beijing 
Garrison Command's CPC committee. After the "Cultural 
Revolution," Fu Chongbi, Yan Tongmao, Dong Xuelin and others 
held this post before. In view of the importance of this 
position, there are good chances for the 59-year old He Daoquan 
to move upwards in the next few years. 
  He Daoquan believes that we never complain about having 
too many friends, but we are not sure that one will never become 
our enemy. As long as border lines are not eliminated on earth, 
it will be impossible to eliminate frictions and conflicts for 
survival among the various nationalities. The armed forces must 
be ready to launch attacks at all times. 
<H5>  Armed Forces Must Be Ready to Launch Attacks At All Times </H5>
  He Daoquan often sigh with a soldier's feelings about 
the perverse and changeable, but sometimes soft and tender 
history. He is not sure that he has reached the peak of his 
life, but he accepts the historic facts imposed on an 
individual. Because he believes that one must commit oneself for 
being a high-ranking general and that one's obligation is always 
commensurate with his power. 
  One who wishes to become a general thinks more about 
honor, and one who is a general thinks more about one's 
responsibilities. He Daoquan is one who thinks more about his 
responsibilities. At a time when cries for peace are causing a 
temporary clamor, this general, laden with anxiety, is improving 
his military machinery all by himself night and day. He believes 
that his efforts and those of his colleagues will not be wasted. 
Once the page of "complex and changeable" history is turned 
over, our descendants will joyfully find that their world will 
be more secured than ever before. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66222 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94031" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  16 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY, PUBLIC SECURITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Journal Views GLD's Sanjiu Corporation </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Journal Views GLD's Sanjiu Corporation </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0246A Hong Kong KUANG-CHIAO CHING [WIDE ANGLE] in 
Chinese No 258, 16 Mar 94 pp 48-50 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0246A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong KUANG-CHIAO CHING [WIDE ANGLE] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Ching Lai (2529 0171) and Chi Ling (0679 7227): </F>
"Mysterious Success of Military's Transnational Enterprise"] 
  [Text] First Transnational Joint Enterprise Group 
Ordered Established by Central Military Commission, General 
Logistics Department 
  The military's first transindustry, transnational joint 
enterprise group, which was ordered established by the Central 
Military Commission and the Liberation Army's General Logistics 
Department (GLD)--the Sanjiu (999) Enterprise Group--after being 
in operation for two short years, has developed from the 
original 34 joint enterprises, with the Southern Pharmaceutical 
Factory as the chief enterprise, to 106 enterprises. It has set 
up branch companies in 11 countries, including Germany, America, 
Russia, Thailand, and Malaysia. 
  Not only the CPC Politburo and high-ranking military 
officers 
attach importance to the outstanding achievements of the Sanjiu 
Enterprise Group; some major financial groups abroad with solid 
strength have sought cooperation with this enterprise group. 
  What is the secret of the Sanjiu Enterprise Group's amazing 
achievements over two years? Not long ago we interviewed Zhao 
Xinxian [6392 2450 0341], general director of the Sanjiu 
Enterprise Group. 
<H5>  Recorded in Cambridge World Who's Who </H5>
  Zhao Xinxian is China's first enterprise star, and in 1993 
he 
was selected by the editor in chief at England's Cambridge 
International Biography Center for inclusion in its Who's 
Who. The talents and the wisdom and courage of this 
entrepreneur in management and in enterprise development were 
displayed for the first time when he set up the Southern 
Pharmaceutical Factory with its famous "Sanjiu Stomach Tonic," 
and his fame spread abroad. 
  In 1985 he led five young people in obtaining a 5 
million-yuan loan in preparation for setting up the 
pharmaceutical factory. In the first year after it went into 
production in 1987 it achieved an output value of 11 million 
yuan and a profits tax of 1.78 million yuan. Afterward, the 
plant expanded the scale of its production year by year, and its 
returns multiplied year by year. In seven years' time the output 
value and the profits tax increased respectively by 60 and 52 
times, becoming above average in the pharmaceutical industry of 
the People's Liberation Army and even of the whole country. 
<H5>  Pharmacy Holds Sway Over Entire Country </H5>
  In 1991 the Sanjiu Enterprise Group was formally 
established, 
and it had a total output value of 640 million yuan; in 1993 the 
output value sharply increased to 2.2 billion yuan, with an 
increase of 330 million yuan in fixed assets, an increase in per 
capita output value of 900,000 yuan, and an increase in profits 
tax of 290 million yuan, not only holding say in China's 
pharmaceutical industry but also jumping to 74th position among 
China's 100 largest industrial enterprises. 
<H5>  Zhu Rongji Says: Armed Forces Enterprises March at the Head </H5>
  What is noteworthy is that, during the application of the 
Sanjiu Group's armed forces-style management to enterprises, 
effective "Sanjiu mechanisms" were found and summed up. First of 
all, in fitting out the leading body of an enterprise, they 
boldly broke with the tradition of the "multihead system" 
forbidden zone and put effect the enterprise's corporate 
representative "single-head system," thereby taking the lead in 
the reform of the rights structure of Chinese enterprises, which 
for the Chinese military was unprecedented. 
  The year before last Zhu Rongji went to the Sanjiu 
Enterprise 
Group to inspect it. He found quite admirable the fact that it 
did not set up the position of deputy to the head of the leading 
group, and he said to important officials of Guangdong Province 
and Shenzhen City accompanying him: "Foreign enterprises are run 
like this. The armed forces enterprises are marching at the 
head. We must learn from the Liberation Army!" 
  Doing things in this way means that there is quick decision 
making by the leading mechanism, there is no internal dawdling, 
and the sense of responsibility of the corporate representative 
is strong. In the words of Zhao Xinxian: "If there is one 
carrier then there will still be water to drink; if there are 
three carriers then even if they still carry water there will be 
no water to drink!" 
  At present the several leading groups of China's state-owned 
enterprises are often bodies in which the collective has the 
final say. If there is a loss or an accident, the members of the 
leading group can shift responsibility on each other and "it is 
not known whose backside the bamboo rod should strike." 
  Zhao Xinxian thinks that an enterprise may be compared to an 
orchestra: an orchestra can have only one conductor and can 
absolutely not have two conductors. If there were two conductors 
the orchestra would be in a total muddle. What the Sanjiu Group 
put into effect was precisely the corporate representative 
responsibility system, which "lets one person conduct the 
orchestra, i.e., the enterprise." 
  Of course, the enterprise's corporate representative 
responsibility system does not mean that the corporate 
representative can make decisions at will and do what he wants; 
there must be corresponding restraining mechanisms that ensure 
that the decisions of the corporate representative are made on a 
scientific basis, and ensure that the corporate representative 
is restrained by rules and regulations and the supervision of 
relevant departments, thereby protecting the state-owned 
enterprises' maintained value and increased value. 
<H5>  Boldly Improving Sanjiu's Wage System </H5>
  The "Sanjiu mechanisms" of the Sanjiu Enterprise Group, in 
distribution criteria, put into practice the 1:18 ratio wage 
system of "drawing salaries according to responsibility, 
calculating remuneration according to work, and dividing work 
according to profit," which for the first time set a precedent 
for China's enterprise wage system. 
  Zhao Xinxian said that in the initial period of its 
establishment the Sanjiu Enterprise Group, when the enterprise 
was growing and needed manpower, several competent cadres 
resigned, giving as their reason that the "Sanjiu" wages and 
benefits were too low. The families of some staff members and 
workers played the stock market, and in one year made 18,000 to 
20,000 yuan; and the cadres, who had made several tens of 
millions and even several hundreds of millions of yuan for the 
state, had an annual income of several thousand yuan, and 
therefore pyschologically there could not be a balance. 
  Not long ago Zhao Xinxian went to Singapore on an inspection 
trip, and he discovered that in Singapore there are enterprises 
in which the wage differential ranges from high to low by more 
than 20 times, and these enterprises are managed very well. 
After returning to Shenzhen he reformed the fixed wages system 
in the old way of distribution, and exanded the difference in 
wages so that there was a differential between the highest and 
the lowest of 18 times. At present, the monthly wage in the 
enterprise at the lowest is several hundred yuan and at the 
highest can exceed 10,000 yuan. 
  The Sanjiu Group's new wage system also stipulates that the 
group's subordinate enterprises, under the premise of improving 
economic returns year by year and of ensuring that state-owned 
enterprises multiply their output value, can put into effect a 
distribution in which the differential ratio is higher than 1:18 
times. Fifteen percent of an enterprise's after-tax profits are 
to be put into the enterprise's distribution fund for wages and 
bonuses. For enterprises that greatly exceed the quota for 
profits the standard level for share-out bonuses may float up to 
20 percent. For enterprises that cannot fulfill the quota for 
profits to be handed over to the higher authority, the standard 
level for share-out bonuses must fall 10 to 5 percent. 
<H5>  If You Have the Ability, You Will Be Given Money as an </H5>
Investment in Letting You Display Your Talents 
  Zhao Xinxian says to people: If you have ability and also a 
feasible project, we will give you money to start up a company, 
run a business, and be the boss. If you are a talented person, 
before you come to Sanjiu we will prepare a home, furniture, and 
other living conditions for you. If you have a scientific 
research topic worth developing and using, we will give you 
money for the cost of the scientific research, and if results 
are obtained, besides doubling your bonus, we will deduct a 
proportional percentage from the profits made by the result and 
give it to you, thereby making you a "millionaire" overnight. 
  For two years the Sanjiu Group has had a total of more than 
90 competent persons in charge of leadership work at all levels, 
and more than 40 cadres who did not perform well either have had 
their wages cut or have been dismissed. The personnel 
elimination rate is being maintained at about 15 percent. 
  After the Sanjiu Group reformed its distribution system, the 
enterprises put into effect three major supervisory systems 
(political supervision, economic supervision, and quality 
supervision), and the effect of "high salaries fostering 
honesty" is manifested there, because up to now there has not 
been discovered one case of using authority to seek private gain 
or of graft and bribe taking. Over the past two years, according 
to statistics: cadres have refused to take 100,000 yuan in cash 
gifts and have turned over to the higher authority 320,000 yuan 
for return to the factory. 
  With regard to this "healthy phenomenon," Zhao Xinxian made 
an analogy: "If a cadre's monthly wage were one carton of 
cigarettes or one bottle of spirits, then, of course, one carton 
of cigarettes or one bottle of spirits would be attractive to 
him. If his monthly wage were equal to 10 cartons of cigarettes 
or several dozen bottles of spirits, it would not be worthwhile 
for him to accept one carton of cigarettes or one bottle of 
spirits in return for committing a mistake, because they would 
be of too little worth." 
<H5>  Li Chia-ch'eng Invests in Sanjiu Group </H5>
  The Sanjiu Enterprise Group, which has nearly 2 billion yuan 
in fixed assets, which makes pharmaceuticals primary, and 
conducts pluralistic operations, has now developed the scope of 
its operations to 12 industries, including real estate, motor 
vehicles, import and export trade, electronics, foodstuffs, 
clothing, and banking, and has set up branch companies in 12 
countries. 
  Wealthy businessman Li Chia-ch'eng [2621 0857 6134], the 
head 
of Hong Kong's 10 major financial groups, at the spring of the 
year before last began to invest in real estate with the Sanjiu 
Group, and in Shenzhen he built the 81-storey Sanjiu 
International Building. Shortly afterward, some major financial 
groups, including America's First National Bank of New York and 
Thailand's (Chungta) Group, competed to become shareholders in 
the group. An inspection team formed by (Yi Kim-chi) [2621 6885 
0892], chairman of the board and concurrently general director 
of South Korea's (Chukao and Nito) Pharmaceutical Corporation, 
and (Kim In-san) [6855 0690 3595], general director of South 
Korea's Pharmaceutical Trading Comnpany, inspected the Sanjiu 
Group and its core enterprise--the Southern Pharmaceutical 
Factory--and in South Korea signed an agreement under which they 
will the general agents for the products of the Southern 
Pharamaceutical Factory. America's San Francisco Mayor Frank 
Jordan led a 25-member commercial delegation to the Southern 
Pharmaceutical Factory, and the two sides signed an agreement to 
set up in San Francisco an American Sanjiu company. Recently, 
Hawke, a former prime minister of Australia, made a special trip 
from Hong Kong to the Sanjiu Group, and the two sides explored 
cooperation in tourism. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66223 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94032" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  29 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   KMT Intensifies Social Control </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    KMT Intensifies Social Control </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0211B Taipei HSIN HSIN WEN [THE JOURNALIST] in Chinese 
No 359, 29 Jan 94 p 45 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0211B </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei HSIN HSIN WEN [THE JOURNALIST] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chi Yen-ling (4764 1693 7117): "You Want the KMT </F>
to Give Up Power? That Must Wait For Another Generation!"] 
  [Excerpts] In recent years, although there has been a 
significant decline in the KMT's governing position in the 
political arena, its ruling position in the social area not only 
shows no sign of loosening indication, it is showing a tendency 
to grow stronger. [passage omitted] 
  Take enterprise circles as an example, with at least 1,000 
entrepreneurs summoned by the Gejianyuan [7245 6432 7108] for 
instruction; after their return, these people called each other 
classmates, and formed cliques and groups to pursue common 
interests. These "blue seeds" are now breeding and growing 
throughout Taiwan, in every location and trade. 
  These entrepreneurs were used to ordering their employees 
about at will, but because they had received the KMT's favors, 
whenever there arose such issues as renewing the heads of 
industrial and commercial associations, they all became very 
obedient to the KMT. The general secretary of the Shekunghui is 
equivalent to several big bosses, and for business which the 
general secretary cannot handle, if the director of the union 
handled it himself, after "persuading with major reasons" and 
"promising profits," there are few examples of big bosses who 
can turn it down. 
  Because entrepreneurs are always absolutely obedient to the 
KMT, it is natural that the KMT views enterprise circles as its 
organized external groups. So, even though elections in 
enterprise circles are obviously their own internal matter, the 
KMT will still present a slate of so-called "Party nominated 
candidates" and "party planned list"; persons who have not been 
nominated or are not listed will then be persuaded to withdraw 
one by one from the election for "other, better candidates." To 
the KMT, handling matters of this sort is much like handling 
violations in one's "household affairs"; some people in 
enterprise circles look upon this as the natural course of 
events, and although there are some complaints, they accept it 
in the end. Although there are many examples of minor 
politicians "betraying the party" to run for election, one never 
hears of big bosses "violating discipline" and "betraying the 
party." 
  Behind the enterprise community, there are concealed persons 
who hold in their hands life and death power over them. The 
situation is no better in the sports world; the General Athletic 
Association and the Chinese Taipei Olympic Committee made 
personnel changes which showed clearly that the KMT's dominance 
in sports not only has not declined, but has risen. [passage 
omitted] 
  Everyone knows that it was "Party Chairman" Lee Teng-hui's 
[2621 4096 6540] nomination of Kuo Chung-ching [6753 1350 3237] 
that landed him his position on the General Athletic 
Association, and that kept Chang Feng-hsu [1728 0023 4872] in 
office as Chairman of the Olympic Committee. Prior to the 
reorganization, although there were many candidates, there was 
also a strong offensive of persuading them to withdraw, so that 
all of the "party nominees" passed, and none of those on the 
"party plan list" lost. How envious were the members of the 
Tsukunghui, working in the same building, at the Shekunghui's 
two great sports world victories! 
  Although personnel moves in the sports world have always had 
a strong political flavor, these had all taken place behind the 
scenes in the past, and were limited to high level personnel 
only. But this time, from higher to lower levels, from behind 
the scenes to out front, everyone fought for power openly, even 
playing in a big way the game of sharing booty, which has just 
become popular in political circles. 
  A lot of "old timers" who had made contributions to the 
sports world in the past were swept out the door, pushed aside 
for "not belonging to the same clan"; some of them even had 
their "names removed from the rolls forever." 
  Take as examples Chi Cheng [4764 2398] and Yang Chuan-kuang 
[2799 0278 1639], the earliest Taiwan Olympic level athletes to 
gain international reputations. Chi Cheng just resigned his 
position as Secretary-General of the Track and Field 
Association, while Yang Chuan-kuang is still at Tso Training 
Center in charge of training. No matter whether one is speaking 
of international reputation, or their contributions to the 
nation, or their age and experience, these two people have not 
reached the age of being too old, having to be replaced, or 
having no more useful value. But the Olympic Committee and the 
General Athletic Association treated them as trash and just 
swept them out of door, while looking for some younger, less 
qualified fellows to replace them. 
  Maybe it is unavoidable for politics to interfere with 
sports, but such ugly interference is actually rarely seen in 
the world. It is due precisely to Chi Cheng not supporting the 
public voting law, and Yang Chuan-kuang being "so naive" as to 
join the Democratic Progressive Party, but the outcome was that 
both of them had the fate of having their names stricken from 
sports circles. This is the sort of thing that Olympic Chairman 
Samaranch, who has a strong political sense, will disagree with. 
  The fact that the KMT is declining in its governing position 
in politics is not something they are doing voluntarily but 
rather because multilateral pressures from both inside and 
outside the system forced them to do so. By the same token, if 
people want to break the KMT's traditional dominance in the 
social sphere, enterprise circles and the sports world should 
not wait for the KMT to voluntarily announce it is "abandoning 
power" either. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66224 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94033" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  26 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   DPP `Inner-Party Power Struggle' Intensifies </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    DPP `Inner-Party Power Struggle' Intensifies </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0274A HSIN HSIN WEN [THE JOURNALIST] in Chinese No 367, 
26 Mar 94 pp 36-37 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0274A </F>
<F P=104>  HSIN HSIN WEN [THE JOURNALIST] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chen Chien-hsun (7115 1696 8113): "Election of </F>
New Democratic Progressive Party (DPP) Representatives and Its 
Effect on the Inner-Party Power Structure--One Large Earthquake 
Split the Two Large Into a Number of Small Mountain Tops"] 
  [Text] After the election on 12 March of regional party 
representatives for the various regions, the inner-party power 
struggle in the DPP reached white heat intensity. From the local 
branches to the center, from factions to individual persons, 
everyone was flexing one's muscles and scheming as to how many 
votes could be garnered. 
<H5>  Different Inner-Party Factions </H5>
  Presently, it is no more possible to divide the DPP 
comprehensively into the traditional two factions, the Meilitao 
[Formosa] Faction and the Hsin Chaoliu [New Trend] Faction. 
Speaking of factions that would constitute appreciable forces in 
the present inner-party power struggle, we would have to include 
the old stronghold of the Meilitao group and its affiliated 
organizations of local party branches that have been penetrated 
by the Meilitao's medium-age group [zhong sheng dai], then also 
the Hsin Chaoliu Faction, the Taiwan Independence Alliance, the 
Kungtouhui group, the Alliance for Justice, the Welfare State 
Alliance, and other local factions not otherwise affiliated. 
  Apart from this, and apart from setting up DPP 
representatives for the various districts, certain local 
political personages have also begun to gain such power as would 
allow them to intrude into the power centers of the DPP. For 
instance, of the 11 seats of party representatives of the Tainan 
City party branch, there are two seats that had been created in 
the present election by Lin Nan-sheng [2651 0589 3932], who had 
been expelled from the Kuomintang, but who had still, in 
violation of party discipline, participated in the election. He 
and some of his supporters later joined the DPP. There was also 
the case in Chiayi County where, as we understand, one seat was 
given to a person who had strong connections to the local 
faction. Although the number of this type of party 
representatives is extremely small, also of little impact on the 
present power core of the DPP, the phenomenon is still very 
worthwhile watching as to its future development. 
  Although some "thorough accounting" [jing suan] was started 
as soon as the election of party candidates had been completed 
and much planning was done as to how to combine the diverse 
factions and personalities, the main focus of attention was 
directed to the election of the party chairman. However, 
actually, with the factual attachments of the party 
representatives in so confusing a state of entanglements and not 
even the beginnings of unification apparent among them, it is 
only the 31-seat central executive committee, the power core of 
the party, that most people can now definitely figure out and 
get a good grasp on. 
  Because the status of the large majority of natural DPP 
party 
representatives is that of public servants, they ordinarily have 
their base of actions and operations within their faction, 
therefore, as far as the various factions are concerned, the 
difficulty of assessing votes is still when concerned with the 
local party representatives. 
  For instance, Taipei and Kaohsiung have 35, 36 local party 
representatives, but almost all belong to various public service 
bureaus, and we may still differentiate between them 
comparatively easily according to the factions of the public 
office they belong to. However, there may also be some factional 
overlapping, and this may lead to erroneous assumptions. In all 
other localities it is even more difficult to get a grasp of the 
true situation. 
  For instance, the five seats for local party representatives 
in Pingtung County comprise one seat for the Hsin Chaoliu 
faction, one seat for the Taiwan Independence Alliance, while 
the allotment of the other three seats is not clear. But we 
understand that it was already more or less openly promised the 
local party representatives during the election campaign that Su 
Chen-chang [5685 6297 2490]--not supported by any particular 
faction--a man who had failed in the election for county 
magistrate and who is now DPP secretary-general, will certainly 
become member of the central standing committee. This is an 
example of relying on some kind of local bondage. 
  Again, almost all the ten seats for party representatives of 
Kaohsiung County are considered the domain of the Yu [0151] 
family group [jia ban], who belong to the Meilitao faction, but 
magistrate Yu Cheng-hsien [0151 2398 2009] belongs to the 
Alliance for Justice. If Yu Chen Yueh-ying [0151 7115 2588 3841] 
will enter the contest for membership in the central standing 
committee, the direction in which the votes of the Yu family 
bloc will be split between the Meilitao and the Alliance for 
Justice would become a matter of close speculation. 
  Moreover, in the present power struggle within the DPP, two 
new forces are joining the fray from abroad, namely the 
Kungtouhui and the Taiwan Independence Alliance, but the power 
of these two factions and their work at the basic level is 
somewhat related. Insiders in the Taiwan Independence Alliance 
have pointed out that after election of the regional party 
delegates, the strength of the Taiwan Independence Alliance is 
after all not as formerly anticipated, while that of Tsai 
Tung-jung's [5591 0681 2837] Kungtou system is exceeding general 
anticipation. These persons believe that it has much to do with 
the fact that the Taiwan Independence Alliance has been doing 
work at the basic level for only a little over one year and has 
not yet completed its deployment and build-up. 
  For example, in the case of Chang Tsan-hung [1728 3503 
1347], 
now elected party representative in Tainan City, it was pointed 
out that the forces of Tsai Chieh-hsiung [5591 0094 7160], a 
provincial counselor of the Meilitao faction, had provisionally 
allocated over 100 votes in support of Chang Tsan-hung before 
the election. However, many among these supposed voters failed 
to vote. On the other hand, cadres of the Taiwan Independence 
Alliance in the Tainan district came up before the election with 
urgently needed votes and thereby achieved their task of 
"protecting their lord" and indeed had Chang Tsan-hung rise to 
become third-highest vote-getter. However, this version has not 
been confirmed. 
  As to the trial of strength between the two forces coming 
from abroad, Yulin County might be expected to become indicative 
of how their struggle will go. Yulin County will have seven 
votes for party representatives, one will belong to the Taiwan 
Independence Alliance and one to one of its affiliates, while 
the designation of the remaining votes has not yet been clearly 
determined. Hsu Lung-chun [6079 7893 0193], the newly elected 
chairman of the Yulin County party branch, has had good 
relations with both the Taiwan Independence Alliance and the 
Kungtouhui. 
  As we understand, the local party representatives in Yulin 
County have temporarily come to one common understanding, namely 
not to allow themselves to be manipulated as pawns by any 
faction or personality during the coming elections. When the 
various forces will come and try to win over new followers, 
they, the Yulin representatives, will therefore probably resort 
to the method of asking these factions first how many seats they 
control, and then, after assessing the "true strength" of each, 
arrive at their final decision. 
  Among the older factions, the Meilitao faction, although 
fragmented and dispersed, is presently still the largest 
faction. At the time of election to the central executive 
committee and central standing committee, the Meilitao faction 
will only have to exchange votes with the various local bosses 
and both sides will have to render mutual support. The 
medium-age group [zhong sheng dai] of the Meilitao faction are 
assessed as presently having a good chance of getting the 
membership in the central executive committee, out of the two 
top possibilities. The forces of the old Meilitao faction are 
still in the process of consolidation. The important variable of 
great influence will then be whether legislator Chang Chun-hung 
[1728 0193 1347] will decide to enter the race for party 
chairman. 
  Because Chang Chun-hung's forces had not yet been mobilized 
during the present selection of delegates, they gained only one 
seat among the seven candidates for Taipei City party 
representatives, and that created a crisis for the Meilitao 
faction. Most members of the Meilitao faction believe that if 
Chang Chun-hung will stand for election as party chairman, he 
would be the most formidable challenge for the re-election of 
the incumbent chairman Shih Ming-teh [2457 2494 1795]. On the 
other hand, it has already assumed the appearance of a "fight 
for the protection of the Meilitao faction." Chang Chun-hung 
could exercise extremely powerful pressure, and it is for this 
reason that he appears even more cautious in every respect in 
his present solicitation of opinions and assessments. 
  The likelihood of re-election of incumbent chairman Shih 
Ming-teh has much increased after he gained the support of the 
Hsin Chaoliu faction and most personages of the Welfare State 
Alliance [Fuliguo lian xian]. 
  As to Tsai Tung-jung's drive to enter the campaign for party 
chairmanship--he, like Shih Ming-teh, belongs to the Welfare 
State Alliance--this has evoked calls for his retirement from 
some colleagues in the Welfare State Alliance, while Chang 
Tsan-hung's campaign strategy gradually shifted toward mainly 
external propaganda and enhanced external influence. It is 
generally foreseen that if the present DPP election for party 
president will ultimately develop into a confrontation between 
personalities on the island and those abroad, it 
will--regardless of whether the two men will fight it out to the 
end--create for both of them a rather unfavorable overall 
situation. 
  Because the present realignment of power within the DPP will 
have an impact on overall position in future major elections, 
everyone inwardly figures that the drive to bring all the 
diverse forces within the factions together will become even 
more acute. Add to it the fact that after the experiences of all 
these years, fighting skills on all sides have been further 
developed and matured. If one would, therefore, still have the 
idea that this new wave, the change-over of teams in power 
within the party, could now be weathered as a smooth transition, 
that would, by all appearances, be a difficult thing to achieve. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66225 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94034" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  5 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Big Brother Types' Alleged Among Legislators </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Big Brother Types' Alleged Among Legislators </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0235B Taipei TZULI WANPAO in Chinese 5 Mar 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0235B </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei TZULI WANPAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by staff reporter: "Don't Call Him a Big Brother </F>
Gangster; He's a High-Ranking Government or Commercial Official"] 
  [Text] If one wants to understand how gangsters get 
involved in Taiwan's elections, "the native place of 
gangsters"--Yunlin County's local ecology and the gangsters' 
unstable history--is a typical case most worthy of exploration 
and study. Especially in recent years, among the local faction 
in Yunlin County, under the law of the jungle's "struggle for 
survival," the discard rate of local political figures has been 
particularly high. To understand the strong figures who have 
newly appeared on the political stage, I'm afraid we must search 
the "Record of Instability in Western Taiwan" in the news 
archives for society in the past one or two decades, and not the 
local political records. 
  "First become a brother and then become a member of the 
legislature" is the "mood of a drifter" on Yunlin's page. From 
the local legislative council to the center's National Assembly 
halls, there is no lack of "big brother-type" figures who in 
these years made a big splash. After the recent elections of 
county members of the legislature and of heads of townships and 
towns, in Yunlin County inroads were made by more local 
political figures who in past years were important armed 
criminals or who were trained to be gangsters. Moreover, at the 
side of local faction leaders there is even no lack of "wolves" 
whose previous crimninal records as important armed criminals in 
cases of robbery created a stir in their early years. Because of 
the sudden increase in "huge profits" politically from "changing 
to inferior election styles," these "brothers" who can frighten 
people do not just engage in shootouts for control of gambling 
halls and bars; they have expanded their undertakings to 
aggregate construction, land brokerage, election canvassing, and 
entertainment, and have established national connections of 
enormous power. Ordinarily, local affairs amount at the smallest 
to traffic accident settlements and disputes over debts and 
business operations, and at the largest to local elections and 
factional grievances. Provided that these "brothers" make their 
appearance, everybody will be fearful and the dignified ones 
will be the "black peacemakers." The recent election of the 
principal and deput speakers of the legislative body is the best 
example of this. 
  Precisely like the samurai films depicting Japan's Shogunate 
Era, the leaders of local factions care for and harbor "samurai" 
who excel in the martial arts in order to consolidate their own 
political and economic domains. When each faction sticks to its 
own position, the factions do not hesitate to develop their 
"strength" by letting the "brothers" go into action on their 
behalf. Last year there was even performed a play in which a 
"venerable godfather-type" figure in the political world was 
forced to withdraw from an election. This "retired" godfather in 
that year may be said to be the "First Ancestor" who "pulled" 
many "small brothers" into the political world; at the same time 
he was also the benefactor who got cases dismissed for "little 
brothers" wanted by the police, but the "little brothers" of the 
hostile factions that had become big and strong forced the "big 
brother to yield." 
  Opening the "Record of Instability in Western Taiwan," we 
see 
that in each of the 60th and 70th years of the republic there 
was a sensational gangland robbery case as well as several top 
news stories about factional fighting in society between "big 
brothers." The figure with real strength now on the political 
stage in Yulin County was not involved in these cases; rather, 
he was the benefactor who, after the event, spared no effort and 
lost no time in guaranteeing that the "brothers" got out of 
prison. Therefore, after getting out, these "brothers" 
gravitated to the side of the local politician. 
  In the 60th year of the republic, a "venerated" "model 
brother" of Yunlin County who had committed armed robbery and 
murder was sentenced to 11 years in prison. When in Chiayi while 
being escorted to prison, he was forcibly freed by his father 
and his subordinates Ting Jih-ch'ing [0002 2480 3237] and Hsu 
Hsiu-ch'uan [6079 4423 3123]. This first case in the country of 
a forcible freeing of a prisoner greatly enhanced the fame of 
the "model brother" and Ting Jih-ch'ing along the underworld's 
"grapevince," and established their positions in gangland. In 
particular, the way Ting Jih-ch'ing's getaway car evaded police 
roadblocks was enough to make him proud as a peacock. However, 
after fleeing for a period of time, they were caught and 
returned to prison. It is said that during the years that the 
"model brother" was a fugitive he got financial aid from a 
certain member of the legislature from Yunlin. 
  In October of the 70th year of the republic, when old Ting 
Jih-ch'ing of the Read Sealine Gang in western Taiwan was 
carousing in the Hungyulin Bar in Hsilo Town, his subordinates 
for a time carelessly relaxed their guard, and Chang Chin-shu 
[4545 6855 2885], a subordinate of "Little Lin" [1420 2651], a 
member of the "tiger tail" "Central Plains Gang," which was as 
incompaptible as fire and water with Ting's gang, fired three 
shots killing Ting. Not long afterward, Chang Chin-shu was shot 
and severely wounded in Paochung Township by Liu An-yuan [3966 
1344 0337], a "hitman" instigated by Ch'en Lung [3086 7127]. 
  After Ch'en Lung and Liu An-yuan were arrested, their 
subordinate 15-year-old Huang [7806] X in collusion with Li 
[2621], Lin [2651], Hsu [6079] and other "brothers," in July of 
the 72d year of the republic, brandishing swords and guns in 
front of Yunlin's local court, openly freed Liu and Ch'en, who 
were being brought to the court for trial as the suspected 
criminals in the shooting case. Among those taking part in this 
action was Ting Hsueh-ching [0002 1331 4842], who once drove a 
getaway car for Lo Ch'ing-chin [5012 3237 6930], an important 
criminal. When he was in a reformator, Ting wrote a story about 
an underworld drifter entitled "Wind and Cloud in Western 
Taiwan." 
  Now the "model brother," who more than 20 years ago was 
forcibly freed from police custody, has become an official of a 
certain large entertainment company and a certain sandstone 
plant, both in Yunlin. He was involved in an arms smuggling case 
but was protected by a certain heavyweight member of the 
Legislative Yuan from Yunlin. In recent years, although he has 
not bothered to settle old gangland scores. when an election 
battle heats up this "big brother" takes action to repay an old 
favor or old injury. 
  Moreover, "Little Lin," a circular order for whose arrest 
has 
been put out, in legendary style ran for county legislature 
member 12 years previously; later, after the strong protection 
of a certain "godfather" got a case against him dismissed, he 
was elected to be county legislature member, thereby beginning 
the meteoric rise in his political career. And "model brother" 
Ch'en, who 12 years before had been forcibly freed from police 
custody, also this year was elected by a big margin to be a 
Yunlin legislature member. 
  It is said that among the current members of the legislature 
from Yunlin County, there has been an increase of four "big 
brother types" who had been in police custody or who had a 
previous criminal record. In addition, many "brothers" wha had 
been involved in the forcible freeing of police prisoners have 
now become "big brothers" who stick to the sides of a certain 
government VIP. Furthermore, the chief of staff "black dog" of 
Lin Lai-fu's [2651 0171 4395], who three or four years ago 
headed the list of most wanted armed criminals, is said to be 
the trusted lieutenant at the side of this government VIP, who 
had gone abroad for medical treatment, and he has made this 
"underworld" force the biggest faction in Yunlin County. Such 
being the case, how could a local election not be a case of 
"black heaven and dark earth"? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66226 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94035" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  19 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   KMT, Constitutional Reform Issues Viewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    KMT, Constitutional Reform Issues Viewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0236A Taipei HSIN HSIN-WEN [THE JOURNALIST] in Chinese 
Nos 361 and 362, 19 Feb 94 pp 50, 53-54 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0236A </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei HSIN HSIN-WEN [THE JOURNALIST] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese and 362, </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Hsieh Chung-liang (6200 1813 5328)] </F>
  [Text] The third stage of constitutional reform on Taiwan 
is being enacted on the political stage during the first half of 
this year. Inner circles of the Kuomintang (KMT) have already 
begun their intense publicity campaign. Issues to be discussed, 
following scholarly opinions sought by KMT elders, are taking 
form--direct election of the president by popular vote, the 
countersigning power of the premier as head of the Executive 
Yuan, term limits for legislators, and a standing role for the 
National Assembly. These issues will form the mainstay of 
discussions by the National Assembly at its meeting from April 
to August. 
  By comparison, the second stage of constitutional reform saw 
politics drawn into the constitutional reform process because of 
distinct differences between factions within the KMT. For the 
third stage of constitutional reform, the inner structure of the 
KMT seems to be simpler, and dissension during meetings seems to 
have lessened. On the contrary, the focus has been on 
theoretical differences and the system. This point alone shows 
how much progress has been made in the KMT. According to higher 
political circles, direct election of the president by popular 
vote was already the focus of controversy at the third plenary 
session of the 13th party congress. This time, weightier 
elements who object to direct election of the president by 
popular vote are not quite as adamant. Similarly, some members 
of the mainstream faction that surfaced after the 14th Party 
Congress had evoked the great disapproval of the non-mainstream 
faction because they had repeatedly released trial balloons for 
"moving forward the date for popular election of the president." 
The non-mainstreamers had intended to attack and oppose this 
stand vehemently. But after mediation by some neutral parties, 
the mainstream faction abandoned their stand of "advancing the 
date of presidential election," thereby making it possible for 
the controversy to dissipate. 
  According to inner circles at the presidential office, 
some people, before the 14th Party Congress, had suggested to Li 
Teng-hui to move forward the date for popular election of the 
president to avoid the "Yeltsin effect" which would follow the 
popular election for governor. At the time, Li did not show any 
clear indication one way or another, but said that this 
suggestion was worth consideration. However, the clamor for 
moving forward the date of the presidential election by popular 
vote became greater after the 14th Party Congress. This clamor 
actually posed a great threat to the non-mainstream group, for 
this equated Li's quest for another presidential term with 
advancing the date for presidential election by popular vote. 
  Proponents for advancing the date of direct presidential 
election by popular vote have even made tentative plans to 
change the date, much like an arrow set against the bow and 
ready to shoot. However, faced with reaction from KMT insiders 
and the fact that there was not enough time to revise related 
legalities, and the task to make necessary constitutional 
revisions was too big, this clamor subsided after a while. 
  It was pointed out that the idea of advancing the date of 
presidential election by popular vote appeared first around the 
time of the 3rd Plenary Session of the 13th Congress. Some 
scholars pinpoint the controversy as originating during the 
second stage of constitutional reform when the source and basis 
of presidential power were questioned. For during the time that 
the whole Hao P'ei-ts'un (6787 2672 2625) cabinet resigned, the 
source of presidential power had again been challenged. For the 
sake of political stability, the idea of advancing the date for 
presidential election by direct popular vote gradually took 
form. But after the 14th Party Congress, the calls for direct 
popular election of the president came too late. Whether such an 
election could take place the end of this year or early next 
year, there was no way to coordinate the necessary measures. 
Conducting it toward the end of 1995 had no practical meaning 
with respect to political stability. On the contrary, outsiders 
might think personal factors were involved in advancing the 
election, adding to the puzzle. Furthermore, if Li Teng-hui 
intend to succeed himself, why should he carry this unnecessary 
baggage of suspicion, by advancing the election date by three 
months? As a result, in this atmosphere of everything being in 
place, there was no way for the mainstreamers and 
non-mainstreamers to further ignite sparks over this controversy. 
  It is understood that the attitude of Hao P'ei-ts'un, 
retired premier turned scholar studying the presidential office, 
has changed substantially over a year's time toward the way the 
president and vice-presidential positions are created. After 
many sessions with specialists who analyzed and enlightened him 
on the subject, Hao no longer insists on "selection by 
appointment," but is receptive to "direct election by popular 
vote" for the positions of president and vice-president. Because 
of this change in Hao, it is possible to eliminate the greatest 
unknown factor in this issue of "presidential election by direct 
popular vote," which is part of the mainstay discussion during 
the third stage of the constitution reform process conducted by 
the KMT. 
  According to high political circles, after Hao had 
resigned his premier post as head of the Executive Yuan, he 
regularly invited different scholars in for discussions on 
constitutional government. After listening to analyses by many 
neutral parties, he has been less adamant in his opposition to 
the issue of "direct presidential election by popular vote," as 
long as the structure of constitutional government remains 
unchanged. However way the positions for president and 
vice-president are created, Ho can accept. This change in his 
stand has been transmitted via available channels to Li 
Teng-hui, and has allowed dissension on this issue, which was 
created by interpersonal factors, to be eliminated completely 
for the third stage of constitutional reform. Moreover, the 
controversy between the "direct election faction" and the 
"election by appointment faction" in the KMT that surfaced 
during the second stage of constitutional reform is settled, at 
least for the time being. 
  However, it is possible that another topic--the 
countersigning power of the premier as head of the Executive 
Yuan--may be replacing it for discussion. 
  As Hao P'ei-ts'un has had practical experience with this 
subject, he has a deeper understanding of the countersigning 
power of the premier as head of the Executive Yuan. Moreover, 
some scholars also emphasize that the countersigning power is 
proof that China's constitution tilts toward a cabinet system. 
It is understood that Hao favors retaining the original 
constitutional provision giving the countersigning power to the 
premier, or eliminating this power only for his resigned 
position as head of the Executive Yuan, but leaving it for the 
rest of the cabinet members, as it is under the present setup. 
  Based on the larger controversy posed by the issue of "the 
countersigning power of the premier as head of the Executive 
Yuan," and the heated discussion generated during meeting of the 
advisory unit supporting the Tactical Planning Group on 
Constitutional Reform, a "unit studying special cases" was 
established. It would provide further understanding of this 
issue by making a complete analysis of the problem dealing with 
the premier's countersigning power. Members of this study 
group from the National Assembly include Chu Hsin-min [4281 2450 
3046], Lin Ming-te [2651 6900 1795], Wang Fu-mou [3769 1381 
5399], and Lin Hung-ch'ih [2651 7703 3069]; from the Legislative 
Committee, Wei Yung [7614 6978], and Huang Chu-wen [7806 0031 
2429]; and from the group of scholars, Hu Fu [5170 1765] and 
Tung Hsiang [5516 5046 7378]. Composition of such a group 
reflects the importance the KMT's core attaches to this topic 
and the divergence of opinion inside the party. 
  Among those opposed to slashing the countersigning power 
of the premier was the deputy minister of the Executive Yuan Hsu 
Li-te [1776 4539 1795] who notes this power in action on the 
inside. He feels the premier, as head of the Executive Yuan, 
must be answerable to the National Assembly. The budget for the 
five yuans and even the budget for the president's office are 
all subject to questioning of the premier by the National 
Assembly. To meet the rule that power and responsibility should 
be one, the premier should keep his countersigning power, 
especially if this power is one of form only, and he has to 
shoulder real responsibility in front of the National Assembly. 
Therefore, the countersigning power of the premier should not be 
pared down to any great extent. 
  Those in support of a logical revision of the 
countersigning power of the premier base their views on the 
principle of the five yuans being coequals, and the premier 
should not countersign on personnel and legal matters for the 
other four, for countersigning amounts to interference in the 
administration affairs of the other yuans. As to powers directly 
exercised by the president, the premier should not countersign 
either, for it is easy for such mutual interference of executive 
powers to create political instability. 
  As an example of constitutional government, ever since the 
constitution has been observed, the president has had real 
power. Constitutional reform this time is reform on a small 
scale. That is, based on examples from the past, the 
constitution grants the president the inherent power to meet 
present conditions. Under this premise, only some logical 
revision needs to be made regarding the countersigning power of 
the premier, limiting such power to personnel and legal matters 
within the Executive Yuan. The countersigning power within the 
other yuans should be assumed by their respective ministers, 
thereby making the five yuans as coequals. 
  Among the views of these two factions, the most extreme 
are those held by Taiwan University professor Hu Fu and Huang 
Chu-wen, director of the KMT's central policy organization. Hu 
Fu advocates the view that China's constitution is the framework 
for the cabinet system, and the countersigning power of the 
premier, as head of the Executive Yuan, should not be changed, 
or it would be against the spirit and intent of the 
constitution. But Huang Chu-wen advocates, without reservation, 
that direct election of the president is the mainstay of 
constitutional reform which means tilting in the direction of a 
presidential system. It is only a small scale constitutional 
reform of little consequence in a larger scale constitutional 
reform. Therefore, under the premise of a presidential system, 
the countersigning power of the premier, as head of the 
Executive Yuan, should be discarded. 
  It is very possible that this issue on the countersigning 
power of the head of the Executive Yuan, which lacks common 
understanding within the KMT, may evolve into a factional 
struggle. Two agenda items on "A Standing Role for the National 
Assembly" and "Term Limits for the Legislators" may present two 
conflicting problems dealing with the system for the National 
Assembly. 
  From the standpoint of the KMT's central committee, the 
National Assembly only has an "existence-abrogation" problem and 
not what is called a "standing role" problem. However, judging 
from the National Assembly's attitude, it wants to have a 
regular standing role that allows it to oversee the operations 
of the Legislative Yuan. Such thinking which is counter to 
democratic government is the bad aftermath of factional 
struggles that occurred during the first and second stages of 
constitutional reform. 
  From the standpoint of democratic government, the National 
Assembly represents the will of the people overseeing operations 
of executive departments. But there are problems involving 
control and supervision between the two. This situation cannot 
be allowed to surface between two national bodies representing 
the will of the people, whether it is the National Assembly 
overseeing the Legislative Yuan, or it is the Legislative Yuan 
reining in operations of the National Assembly. Such action goes 
completely against the conduct of democratic government. 
  Deficiencies in design of such a system occurred during 
the first and second stages of constitutional reform. When 
political strife was introduced, that made problems which could 
be resolved even more muddled. Particularly when the National 
Assembly called for a role as an organ structure with regular 
standing, that made the conflict more acute between two 
political parties purporting to represent the will of the 
people. While the struggle between the National Assembly and the 
Legislative Yuan is limited to their roles, and different from 
the power struggle between political factions, if this problem 
is not resolved during the third stage of constitutional reform, 
the problem of power struggle within the system will continue 
forever, and become an incurable cancer on constitutional 
government. 
  Among the four basic Issues to be covered during the third 
stage of constitutional reform--direct election of the president 
by popular vote, the countersigning power of the premier as head 
of the Executive Yuan, a standing role for the National 
Assembly, and term limits on legislators--resistance to direct 
popular election of the president has been basically removed. 
The countersigning power of the premier may be a problem and 
lead to factional struggle within the KMT. Term limits for 
legislators and a standing role for the National Assembly may 
become a controversy about the system. The problem of the 
countersigning power will be the immediate cause for lively 
dissension during the third stage of constitution reform, but 
the problem with a standing role for the National Assembly and 
term limits for legislators will be the main reason for unending 
strife in the future. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66227 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar031___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-031 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  6 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY, PUBLIC SECURITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Profile of Air Defense, Anti-Ship Missile Systems </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Profile of Air Defense, Anti-Ship Missile Systems </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0248A Beijing HANGKONG ZHISHI [AEROSPACE KNOWLEDGE] in 
Chinese No 3, 6 Mar 94 pp 12-14 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0248A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing HANGKONG ZHISHI [AEROSPACE KNOWLEDGE] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zong Shu (1350 2885): "Various Chinese-Produced </F>
Air Defense and Anti-Ship Missiles"] 
  [Text] Air Defense Master 
  The HQ-2B ground-to-air missile is a Chinese-developed high 
speed, high efficiency, all-weather, omni-bearing combat, 
mobile, intermediate altitude and high altitude air defense 
weapon. This missile makes wide use of modern technology. It 
possesses not only the head-on attack capability common to 
ground-to-air missiles, but flank attack, and stern-chase attack 
capabilities as well. 
  Modern offensive air weapons frequently emit all kinds of 
jamming, and they maneuver in flight as a defense against 
ground-to-air missiles. Thus, ground-to-air missiles must 
possess strong ability to resist jamming, a large battle sky, 
and flexible ground mobility in order to attack various types of 
mobile targets, and they must have fairly high survivability. 
The HQ-2B missile is highly resistant to jamming; it is able to 
attack targets moving at a wide range of speeds, has a large 
battle sky, and a high kill probability; it is very able to 
attack moving targets; and all of its weapons systems and parts 
make wide use of digital circuits. Its command and control 
systems are computer-controlled. Therefore, this missile meets 
the requirements of modern air-defense. 
  The HQ-2B missile is used mostly to defend important areas. 
It may be used alone or as part of a weapons system group, one 
group linked to another for large area echelon defense. 
Alternatively, several weapons systems may form a circular 
defense against a single target. 
  This missile is used primarily to attack bombers, fighter 
bombers, fighters, reconnaissance aircraft, and helicopters. It 
may also be used to attack air-to-ground missiles. It may attack 
either single targets or groups of targets. It may attack high 
speed targets or low speed targets. The HQ-2B missile attacks 
aerial targets flying at high speeds and at a range of 
altitudes. Missiles such as this one can be counted on the 
fingers. The maximum combat altitude of this air defense missile 
is 27 kilometers, and its minimum combat altitude is 1 
kilometer. Its maximum combat slant distance is 40 km, and its 
minimum slant distance is seven kilometers. The missile's 
maximum flight velocity is 1,250 meters per second. This means 
that the velocity of the target being attacked may not exceed 
750 meters per second. The single missile kill rate probability 
for this missile is no less than 0.92. Against targets whose 
velocity is not greater than 750 meters per second, the single 
missile kill rate probability is no less than 0.73. 
  Inasmuch as the HQ-2B is an omni-directional, ground-to-air 
missile that can make flank attacks or stern-chase attacks, it 
can attack anti-missile moving targets and turning attack 
targets. This is where this missile is superior. The HQ-2B 
missile's combat altitude is the maximum flight altitude of 
modern aircraft; its combat slant range can be maintained within 
the combat altitude range; and its kill area is sufficiently 
deep. Thus, it can effectively kill intruding aerial targets. 
This range of speeds at which this missile can attack targets 
covers all the range of speeds of modern aircraft. A certain 
kill probability against high speed targets is another special 
feature of this missile. 
  The HQ-2B missile weapons system is made up of missiles, a 
guidance station, and launch equipment. The layout of a basic 
firepower unit is as follows: 12 missiles, one guidance station, 
and launch equipment (made up of 12 mobile launch vehicles and 
one launch control vehicle). Guidance is provided by connecting 
the main flight level with the booster level, using a 
fuze-warhead having strong killing power. Its anti-jamming phase 
comparison fuse can adjust the time of detonation of the warhead 
by comparing the relative speed of the target and the missile, 
so that the warhead explodes when the target is in the best 
location to be killed. Large shrapnel type warheads have a high 
dispersion speed and high armor penetration capabilities that 
insure that any target that is attacked is killed. The guidance 
station employs an anti-jamming digital code command 
transmission for signal transmission. The missile carries a 
corresponding anti-jamming digitally coded radio-control device. 
Consequently, signal transmission is accurate and reliable, and 
anti-jamming capability is strong. 
  Since the weapons system has guided missiles that use employ 
various guidance patterns, in each salvo (1 to 3 missiles) of a 
running launch (or cluster launch), a different guidance pattern 
may be used to guide the missiles. This makes it possible to 
attack high speed targets, mobile targets, targets with on-board 
jammers, and low altitude targets. The HQ-2B mobile launch truck 
is self-propelled tracked vehicle that can both launch and 
transport missiles. 
  Patriotic "Smart Kid" 
  The HN-5C is a Chinese-developed short-range mobile air 
defense missile system that is used mostly to deal with the 
threat from sub-sonic, low flying, fighter aircraft and armed 
helicopters. It is a spot defense system all of whose combat 
equipment is loaded on one light cross-country vehicle. It is 
very mobile; thus, it can be rapidly deployed as needed to any 
combat zone. 
  This missile system is composed of guided missiles, complete 
optical target detection and tracking sensors, a turret, a fire 
control computer and launch control electronic equipment, a 
missile launch rack, a power supply system, and radio data 
transmission, position finding, and direction detection 
equipment. All combat equipment in the firepower unit (including 
two operators and several missiles) are loaded on a single light 
cross-country truck that can travel at 60 kilometers per hour on 
a highway, and 30 kilometers per hour on a dirt road. 
  The complete optical target detection and tracking sensor 
units consists of an infra-red ray angle tracker, a television 
controller, and a laser range finder. The function of the 
infra-red angle tacker is to track the direction of the target 
indicator to find and lock on to the target, and then switch to 
automatic tracking to guide the missile's target-seeker to lock 
on and track the target. The television controller employs a 
double field of vision working mode. When it seeks and finds a 
target, it uses a wide field of vision, then it brings the 
target into the field of vision of the infra-red ray goniometer 
until the infra-red ray goniometer locks on to the target. The 
laser range finder is used to measure the distance between the 
target and the firepower unit in order to calculate accurately 
the aiming lead required for the missile launch and to judge 
launch conditions. 
  The turret is what carries the missile launch box and the 
target detection and tracking sensor unit. It has three working 
modes, namely initial switching, lock following, and lead 
switching, depending on the signals from the fire control 
computer and the target detection and tracking sensor. It 
operates in 360 degrees, its elevation angle is from 2 to 85 
degrees, its angular velocity is 0.25-50 degrees per second, and 
its tracking precision is as little as 4 meters. 
  The fire control computer is the key piece of equipment in 
the missile weapons system's automated combat control. It has 
multiple functions such as producing target detection, tracking, 
and laser range finder launch synchronous pulse control 
commands. It also issues commands to power up the missile, to 
lock and unlock the missile's target-seeking device, and to 
launch the missile. 
  The HN-5C missile employs a passive working mode, which 
greatly reduces the probability of enemy aircraft detection. It 
has good concealment characteristics. Its target detection range 
is 7 kilometers, system response time is short, and combat 
efficiency is high. It may be used on various kinds of trucks, 
and it can be rapidly deployed. It can be used in night combat. 
  Plans call for the use of a wheeled armored vehicle to 
transport the HN-5C, and the use of an infra-red ray detector. 
This will permit the missile to not only do stern-chase 
attacking, but it will also have a forward attack capability. 
  Aerial Harpoon 
  The Chinese-developed C601 is an air-to-ship tactical 
missile 
weapons system. It is slung beneath the wings of the Hong 6D 
medium range bomber for use against large and medium size 
surface ships that enter coastal waters. 
  This weapons system is made up of C601 guided missiles, 
on-board aiming and launching equipment, and ground technical 
support equipment. C601 missiles may be launched from an 
altitude of 1,000 - 9,000 meters, and the combat radius of the 
Hong 6Ds that carry them is between 1,800 and 2,000 kilometers. 
Thus, a C601 missile weapons system can control a very large 
ocean area. The maximum effective range of a C601 missile is 
between 100 and 110 kilometers; the maximum powered flight 
distance is 150 kilometers; and the launch sector angle is plus 
or minus 12 degrees. Once the missile is launched, no control is 
needed. This means that once launched, the carrier aircraft can 
leave the combat zone at once or carry out follow-up missions. 
Not only does this protect the aircraft, but it also improves 
its combat capabilities. When the C601 missile is cruising in 
level flight, its altitude may be 50, 70, or 100 meters above 
the water, and its causing speed is 0.9 times the speed of 
sound. This missile's outstanding points are a long period of 
independent flight, good concealment, and low altitude 
penetration. Its homing target hit probability rate is greater 
than 90 percent. This missile's warhead carries a large charge, 
is powerful, and it has a shaped charge that can pierce armor, 
explode, and fragment. Single or multiple missiles may be 
launched. A single missile is enough to seriously damage or 
sink a 3,000 ton class or above destroyer or a 10,000 ton class 
transport. Since a monopulse active radar is used in missile's 
terminal guidance, it is able to resist the waves and all kinds 
of jamming. 
  The C-601 is a cruise missile composed of a body, a control 
and guidance system, a power system, an electrical system, and a 
warhead. The missile is 7.36 meters long, and its launch weight 
is 2,440 kilograms. The missile is a symmetrical, normal type, 
aerodynamic, high subsonic speed flight vehicle that employs a 
post-launch independently controlled and terminal stage 
automatic homing guidance system. The onboard terminal homing 
radar provides target information about flight direction and 
pitch to guide the missile to the target following preset homing 
instructions. The power system consists of a liquid fuel rocket 
engine and an oxidizing agent blow-off system. The warhead 
contains a high energy mixed charge. Its front end is a 
hemispherical, metal, shaped-charge cover. Following ignition, a 
high temperature metallic jet flow occurs that can penetrate up 
to one meter thick armor plate. 
  This missile's weapons system works in combat in the 
following way: After the on-board aiming and launching equipment 
sets the firing data parameters for the C-601 missile, the 
missile is fired from the aircraft. During this period, the 
missile goes into an unpowered glide. When the missile reaches 
850 meters above the sea, the engine ignites causing the missile 
to pick up speed. When the missile glides to 500 meters above 
the sea, it shifts to ultra-low altitude, constant velocity, 
cruising flight. When the missile comes within the set firing 
range, the on-board Doppler homing radar shuts off, and the 
active terminal homing radar switches on to seek, lock on, and 
track the target. At this time, the missile's homing system 
automatically switches to the self-guidance mode to guide the 
missile in a dive toward the target. When the missile crashes 
into the target, the fuze detonates the warhead to destroy the 
target. 
  The C-601 missile formed the basis for research and 
development of the C-611 air-to-ship missile whose range has 
increased to 200 kilometers. 
  Anti-Ship Star 
  The C-101 is a supersonic, super low level tactical 
anti-ship 
missile developed in China. This missile may be carried on both 
aircraft and ships for use mostly against large and medium size 
surface targets in the destroyer class or above. The C-101 
missile weapons system consists of missiles, a carrier fire 
control system, launch equipment, and a ground system. It is at 
the advanced level of the 1990s. Its ability to cruise at 
supersonic speed just above the waves is one of its important 
features. 
  The C-101 missile cruises above the waves at an altitude of 
50 meters. When it is about 3,000 meters away from a target, the 
missile dives to an altitude of five meters to hit the target. 
This gives the missile concealability and enables it to hit the 
target near its water line. This missile maintains a supersonic 
flying speed that is two times the speed of sound when in flight 
against a target. Its concealability and speed means that the 
C-101 missile has very high penetration ability. In a diving 
attack 3,000 meters away from a target, the sudden maneuvering 
of the missile just at the point where an enemy anti-missile 
weapon might attack it greatly reduces the probability that the 
enemy will be able to stop it. Since the missile's homing 
system uses a monopulse terminal homing radar, and since it is 
able to skim the waves at supersonic speed, its anti-jamming 
capability is strong. 
  This missile weapons system has a fairly high hit 
probability 
rate and destruction rate. The C-101 missile uses a supersonic 
high energy, semi-armor piercing, explosive warhead, and a time 
delay contact fuse. The warhead weighs 300 kilograms, making it 
larger that the warhead on similar foreign anti-ship missiles. 
Once launched, the missile flies entirely independently, that 
is, it flies unattended after launch. During its independent 
control stage, it relies on the on-board control system for 
flight control. During the self-homing stage, it relies on the 
on-board terminal homing radar and the automatic tracking radar. 
This permits the aircraft that carried the missile to return to 
base at once following launch, or to carry out other missions. 
  The C-101 missile's aerodynamic shape is a canard layout in 
which two liquid fuel ram engines are symmetrically connected 
front and back to both sides of the missile. The missile body 
consists of a radar compartment and a warhead compartment. The 
missile employs an automatic pilot system that ensures that the 
missile flies at a pre-set altitude during the self-control 
stage. During the homing stage, the missile automatically tracks 
the target on the basis of control signals that the receiving 
radar emits. The terminal homing radar is located in the radar 
compartment. It is used to detect, lock on, and track ocean 
surface targets, and it sends corresponding control signals to 
the automatic pilot to effect automatic homing. Since the 
missile employs a supersonic, high energy, semi-armor piercing 
explosive warhead, it relies on the enormous kinetic energy that 
the missile's high velocity generates to penetrate the armor and 
explode inside the ship to produce huge casualties. The on-board 
time delay contact fuze effectively controls the explosion of 
the warhead inside the enemy ship. 
  The C-101 weapons's system works in combat as follows: Once 
the on-board missile attack radar discovers a target, it 
conducts a target identification to select the target to be 
attacked. After tracking the target, the targets movement 
parameters are calculated and sent in real time to the missile's 
director. The director plots the firing data. Next, combat 
parameters and instructions are set in the missile, after which 
a pre-launch test of the missile is made and the missile launch 
controlled (either a single or multiple missiles may be 
launched). After launch, the missile climbs to a pre-set 
altitude, glides, and enters level flight according to a pre-set 
procedures. During this process, the missile is accelerated to 
1.8 times the speed of sound by a solid rocket booster. After 
the booster falls away, a liquid fuel ram engine takes over to 
make the missile cruise steadily at two times the speed of 
sound. When the missile reaches a pre-set automatically 
controlled flight time, its on-board automatic pilot system 
switches to pre-programmed level flight, bringing to an end the 
automatically controlled flight stage. At this time, the 
on-board radar switches on to seek and track the target. After 
locking on the target, it goes into lateral and planar tracking 
of the target. A radio altimeter controls the missile's descent 
to an altitude of five meters to attack the target. When the 
missile contacts the target, the fuze begins to work. The 
warhead explodes after entering the ship near its water line to 
destroy the target. 
  Flight tests show the C-101 missile to be at the level of 
the 
fourth generation anti-ship missiles of the 1990s. 
  The foregoing is only a taste of China's several air defense 
and anti-ship missiles. The materials used in them are good and 
expensive, and they ave attracted the interest of all countries 
in international defense exhibitions. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66228 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar031___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-031 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  28 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Li Teng-hui: Beneficiary of 28 February Incident? </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Li Teng-hui: Beneficiary of 28 February Incident? </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0235A Taipei TZULI WANPAO in Chinese 28 Feb 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0235A </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei TZULI WANPAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Ch'en I-shen (7115 0308 3234), assistant </F>
researcher, Modern History Department, China Research Institute: 
"Victim, Injured Party, or Beneficiary?--Notes on What This 
Year's 28 February Incident Anniversary Will Do to Li Teng-hui"] 
  [Text] Following the opening up of politics and society, 
there have often been different themes in the anniversaries of 
the 28 February Incident in the past several years. One time it 
was marked by the Legislative Yuan's standing in silent tribute 
for the first time, at another time it was the observance by the 
Executive Yuan's study group, and at still another time it was 
the observance at a grand meeting of the State Music 
Department--what will it be this year? From the TZULI WANPAO 
supplement one sees on the two palms of the old man Lin Mu-ch'i 
[2651 2606 2630] of Keelung the scars clearly left by wires, as 
well as the process in which 81 persons were formed in nine 
lines and shot dead. Certainly many people are shocked into 
jumping up and saying "Sure enough, it's true...." Should this 
manifesation of oral history leave the most clear and lively 
impression at this year's anniversary of the 28 February 
Incident? 
  Unexpectedly, President Li Teng-hui, when receiving on 24 
February the family survivors of those killed in the 28 February 
Incident, said that he was a victim (injured party?) of the 
incident, a statement that for several days running has been the 
focus of the news media. 
<H5>  The 28 February Incident and White Terror Should Not Be </H5>
Jumbled Together 
  From the available material one cannot see a record of Li 
Teng-hui's taking part in the 28 February Incident or of him 
being made a victim of it. Someone then searched for an 
explanation in the direction of "the victims' family members," 
but after reviewing his family tree and geneology could find no 
evidence and could only describe him as a fairly abstract 
"injured party." This will never satisfy the reader's curiosity. 
Li Teng-hui said clearly that he himself....[as published] 
Therefore, the heroic deeds of the fifties and sixties have 
been completely revealed, and so has: Who joined the Communist 
Party, who was familiar with Huang Wen-hsiung [7806 2429 7160], 
who was the protaganist in the Chiang [5592] assassination case, 
and even the experience in White Terror on the part of other 
government officials who left the ranks to serve as a prop. 
  In my opinion, the 28 February Incident has its particular 
reason, course, and result, and it should not be lumped together 
with the White Terror of the fifties. Beginning on the evening 
of 27 February 1947 with the occurrence of the anticontraband 
tobacco incident, and going through the initial insurrection 
stage, negotiation and disposition stage, suppression and 
massacre stage, up to 16 May when Wei Tao-ming [7614 6670 2494] 
became the provincial governor, abolished martial law, and ended 
the activities to eliminate the bandits in the 
countryside...this was the 28 February Incident. The White 
Terror of the fifties was, after the Kuomintang (KMT) "central" 
government moved to Taiwan, mainly focused on activities to 
eliminate Leftists and Reds. If the two are not clearly 
distinguished, how can we calculate the number of dead persons? 
How can we talk about cause and effect? How can we remember the 
lessons of history? 
<H5>  Political Effect of 28 February Incident </H5>
In the initial period after the 28 February Incident, the 
residents of Taipei City staged a demonstration in which they 
carried the corpses of those who had been machine-gunned to 
death and shouted: "A Shan-tzu [7093 1472 0098]" killed these 
people. At the side of a fountain in Chiayi City, residents 
chased and beat people wearing Sun Yat-sen suits, and there was 
a clear image of clan conflict. However, if there were no enmity 
provoked by political rule, how could the cultural differences 
or clan contradictions of that time have become such a 
widespread and swift upheaval? The KMT's way of handling the 
incident was not just to suppress the rebellion, but to carry 
out a retaliatory massacre, which caused the death, or the 
leaving or withdrawal from the political world of a large number 
of Taiwan's elites. One can well imagine the quality of the 
Taiwanese political figures who filled the vacancies at that 
time. Over the past decades local factions "have had license to 
run wild," letting the KMT divide and rule, a situation that has 
a close connection to the 28 February Incident. Therefore, the 
political effect of the 28 February Incident is very clear. It 
settled the KMT's stable rule on Taiwan for several decades, 
causing Taiwan "to have no" clan or crowd problem for several 
decades. However, the KMT, under the martial law system, to 
gloss over its nature as an external regime, had no choice but 
to cultivate and use the Taiwanese "elites" whom it trusted. 
Didn't Li Teng-hui have his meteoric rise under the 
circumstances of this general trend of events? If it is said 
that the KMT regime was a beneficiary of the 28 February 
Incident, how can it be said that Li Teng-hui was also not one 
of the beneficiaries? 
<H5>  The Focus Was on How To Avoid "National Disorder" </H5>
  At the time of the 28 February Incident, although there no 
loud cries for Taiwan's independence, in Taipei the word "China" 
on the signboards of the China Tourist Association and the China 
Bank was pulled down, and many things connected with "China" 
were burned in the streets. It is not hard for us to feel that 
Japan, in its 50 years of colonial but modernized rule, 
cultivated the people of this island--the Taiwan people's 
consciousness of this should ferment. Although because time is 
not short and because of the restrictions of objective 
conditions, the elites who took part in the 28 February Incident 
probably have not reached a common understanding about founding 
a new country, the entire 28 February Incident really can be 
viewed as a "national disorder" that caused "injury to members 
of the same clan." 
  Why did Taiwan want to be ruled by Japan? Why did it also 
want to be ruled by China? Without founding a new, independent 
country, how can a repeat of the 28 February Incident be 
avoided? Any introspection about, commemoration of, or 
disposition of the 28 February Incident, I'm afraid, must be 
examined with this criteria in mind. 
  When the "28 February Incident delegation that traveled to 
America and returned home" requested that Li Teng-hui "publicly 
apologize," Li Teng-hui did not make a clear reply, but rather 
tried to mislead them with the emotional statement "I am also an 
injured party." Actually, the entire government's handling of 
the 28 February Incident may be said to one of muddling along 
for the past year, that is, the measure for compensation is 
stranded in the Legislative Yuan, P'eng Meng-ch'i [1756 1322 
4874] still occupies an official building of more than 1,000 
p'ing [one p'ing is an area six feet square], and the 
modern history of Taiwan, which the provincial historical 
documents society has time and again bragged about, was written 
with this idea of ourselves against the enemy .... What is 
strange is that recently the editorials in newspapers have 
maintained that it would be inadvisable for Li Teng-hui, in his 
status as a Taiwanese president, to publicly apologize for the 
28 February Incident! 
  With regard to dealing with the aftermath of the 28 February 
Incident, President Li Teng-hui--as a beneficiary of the KMT 
system--has very many things that he should do but has not yet 
done, and a public apology is only one of them. The Taiwanese 
people should know that language group affinity is not a 
necessary factor for founding a country. If people often, 
because of Li Teng-hui's status as a Taiwanese president, lose 
their ability to think and are perfectly happy to let him 
"deceive them by playing on their feelings," this precisely 
shows that they have not yet drawn the proper lesson from the 28 
February Incident. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66229 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar031___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-031 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  5 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Newly Founded `Voice of Southern Taiwan' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Newly Founded `Voice of Southern Taiwan' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0263A Taipei HSIN HSIN WEN [THE JOURNALIST] in Chinese 
No 364, 5 Mar 94 pp 56-57 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0263A </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei HSIN HSIN WEN [THE JOURNALIST] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yang Ho-lun (2799 0735 0243) and Li Chia-hsing </F>
(2621 0857 5281) (Southern Report): "The Effect Caused by the 
Voice of Southern Taiwan in the Kaohsiung Area--Four Laymen Will 
Use 800 Watts of Power to Invade Greater Kaohsiung"] 
  [Text] [Excerpts] [passage omitted] 
  In the last two months in the Kaohsiung area, more and more 
taxi drivers and factory workers have gotten into the habit of 
listening regularly every day to the programs broadcast on 
"Nan-Sheng Tien-T'ai" [Voice of Southern Taiwan] radio station 
at 90.7 megahertz FM, because on this "unofficial frequency," 
which has not yet been legally applied for, they can receive 
never before heard sensitive political topics and genuine local 
and media "news that slipped out." 
  [passage omitted] 
  Founded on the concept and the background of the "Ch'uan-Min 
Tien-T'ai" [All People's Radio Station] in the Taipei area, the 
development of the Voice of Southern Taiwan has been rather 
similar. In the same way, it has first locked onto taxi drivers 
and metropolitan factory workers as its listeners. The age 
distribution is concentrated at 20 to 35 years of age, and it 
seeks men as its principal market. 
  Based on the reaction from the listener hotline in the more 
than two months since it began broadcasting, the Voice of 
Southern Taiwan has attracted the market goal that it originally 
locked on to, and has gradually taken the opportunity to expand 
to every level. So, the Voice of Southern Taiwan not only 
extended its five hours of programming to from seven o'clock in 
the morning to eleven o'clock, deep into the night, but 
established a broadcasting studio in Taipei and used the 
"hotline telephone" of the telephone and telegraph office for 
hosts in the south and the north to conduct simultaneous 
immediate on-site broadcasts and become a new non-main line 
voice suddenly appearing in the southern air. 
  Because they have a shortage of funds, resources, and 
manpower, the program content first concentrates on innovation 
and defeating the opponent by surprise moves, like the use of 
the telephone hotline for simultaneous north-south conversations 
to overcome the drawback of the heavier concentration of 
political, economic, cultural, and social resources in the north 
of Taiwan than in the south. In the past it was necessary to 
spend time and money to invite famous people and famous 
spokesmen down. At the Taipei studio of the Voice of Southern 
Taiwan, they also can make immediate on-site broadcasts and at 
the smallest cost break the limitations of time and space and 
satisfy the southerners' need to probe regional subjects. 
  And they select 5:00 pm to 7:00 pm to broadcast this 
"Southern Taiwan at Dusk" program, because this period is 
precisely the "golden opening" when the evening newspaper is 
already published, and the parliament and government are in 
recess, and the television news still has not appeared, cleverly 
standing out in a gap in the market. 
  In addition, like what began on 28 February, the Voice of 
Southern Taiwan has especially made a special series that spans 
seven days, including lively historical data, oral stories, 
reports of commemorative activities in various places, scholars' 
expert commentary, and field survey reports. Particularly 
valuable was the first revelation of a diary of Uncle Wu 
Po-hsiung [0702 0130 7160] the year before he was murdered in 
the 28 February Incident. In it he recorded in great detail such 
sadnesses of the time as the descriptions of government 
officials, fluctuating prices, the sound of gunfire all around, 
and the anxiety in people's hearts. It was valuable "field 
historical data" of the 28 February Incident. When the announcer 
read that on 16 March 1947, the day the author was caught, it 
was "blank"---and later Aunt Wu Po-hsiung added the 
blood-stained words: "...he died and his body floated to the 
side of the river." Readers were choked up and listeners noses 
were stinging. [passage omitted] 
  The Voice of Southern Taiwan has 200 watts of transmitting 
power (All People's Radio Station only has 100 watts), and is 
expected to expand its power to 400 watts before early March, 
and increase it to 800 watts in April. At that time, its 
transmitting range could extend to Chia-I, P'ing-tung, and the 
P'eng Hu offshore islands from the present greater Kaohsiung 
area, becoming the greatest electronic medium of the 
out-of-office forces. (The area has 5 million residents.) 
  At the same time, the Voice of Southern Taiwan also has 
begun 
a "program exchange" with All People's Radio Station to expand 
its dissemination. Within the next few days, it will overcome 
equipment and technology problems by conducting southern and 
northern simulcasts. In the future, after the establishment of 
the Taichung station planned by Hung Chi-ch'ang [3163 1142 
2490], northern, middle, and southern broadcasts will be 
formally joined and they will be moving toward the goals of a 
total island linkup and a local medium and truly put an end to 
the era of mainline monopoly of the electronic media. 
  As the influence of the Voice of Southern Taiwan 
progressively increases, although such people as Huang Chao-hui 
[7806 2507 6540] and Ch'en Chu [7115 5468] are putting their 
support on the table, there are only four people who have put 
their whole heart and soul into it, and they all were formerly 
laymen--the station master, Kuo Chien-chih [6753 1696 2535]; the 
program designer, Lin Ti-chuan [2651 3336 1227]; and broadcast 
engineers Huang Po-ch'ao [7806 0590 6389] and Wu I-chao [0702 
0310 0340]. 
  Station master Kuo Chien-chih smiles and says that he 
studied 
economics and formerly ran his own factory and knows nothing 
about a radio station. With Huang Chao-hui "bravely giving 
orders" and driving them on, after more than two months 
preparation, they had a trial broadcast and immediately formally 
began broadcasting. Everyone is learning as he works. Now it is 
generally considered that they have achieved a little bit of 
grueling success and the greatest joy is receiving encouraging 
calls from listeners every day. 
  He recalls when they first began at the end of last 
September, for fear of interference and obstruction, everything 
was done in secret. In particular, transmitting and broadcasting 
equipment was all first broken down outside the country and made 
into parts, and after being transshipped through two countries 
as hardware, it entered Taiwan. After that, technicians were 
engaged at a high price to come south from Taipei to reassemble 
them at a secret location, and they were transported to the 
station and hurriedly set up. 
  Since broadcasting formally began last 10 December, station 
workers all have discovered that a number of faithful listeners 
follow the development and growth of program content, and in the 
short period of over two months, it has seen surprising results. 
  Lin Ti-chuan, who studied politics and is program planner 
and 
hostess asks with total confidence, "Who would still dare to say 
that our station's listeners do not have standards?!" 
  She brought up an example as explanation. When they first 
began broadcasting, because some of the criticism programs were 
misunderstood to "torture" the Democratic Progressive Party 
(DPP), quite a few habitual listening "open platform political 
view club" DPP supporters one after the other called the station 
to protest, scolding by linking the Three-Character 
Classic and threatening wording. However, with the patient 
explanation of the programming people, one by one they demanded 
that "they themselves turn around and respect their weakness and 
maintain their poise." From observing recent on-site hotline 
dialogues, these formerly easily emotional listeners, because 
they themselves had been respected, had clearly begun to learn 
to use reasonable and democratic methods to participate and 
discuss. Lin Ti-chuan and Kuo Chien-chih both believe that this 
proves that it is only necessary to give people respect and they 
will have higher standards, and not blindly doubt and put them 
down. 
  In the period that they began broadcasting, one of the 
things 
that was most gratifying to station personnel was to have a taxi 
driver affirm his support for the Voice of Southern Taiwan by 
especially sending a large cake to the station on 10 January, 
the day that they "completed a month" of broadcasting, at his 
own expense mimeograph advertising flyers for the station and 
distribute them everywhere, and send each of the hosts a card on 
Christmas day. He is considered a "deathly loyal and sworn" 
supporter. 
  Once after a program was broadcast in which K'o Ch'i-hua 
[2688 2475 0553] personally described the situation at the time 
of the White Terror, several listeners immediately called in to 
the hotline with choking voices to encourage old Mr. K'o to 
persevere. The station workers were extremely moved. 
  Since last year when broadcasting in the central area began 
to greatly increase and a share of listeners' two-way dialogues 
on the hotline have been directly broadcast live, the 
interactive relations between the broadcast media and listeners 
have become closer than ever. Lin Ti-chuan also believes that 
this is Taiwan's newest wave of revolutionary consciousness 
movements. Listeners' rights and voice have never been given so 
much importance and enhancement. Moreover, the effect of the 
broadcast hotline has been more absorbing than the effects of 
television and the flat medium.---Because the "reader reaction" 
pages in the press are less timely than the electronic media and 
the "viewer hotline" on television often appears to lack 
strength and be loosely organized and unnatural, because the 
picture is dull. 
  [passage omitted] 
  So, the Voice of Southern Taiwan like the All People's Radio 
Station, as distinguished from the mainline media accustomed to 
their own speech, expands "listener time" as much as possible in 
several of their programs. It concentrates its funds on 
assembling "collective line microphone systems" that other 
stations do not have and emphasizes strengthening dual or even 
three-way or multi-directional interaction of the station, 
listener, and balanced oversight objectives to act as the most 
effective "people's public instrument." 
  Presently, the Voice of Southern Taiwan programming still is 
mainly political, topical, and local and daily life information, 
but as they attract manpower and resources and after they are 
legalized, their foundation will change to a company 
organization and seek a special and a higher station site, 
increase the injection of youth, news, and cultural programs, 
and increase the purchase of on-site relay vehicles to utilize 
important materials and select information for reporting. All of 
this is to gradually orient their efforts into the system. 
  Although the initial period has been short, the Voice of 
Southern Taiwan already has moulded a few "famous voices": Like 
Lin Ti-chuan with the sharp diction; Su Jung-jui 5685 2837 3843 
with the pleasant clear-toned voice and precise facts; and old 
Mr. Ou Ming-lang 2962 2494 2597, the eighty-year-old host of 
"Uncle Talks About Antiquity." They all have their regular 
listeners, and they often have listeners write letters to the 
station pouring out their aspirations. These are the intangible 
fruits of "righteous work." 


</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66230 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpcar031___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-031 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  5 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Journal Views Characterisics of Political Culture </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Journal Views Characterisics of Political Culture </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0263B Taipei HSIN HSIN WEN [THE JOURNALIST] in Chinese 
No 364, 5 Mar 94 p 38 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0263B </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei HSIN HSIN WEN [THE JOURNALIST] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chi Yen-ling (4764 1693 7117): "Everywhere Can </F>
Be Heard the Sound of Dogs Barking"] 
  [Text] [Excerpts] [passage omitted] 
  Taiwan is a society in which "following the wind" is very 
popular. Everyone like a swarm of bees says the same things and 
does the same things. Chien Ming-ching [4675 2494 2529], speaker 
of the Taiwan provincial parliament describes this phenomenon as 
"dog culture [gou de wenhua]." One dog barks and the pack of 
dogs follows. When it barks, it is very lively, but when it 
finishes barking, it is as if nothing had happened and nothing 
has changed. 
  Dog Culture Can Be Seen Everywhere 
  This "dog culture" is expressed especially clearly in 
politics. A year ago, on the issue of participation in the 
United Nations they barked throughout Taiwan to form a group. 
From Taipei they barked all the way to the front door of the 
United Nations. It was as if there were no other issue but this 
on earth. But who knows when, the "United Nations fever" 
suddenly dropped from the boiling point to the freezing point. 
Now one no longer hears anyone talking feverishly about the 
United Nations issue. 
  Recently the popular "southern orientation" topic was 
exactly 
the same. Since President Lee Teng-hui vacationed in three ASEAN 
countries, throughout the country with neat and uniform actions 
they have concentrated on "looking south." Government units have 
worked overtime to study and evaluate; the enterprise sector has 
gone south to investigate nonstop; and the news sector every day 
has reports of "southern orientation" news. It appears that the 
future of Taiwan's economy, trade, and foreign affairs can only 
begin to be ensured by "southern orientation." 
  Another complication of "southern orientation fever" is 
"presidential foreign visit fever." Lee Teng-hui had just 
returned from Bangkok when the topics of whether or not in the 
near future he could visit the United States, visit Japan, visit 
France, visit Germany, visit Fiji, visit Central and South 
America were brought out one after the other for great and 
special speculation. Taiwan's officials every day were chased by 
reporters and asked these questions that still did not have a 
trace of evidence. They could only grin and bear it. But foreign 
government officials, legislators, and scholars also were 
tediously harangued with, "Would your country agree to a visit 
from President Lee Teng-hui?" a question "of no interest." It 
appears a little ridiculous and comical. 
  Another example is such "major national issues" as the vice 
president serving concurrently as president of the Judicial Yuan 
and the speaker of the assembly, whether or not the Taipei 
municipal Number Seven Park Kuan-yin [Goddess of Mercy] statue 
should be removed, and in the Legislative Yuan generally how 
many questions and how many answers the form of interpellation 
should take. These fully manifest "dog culture" characteristics. 
No one asks if the matter is true or false and no one cares if 
it is important or not. Someone need only start to ramble on a 
topic and the other people follow with all their might, rambling 
until they are talked out and tried of talking, and everything 
calms down again. But everything remains as before. The boat 
goes through the water without a trace. In all the world 
probably only Taiwan can arrive at this state of mind! 
  Concentrated Fever, Concentrated Incapacity 
  From the perspective of social psychology, "concentrating on 
following the wind" is the phenomenon of a sick society. Whether 
we should participate in the United Nations, whether we should 
plan a southern-oriented policy, and whether the president 
should leave the country on visits are all matters that we can 
talk about and should talk about and can do and should do. But 
once the whole nation "dog fashion" is engaged on a grand scale, 
it becomes "United Nations fever," "southern orientation fever," 
and "foreign visit fever." Any issue ultimately should have only 
three minutes of fever. In a society that often has 
"concentrated fever" and "concentrated stupor" in dealing with 
national affairs will have difficulty avoiding the resulting 
"concentrated incapacity." 
  With the Year of the Dog beginning, the dog people precisely 
can greatly practice their belief in the year that is named for 
them. The "doggy culture" is bound to shine even more. In the 
next year, we will amend the constitution and we will select the 
governor and mayors, and we can expect that in the political 
arena the excited noise of barking will be heard from all sides. 
The "dog" people are lucky. The people who do not belong to the 
dogs can only seek their own greater luck in the midst of the 
barking! 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66231 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar031___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-031 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  13 May 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hu Jiwei on Contemporary, Future China </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hu Jiwei on Contemporary, Future China </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0268A Hong Kong MING PAO YUE-KAN [MING PAO MONTHLY] in 
Chinese No 29, Mar 94 pp 50-55 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0268A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong MING PAO YUE-KAN [MING PAO MONTHLY] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article, dated 10 July 1993, by Hu Jiwei (5170 4921 0251): </F>
"Optimism as to Future Developments? Or a Crisis Ridden 
Future?--An Analysis of China's Present Condition and Future 
Prospects." A note at the end of the article reads: "The article 
originally appeared under the title `China's Direction,' but is 
here given in a shortened form due to the constraints of space."] 
  [Text] Editor's Note: Hu Jiwei, a former president of the 
RENMIN RIBAO Publishing House, had accepted the invitation for a 
three-month lecture tour in the United States, during which he 
gave speeches or held symposia in some ten universities and 
academic societies, mainly analyzing the present condition of, 
and future prospects for China. Before every lecture, Hu would 
write out a draft of his speech, but he did not read from the 
draft; rather, he expressed some of his views freely as the 
occasion demanded. He has attracted great interest among 
students of the Chinese scene. The present article points out 
that the direction of China's development justifies optimism, 
but that there are also serious problems. Hu also points out 
that only with "peaceful gradual advance [heping jianjin]" can 
China's prosperous development be ensured. [end editor's note] 
  The world's attention is fixed on China's internal 
situation. 
In my opinion, generally speaking, that situation is good; I am 
optimistic as to the direction China is going. 
<H5>  Small Turbulences Cannot Be Avoided </H5>
  China's situation is good, especially its economic 
situation. 
However, some observers only look at the speed of its economic 
growth and speak of it as very good. They say, for instance, 
that China is already third among the large economic powers. 
This, in my opinion, does not conform to reality. 
  Internally, China still has problems of considerable 
seriousness, but then there are also observers who will only see 
the bad side and make it out to be too bad. They even talk of 
China being beset with crises, and think outbreaks may be 
triggered at any moment, much as if China will soon be one total 
chaos. That too does not conform to reality. 
  What one may say, I think, is that the situation is very 
good, and that the developmental trend justifies optimism, but 
that there are also some serious problems. 
  In the following I will give my reasons and my analysis: 
  First, in a broader perspective, to speak of the larger 
basic 
reason, there is the basic turn for the better in the new 
international situation, which also determines the developmental 
prospects for China. 
  The disintegration of the socialist camp and the fundamental 
elimination of confrontation between the two armed camps; the 
situation of having two ideological blocs facing each other, 
backed by armed forces, is becoming more and more relaxed. Times 
are gone when great powers staked their fate on their military 
power. A new era has begun where the world situation will be one 
of peaceful development. 
  This has a decisive influence on China's future, as China 
too 
will then also, inevitably, develop into a peaceful, democratic, 
and modern state. 
  In this international situation, great changes will also, 
inevitably, be engendered internally within the country. The era 
of wars, when armed forces were relied upon to fight off foreign 
aggression and to ensure the state's independence, has 
essentially come to a close. The era of armed forces being 
relied upon to consolidate the internal political system and to 
protect economic construction should long ago also have come to 
a close. The idea of a proletarian dictatorship--having the guns 
means having everything--has already become outdated. The times 
of violent revolution and violent rule have passed, never to 
return. 
  This peaceful, democratic development cannot be reversed 
anymore and cannot be stopped. Anything that stands in the way 
of this great principle, any high-handed reactionary policy, 
will have no chance of success, and will be compelled to undergo 
change. Whatever countercurrent or whatever obstruction appear, 
all will ultimately end up in defeat. 
  Some people believe that large-scale armed turmoil and armed 
suppression may erupt in China, warlords will get tangled in 
warfare in some kind of feudal separatist regime, nationalities 
will split off, or ethnic fighting will break out.; however, all 
these assumptions are overpessimistic. I believe it may not be 
possible to avoid small disturbances, but still the possibility 
of large-scale turmoil is very, very small. 
  In sum, viewing the overall situation, all those autocratic 
powers and autocratic measures are headed for extinction, and 
they are not headed for any growth in strength. 
<H5>  Two Reasons for an Optimistic Attitude </H5>
  There are two important reasons for my optimistic attitude 
as 
to the situation in China. One reason: Those democratic forces 
that actively advocate learning advanced science and technology 
and economic management from the capitalist countries, that 
advocate importing foreign capital and technologies, and that 
formerly had been thought of as the most dangerous forces of 
bourgeois liberalization, are now right among, and of the 
masses, and they are now the ones that are more and more 
considered "advanced personalities," in that they firmly 
advocate reform and opening up to the outside world. If one 
were, under these circumstances, to advocate and actually try in 
present-day China to strengthen total dictatorship of the 
proletariat, if one were to think of inciting to "class struggle 
as the key link," even extreme leftist forces who oppose that 
sort of "bourgeois peaceful evolution" would become highly 
unpopular. Peace is bound to replace violence, democracy is 
bound to replace dictatorship, that is the developmental trend 
of the world, and even more so the developmental trend in China, 
and any move against this current will just get nowhere. 
  The second important reason is that the reform of China's 
economic structure is proving increasingly successful, and that 
the reform of China's economic structure has actually induced a 
reform in China's political structure, which in fact has already 
gained some gratifying achievements in quite a few respects. 
Judging by the actual situation in China, it is not by a sudden 
change, but by a gradual change that economic reform is inducing 
political reform. It is a process of moving from quantitative 
changes to a change in substance, it is a gradual change of 
which the effects will only become apparent after the lapse of a 
considerable period of time. Some people see some of the 
obnoxious phenomena and conclude that things will take a sudden 
turn and then develop rapidly into a gigantic chaos. I don't 
agree. Some people see all the good phenomena and conclude that 
the situation will become all rosy, will assume a completely new 
look. That too is an unrealistic fantasy. However, judging by 
the trend of overall developments, the reform of the political 
structure in China will take a step forward. That is the general 
trend which no man's will can deflect. 
  The Chinese authorities have decided on the extremely 
important policy decision of "grasp with two hands, two hands?" 
It is to mean grasp material civilization with one hand and 
spiritual civilization with the other hand. This is of course 
correct and very good, but in its actual implementation this 
move was usurped by ultraleftist forces, who made it out to be 
something like "oppose bourgeois liberalization" and "oppose the 
bourgeois peaceful evolution." In the ideological field, they 
launched a political movement to condemn and attack those who 
hold different views, and what they promoted was still nothing 
else but an ideological dictatorship and cultural dictatorship. 
In actual fact they did not dare, and even opposed, instituting 
a reform of the political structure. 
  After the disintegration of the Soviet Union, some 
authoritative persons erroneously summed up the Soviet 
experience by blaming two reasons for the disintegration of the 
Soviet Union: One being the failure to institute economic 
reforms, their economy having been in a depressed state for a 
long time; and the other, having first started a political 
reform, when people were allowed to think and speak out, thereby 
confounding the political situation. The said "authoritative 
persons" then decided to go the opposite way: If the Soviets 
failed to start economic reforms, they would precisely start 
economic reforms; that was right. If the Soviets started 
political reform, they would precisely not start political 
reforms, but that was wrong. This is in reality creating the 
lopsided situation of economic reform without political reform. 
Some of these "authoritative persons" would even concoct the 
theory that economic reform without political reform is the only 
way that will suit the national condition of China, and they 
would arrive at the important policy decision that they would 
thereby be creating socialism with Chinese characteristics. In 
actual fact, this is totally wrong. 
<H5>  Economic Reform Without Political Reform Is a Monstrosity </H5>
  According to the actual situation during the ten years that 
followed our smashing the Gang of Four, economic reform has in 
fact frequently been conducted accompanied by political reform, 
and any mechanical separation of the two is impossible. First, 
did we not smash the autocratic regime of the Cultural 
Revolution time with its feudal, fascist dictatorship, which was 
then followed by the discussion of truthful objectives and the 
achievement of a liberation of the mind, and did we not smash 
the political rule of the personality cult with its "two 
absolutes" [observance of Mao's decision and obedience to his 
directive]. All these are extremely important reforms of the 
political structure. Without these reforms of the political 
structure, the great reform in the structure of China's rural 
economy could not have been realized. 
  Rural reform started with the institution of the system of 
fixing farm output quotas for each household. This system, 
outwardly, appears as a reform of the agricultural production of 
the peasants, but in actual fact it was a reform of the rural 
economic structure. Through a protracted, tireless struggle of 
four, five years, it was finally possible to abolish the 
people's commune system with its integration of government 
administration and commune management, and its 
worker-peasant-merchant-student-soldier unison. It was then only 
that the 800 million peasants truly became masters of their 
land, and that the 800 million peasants gained initial 
democratic power. Democracy for 800 million peasants is an 
extremely valuable contribution for the eventual establishment 
of a democratic regime in China. The great significance of this 
fact is not understood by many people and is ignored by many who 
advocate democracy for China. 
  The reason for economic reform to have as consequence so 
huge 
an effect on political reform is that at the same time as the 
economic reform was implemented a political struggle was waged 
simultaneously, a struggle which breached certain conventional 
political barriers. This was the only way that so great a 
victory could have been achieved. For instance, when persisting 
on implementing the system of fixed farm quotas for households, 
it was necessary to offend against and violate the directives 
and provisions on establishing the people's commune system, as 
previously ordered by Mao Zedong and the CPC Central Committee. 
It was furthermore necessary to offend against and violate 
relevant provisions of the CPC Central Committee, such as 
earlier documents that prescribed that "fixed farm output 
quotas" would be permissible for "work teams," but not for 
"households." Later documents changed this and allowed the 
system to be applied to households, but only in the "three 
hardship regions" (such poverty and hardship regions as the 
national minority districts, remote mountainous districts on the 
country's borders, and regions that had suffered calamities 
which had reduced farm output). The system was not permitted for 
the other vast rural areas. Later this was again changed, 
allowing application in the villages, but not on state farms. 
However, all these provisions were ultimately violated, and we 
must therefore not mechanically separate reform of the economic 
structure from the reform of the political structure. We must 
not conduct economic reform isolated from simultaneous political 
reform. This is a Chinese characteristic that has become 
manifest in the actual life of China, and that is something that 
man's will cannot alter. The positive significance of 800 
million peasants gaining this much initial democratic freedom is 
something that is difficult to comprehend. For instance, 
peasants in some advanced districts with flourishing 
agricultural production have begun to disbelieve and to break 
away from the old set pattern of "take grain as the key link and 
regard agriculture as the foundation," and are experimenting 
with village and township enterprises. They are developing small 
enterprises into large enterprises, and income from industrial 
and sideline undertakings gradually overtake income from 
agriculture. They, furthermore, use income from industrial and 
sideline undertakings to help modernize agriculture, for 
extensive improvements in agricultural products, and also to 
achieve high and stable yields over long periods of time. The 
extensive development of village and township enterprises in the 
rural areas has not only increased peasant incomes and improved 
the rural economy, but also opened the way for agricultural 
modernization, urbanization of the rural areas, solving the 
problem of surplus manpower--in excess of 100 million--in the 
rural areas, and to narrow the disparity between city and 
countryside. All these enormous and amazing changes nobody would 
have ever expected. In August, year before last, I toured the 
Suzhou-Wuxi-Changzhou triangle, and I was extremely pleased and 
surprised by conditions there. In that area, many village and 
township enterprises were of a larger scale than state 
enterprises, their machinery and equipment was more advanced 
than in the state enterprises, their management was more 
rational than in the state enterprises, their productivity was 
higher than in the state enterprises, and they turned in more 
taxes and profits than state enterprises. There are now many, 
many villages whose output value exceeds the 100 million yuan 
mark. 
  In short, the reform of the rural economic structure has 
abolished the people's commune system, and 800 million peasants 
have gained initial democracy. This is an amazing change in 
China. It is an enormous victory achieved by the high pressures 
of a top-to-bottom directed assault against the "Leftist" 
political forces. 
  After victory in the economic structural reform in the rural 
areas, the next reform target was the system of the highly 
centralized planned economy. Abolishing the people's commune 
system took four years, while abolishing the planned economy 
system has taken ten years. There was first the need to overcome 
the unitary economic component of the public ownership system: 
First, to revive the private economy that had been extinct for 
over 30 years; second, to convert what nominally had been a 
collective ownership system, but actually a system of ownership 
by the whole people, truly into a collective economy of large, 
medium and small types, especially to restore the various 
service trades, such as commerce, and transportation, that are 
so closely linked with the life of the people. After privately 
managed or collectively managed enterprises had developed, a new 
force broke in on the scene: foreign-invested enterprises, that 
is, Sino-foreign joint ventures, Sino-foreign contractual joint 
ventures, and wholly foreign-owned enterprises, and this 
development opened up a wide breach in the centralized system of 
the planned economy structure. 
<H5>  "Foreign-Invested Enterprises" Opened Breach in Planned </H5>
Economy 
  Development of foreign-invested enterprises took off only 
after the establishment of the special economic zones [SEZs]. 
Establishment of the Shenzhen SEZ was a final resolution in 
1980. The plan at that time was to establish a special zone on 
the country's border, emulate the Hong Kong model, attract 
foreign capital, and to open a window that would allow to study 
foreign experiences on mainland territory, and thus set up a 
small experimental station for the practice of market economy. 
However, unexpectedly it developed into a miracle, and results 
were excellent. Finally SEZs were also established at Zhuhai, 
Shantou, and Xiamen, and later the whole of Hainan Island was 
designated one large special zone. Later, economic development 
zones were set up along the coast, foreign capital kept flowing 
in, and the foreign-invested enterprises kept increasing. 
China's economy became increasingly invigorated. 
  The SEZs mainly adhered to the law of market economy, and 
they thereby dealt the planned economy structure a serious blow. 
In the SEZs many conventional provisions of the planned economy 
system were quite naturally tossed aside. 
  That the planned economy system was changed into a market 
economy system was not only a great reform in economic respects, 
but also in political respects. In the past it had been the 
government (actually the party) that had decided everything, 
directed everything, controlled everything, concerned itself 
with everything. People's work, employment, school attendance, 
salary and wages, welfare, food, clothing, housing, marriage, 
childbirth, moving home, and business trips; everything was 
strictly controlled. After abandoning the highly-centralized 
planned economy structure, people became gradually liberated 
from all these controls and restraints. As the people gained an 
enhanced feeling of being masters of their own affairs, 
democratic awareness increased. This is a point that is very 
often ignored. Again from the economic angle, this is also a 
great reform, because in this way, great changes will also come 
about in the relations between the central and the local 
authorities and in the relations between the government and the 
enterprises. The former rigid system of having people, finance, 
materials, production, supply, and marketing highly centralized 
and unified had inevitably to undergo fundamental changes. At 
long last a way had been found to revitalize the large and 
medium-sized state enterprises and to break down the rigidity of 
the former state of affairs, and it is now a matter of 
implementing and making it become reality. The large and 
medium-sized enterprises will finally be revitalized, that is 
quite certain, and the prospects also justify optimism. 
<H5>  Power Monopoly Leads to Various Malpractices </H5>
  However, we must also realize that China's problems are 
problems that have come down to us after having accumulated over 
an extended period of the country's history. They are not 
problems that have accumulated only during the 40-odd years of 
total proletarian dictatorship, still these problems are indeed 
extremely complex and extremely serious. If one were only to 
look at this serious state of affairs without considering its 
historical development, especially without fully assessing the 
achievements gained by the Chinese people in their persistent 
and dauntless upward struggle, and the particular developmental 
direction determined by the strength of this people, one could 
then easily regard the problems as excessively serious and come 
to negative and pessimistic conclusions. 
  Talking now about the serious circumstances that presently 
exist in China: The highly centralized system of planned economy 
of the past few decades had resulted in an autocratic political 
system with a highly centralized power monopoly. Following the 
collapse of the planned economy system, this autocratic system 
with its power monopoly, although also badly shaken, was still 
able to maintain its position with extreme tenacity. The 
strongest power had also been the strongest corrosive agent. 
Under this system of a highly centralized power monopoly, larger 
or smaller power-holders and larger and smaller organs of power, 
are misusing their powers to engage in malpractices for selfish 
ends to an extent that is hard to imagine. For instance, most 
startling way of getting rich without own capital is to rely on 
the domain of one's superior official, appropriate property to 
oneself, and to engage in real estate trading. 
  For instance, an organization with certain power will 
suddenly change its identity and become some kind of 
corporation, a general company, while still, as before, keep 
rigidly controlling the state-run enterprise, and as before 
enjoying the high profits of the enterprise. They will then 
still control important materials, such as steel, or significant 
products, such as arms and ammunition, and one transaction in 
such materials will yield profits into the millions. There is 
also misuse of special powers to effect power-backed investments 
and take out power-backed loans ("friendship" loans). These 
cases are frequent and show no decline, rather a tendency to 
increase, and are important reasons for excessive investments 
and currency inflation. Under the protection of larger and 
smaller powerholders, there is much tax fraud and tax evasion, 
much lavish feasting, travelling at public expense, and 
increases in collective expenditure. Repeated countermeasures, 
but repeated offenses, attempts at control but never an 
effective stop. 
  Utilizing the manufacture by larger or smaller powerholders 
and under their protection, false and inferior products are 
flooding the market. In the case of some consumer goods that are 
daily necessities, 70 to 80 percent are false or inferior 
products, inflicting great harm on the people. 
  There is also the extremely serious problem of such crimes 
as 
robbery, train banditry, illegal usurpation of highways, drug 
trafficking, smuggling, trade in human beings, crimes which 
continue to be rampant, and which are committed by criminal 
gangs in collusion with powerholders. As to crimes committed by 
higher ups and emulated by the lower ranks, such as graft and 
bribery, malpractices for selfish ends, extortion and blackmail, 
and even paying bribes to obtain official posts, such crimes too 
are prevalent throughout society. They add to the ever growing 
burden on the people, and their burden on the peasants is 
particularly serious. 
  Yet another extremely frightening phenomenon is the really 
alarming decadence of the press. The Chinese press is the area 
most strictly controlled by those leftist princelings and 
leftist big chiefs. While they loudly proclaim such slogans as 
"oppose bourgeois liberalization" and "oppose peaceful 
evolution," moral degeneration is spreading among them in a bad 
way. In the very own party paper of the Central Committee, the 
RENMIN RIBAO, the situation is also extremely serious. There are 
many jingles about this on the mainland, a recent specimen goes 
like this: 
  First reporter sells "secret information". 
  Second reporter gambles in shares. 
  Third reporter sells whole page layouts. 
  Fourth reporter canvasses advertisements. 
  Fifth reporter fishes for envelopes containing gratuities. 
  Sixth reporter is moonlighting by writing for other places 
than his own paper. 
  It is impossible to list all the serious problems one by 
one. 
The details of many alarming incidents are first "exported" and 
then become "marketed" domestically; the outside gets to know 
them faster and to know more of them than the inside. 
  The chief root of the affliction in this serious state of 
affairs is the autocratic system with its highly centralized 
power monopoly. The problem cannot be remedied by treating 
single symptoms piecemeal and not the whole disease. In economic 
respects, going the old road of pressuring, adjusting, and 
rectifying will not do anymore, and in political respects, 
issuing of directives, launching formalistic investigative 
movements will also not do anymore. What is necessary is to 
conduct a resolute reform of the political structure 
concurrently with the reform of the economic structure; what has 
to be done is to firmly resolve to fundamentally reform this 
autocratic system. 
<H5>  Government System Requires Fundamental Reform </H5>
  The broad masses of the people have reached the limits of 
their endurance. Reference to last year's openly visible 
disturbance in Shenzhen about the sale of shares, the 
anti-tyranny struggle of the Renshou peasants, and the huge 
fraud case involving the Changcheng Corporation, can well 
explain the seriousness of the situation. It will also explain 
that the people have reached a stage when they will be forced to 
wage struggle, it will also explain that some relatively good 
results have already been achieved, and will also explain that 
the upward struggle of the masses is expanding in breadth and in 
depth. 
  Of course, it is hoped that the urgent upward struggle will 
be coordinated and receive support, from top toward the bottom, 
by the CPC and the government. It is hoped that with coordinated 
action from the top toward the bottom a fundamental reform of 
the political structure will indeed be accomplished. 
  People who advocate economic reform alone and oppose 
political reform say that they are emulating Singapore, and that 
they highly esteem the example set by Singapore. However, they 
do not understand that the reason why Singapore has been doing 
so well is that the Singapore Government does not directly 
control economic affairs. Besides, the Singapore Government is 
an absolutely honest government, also a government that operates 
with a proficient yet suitably limited personnel, a government 
of the rule of law, a government performing at high efficiency, 
and a government that has the welfare of its people at heart. If 
we are to truly emulate Singapore, then we should as quickly as 
possible get on with the reform of the political system. We 
should then, first of all, start with the reform of the 
government system. The government that we must subject to change 
is one that is highly centralized, that determines everything, 
directs everything, controls everything, concerns itself with 
everything, a government with an unwieldy organization, with 
bloated agencies, with overstaffed offices, affected by 
routinism and bureaucratism. This government has to be changed 
into one that is honest, that employs proficient yet suitably 
limited personnel, that is operating according to the rule of 
law, that is efficient and welfare-conscious. This is the reform 
of the government system that is presently absolutely needed 
with regard to every one of the above-mentioned characteristics; 
it is a reform that also cannot be delayed any longer. 
  Think, if a reform of this sort could be implemented, and if 
it were possible to gradually establish a government like 
Singapore's, there would indeed be every hope that the many 
serious problems that we are presently having could all be 
resolved. 
  China's affairs are extremely complex, all good ideals and 
good aspirations must be gradually realized on the basis of the 
actual conditions. Otherwise, haste will not get you to your 
goal and good intentions will not get good results, as so often 
happened. It is my opinion that with realistic and sustained 
effort, China's prospects are definitely bright. 
<H5>  "Peaceful Gradual Advance" Will Benefit China's Development </H5>
  Summing up all that was said, we may gain valuable 
experiences and lessons, namely: 
  1) Economic reform must be conducted simultaneously with 
political reform; 2) Whatever the obstructing forces, the 
Chinese people have always found ways and means to wage their 
struggle, a struggle from the bottom upward; 3) China's 
reform must always be a continuous effort to smash the 
  conventions of the "Leftist" forces; 4) The struggle is a 
protracted one. Only by pursuing it realistically, persistently, 
and untiringly, will there come a time when the enormous change 
will have been achieved, namely the change from quantitative 
changes to the change in substance. 
  Xu Jiatun put forward the idea of "peaceful evolution," my 
idea is "peaceful gradual advance." The great difference is that 
Xu speaks of socialism and capitalism progressing together in a 
"peaceful evolution," to gradually heading for a world of 
universal harmony. My idea of "peaceful gradual advance" speaks 
only of the future political situation within China, and asserts 
that peaceful methods should be used in a gradual advance. 
  I emphasize "peaceful" because innumerable historical events 
have proven that violence and democracy are as incompatible as 
fire and water. If violence is used to topple a violent regime, 
the new regime is bound to use violence to maintain its rule, 
and however democratic its pronouncements, in reality it cannot 
possibly be a democratic regime. It would only be replacing one 
violent regime with another violent regime. 
  I emphasize "peaceful," because in so large a country as 
China the political situation is extremely complex, and the 
influence of autocracy lingers on, as a left-over from several 
thousand years of history. It is therefore impossible to effect 
a "great leap forward" and to "advance at the double," also 
impossible to "overtake England and the United States" within a 
short period of time, or to cross all of a sudden over a "golden 
bridge" right into "paradise." Only by realistic and persistent 
effort will it be possible to achieve an emphatically peaceful, 
stable, protracted, and gradual advance. 
  At the same time I very much disagree with those who 
advocate 
"strike down the communist party, overthrow the Chinese 
Government." That way is fraught with great danger, a way one 
should not take. I believe that by the methods of "striking 
down" and "overthrowing" it is not possible to achieve a truly 
democratic society, it could only replace violence by violence. 
For this reason I emphasize: I am not a man of democracy in 
general, but of peaceful democracy. I propose to urge the 
communist party to effect self-reform, urge the communist party 
to effect a democratic reform within the party. In the China of 
today, it is impossible to have a reform of the Chinese society 
without a reform of the CPC, and without internal democracy 
within the CPC, it is impossible to have democracy in Chinese 
society and democracy in the state. 
  In my opinion only by adopting the method of "peaceful 
gradual advance" will it be possible to achieve a prosperous and 
thriving China. I believe there are indeed powerful reform 
forces and democratic forces generally extent within the CPC, 
forces that would exert a top-to-bottom effort. Although the 
Chinese people have lost much confidence in the CPC, they have 
not given up all hope. They are still very hopeful, and they 
still hope that their untiring upward struggle will be met with 
a coordinated downward effort by the party and the government, 
so that even greater achievements will be unceasingly 
accomplished in China's reform. 
  This is how I assess the direction of China's development, 
and these are also the reasons for my optimistic attitude. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66232 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar031___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-031 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  15 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article Urges Support for Public Ownership System </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Article Urges Support for Public Ownership System </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0272 Beijing XUEXI YU YANJIU [STUDY AND RESEARCH] in 
Chinese No 4, 15 Feb 94 pp 5-6 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0272 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XUEXI YU YANJIU [STUDY AND RESEARCH] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wang Ruipu (3769 3843 3877)] </F>
  [Text] "Decisions by the Central Committeee of the 
Communist Party of China Regarding Several Issues Concerning 
Establishing a Socialist Market Economic System" points out that 
"a socialist market economic system is one integrated with the 
basic socialist system" and "a modern enterprise system with a 
public ownership system as the main part is the foundation of 
the socialist market economic system." There are two main items 
in the basic socialist system: One, public ownership of the 
means of production, and two, the Communist Party in power. One 
item is economic, one is political; these are the essential 
differences between it and the basic capitalist system. There 
will be no questions about establishing a socialist market 
economic system if we do not firmly uphold the position of the 
Communist Party in power and public ownership of the means of 
production. To firmly uphold a socialist public ownership system 
requires enlivening large- and medium-sized state-owned 
enterprises because they are the backbone of socialist public 
ownership. 
  The current matter is: In general, the mainstays of the 
public ownership system--medium- and large-sized state-owned 
enterprises--still lack vitality. A relative number of them have 
suffered losses while there is flourishing growth in the 
non-public ownership economy. We naturally cannot clutch onto 
policies to control growth in the non-public ownership system 
economy to protect the publically-owned economy. On the one hand 
we must continue to encourage the growth of the non 
publically-owned economy. On the other hand we must enliven 
state-owned medium- and large-sized enterprises through deeper 
reforms. We may very possibly be compelled to privatize if the 
latter cannot be enlivened for a long time and are powerless to 
compete against the non publically-owned economy. Therefore, 
enlivening medium- and large-sized state-owned enterprises is 
both a fundamental economic issue as well as a fundamental 
political issue. 
  Overall, medium- and large-sized state-owned enterprises 
still lack vitality. This is a fact. However, there are two 
opinions regarding how to treat this fact. One regards their 
lack of vitality as due to the public ownership system. Some 
believe that having medium- and large-sized state-owned 
enterprises is in itself a mistake. A second treatment is to 
seek truth from facts, with specific analyses for specific 
issues. The lack of vitality seen in medium- and large-sized 
state-owned enterprises is in terms of comparison with the non 
publically-owned economy and the collectively-owned economy. On 
the surface, considering vitality and competitiveness, the 
state-owned is not as good as the collective, the collective is 
not as good as the individually-owned, the individually-owned is 
not as good as the privately-owned, and the privately-owned is 
not as good as enterprises with the three types of foreign 
ownership. Nonetheless, this is not a material fact but purely a 
surface phenomenon. The fact of the matter is that they 
basically are incomparable. First, medium- and large-sized 
state-owned enterprises were created under a highly unified 
planned economic system. They operated for several decades under 
the old system. Now we must undertake reform, a reform of the 
highly unified planned economy, transform enterprise operating 
mechanisms and establish a socialist market economic system. 
There is a switching process for enterprises to enter the 
marketplace as independent economic bodies. The non 
publically-owned and collectively-owned economy as swift-footed 
arrive first, reaching it in one step. For them there is no 
process of switching from the old to new systems. They create 
enterprise operating mechanisms directly according to th e needs 
of a market economy. Second, the developmental histories differ. 
Medium-and large-sized state-owned enterprises always have been 
pillars of the national economy. The individual economy, the 
private economy and enterprises using the three types of foreign 
investment are products arising in implementing reforms of the 
economic system following the Third Plenary Session of the 11th 
Central Committee Meeting of the CPC. Because medium- and 
large-sized state-owned enterprise directors for a long time 
used a policy of unified state control over income and 
expenditure, the state added value on enterprises by tax profits 
and other methods and allocated seriously insufficient funds for 
the technological transformation of enterprises. This brought on 
the aging of enterprise equipment, backward technology, and no 
readjustment of the industrial mix, product mix or tecnological 
mix of enterprises for a long time. Under highly unified 
planning, this contradiction was somewhat hidden. After 
reforming the economic system and once enterprises directly 
faced markets, this contradiction immediately became clear. From 
the day they were set up, the individual economy, the private 
economy, and foreign-funded enterprises faced the market. Their 
industrial mix, product mix and technology mix were naturally 
rational. Even though certain things are irrational, small boats 
are easy to turn about and readjustment is relatively simple. It 
is relatively hard to readjust the industrial, product and 
technology mixes of medium- and large-sized state-owned 
enterprises. Third, social contributions and burdens are not the 
same. Most medium- and large-sized state-owned enterprises are 
old. All have made outstanding contributions to the state in 
terms of providing tax income and training and moving personnel. 
At the same time, they have constituted a considerable core of 
retired worker. Because social security mechanisms still are 
unformed, retired workers still rely on enterprises for living 
security and medical benefits. Retired workers account for 
one-third of those on the job in most enterprises. In particular 
enterprises, the proportion of workers on the job to those 
retired is one to one. This undoubtedly will increase costs, 
lower profit levels and correspondingly weaken competitiveness. 
Prior to reform, China's employment road was narrow. There also 
was a desire to sustain social stability. Medium- and 
large-sized state-owned enterprises only had a responsibility to 
expand employment but no authority to reduce the number of staff 
and workers. As a result there was surplus labor on the job. 
Generally speaking, there was 20 percent to 30 percent surplus 
of workers at medium- and large-sized state-owned enterprises. 
Speaking in terms of the needs of a market economy, this is an 
irrational allocation of resources. Surplus workers should be 
pared down to attain the best combination of the means of 
production and labor and improve economic results. Considered 
in terms of the needs of social stability, enterprises are not 
allowed to push surplus workers out into society. Although the 
"Regulations for Transforming the Operating Mechanisms of 
Enterprises Owned by the Whole People" stipulated that those 
responsible for an enterprise have this authority, practically 
noone responsible for an enterprise dares use it. The individual 
economy, the private economy and foreign-funded enteprises need 
not have such worries. Medium- and large-sized state-owned 
enterprises have paid an enormous price to the state and 
society. This price will lead to higher enterprise costs, lower 
profit levels and weaker competitiveness. For a long time now, 
we have had enterprises run society, from cafeterias to 
elementary and middle schools. Some even run colleges. Although 
this is a contribution by enterprises, it also is a burden. The 
individual economy, the private economy and foreign-funded 
enteprises have neither such a contribution nor any such burden. 
It clearly is unfair if it is sweepingly and abstractly stated 
that medium- and large-sized state-owned enterprises are not as 
good as the individual economy, the private economy, or 
foreign-funded enterprises, in terms of vitality, without 
differentiating these different circumstances. If medium- and 
large-sized state-owned enterprises are allowed to smash the 
"three knives": One, give retired workers to the state and 
society, and enterprises will no longer care for them; two, pare 
down all surplus workers; and three, stop the running of middle 
and elementary schools and colleges. In this way, enterprises 
would immediately be enlivened by one-half. The current problem 
is that none of the three knives can be smashed. Enterprises 
still must practice exercises to benefit the internal organs and 
digest [workers] themselves. This requires procedure. 
  The process of enlivening medium- and large-sized 
state-owned 
enterprises also is one of economic development and reform. The 
"Decisions of the Central Committee of the CPC Regarding Reform 
of the Economic System" notes "full development of a commodity 
economy is a stage which socialist economic development cannot 
overstep. It is an essential condition to realize the 
modernization of China's economy." The "Decisions by the Central 
Committeee of the Communist Party of China Regarding Several 
Issues Concerning Establishing a Socialist Market Economic 
System" by the Third Plenary Session of the 14th CPC Central 
Committee note, "transform the operating mechanisms of 
state-owned enterprises and establish a modern enterprise 
system" and "a modern enterprise system with a public ownership 
system as the main part is the foundation of the socialist 
market economic system." The two meetings, two documents and 
their policy regulations are a summary of economic development 
and reform experience. They also are a deepening of reform 
theory reflecting that our understanding of socialism and reform 
have reached a new level. Nevertheless, establishing a socialist 
market economic system is an unprecedented pioneering 
undertaking that requires resolution of many extremely 
complicated issues. Economic system reform is a profound reform 
relating to the foundation of the economy and many areas of 
superstructure. Of course we must change various irrational 
interest situations inherent to the old system and those newly 
created in the process of transforming the system. We cannot 
avoid this or that difficulty or obstruction which may be 
encountered. Overall, we must handle well the relationship among 
reform, development and stability. We must handle well interest 
relationships in all respects, motivate all positive factors and 
create conditions for healthy growth of the national economy. 
Ths requires that we develop market economies. We cannot negate 
the primary position of the public ownership system. To enliven 
enterprises we must not create social upheaval. To rationally 
allocate resources we cannot create enormous armies of 
unemployed. 
  Reform is a mass undertaking. The "Decisions by the Central 
Committee of the Communist Party of China Regarding Several 
Issues Concerning Establishing a Socialist Market Economic 
System" make clear stipulations regarding basic reform ideology, 
basic theory, basic policy, basic principles, and basic 
requirements. Reform theory is further clarified and the 
direction of reform is further defined. Whether there is success 
in transforming the operating mechanisms of state-owned 
enterprises, in establishing modern enterprise systems, in 
fostering and developing market systems, in changing political 
functions, in establishing a full macroeconomic readjustment and 
control system, and in establishing rational individual income 
allocation and social security systems, the practice of the 
masses must be relied on. A successful example is provided to us 
by overall and complete reform of the Beijing Number One Light 
Industry Headquarters; the secret of success lies in the two 
words, "overall and complete." Their method was to pull out of 
secondary and enter tertiary industry -- enterprises situated in 
urban golden areas pull out of secondary industry and enter 
tertiary industry; pull out of fourth and enter secondary -- 
enterprises situated in golden areas pull back beyond the fourth 
ring and develop secondary industries with high results at high 
starting points; added asset value -- rationally deploy 
resources through the direction of land use and development 
models to attain the greatest added value of assets; industrial 
shift -- on the basis of added asset value, readjust and 
reorganize the industrial mix; transform mechanisms -- change 
mechanisms and establish systems while transforming enterprises 
and reorganizing industries; have headquarters manage assets 
instead of enterprises; personnel circulation --asset 
redevelopment creates new employment opportunities, allowing the 
best arrangement of surplus personnel; industrial mix 
readjustment -- personnel changes and function readjustment are 
all deep reforms and enormous changes. While deepening reform by 
enormous change, economic growth was maintained and state-owned 
assets increased in value, while maintaining social stability. 
This must be called an extraordinary wonder. Of course the 
Beijing Number One Light Industry Headquarters has the 
superiority of occupying a golden area which others do not. 
Nonetheless it also should be seen that others have 
superiorities which it does not. The outcome still depends on 
human effort. A certain large-sized enterprise in Jiangsu has an 
on-the-job worker to retired worker ratio of one-to-one, with 30 
percent surplus workers, long-term losses and near-bankruptcy. 
The threat of bankruptcy oppresses the director and workers. 
Oppression engenders a feeling of crisis and the feeling of 
crisis brought on a courageous search for a way out. After 
several years of struggle, they got out of difficulty. What was 
the general character of these two experiences, that of the 
Beijing Number One Light Industrial Enterprise and the Jiangsu 
large-sized enterprise? It is as discussed in the "Decisions by 
the Central Committeee of the Communist Party of China Regarding 
Several Issues Concerning Establishing a Socialist Market 
Economic System": "Respect the pioneering spirit of the masses. 
Give heed to the individual interests of the masses. Summarize 
in a timely way the practical experience of the masses. Respect 
the desires of the masses. Guide, protect and develop well the 
enthusiasm of the masses. In the process of deepening reform and 
developing the economy, handle appropriately the relationships 
among accumulation and consumption, the whole and the partial 
and long-term and near-term interests. Continually raise the 
living standards of the masses. Make reform win a broad and deep 
mass foundation." Establishing a modernized enterprise system 
with Chinese characteristics and establishing a socialist market 
economic system are unprecedented pioneering undertakings; thus, 
we especially must emphasize people's creativity and respect the 
masses's pioneering spirit. Just as Comrade Deng Xiaoping said 
on his 1992 southern tour: In a certain sense, firmly upholding 
socialism, developing the economy, reforming and the open door 
policy, and firmly upholding the cause of the two civilizations 
depend on the people. 
  Integrating a basically socialist system and a market 
economy 
requires firmly upholding the position and leading role of the 
public ownership system. Firmly upholding the position and 
leading role of the public ownership system requires enlivening 
medium- and large-sized state-owned enterprises. This accords 
with the logic of theoretical and practical developments. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66233 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar031___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-031 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  10 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Gao Shangquan on Strategies for Economic Reform </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Gao Shangquan on Strategies for Economic Reform </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0422A Nanjing JIANGHAI XUEKAN [JOURNAL OF JIANGHAI 
ACADEMY] in Chinese No 1, 10 Jan 94 pp 20-23 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0422A </F>
<F P=104>  Nanjing JIANGHAI XUEKAN [JOURNAL OF JIANGHAI 
ACADEMY] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Gao Shangquan (7559 1424 0356), deputy chairman </F>
of the Economic Structural Reform Commission: "Market 
Orientation, Way of Gradual Advance--Strategies for Reform of 
China's Economic System"] 
  [Text] The reform of China's economic system has already 
gone on for 15 years. For 15 years, from the rural areas to the 
cities, from the coast to the interior, from the non-state-owned 
economy to the state-owned economy, from micro to macro, and 
from the economic domain to the scientific and technological, 
educational, and political domains, the reform has become the 
main performer in China's social and economic life, and its 
successes have become the focus of world attention. When we look 
back on and sum up the basic experiences of the 15 years of 
reform, we see that China's reform took the path of gradual 
expansion of the proportion of market regulation and of gradual 
enhancement of the role of market mechanisms, in broad outline: 
market orientation and the way of gradual advance. 
<H5>  Market Orientation: Reform's Basic Achievement </H5>
  There are many reasons that China's reform was able to 
obtain 
universally acknowledged successes; and the reform itself 
employed the strategy of "market orientation, and the way of 
gradual advance." 
  In the l5-year reform there were roughly four stages. In the 
first stage, from the end of 1978 to October 1984, the reform 
first of all made a breakthrough in the rural areas and obtained 
successes; in the cities, starting from expansion of the 
enterprise's right to take the initiative, experiments at 
selected points in comprhensive and special-item reforms were 
carried out. In the second stage, from October 1984 to September 
1988, the focus of reform shifted from the rural areas to the 
cities, and reform was launched in a comprehensive way in all 
domains. In the third stage, from September 1988 to the end of 
1991, in the economic domain the environment was brought under 
control, the order was rectified, and the reform was deepened. 
The fourth stage, which started at the beginning of 1992, with 
Comrade Deng Xiaoping's important talk on his inspection of the 
south as its starting point, and the 14th CPC Congress set the 
goal of the reform of China's econmic system as the 
establishment of the socialist market economy system. The pace 
of reform and opening up to the outside world markedly 
quickened, and the reform entered a new historical stage. 
  Following the constant deepening and expansion of the reform 
and opening up to the outside world, profound changes occurred 
in the pattern and operating mechanisms of China's economic 
system: 
  --With public ownership as the main part, many economic 
forms 
coexisted, including ownership by the whole people, collective, 
privately operated, individual, and foreign joint venture, and a 
pattern of joint development was gradually formed. The single 
ownership structure of the original economic system--a structure 
that was separated from the level of productive forces--was 
broken, and township enterprises, "the three kinds of 
enterprises that were either wholly or partially owned," and the 
private and individual economies developed swiftly. In 1992, in 
industrial output value, enterprises owned by the whole people 
accounted for 48.4 percent, the collective enterprises accounted 
for 38.2 percent, and the individual, private, and "three kinds" 
enterprises accounted for 13.4 percent; in retail value of 
social commodities, the enterprises owned by the whole people 
accounted for 41.3 percent, the collective enterprises accounted 
for 27.9 percent, and joint venture, individual, and private 
enterprises accounted for 30.8 percent. The rapid development of 
the non-state-owned economy and the non-public economy infused 
new energy into China's economy. 
  --Based on the principles of separation of government and 
enterprise and of separation of proprietary rights and 
management rights, the management mechanisms of state-owned 
enterprises are being changed and are progressively moving 
toward the market. Starting with smoothing out the relationship 
between state and enterprise, and with the implementation of the 
enterprise's right to take the initiative in production and 
management, enterprise reform of various forms has been carried 
out. Ninety-three percent of the industrial and commercial 
enterprises under whole-people ownership have implemented 
various forms of the contract management responsibility system, 
and, in order to promote the rational combination of important 
production factors, they have formed a number of new-type 
enterprise groups. For some small and medium-sized state-owned 
enterprises, the practice of "rent, transform, or sell" was 
instituted. In recent years, in order to explore effective forms 
for implementing public ownership, new-type enterprise systems 
have been set up, and a large number of enterprises have carried 
out the reform of instituting varied forms of the stock system. 
By the end of 1992 there were more than 3,700 stock enterprises 
in China; at present, 92 of them have been publicly put on the 
Shenzhen and Shanghai stock exchanges. 
  --With the market primarily determining prices, the 
commodity 
market system, which gives full play to the role of market 
mechanisms, has been initially formed. Now, controls on the 
greater part of commodity prices have already been loosened, and 
the proportion of prices fixed by the state is less than 15 
plercent of the total amount of agricultural products purchased. 
In the ex-factory total sales of industrial consumer goods and 
means of production, the proportions of state-fixed prices are 
only 10 and 30 percent, respectively. At the same time, the 
stock exchange, foreign exchange market, labor market, 
technology market, land market, and other markets for important 
factors are now being swiftly developed. 
  --The macroeconomic regulation and control system has begun 
to change from primarily direct administrative control to making 
indirect regulation and control primary with the comprehensive 
application of economic and legal measures. The state plan broke 
away from direct controls, such as fixed quotas, apportioned 
investment, mandated projects, and apportioned materials; in 
addition, command planning has been greatly reduced. In 
industrial production, before 1979 command planning accounted 
for more than 95 percent of the entire industrial output value, 
and now it accounts for only 7 percent. The means of production 
under the state's unified distribution and the one-category 
commodities under planned purchasing have also been 
correspondingly reduced. At the same time, the effect of 
financial policy and monetary policy is becoming larger and 
larger. 
  With distribution according to work as the main part, a 
social distribution pattern of various forms of distribution 
existing side by side is appearing, and a new social security 
system is being formed. The policy of encouraging some people to 
become wealthy by honest work before others do so and of 
appropriately widening the income gap has greatly arouused the 
enthusiasm of workers. 
  --Opening up to the outside world has become an enormous 
motive power for promoting domestic reform and developing it; 
and a new pattern of multilevel, omnidirectional, multiform 
opening up to the outside world, in which there is the 
progression "special economic zone--coastal and border open 
cities--interior," has been formed. By the end of 1993, in China 
there were 84,000 registered "three kinds of enterprises," $58.7 
billion in contracted investment, and $11.2 billion in actual 
investment. In its foreign trade system, China will, in 
accordance with international practice and GATT regulations, 
control imports and exports in order to meet the requirements 
for expanding economic and technological cooperation abroad and 
for taking part in international market competition. Opening up 
to the outside world is not only manifested in attracting 
foreign capital; what is more important is that it makes 
reference to foreign advanced technology and successful 
practices, in order to accelerate the welding of China's market 
to the international market. 
  The profound changes in economic mechanisms and operating 
mechanisms have brought enormous changes to China's social and 
economic life. Over the 15 years of reform, China's GNP has 
grown at an annual average rate of 9 percent, its overall 
national strength has increased markedly, and the people's 
standard of living has risen markedly. In addition, people's 
ideas and concepts have been liberated from a long period of 
confinement, and in practice, with the spirit of emancipating 
the mind and of seeking truth from facts, there is constant 
exploration and a gradual push toward deeper involvement in 
reform. 
<H5>  Gradual Advance: A Successful Experience </H5>
  Under the premise of already making clear the direction and 
goal of reform, the movement and method of reform is to 
gradually move forward, and not to apply "shock treatment" to 
reach the goal in one bound. In the practice of China's reform, 
the form that "gradual advance" is manifested in is that the 
reform of the system is a process of preceding from point to 
area, i.e., there is a breakthrough at a key point, which then 
evolves and permeates everything. The specific practice is to 
first make experiments at selected points and then popularize 
the results, i.e., when any reform measure appears, first there 
is an experiment at a certain place or a certain enterprise, and 
after a result is obtained it is popularized throughout the 
country. To this end, the state before and after the fact 
decided on some experimental zones for reform and opening up to 
the outside world and on some experimental cities, experimental 
counties, and experimental enterprises for comprehensive reform 
or single-item reform, which undertake the task of testing each 
reform. For example, reform first begins in the rural areas and 
then gradually makes the transition to cities; first begins with 
the setting up of special economic zones, after which it 
radiates to the coastal region, and then deeply penetrates the 
interior region; first begins with developing the township, 
individual, privately operated, and "three kinds of enterprise" 
economies, and, after strengthening the roles of market 
mechanisms in these domains, causes these roles to infiltrate 
the state-owned economy; and first begins in the microeconomic 
domain, where the right to take the initiative in production 
management is expanded, and then promotes reform in the 
planning, financial, and banking macro-domain. This way of 
pushing forward reform by gradual advance and infiltration is a 
creation of the Chinese people, and is also the result of 
constant exploration in practice. 
  A typical example of the method of "gradual advance" is 
price 
reform. In the past price reform was always a difficult problem 
for some countries, and it was also the first difficult problem 
that we ran into in our reform. The Chinese government and 
economic academic circles both saw the importance of price 
reform, and understood that price marketization was the premise 
for the full display of the role of market mechanisms and of 
fair competition between enterprises, and for guiding the 
optimum deployment of natural resources. However, at the same 
time they also saw that price reform had to be integrated with 
the cultivation of the market, and that price reform was a fast 
variable while market cultivation was a slow variable, and that 
to demand that a slow variable be adapted to a fast variable was 
to be divorced from reality. Price reform requires a necessary 
financial base in order to meet the need for smoothing out 
various price relations and to ensure that in the process of 
reform the interests of the broad masses were not harmed. Price 
reform is also linked to the charateristics of different 
industries or products; the elastic coefficient of some 
industrial prices is high, and price controls are relaxed it 
will be possible to achieve rapidly a market equilibrium. 
Production in some industries or of some products, first, 
requires a large investment; second, has a long production or 
contruction period; and third, has higher technological 
requirements, and, after price controls are relaxed for a long 
period of time, there cannot be a market equilibrium and thus 
there is a trend toward inflation. Precisely because we 
recognized these characteristics, in our price reform we did not 
adopt the tactic of relaxing controls at one fell swoop, but 
rather adopted the policy of positive safety, and, based on the 
characteristics of different industries and different products, 
at different periods of time put forward some reform measures. 
Even if there are still heavy tasks in China's price reform, it 
may be affirmed that China's price reform has made the 
transition to a critical period. 
  Why did China's reform adopt the way of gradual advance? The 
reasons are many-sided. Generally speaking, this reform is 
China's third revolution, i.e., it will make a fundamental 
change in the economic system's operating mechanisms. This is an 
unprecedented creative undertaking, and there is no ready-made 
model we can copy, so we can only proceed in an orderly way step 
by step and try to find our way in practice. And the deeper 
reasons have a many-sided basis. 
  First, the way of gradual advance has its basis in 
understanding. Reform is an important matter that affects all 
domains of social life and that touches on every member of 
society, both basically bringing interests to the people and 
adjusting to different degrees the relationships of the 
economy's specific interests and authority. This means that 
reform must obtain the understanding and support of all quarters 
of society. For a reform measure, particularly a measure that 
adjusts the structure of interests, there must be a process of 
gaining society's understanding. Therfore, before 
comprehensively promoting a measure, there must first be an 
experiment, and when it gradually becomes understood by people 
it can become a conscious action of theirs. Otherwise, in the 
course of reform there will be numerous difficulties, and 
contradictions will be intensified, causing all previous efforts 
to be wasted. 
  Second, the way of gradual advance has a logical basis in 
the 
system. All links in the economic system are closely connected, 
both requiring coordination and forming complete sets, and the 
accurate selection of breakthrough points, and then the 
uncoupling of one link at a time, and in the end untying "fast 
knots." Looking at China's experience, we see that reform often 
does not start from the most critical, most difficult place, but 
rather the breakthrough is made at the place where there is a 
large probability for success and where it is easy to solve 
technical problems. For example, in enterprise reform, the 
reform of state-owned large and medium-sized enterprises is 
extremely important, but it is very difficult. The reform begins 
with expanding the right of enterprises to act on their own 
initiative, and at the same time it vigorously develops the 
non-state-owned economy, forming outside the state-owned economy 
a competitive "colony," which puts pressure on the state-owned 
economy, proomoting the reform of the state-owned economy. It is 
very difficult to imagine that a process of reform without this 
kind of gradual advance would find a path to pass through into 
the state-owned economy. 
  Third, the way of gradual advance is determined by China's 
complex national condition. China's basic national condition is 
a large population, a vast area, and an unbalanced economic 
development; the level of economic development in all places is 
uneven, and there are also differences in them in the conditions 
and basis for reform. This determines that reform in each place 
cannot "quick march," and that it should be recognized that in 
some places reform will go somewhat faster while in other places 
it will go somewhat slower. This kind of unbalanced reform, in 
reality, is a process of conforming to nature and developing by 
gradual advance. 
  Fourth, the way of gradual advance is also a political 
requirement. China's reform needs a stable political and social 
environment; a radical way of reform would be bound to go beyond 
the capability of society to bear it, causing shocks in society 
that in the end would harm the reform. China is a large country 
with a population of more than 1.2 billion, and obtaining 
stability is an overriding task that must be done. Therefore, 
the selection of the way of reform must proceed from the 
question of whether it is advantageous to promoting social 
stability. 
<H5>  New Starting Point of Reform: Establishment of the New </H5>
System of a Socialist Market Economy 
  China has already decided that the goal of reform is the 
establishment of the system of socialist market economy. Without 
the slightest doubt, this is a continuation and development of 
the past 15-year "market orientation" reform, but it also has 
pushed China's reform to a higher stage. To establish the system 
of socialist market economy there must be formed the inherent 
unity of public ownership and market economy; under the state's 
active, effective macro-regulation and control, the market 
mechanisms play a fundamental role in the disposition of natural 
resources, and are able to bring about an economic system that 
combines a high standard of efficiency with a high standard of 
fairness. 
  To establish the system of socialist market economy, first 
of 
all we must boldly assimilate and use for reference the 
successful experiences in the practice of foreign market 
economies, abiding by the laws of modern economics. This is 
mainly a case of all commodities and important production 
factors going on the market, and, in the disposition of natural 
resources, the market mechanisms play a fundamental role. By 
making clear the relationship of property rights and making 
pluralistic the main part of interests, the enterprise will 
truly become a corporate entity that operates on its own and 
that is responsible for its own profits and losses, and the main 
part of market competition. Mainly through economic measures, 
the government will indirectly regulate and control economic 
activity; and the unified, open domestic market, with the 
organic "joints" of the international market, and in accordance 
with the current international criteria and practice, will carry 
out economic activity. The socialist market economy must be an 
integration of public ownership and the market economy; public 
ownership must adopt basic forms that meet the demands of the 
market economy and that are achieved through the market economy 
system. China's basic national condition also determines that, 
in the market economy, the component parts of the economy are 
diversified and include state, collective, private, and foreign 
venture ownership. With public ownership primary, the 
diversified forms of ownership will coexist for a long time, 
jointly develop, and compete on an equal basis. Following the 
development of the market economy, there will be an 
interpenetration of different owners' properties, more and more 
mixed ownerships forms will appear, and the specific forms of 
public ownership will be diversified. 
  Establishing the system of socialist market economy is a 
piece of complex systems engineering. The main frame of this 
system has the following aspects: 
  --Establishment of a modern enterprise system with distinct 
property rights, initiative in operation, responsibility for 
profits and losses, and competition on an equal basis. 
Enterprises of all types are not divided by form of ownership. 
They are all formed legally and recorded in registers, and they 
have the authority to have real ownership and use of property 
and to legally dispose of property. For the reform of 
state-owned enterprises, we must start with smoothing out the 
relationships of property rights and carrying out the industrial 
transformation of enterprises in competitive industries, so that 
they mainly become different types of stockholding companies, 
for example limited-liability companies or joint-stock limited 
companies. At the same time, based on market economy laws and 
the characteristics of different industrial sectors, under the 
premise of ensuring the increase in value of state-owned 
property, we must vigorously take the initiative to readjust the 
industrial distribution structure of state-owned property. 
  --Establishment of a modern market system in which the 
market 
regulations are sound, the organization is complete, and the 
main part's behavior is normal. Controls on the prices of the 
great majority of commodities and important production factors 
are to be relaxed, forming a mechanism for deciding prices with 
the market as primary. This entails formation of an integrated 
system of markets for commodities and markets for important 
production factors; elimination of industrial monopolies, 
regional blockades, and sector divisions; and formation of a 
unified, open market structure in which there are diversified 
economic components, diversified economic forms, and 
multichannels for circulation, and in which domestic and foreign 
trade are balance, domestic and international markets are 
linked. The focus of the current stage in market construction 
are opening up the market for important production factors, 
smoothing out the prices for important production factors, and 
ending the "double-track system" in important production factors. 
  --Establishment of macroeconomic control and indirect 
regulation and control system in which the goal of balance in 
total volume and optimum structure of the economy is promoted, 
and in which economic policies and economic levers are the main 
measures; and the corresponding establihsment of a crack, highly 
efficient economic regulation and control organizational 
structure, in which the structure is rational and the duties are 
clear, and which meets the demands of the market economy. Now, 
the changes in government functions and the establishment of a 
macro regulation and control system have been seriously delayed, 
a situation that has become a serious restraining factor in the 
construction of the system of socialist market economy; and we 
must be determined to make breakthroughs in these respects. In 
the reform's advanced system of financial payment in which 
payment is made partly in kind and partly in cash, on the basis 
of a clear demarcation between central and local rights, the 
standard divided-tax system is to be practiced. There is to be 
an acceleration of the reform of the banking system by 
perfecting the central banks' macro-regulation and control 
mechanisms, and by making an effort to promote the business-like 
transformation of the commercial banks. There is to be an 
acceleration of the setting up, with the enterprise taking the 
initiative in investment as the main part, of an investment 
system that practices management by category. 
  --Establishment of a social security system in which social 
insurance for unemployment, for old age, and for medical 
treatment is the main part. The new-type social security system 
must integrate social security mechanisms and stimulus 
mechanisms. Currently, the focus must be on getting a tight grip 
on establishing a national unified organizational structure for 
social security management, on formulating a unified policy, and 
on enhancing management and supervision. There will be 
separation of government affairs, entailing the setting up of a 
nonadministrative organization for managing social insurance, 
and for legally engaging in raising, using, maintaining and 
increasing the value of the social security fund in order to 
reduce erosion and waste in the fund. 
  Establishing the system of socialist market economy is a 
formidable task. In general, China's reform still can only 
gradually advance in order, and step by step make the transition 
to this system and it cannot engage in "shock treatment." 
However, this does not exclude the fact that reform at certain 
times and under certain conditions, or reform in certain regions 
can progress more quickly or to a greater degree. It should be 
seen that "breakthroughs from point to area" were not very 
different and that at present reform has entered the historical 
stage of "storming fortifications." We must be determined to 
break through the contradictions on some deeper levels; if we 
are not decisive the losses could be larger. Therefore, the 
point at which "to storm the fortifications" must be accurately 
selected, an advantageous and opportune time must be selected, 
action must be adroitly guided according to circumstances, some 
major reform measures must be pushed forward, and the transition 
to the system of socialist market economy must be accelerated. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66234 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar031___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-031 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  28 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Official on 1993 Economy, Emphasis for 1994 </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Official on 1993 Economy, Emphasis for 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0428A Beijing JINGJI TONGXUN [ECONOMIC WORK NEWSLETTER] 
in Chinese No 4, 28 Feb 94 pp 6-7 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0428A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI TONGXUN [ECONOMIC WORK NEWSLETTER] 
in Chinese No 4, 28 Feb 94 pp 6-7 </F>

<F P=105> Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Li Zhiming (2621 1807 2494): "Comrade Shi </F>
Wanpeng (4258 8001 7720) Talks About the Current Economic 
Situation and Key Points of Work"] 
  [Text] Recently, the 
State Economic and Trade Commission's Deputy Chairman Comrade 
Shi Wanpeng was visited and interviewed by this publication and 
talked about the current economic situation. 
  Shi Wanpeng believes that in 1993 the overall movement of 
the 
economy was in a good direction, and this was primarily 
manifested in the following: 
  Industrial production grew rapidly. In 1993 for the country 
as a whole the village level and above village level total 
industrial output value was 3.5074 trillion yuan, an increase of 
23.6 percent in comparison to the previous year, was greatest 
increase in the 15-year period since reform and opening. Of this 
total, the increase for state-owned industry was 8.9 percent, 
light industry increased 22.3 percent, and heavy industry was up 
24.8 percent. In addition, there was a new increase in 
production of a set of major industrial products related to the 
national economy and the people's livelihood. 
  Industrial product sales were brisk, and the production and 
marketing rate increased. For the year as a whole, the 
industrial product marketing rate reached 96.4 percent, an 
increase of 0.9 percent over the previous year. The industrial 
product marketing rate from November on showed a marked 
acceleration, and in December the production and marketing rate 
reached 109.86 percent. 
  Urban and rural markets were thriving and active. For the 
year as a whole, the total retail value of commodities in the 
society increased by 23.6 percent, and in December the increase 
was 35.3 percent. Rural markets rose relatively quickly, and the 
difference in the expansion of rural and urban markets for the 
first half of the year of 10.4 percent dropped for the year as a 
whole to 6.4 percent. 
  The situation involving a shortage of enterprise funds was 
ameliorated. From September 1993 on, the industrial operating 
funds and loans showed a marked increase. From September to 
December the total new increase in industrial operating funds 
and loans reached 97.5 billion yuan, while for the whole year 
the new increases in the industrial operating funds and loans 
reached 139.8 billion yuan. 
  Grain market prices have basically been controlled. At the 
end of last year, a situation of price rises emerged in some 
areas in the grain market. The State Council in a timely manner 
took measures involving the utilization of state grain reserves 
to stabilize prices, and at present grain market prices have 
basically been controlled. 
  In talking about the trends of current economic movement, 
Comrade Shi believes that due to some new conditions that have 
emerged since last November, the current economic environment is 
not hospitable. This is primarily manifested in: 
  The market price situation is grim, though trends for 
reversing this are gaining strength. In 1993, the retail price 
inflation in the society as a whole from March on doubled, and 
for the year as a whole was predicted to increase roughly 13 
percent. City and rural prices had the same level of increase, 
and the rural price expansion for the year as a whole was 
predicted to reached 12.5 percent; household living expense 
price expansion reached 14.5 percent, among which for 35 big 
cities the increase reached 19.6 percent. 
  The scale of fixed capital investment was too large, and had 
an irrational structure. In 1993, fixed capital investment was 
able to reach 1.2 trillion yuan, of which state-owned units 
investment increased more than 60 percent; the total scale of 
investment involving projects under construction totalled 3.3 
trillion yuan, a four fold increased over the previous year, and 
the proportion of closing year end unfinished projects reached 
57.6 percent. The investment structure was not rational to a 
great extent, and the proportion of investment in basic industry 
dropped from the first half of the year, at 42.9 percent, down 
to 36.9 percent, while the proportion of extended investment 
increased from 34.1 percent to 38.6 percent, there was a high 
level of consumption, and a great number of leading consumption 
projects. 
  Industrial production for December of last year increased at 
an above normal rate. That month, the national village and above 
village level industrial production from the high base level of 
32.2 percent of the same month the previous year increased by 
29.8 percent, or the second highest rate of growth after the 
30.2 percent increase of June, while the monthly chain index 
increase reached 18.2 percent, a more than 10 percentage point 
increase over the normal annual increase. This above normal 
increase could give new life to the contradiction of the 
shortage of funds. 
  Increases in mutual arrears among enterprises. According to 
Industrial Bank statistics for 40,000 enterprises, at the end of 
November 1993, debt owed funds were 341.2 billion yuan, an 
increase from earlier in the year of 178.7 billion yuan; while 
credit funds were 289.8 billion yuan, an increase of 70.5 
billion yuan from early in the year. 
  The import of some major commodities exceeds planning by a 
considerable degree. Among the most prominent of these are steel 
products, and petroleum products, while car imports also exceed 
planned targets by a substantial margin. 
  Rail transport is still constrained. In 1993, the volume of 
goods transported by railroad was 1.567 billion tons, only a 2.9 
increase from the previous year. In 1994, the shortage situation 
for the volume of goods transported by rail will not markedly 
improve, particularly due to the spring transport time delays, 
which will have a major impact on the transport of goods by rail. 
  When it comes to the new situation currently emerging for 
the 
movement of the economy, Comrade Shi believes that it is 
necessary to treat controlling the scale of fixed capital 
investment and price increases as the major tasks to grapple 
with, and continue to strengthen and improve macro adjustment, 
while steadily realizing an increase in the people's economy in 
the process of readjustment. 
  1. Strengthen guidance towards citizens' psychological 
expectations and social consumption. It is necessary to 
gradually deepen dissemination of the contents of reforms 
dealing with foreign currency and the tax system, and strengthen 
guidance of the media, actively launch some directed propaganda, 
to increase the understanding of reform of enterprises and broad 
numbers of people, remove doubts, and avoid blind action. 
  2. Strict control and active guidance of fixed capital 
investments. When it comes to investment it is necessary to 
strictly achieve planning sufficient funding, and not leave 
gaps. First, there is strict control of new launching of 
construction projects; second, this involves not permitting the 
use of operating funds for loans to make investments; third, 
this involves the fact that new construction projects must plan 
for a sufficient cushion in operating funds, and those that are 
insufficient should not be permitted to start work; fourth, this 
involves the need to devise a way to fill the gap in funds for 
newly completed and operating projects in 1993-1994; fifth, this 
involves directing investment and effectively guiding it towards 
increasing the society's supply, and improving the production 
structure. This is the key to having the new macro regulation 
obtain new results. 
  3. In accordance with market conditions, at present it is 
necessary to increase the national special reserves of products 
such as grains, edible oils, meats, sugar, and cotton, and for 
existing reserve stores to conduct an inventory and checks to 
find out what resources are available, and make accounts of 
materials tally up. 
  4. Strengthen management of the import and export of primary 
commodities. It is necessary as rapidly as possible to 
investigate and promote measures for increasing product exports, 
and at the same time it is necessary to properly handle import 
regulations for major commodities and goods and materials, such 
as steel products, oil, and cars. 
  5. Serious financial policies and strengthening of financial 
management. When it comes to the issue of mutual debt between 
enterprises, it is recommended that some provinces and cities or 
industry be chosen for deepening of investigation and finding 
out about the situation, and researching methods for resolving 
issues, and preventing the recurrence of prolonged debt. 
  Comrade Shi Wanpeng stressed that this year is a year when 
the degree of strength of the implementation of various reform 
measures will be comparatively large, and properly handling the 
immediate macro regulation, improving the production structure, 
and increasing the society's effective supply are the key to 
smoothly implementing the policy of "grasping opportunity, 
deepening reform, promoting development, and maintaining 
stability," and should draw the sufficient attention of 
government at all levels and of responsible economic departments. 
  At the conclusion of the interview, Comrade Shi expressed 
his 
hope that the "Economic Work Newsletter" would progressively 
develop its characteristics such as its broad readership, large 
volume of policy information, and its high level of 
authoritativeness, while properly handling its propaganda work 
in the economic field, truly becoming an intimate friend of 
enterprises and responsible economic departments at all levels. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66235 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar031___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-031 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  8 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Case Study of Enterprise Ownership Reform </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Case Study of Enterprise Ownership Reform </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0423A Beijing JINGJI YU GUANGLI YANJIU [RESEARCH ON 
ECONOMICS AND MANAGEMENT] in Chinese No 1, 8 Feb 94 pp 57-58, 31 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0423A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI YU GUANGLI YANJIU [RESEARCH ON 
ECONOMICS AND MANAGEMENT] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article under general heading "Mayor's (County </F>
Magistrate's) Forum" by Jia Tianzeng (6328 1131 1073), mayor of 
Xiangfan City, Hubei Province: "A Realistic Choice in the Reform 
of Enterprise Ownership: From Simple to Complex, Pushing Forward 
in a Scheduled, Classified Progression"--responsible editor Chen 
Bingzhen (7115 3521 3791)] 
  [Text] Reform of the enterprise ownership system is an 
extremely arduous and complex piece of systems engineering, and 
at present the development in depth of this reform is meeting up 
with difficulties of considerable dimensions in theoretical as 
well as in practical respects. The crux of the problem is that 
an all-round solution cannot possibly be achieved overnight as 
long as certain related complementary conditions (including 
establishment of the market system, shifts in the functions of 
government, and transformations in the political organization) 
remain in their imperfect state. The shareholding system is a 
promising way of straightening out the ownership relations, but 
looking at trials conducted in that respect we see that this 
method still could not find acceptance by many state-owned 
enterprises for a variety of reasons. Faced with this reality, 
it seems there is nothing that can be done and no way out, and 
changing the enterprise character is certainly also not a 
desirable alternative. Past experiences in the reform of 
state-owned enterprises are telling us that realization that 
whatever the reform objectives are, they always require a 
continuous progression, from low level to high level, from point 
to area, from shallow to deep, and a progressive move from 
quantitative change to qualitative change. One prescription 
cannot cure a hundred sicknesses, launching an attack on the 
entire front at once will not necessarily bring success. Reform 
of the ownership system of state-owned enterprises must also 
adapt to the new peculiarities of the transitional period, the 
move from planned economy to market economy, and must foster a 
work mentality that is geared to the actual circumstances. Last 
year, we adopted a method of fitting measures to the particular 
factory in question, "one plant, one method," gradually 
advancing in good order, implementing in a scheduled, classified 
progression, and as result had the reform of the ownership 
system of state-owned enterprises take a new great leap forward 
from quantitative change to qualitative change. 
<H5>  Speaking of the Entire City: Implementing in a Scheduled, </H5>
Classified Progression, From Quantitative Change With a 
Multiplicity of Forms to Qualitative Change With Concentration 
on a "Shift in System" and a "Shift in Mechanism" 
  Because character and production conditions are different 
for 
each state-owned enterprise, we have to differentiate in the 
choice of forms by which to straighten out ownership relations. 
  1. Enterprises which operate in conformity with the 
industrial policy and which belong to those with good 
competitive character and vitality, should institute the 
business and managerial forms of companies limited by shares or 
of limited-liability companies. Up to the end of September of 
last year, 39 enterprises throughout the city have on trial 
shifted to the shareholding system. Their total capital is 459 
million yuan, of which 241 million, i.e. 45.6 percent, are 
state-owned shares; 187 million yuan, i.e. 40.7 percent, are 
corporate shares; and 58.28 million yuan shares, i.e. 12.7 
percent, are owned by private individuals. Within the category 
of limited-liability enterprises, 14 are companies limited by 
shares and 25 are limited-liability companies. 
  Enterprises not ready to reform their system throughout the 
entire factory may select one superior shop, one superior 
product, or one superior item and transform that part of the 
operations into a limited-liability company. This form has a 
high degree of adaptability: 
  First, being outstanding for their "three superiors," these 
enterprises have bright prospects in their development. They are 
apt to arouse enthusiasm among its shareholders, be they the 
enterprise, corporate bodies, or staff and workers. They are 
capable of raising capital within a short time and of 
alleviating the adverse effect of retrenchments in capital 
funds. The generating unit at the Nanhe Power Station in Gucheng 
City was old equipment manufactured in 1973, its insulation had 
deteriorated and urgently needed renovation, but that was long 
delayed because of a shortage of funds. Early the year before 
last, the provincial and city sectors in charge of electric 
energy and the Nanhe Power Station put up 2.5 million yuan each, 
organized the Xiangtai Water and Power Development Co., Ltd. and 
this enabled the project to be carried out expeditiously. 
  Second, the form is flexible and the procedure for 
examination and approval is simple and convenient. 
  Third, the form is beneficial in allowing enterprises to rid 
themselves of the burden of old concepts and to enter the fray 
unencumbered. The Xiangfan Knitting Mill No 4 had been operating 
with painstaking effort for many years and until today has been 
bearing a heavy load of old encumbrances. However, the mill's 
bleaching and dyeing shop used superior technology, and its 
products enjoyed a high reputation. They decided to convert this 
shop into an enterprise on the shareholding system; they 
increased its capital by the issue of 600,000 yuan new shares, 
and expanded the scale of its production. They raised annual 
capacity from 100 tons to as high as 1,500 tons, and 
productivity was also greatly improved. 
  Fourth, the form can help accelerate technological 
transformation of enterprises and can rapidly form new 
production lines. For the synthetic electric insulators 
manufactured by the Xiangfan Electric Power Equipment Co., Ltd. 
market demand exceeded supply. The company raised 888,000 yuan 
capital and increased its capacity 2.2-fold, compared to the 
preceding year. During the period from January to August 1993, 
it achieved an output value that was 42.8 percent above that of 
the preceding year, while sales income increased 59 percent, 
with benefits also increasing at a large margin. 
  2. In enterprises with great potential vitality, there has 
to 
be first a reform of all internal component parts in order to 
gradually activate their potential, thereafter transformation to 
shareholding system may be instituted. 
  First, transformation of the cadre system, instituting a 
mobile management mechanism that would allow moving cadres up or 
down. The 350 industrial and communications enterprises of the 
city have instituted the system of inviting applications and 
selecting for employment all plant-level cadres and mid-level 
cadres, and have also initiated simplifications of the 
administrative structure. 
  Second, transformation of the system of employing workers, 
establishing a mechanism for labor composition on the principle 
of survival of the fittest. There were 200 enterprises that 
instituted a move toward optimal labor composition. Out of the 
46,654 staff and workers that participated, 5,173, i.e. 11 
percent, lost their positions. 
  Third, transformation of the distribution system, forming an 
encouragement mechanism on the principle of income distributed 
according to contribution. Throughout the city over 90 percent 
of the industrial enterprises have linked staff and workers' 
income to economic returns. Of these, 49.9 percent pay wages by 
the piecework or over-quota piece work system, 17.9 percent 
according to contracted quantities, 15.7 percent on an internal 
contractual basis, and 16.7 percent pay structural and 
positional wages [jiegou gongzi ji gangwei gongzi 4814 2845 1562 
6327 0644 1511 0143 1562 6327]. 
  3. In the case of some enterprises that are well-known in 
the 
international market, a method of a kind of "grafting on" of 
foreign capital is adopted, turning them into joint ventures. 
Throughout the city, 70 enterprises have joined up with foreign 
capital, constituting a total investment of $68,668,000. Whole 
industries, as the textile, electronics, and light industries 
have begun to move in the direction of joint ventures. For these 
kinds of enterprises, the method applied is based on an 
appraisal of and agreement on the assets, allowing the state to 
continue ownership with regard to the state's due proportion, 
but completely changing the business methods to those of the 
foreign-funded enterprises. Instituting joint venture operations 
has not only brought in advanced and highly efficient management 
methods of foreign-invested enterprises and operational 
mechanisms, and thus promoted development of a export-oriented 
economy, but in addition also solved the problem of financial 
difficulties. 
  4. In the case of the large number of medium and small-sized 
state-owned enterprises or partly state-owned assets, they are 
to be changed by concluding contracts with a fixed time limit 
through risk security [fengxian diya 7364 7145 2107 2131] or 
collective management to "state-owned and community-run," and 
"public-owned and privately run" status. Throughout the entire 
financial and commercial system of the city, 2,660 small shops 
are already in communal or individual operations. They make up 
54.6 percent of all the small shops and have a recoverable 
capital of over 18 million yuan. There are already 14 
enterprises of the industrial and communications systems, of 
which 29 internal units, through the method of leasing, have 
turned into communal or private operations, and of these, 25 
have now already been able to turn an unprofitable into a 
profitable situation. The fine chemicals branch establishment of 
the city's nitrogenous fertilizer plant was unable to bring its 
superior qualities into play because responsibility, authority, 
and interests had not been clearly defined, and internal 
distribution was by the "eating from the big communal pot" 
method. Early year before last, the main plant leased the branch 
establishment to be operated by its own staff and workers, and, 
during the period from January to August, large increases as 
compared with the preceding year were achieved in output value, 
sales income, and in profits and taxes. In addition to 
fulfilling its obligation as to what has to be turned over to 
higher authority, they made a profit of 160,000 yuan. The secret 
of achieving these excellent results by the "state-owned and 
community-run, public-owned and individually managed" method is: 
  1) The lessee has by contract full decision-making 
authority as to production and business operations; 2) the 
lessee has put up capital as security and accepted a limited 
responsibility for operations, and the responsibility, 
authority, and interests relations are clear and definite; 3) 
staff and workers are exposed to competition at their 
workplaces, their income depends on their contribution, there 
being no "large pot" to eat from. 
  Reduced to one point, the enterprises have in these cases 
the 
flexible operational mechanism of community-run or individually 
managed enterprises. 
  5. Enterprises that are hopelessly unprofitable are first to 
be declared bankrupt, and will then, through mergers or other 
methods, have their assets again leased out or be completely 
reorganized. The city has had 91 pairs (groups) with 193 
industrial enterprises reorganized by combining, recovering 102 
million yuan of "sedimental funds" of enterprises in bad shape, 
finding places for 11,154 unemployed personnel, and redeploying 
132 million yuan of fixed assets. At the same time the city 
organized 12 enterprise conglomerates in the areas of health 
service and medicines, tobacco processing machinery, bearings, 
motorcars, earthenware and porcelain, electronics, long siphon 
numeric controls, and machinery. Because of better composition 
of key elements of production, savings were achieved in some 
enterprises in investments for technological transformations, 
and in some cases the period of transformation was reduced and 
profits were earned ahead of time. 
<H5>  Speaking of the Enterprises: Breakthroughs From Certain </H5>
Points, Partial Revitalization Brings About Complete 
Revitalization 
  1. Multiple systems in one plant. Throughout the city, there 
are 77 shops (branch establishments) of 57 enterprises that 
practice "special zones within the plant," and they have 
introduced market mechanism in the "special zones" ahead of 
other sectors. Main forms are: secondary corporate bodies within 
the plant, analogous secondary corporate bodies, internal 
leasing, management in emulation of the foreign-funded 
enterprises, collective contracting, and using shifts within the 
plant of investment capital and labor services for the 
settlement of accounts according to market value. 
  2. System of splitting up the plant. Having shops change 
from 
singular production types to a production type that combines 
production, supply of materials, and marketing in one unit. At 
the same time, establishing within the plant business companies, 
having the departments and offices of the production service 
types change into economic entities oriented toward market and 
opening up for business. Transforming the entire plant, high and 
low, left and right, into relationships that buy and sell among 
each other, conduct commodity exchanges on the basis of equality 
and mutual benefit, and conduct all business according to the 
law of economics and the law of value through signing business 
contracts and agreements. For instance, the Longzhong Cement 
Company of this city conducts buying and selling in connection 
with the conversion of materials and with regard to its 
semifinished products. That means, the supply sector "sells" the 
coal and power, which it has purchased back, to the energy 
management sector, and the energy management sector again 
"sells" it to the production and livelihood sectors. The 
internal bank handles settlement procedure for these transfers. 
If there is a loss, the energy management sector is responsible 
to compensate. In this way a close connection is established 
between the quality of materials management and the very 
personal interests of staff and workers of the management 
sectors, and as a consequence material wastage and loss has been 
greatly reduced. The production shop sells the products of the 
higher stage of the manufacturing process to the lower stage of 
the manufacturing process, there will be high quality and 
favorable prices, and the principle of claiming compensations 
will be firmly maintained. If the quality of the product of the 
higher stage of the manufacturing process adversely affects 
quality or quantity of the lower stage of the manufacturing 
process, the lower stage of the manufacturing process has the 
right to claim compensation from the higher stage of the 
manufacturing process. These relations of "purchasing and 
selling" and the principle of possibly claiming compensation 
compels each stage in the manufacturing process to enhance 
management and to produce at the lowest cost products of the 
highest quality, to ensure profits for its own stage of the 
manufacturing process. During the period from January to 
September of last year, costs at this plant were far below the 
rate at which commodity prices had risen, ensuring higher 
economic benefits for the enterprise. 
  3. Redistributing the fixed assets and liquid assets of the 
main plant against remuneration among the branch establishments 
(workshops) and business companies, creating a dual-level 
contractual framework, namely having the main plant contract 
from the government and having the branch establishments and 
business companies again contract from the main plant. For 
instance, the main plant of the Hubei Friction Seal [moca mifeng 
2302 2361 1378 1409] Materials Factory, in view of the diverse 
state of production and business operations in the various units 
inside the plant, instituted coexisting contractual operations 
of different types. In the case of the rubber plate 
manufacturing shop, whose products were not selling well, it 
instituted profit-first contracting, strictly guaranteeing the 
base figure of profits to be turned over, overcharged brackets 
and shares, excess receipts to be split up proportionately, 
deficiencies in receipts to be made up out of salaries and 
wages. In the case of the brake material manufacturing shop 
whose products were selling well it instituted quantity-first 
unit product quantity wages, bonus and other expenditures 
inclusive contracting; in the case of branches that manufacture 
at a loss policy-related products, it instituted contracting for 
quota reduction of losses; in the case of supply of materials 
and marketing units that are to a certain degree of an 
independent nature, it adopted different forms of contracting 
for reduction of purchasing costs and certain sales 
expenditures. As a result it fully aroused production and 
business enthusiasm among all sectors of the entire plant. 
  In sum, by advancing from point to area, from shallow to 
deep, by pushing on in a scheduled, classified progression, a 
breakthrough was achieved in overcoming the various difficulties 
of in depth transformation of enterprises, and excellent success 
was accomplished in moving from quantitative to qualitative 
change. During the first nine months of 1993, the entire city 
achieved an 36.08 percent increase in industrial output value, 
compared to the preceding year. Involved in this increase were 
114 state-owned large and medium-type enterprises, whose 
increases were of a 54.14 percent magnitude, higher by 18.06 
percentage point over the figure for the city as a whole. They 
achieved an increase of 51.94 percent in sales, compared with 
the preceding year, higher by 14.49 percentage points over the 
figure for the city as a whole. Enterprise profits had also 
increased to varying degrees, as compared with the figures for 
the corresponding period in the preceding year. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66236 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar031___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-031 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  17 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Impact of GATT Membership on Banking Industry </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Impact of GATT Membership on Banking Industry </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0388A Beijing GUOJI MAOYI WENTI [INTERNATIONAL TRADE 
JOURNAL] in Chinese No 134, 17 Feb 94 pp 46-48, 24 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0388A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUOJI MAOYI WENTI [INTERNATIONAL TRADE 
JOURNAL] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Han Jiyun (7281 4949 0061) of the People's Bank </F>
of China's Lianyungang Branch.: "An Analysis of the Impact of 
China's `Return To GATT' On the Banking Industry." The first 
paragraph in italics is a source-supplied note.] 
  [Text] "Return to GATT" will also have a positive 
impact on China's banking industry and economic development. For 
example, it will increase the foreign fund utilization channels, 
enhance the industry's sense of competition, and will raise the 
technological and management standards. It will also promote the 
thorough reform of the financial system and the 
internationalization and marketization of China's financial 
system. However, we will not deal with those aspects in this 
article. 
  The day of China's recovering its status as a GATT signatory 
is drawing closer and closer. When that day comes, according to 
the "market admission" principle, China's banking industry will 
face serious challenges from foreign banks, especially banks 
from the developed nations. This article is an attempt to 
analyze this issue and to suggest some solutions. 
<H5>  I. Specific Impact of "Returning To GATT" on China's Banking </H5>
Industry 
  The "return to GATT" will have the following major impact on 
China's banking industry: 
  1. It will diminish the regulation and control 
functions of China's monetary policy. 
  The main goal of China's monetary policy is to stabilize 
prices and promote economic growth. The central bank's tools for 
implementing the monetary policy include deposit reserves, 
discounting and rediscounting, lending and relending, total 
credit loan control, and administrative measures. Since reform 
and opening up, and depending on the needs of economic 
development at different times, China has utilized the above 
monetary policy tools to continuously regulate and control the 
amount of currency input in order to maintain basic balance 
between currency circulation and industrial and agricultural 
productions and commodity circulation. Currently, China's 
product prices are basically stable and the economy is growing 
at a fairly rapid rate. This proves that our monetary policy is 
basically sound and can function to regulate and control the 
economy. But in the wake of the opening up of China's banking 
industry, some trans-national banks will move in, and because of 
their presence, when we try to implement a tight monetary 
policy, some of them may continue to obtain funds from their 
overseas branches and continue to make loans to their customers. 
Their business will not be affected by, but may even jeopardize, 
our tight money policy, and consequently we will not be able to 
effectively utilize our monetary policy's regulatory mechanisms 
to control the economy. In this sense, it will greatly diminish 
the effectiveness of our familiar traditional monetary mechanism 
where the central bank's tightening of the money supply will 
always lead to the contraction of the domestic economy. This no 
doubt will be a serious challenge to our traditional financial 
system. 
  2. It will make the implementation of China's credit 
policy even more difficult. 
  The principle behind China's credit fund management is 
central planning, allocation of funds, actual loans based on 
actual deposits, and ease of interbank lending and borrowing. 
The emphasis of a credit loan policy built on these premises is 
to maintain volume and structural balance. The goal is to 
promote the benign fund cycle and improve economic efficiency in 
all sectors and departments. Volume balance refers to the 
compatibility between currency issuance and industrial and 
agricultural production and product circulation. Structural 
balance refers to guaranteeing the funds needed by the state's 
key industries and cutting back on funds needed by ordinary 
trades and businesses. Currently, China's specialized banks' 
total credit is balanced and allocated centrally at the People's 
Bank headquarters. This policy lends support to the realization 
of our macroeconomic development goals and structural goals. It 
gives expression to the country's so called preferential 
development policy, which is a structurally biased policy that 
supports certain industries and restricts others. This approach 
may to some extent limit the specialized banks' automony and 
flexibility, but for a country that has scarce funds and is 
structurally unbalanced, it is a necessity. But foreign-funded 
banks have a very different approach. They adopt the usual 
international loan percentages and risk management methods. 
Their loan percentage is based on the amount of deposits and 
capital fund and is not controlled or constrained by volume and 
structural balance. That is to say, their credit policy is very 
liberalized. Therefore, how to coordinate the differences 
between international practices and China's own credit structure 
policy is another problem China's banking industry will be 
facing. 
  3. China's existing foreign exchange control system 
will face serious challenges. 
  China adopts a tight foreign exchange control policy. The 
guiding principle of our exchange control is to "centralized 
control and unify management." Based on this principle, the 
state exchange control department has promulgated a series of 
very strict exchange control policy and laws and regulations, 
but to meet the needs of reform and opening up, the department 
has begun to reform and adjust the exchange control system and 
ease control somewhat. For example, we have implemented a 
managed, variable exchange rate system; set up a foreign 
exchange regulation market; and gradually eased the 
administrative control of foreign exchange revenue and 
expenditure and exchange remittances to and from the country. In 
particular, beginning on 1 January of this year, the state has 
adopted a managed, variable RMB exchange rate that is based on 
market supply and demand. It was a major move in the 
restructuring of the foreign exchange system and even for the 
restructuring of the entire financial system. But under the new 
system, administrative-type foreign exchange control measures 
still play a very important role, and the entrance of 
foreign-funded banks no doubt will pose a challenge to the 
current foreign exchange management system. Therefore, we must 
continue to pursue in-depth reform of the existing foreign 
exchange management system to meet the needs of the opening up 
of China's banking industry and international practices. 
  4. China's finanical institutions will face intense 
competition. 
  Since the 1980's, competition in the international banking 
industry has been intense. The developed nations utilize their 
fund and technological advantages to take and maintain their 
lead. It can be expected that in the future, most foreign-funded 
banks that come to China will be financial institutions from the 
developed nations and regions. They not only have substantial 
financial strength and advanced technological means and 
management methods, but they also have abundant knowledge about 
and experience in international market competition. And if we 
look at our own banks, our loan funds are controlled by the 
state's credit policy, we are behind in technological and 
management skills, and our services lack quality. We will be no 
match for the foreign banks, and we will inevitably lose as we 
try to compete for business. This situation has already happened 
in Shenzhen and Xiamen and other SEZs. Because our financial 
institutions lack initiative and versatility, and their services 
lack quality, many businesses have already been taken away by 
the foreign-funded or Sino-foreign joint venture banks. Take 
foreign exchange settlement for example. We have already lost a 
lot of business there, which is very worrisome. 
  5. It will make the management of the financial 
institutions more difficult. 
  Exercising administrative control over the financial 
institutions is an important part of the central bank's function 
as a "government bank." Today, the control and supervision of 
China's financial institutions extend mainly to the following: 
The scope of business activities, assets and liabilities, credit 
forms and tools, fund settlement, interest rates, cash input and 
withdrawal, trust investment, financial market, and foreign 
exchange businesses. Yet, because the restructuring of China's 
financial system is very incomplete, even though the state is 
very strict with its control and supervision of the financial 
institutions, signs of some financial institutions violating 
laws and regulations are still apparant everywhere despite 
repeated prohibitions. Once foreign-funded banks begin to move 
into this country en masse, the state's control will face even 
more serious challenges. This is because based on today's method 
of managing the foreign-funded financial institutions, 
foreign-funded banks that set up branches in China must have $20 
billion in capital. Although this guarantees that the 
foreign-funded financial institutions will have the scope and 
the business capability, we should also see that by the same 
token, they will be huge trans-national bank groups with 
advanced technologies and substantial business experience that 
can make use of their global network to evade taxes, remit their 
profits and capital, or engage in speculative operations. These 
will make controlling the financial institutions much more 
complicated and much more difficult. 
  6. Foreign-funded banks will ignore risks and engage in 
"aggressive" operations. 
  No doubt, most foreign-funded banks that come to China will 
be trans-national groups. Their assets are separated by 
nationality and their business is all-encompassing; they profits 
are substantial, which gives them tremendous ability to handle 
risks. In comparison, China's financial institutions may have a 
large, well-equipped network at home, and the headquarters and 
branches are tightly-knit, but they are not global, 
trans-national banks in any sense, and their business operations 
are primarily domestic, and they have little to do with the 
outside world. Therefore, from the asset standpoint, it makes 
the Chinese banks' fund utilization more risky. If they run into 
trouble and lose money, there is no way they can remedy the loss 
via other channels or in other ways. When the foreign-funded 
banks run into trouble and lose money, they can get help from 
other profitable branch organizations in other countries or 
regions. Meanwhile, they can also use the profits they make 
elsewhere to engage in "aggressive" operations here. They can 
use lower interest rate to dump funds here as a means to defeat 
their competitors and achieve their high profit goal. 
<H5>  II. Some Suggestions </H5>
  Currently, more than 130 financial institutions from 29 
nations have set up more than 240 representative offices in the 
SEZs and 14 coastal open cities. Among them, 52 are 
business-oriented organs. Their momentum far surpasses that of 
Asia's "Four Small Dragons" in the early days. Once China 
returns to GATT, this process will move even faster. To reduce 
the impact of foreign-funded banks on China's banking industry 
after our "return to GATT," to increase our ability to fight 
them, and to stabilize our own socio-economic lives, we hereby 
make the following suggestions: 
  1. Promptly change the financial policy and the 
industry personnel's ideologies and concepts and make the 
financial institutions more conscious about competition. 
  Ideologies and concepts play a critical role in people's 
thinkings and in their activities to change society. If we use 
the correct ideologies to guide their actual practices and 
activities, we can succeed; otherwise we will fail. Thus, 
under the new conditions, our financial decisions as well as 
industry personnel must adopt the kind of thinking and concept 
that is consistent with the socialist market economy and GATT. 
We must pay attention to the real issue of opening up and 
gradually liberalizing the banking industry as stipulated by 
GATT and consciously put this issue before everything else. We 
must plan and design our financial tasks meticulously and handle 
every link of the financial tasks diligently, so as to raise the 
financial institutions' consciousness about competition. We must 
compete with the foreign-funded banks with courage and strategy 
and raise our service standards amid competition to meet the 
foreign banks' challenge. 
  2. Fully utilize GATT's exceptional provisions extended 
to the developing nations to cushion the impact of the 
foreign-funded banks on our banking industry. 
  According to the pertinent GATT principles and provisions, 
developing nations enjoy certain preferential treatments, one of 
which is the rule on protecting the threatened domestic 
industries, and another is the extension of deadline for 
radically opening up the banking industry. These will help us to 
be better prepared and to improve our banking industry's ability 
to resist the foreign assault. We should take full advantage of 
these favorable regulations and go all out to raise our banking 
industry's service standards, so that we can meet the needs of 
international economic development as soon as possible. 
Meanwhile, we must protect certain domains and regions where our 
banking industry is still immature and allow foreign-funded 
banks to enter into designated financial markets selectively to 
let them launch their business in markets that will benefit us 
the most. In this way, we can cushion some of the impact of the 
foreign-funded banks and gain some time and initiative and in 
turn help our banking industry link tracks with the 
international banking industry in a steady way. 
  3. Promptly formulate laws to administer the 
foreign-funded banks and strengthen their supervision 
  To acclerate the legislative process is an important means 
to 
guarantee effective administration of the foreign-funded banks. 
Only through legislation can we systemize and standardize the 
foreign bank management system and effectively protect our 
rights from infringement. In addition, according to a GATT 
"grandfather clause," "certain laws and regulations already 
established prior to a signatory's participation in any 
agreement should be honored," and this makes it essential for us 
to speed up the formulation of laws to manage the foreign-funded 
banks. We should promptly gather the finanical experts and 
economists to study and discuss the matter and formulate the 
laws on administering the foreign banks as soon as possible. 
Those laws should mainly stipulate the foreign-funded banks' 
types of business, sizes, and treatment. The emphasis should be 
on the utilization of home currency, that is, to put tighter 
restrictions on the utilization of home currency to ensure that 
our banks can make full use of our home currency resources while 
forcing the foreign banks to bring in their own funds to dull 
their competitive edge and guarantee the leading role of our 
financial institutions and the effective implementation of the 
state's general and specific financial policies and promote the 
coordinated and steady development of the nation's economy. 
  4. Accelerate the restructuring of China's finanical 
system and set up a new financial system that is compatible with 
the socialist market economy and international practices. 
  From the objective point of view, the above-mentioned 
protective and restrictive measures are measures of expedience 
that only treat the symptoms but cannot cure the disease. To 
truly solve the problems, we must accelerate the pace of 
financial reform and broaden and deepen the restructuring of the 
financial system and set up a new system that is compatible with 
the socialist market system and international practices. 
Therefore, reshaping China's financial system in accordance with 
the principles of the market economy and the integration of 
global economic and finanical systems is the only way to 
increase our banking industry's ability to fight off future 
competition and to survive and develop. Today we must seize the 
moment and reflect on and re-create various aspects of the 
existing financial system, including improving the quality of 
the personnel, separating business-oriented from policy-oriented 
operations, loosening foreign exchange control, and modernizing 
and internationalizing our business technologies and 
administration. Only in this way can we raise our banking 
industry's standard to enable us to compete with the banking 
industry of any nation in the world and remain victorious. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66237 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar031___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-031 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  13 May 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Experts View Tax Assignment System </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Experts View Tax Assignment System </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0404A Hong Kong TANG TAI [CONTEMPORARY] in Chinese No 
35, Feb 94 p 29 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0404A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong TANG TAI [CONTEMPORARY] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Tung Chin-fa (5516 0530 4099): </F>
"Different Views in the Mainland Toward Tax Assignment System"] 
  [Text] Editor's note: China started implementing the tax 
assignment system this year which has attracted international 
notice. Mainland China specialists have different views toward 
this new system. This magazine elaborates below how their views 
differ for references of our readers. [end editor note] 
<H5>  Two Different Views </H5>
  A majority of those attending the meeting to discuss this 
issue considered that the tax assignment system came about 
because of needs in two areas: first, the need to remedy defects 
of the former fiscal system of partial tax revenue payments; and 
second, the need of a socialist market-based economic system to 
establish a large unified market system within China. Some 
considered the former fiscal system of partial payments to be 
unstable, inequitable and lacking in standard or transparency, 
that the system has a major defect in the regional monopoly 
created which seriously affects structural adjustment of 
state-owned enterprises and adversely affects development of a 
major unified market system within the country. The former 
system also caused decline in central government revenue 
receipts, and created national deficits which endanger 
investments in the country's key projects. In addition, 
implementation of the former system was far from equitable and 
contributed to further widening of the gap between rich and poor 
provinces, adversely affecting the national goal of bringing 
common prosperity to all areas. Some attendees in the meeting 
pointed out that the former system of partial payments had over 
decentralized power. As compared to the original centralized 
fiscal system of revenues and expenditures, the partial payments 
system decentralized fiscal authority to promote efficiency in 
resource allocation, but when the system was over-decentralized, 
it led to the provinces staking out their own turfs for 
administrative control, blocking effective allocation of 
resources and producing another kind of inefficiency. Attendees 
in the meeting also pointed out that one of the objectives of a 
socialist market-based economic system is to realize effective 
resource allocation within a national framework, which means 
that a unified market system should be established within this 
framework, and that the government fiscal system should not be 
an obstacle to effective allocation of resources; the tax 
assignment system is therefore designed to meet the objective 
requirements of a new fiscal system. 
  Some attendees in the meeting, however, considered that the 
necessities for establishing the current tax assignment system 
are not self-evident, and cited the following reasons: 1) The 
result achieved in over ten years of reform is precisely 
decentralization of authority and sharing of benefits, but the 
tax assignment system requires reverting fiscal authority once 
again to the Central Government which would possibly be 
disadvantageous for regional and local developments; 2) the tax 
assignment system in a technical sense cannot yet be implemented 
because from the beginning of reform to the present, different 
sources and kinds of taxes have evolved and changed in the 
absence of a stable and standardized taxation system; therefore, 
given current conditions, now is not the right time to put the 
tax assignment system into effect and that the right time may 
not come for a number of years; 3) the division of 
responsibilities and authorities between the Center and the 
regions is not clearly delineated at this point, and it would be 
difficult to divide fiscal authority in a scientific and 
reasonable manner while the limits on the authority over revenue 
receipts and expenditures are still evolving; 4) the result of 
implementing the tax assignment system under current conditions 
may very well produce a situation of "hitting the son for losing 
an argument with the father," which adversely affects regional 
economic growth since provincial, municipal and lower level 
governments, faced with a fiscal crisis, may well turn to 
raising taxes on enterprises. 
<H5>  Different Justifications for the Tax Assignment System </H5>
  In explaining the tax assignment system, a majority of 
attendees felt that it should be a system of fiscal 
responsibility differentiated by level of authority, and that it 
should involve not only tax assignment but also separate 
systems. But the law setting up the tax assignment system shows 
there are different views: some people felt that it should be a 
system of separate fiscal authorities focused on assignment of 
taxes; others felt that it should be a system of fiscal 
management differentiated by level of authority with tax 
assignment as the foundation; and still others simply thought 
that there are problems in the system itself, and calling it a 
system of assignment of taxes is calling for separation of 
authority, and if the system means that fiscal authority is 
differentiated by level of authority, then one should first make 
clear who has the authority for expenditures before deciding who 
should be responsible for revenue collection. And it would be 
more in line with reality if the reform is defined as a system 
of fiscal or budgeting authority differentiated by level of 
authority. 
  Some of the attendees were ingenious by explaining the tax 
assignment system in terms of a "triangular system" with 
separate components of taxes, authority and mechanism; they 
pointed out that tax assignment is the precondition, that 
separation of authority is the crux and that separation in the 
operating mechanism is a guarantee; they emphasized therefore 
that the tax assignment system should be carried out on the 
basis of these three elements. 
<H5>  Nature of the Separation of Fiscal Authority </H5>
  With respect to the nature of the tax assignment system, the 
attendees proceeded to discuss whether the separation of fiscal 
authority in the tax assignment system means separation of 
administrative authority or separation in more meaningful 
economic terms. Some attendees felt that the prerequisite of the 
system is that administrative authorities and enterprise 
responsibilities should be separated, and that lacking such a 
precondition, any kind of separation of fiscal authority means 
only some form of administrative authority. But under the tax 
assignment system, separation of fiscal authority should be made 
in more meaningful economic terms. At present, the reform of the 
production authority system in state-owned enterprises will 
determine the basic characteristics of fiscal authority 
separation in the tax assignment system, and only when results 
of the above-mentioned reform give assurance that government 
administrative authority and enterprise responsibility are 
completely separated can fiscal authority separation be truly 
justified in economic terms. 
  The attendees felt that in implementing any reform of the 
tax 
assignment system, China should follow international practices 
as much as possible, and draw upon experiences in dealing with 
such an issue by other countries with modern market-based 
economies. 
<H5>  International Customary Practices in Tax Assignment </H5>
System 
  Some attendees felt that in drawing on international 
experiences, the following aspects are most important: First, 
whether the country is large or small, a federated or unitary 
state, a developed or developing country, international 
experiences demonstrate that a central government must 
effectively control the most important sources of revenues in 
the national economy, and this is not only reflected in the laws 
and policies governing revenue collection, but also manifested 
in administrative management and collection of tax revenue; 
second, for government at every level, revenue receipts must be 
adequate to enable government carry out its responsibility for 
expenditures; third, the central government's authority for and 
ability to effective carry out macroeconomic coordination should 
be assured; fourth, any system of fiscal relationships devised 
by government should be conducive to development of a unified 
market system within the national borders and promotion of 
effective allocation of resources; fifth, in terms of regional 
fiscal independence and promoting regional enthusiasm, a central 
government should also have the wherewithal to effectively 
transfer resources to poorer regions in order to narrow the gap 
in revenue receipts and allocations between regions; i.e., a 
central government must have regular financial surpluses derived 
from revenue receipts which exceed expenditures; sixth, 
duplication of responsibility for expenditures between central 
and regional governments must be reduced to the minimum; 
seventh, a central government should use a transparent and 
equitable system of financial subsidies to transfer resources to 
regional governments and, in the process doing so, encourage and 
energize regional authorities to vigorously mobilize for revenue 
collection while carrying out its own macroeconomic coordination 
policy. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66238 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar031___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-031 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  13 May 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article Views Tax Assignment System </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Article Views Tax Assignment System </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0404B Hong Kong TANG TAI [CONTEMPORARY] in Chinese No 
35, Feb 94 pp 11-13 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0404B </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong TANG TAI [CONTEMPORARY] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by (Beijing) Lu Yusha (7627 6276 2619): "Large </F>
Group of State-Owned Enterprises Authorized for Sales: A 
Difficult Financial Issue of Tax Assignment System -- China's 
Financial Red Ink Reportedly Will Likely Increase This Year"] 
  [Text] After the tax assignment system goes into effect in 
China this year, how the relationship between the Center and the 
regions will evolve remains to be examined. On the one hand, 
both sides have issues in contention and each wants to maintain 
the largest share of benefits; but on the other hand, compromise 
is indicated as they are both in the same boat. Therefore, even 
after the tax assignment system goes into effect, the Central 
Government has unceasingly carried out a campaign of persuasion 
in the interiors to facilitate administration of the tax 
assignment and other new systems. 
<H5>  20.5 Billion Yuan Check To Cover the Red Ink </H5>
  A high-ranking State Council official poured out his 
grievances when he said: "Why do we institute the tax assignment 
system? Because developed countries all do it, Japan, the U.S., 
Britain and France all have such a system in effect. We do it 
because the national treasury will not be able to function 
without it. The 20.5 billion deficits reported in the PEOPLE'S 
DAILY is a hard number. From January through October last year, 
provincial revenue receipts increased 18 percent, but the 
Central Government's only 0.03 percent, and this is the actual 
situation. The 20.5 billion deficits in the national treasury 
were only met by a check written in that amount, but this year 
we can no longer resort to using this method." 
  Without holding back, he continued: "This year, China's 
fiscal deficits will likely increase greatly. With the tax 
assignment system in effect and other additional income 
receipts, the Central Government's treasury anticipated some 
revenue increase but [instead] had to spend 18 billion yuan in 
enterprise subsidies without which state-owned enterprises 
cannot survive. And adding to the 20 some billion yuan deficits 
this year is another hard number, and that is the increase in 
workers salaries and wages. With a wage increase of 85 yuan per 
capita per month, it comes to over 20 billion yuan for the 
country as a whole. And this figure has not included the part on 
wages in this year's civil service reform which, if implemented 
in the fourth quarter, will add another 7.5 billion yuan of 
national expenditures." 
  This kind of fiscal situation is really like "the cleverest 
housewife can't cook a meal without rice." Even worse, concerned 
government departments have begun discussing publicly civil 
service and wages reforms, and while the Central Government 
originally wanted to postpone implementing this plan, deferment 
now appears impossible. And that is another large sum of 
expenditures. 
<H5>  Provinces Taking Advantage To Extort From Central </H5>
Government 
  The above-quoted official continued: After the tax 
assignment 
went into effect, local governments continued to operate by the 
former system of transmitting parts of the taxes revenues 
collected to the Center and keeping the rest in the region and, 
because of this, their burden has not increased while the Center 
has to bear the deficits. Furthermore, many provinces and cities 
have asked whether that part of the former system which allowed 
tax revenues collected one year to be transmitted in a different 
year was abolished, for this was another opportunity to extort 
an amount from the Center. But the Central Government, hoping to 
maintain "successful cooperation" with the regions, has 
tentatively indicated that it "may be abolished," since the 
amounts transmitted by all provinces add up to only some 2 
billion yuan which cannot solve the Center's problems. But the 
Central Government is firmly insisting that the required 
increased amount this year must be transmitted, and leaving the 
question of how to modify which part of the former system to be 
considered at year's end. In summary, the Central Government 
wants henceforth to increase its revenue intake, to coordinate 
among rich and poor [provinces] and, at the appropriate time, to 
allow regional authorities to retain more revenues in order to 
stabilize relationship with the regions. 
  And there is more, the Central Government has indicated that 
"henceforth, aside from the nationally coordinated key projects, 
regional authorities can also plan and develop their own 
projects without having to coordinate every project with the 
Central Government." This amounts to meeting two objectives in 
one move, namely, decentralizing authority and lessening local 
burdens. 
<H5>  Government Selling Shares in State-Owned Enterprises </H5>
  As the Central Government decentralizes its authority, 
regional governments take the opportunity to see what they can 
do vis-a-vis the production authority of state-owned 
enterprises. Those who make investments in China should not 
overlook the fact that this year, a large group of state-owned 
enterprises and shares in other such enterprises are up for 
sales or transfer of (from government to people, and from 
domestic investment to joint or foreign-funded investments). 
Although the state-owned enterprises whose shares are available 
for purchase are not the large mainline enterprises, but from 
the standpoint of further intensification of economic changes in 
China, this is a step with significant meaning. 
  According to sources in the foreign businessmen circle, 
overseas investors with large amounts of venture capital today 
are watching closely for investment opportunities in China and 
are prepared, at any time, to buy shares in mainland enterprises 
including state-owned, collective and even sole-proprietor 
enterprises. At the same time, among the state-owned enterprises 
with assets in trillions of yuan, many are also searching for 
new partners to invest in their business. Therefore, this year 
is the time that both buyers and sellers are looking for; even 
if the government may not with great fanfare offer shares of 
state-owned enterprises for purchase, the momentum can no longer 
be stopped. 
<H5>  State-Owned Enterprises Developing Toward </H5>
"Privatization" 
  A State Planning Commission official revealed that of the 
several trillion yuan worth of state-owned enterprise assets, 
only a very small number of shares have gone to private 
investors. Therefore, any trend toward "privatization" in 
state-owned enterprises is just beginning to unfold. 
  China's State Economic and Trade Commission Chairman Wang 
Zhongyu [3769 1813 4416], speaking of selling shares in 
state-owned enterprises, described it in 10 characters, "reform, 
market, efficiency, technological reform, management." But he 
nevertheless put enterprise restructuring in first place. 
  He said: "Reform is focused on two aspects, one is 
enterprise 
reform, the other is reform in the area of circulation. At the 
heart of the latter reform is the establishment of market 
mechanism. Enterprise reform has several major aspects: First, 
"rules and regulations" should continue to be implemented, and 
self management authority put into effect; second, reform should 
have a major effect on the structure of the organization. Within 
an organizational structure, reform should concentrate in areas 
of rents and leases, sales and auctions, transfer and merger, 
and on establishing policies and regulations governing these 
areas. Third is separation of the support system. Fourth is 
selection and disposition of surplus personnel. The crux is to 
invigorate operations of enterprises." 
  According to different news sources from various mainland 
provinces and cities, provincial and local authorities in fact 
are privately or publicly making detailed inventories of 
state-owned enterprises located in their areas to see which ones 
cannot be touched, which ones may offer stocks for sale, and 
even which ones may be bought and resold. All localities, noting 
demands of the Central Government that "state-owned enterprises 
operate by market forces," anticipates that shortly after the 
end of this year, there will be a rash of state-owned 
enterprises seeking partnership with outside investors. 
<H5>  Striving To Seek Export and Agricultural Markets </H5>
  When Wang Zhongyu talked about other reforms, he touched on 
the subject of market reform, saying "that enterprises should 
concentrate on opening two kinds of market, export markets and 
rural markets. The problem of not finding export markets is due 
to lack of understanding of international market. Enterprises 
should, therefore, vigorously seek to open up international 
market to increase exports. China's rural market is quite large, 
but in the last few years, income increase of peasants has 
slowed and their purchasing power declined correspondingly. Once 
rural markets are opened up, sales will pick up quickly." 
  With respect to reform in technology, Wang Zhongyu said that 
in the latter part of the "Eighth Five-Year Plan," China needs 
to set its sight higher and take larger steps toward reform in 
technology, and we must restructure existing enterprises before 
we can raise the levels of industrial craftsmanship, facilities 
and product quality. China is researching into whether it can 
restructure 300 key enterprises, and in 3-5 years raise their 
level of production, grade of products and thereby the overall 
production quantity. In fact, at present 100 state- owned 
enterprises are carrying out restructuring on a trial basis from 
ownership and structure to concrete operations, seeking to make 
fundamental changes. 
<H5>  Pattern of a "Three-Part" System of Enterprises </H5>
  As the above-mentioned reforms intensify, the ratios of the 
different types of enterprises and of their production values 
will also undergo major changes. Based on projections of 
relevant government departments in China, by the year 2000, the 
production values of all enterprises will show a "three-part" 
pattern. In terms of the total industrial production value, it 
is estimated that one-quarter will be from state-owned 
enterprises, one-half from collectively owned enterprises, and 
one-quarter from privately owned enterprises; in terms of the 
total commercial retail sales value, one-third will be from 
state-owned enterprises, one-sixth from collectively owned 
enterprises, and one-half from privately owned enterprises. 
  According to projections, by the year 2000, the industrial 
production value of state-owned enterprises, as a proportion of 
the total industrial production value, will drop to 27.2 
percent, which is the inevitable result of the rapid decline 
beginning in the 1980s and continuing through the 1990s. 
  On the opposite side of the picture, the total industrial 
production values of collective, rural and private enterprises 
will continue to rise. By the year 2000, the proportions [of 
total production values] of these three types of enterprises 
will increase 47.7 percent, 13.4 percent and 11.7 percent 
respectively, as compared to increases of 34 percent, 48.1 
percent and 65.9 percent in 1990. At the same time, the total 
commercial retail sales of these three types of enterprises, as 
a proportion of the all commercial retail sales, are also 
clearly rising, with sales by privately owned enterprises 
increasing by more than 47.1 percent. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66239 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar031___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-031 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  13 May 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Impact of Value-Added Tax on Land Assessed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Impact of Value-Added Tax on Land Assessed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0444A Hong Kong MING PAO YUE-KAN [MING PAO MONTHLY] in 
Chinese No 3, Mar 94 pp 63-64 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0444A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong MING PAO YUE-KAN [MING PAO MONTHLY] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chang Ching-feng (1728 7650 0023): "Under the </F>
Shocking Impact of China's Land Added-Value Tax"] 
  [Text] Investments are tending to shift toward residential 
housing and the renovation of old city districts, and since no 
land added-value tax will be levied on deals involving 
low-profit houses, the land added-value tax has no substantial 
consequences for real estate traders dealing in these kinds of 
  properties. Those that will have to feel adverse effects 
are investors in commercial buildings, medium and high-class 
residences, and developers of large tracts of land. 
<H5>  New Tax System Good for Fair Competition </H5>
  After Mainland China promulgated its land added-value tax, 
it 
first caused a great stir among Hong Kong's real estate trade 
and later also evoked a strong reaction from mainland real 
estate dealers. It has already become a hot topic of discussion 
these days. We have to admit that for a long time past the tax 
burden on real estate dealers on the mainland had been 
exceptionally light, and the rate of investment returns [hui bao 
0932 1032] had been very high, which was not at all consonant 
with the principles of fair competition. For instance, before 
promulgation of the real estate added-value tax, a foreign real 
estate company had to pay only a 3 percent commodity-house 
business tax and a 33 percent enterprise income tax. The tax 
burden was really rather light for the real estate trade. I made 
a very simple table giving a financial analysis of development 
plans, comparing the rate of after-tax investment returns under 
the old and under the new tax law. The computation indicates: 
Under the old tax system, the lowest consolidated tax rate was 
37 percent and the highest 42 percent. The lower the amount of 
added-value, the higher the rate of consolidated tax, and the 
larger the amount of added value, the lower the rate of 
consolidated tax. This was highly unreasonable. The highest rate 
of after-tax investment returns could be, at its highest, 189 
percent and at its lowest 29 percent, allowing indeed a very 
high rate of returns. Under the new tax system, the lowest rate 
of the consolidated tax is 53 percent and the highest 73.2 
percent. The smaller the amount of added value, the lower the 
consolidated tax rate. The higher the amount of added value, the 
higher the consolidated tax rate. The rate of after-tax 
investment returns could, at its highest, reach 80.4 percent and 
at its lowest be only 23.45 percent. This did away with the 
unreasonable state of affairs under the old tax system, and is 
beneficial for fair competition, beneficial also for the 
rational disposition of adjusted social resources. 
<H5>  Positive and Negative Effects of the Value-Added Tax </H5>
  Positive Effects of the Value-Added Tax 
  1. The land added-value tax has a certain significance and 
function in that it ensures orderliness in land and other real 
estate transactions in the market, in that it rationally 
regulates increment from land value gains, and in that it 
protects the interests of the state and promotes modernization 
projects. 
  2. The new tax has a positive effect in that it adjusts the 
structure of real estate investments by encouraging local and 
outsider real estate developers to invest more in low-profit 
residences and in renovations in old city districts, and in that 
it thereby promotes optimal structuring of real estate 
investments. That is so because the new tax law stipulates that 
all sales that show a profit of 20 percent or less of the cost 
are exempt from land added-value tax. 
  3. The new tax law is also most significant and effective in 
protecting actual large investments of real estate developers. 
It actively combats speculation in land and buildings, and other 
unscrupulous activities seeking sudden undeserved large profits. 
It has a restraining effect on the overheating of the real 
estate market, and it regulates the direction in which social 
funds should flow. It safeguards the capital needs in certain 
"bottleneck" sectors and in industry. 
  Negative Effects of the Land Added-Value Tax 
  Under the new tax system, the rates of China's consolidated 
tax on real estate are from 53.1 to 73.3 percent, which would be 
an exceptionally high rate among the countries of Southeast 
Asia. If land added-value tax would be levied throughout the 
nation, we are afraid, it would deal yet another blow to the 
mainland real estate market, which at the present time is 
adversely affected by macro-regulation and control and by a 
generally depressed market. Because real estate development is 
investment for comparatively long durations, real estate 
developers will normally place investments only if they can 
expect fairly high rates of returns. When real estate developers 
see that an excessively high tax will be levied, and the rate of 
returns will be reduced, they will most probably temporarily 
defer the project in question, or rather stop the intended 
project altogether, unless they can shift the tax burden onto 
the consumers. 
  Moreover, in view of the imperfect state of the present 
legal 
system, "underground trading," which had formerly been involved 
in many real estate projects, may again raise its head, and many 
more real estate dealers will adopt irregular trading methods, 
such as writing out false invoices, and this would be felt as 
"unfair" by the majority of discipline-conscious and law-abiding 
real estate dealers. 
  Furthermore, the second-hand real estate market will also be 
adversely affected. The second-hand real estate market is 
extremely important for the development of the entire real 
estate market. In China, the second-hand market is already much 
inconvenienced by procedural problems, and the problems would 
become even more serious by the effects of the added-value tax. 
In that case we figure that in future sellers will demand sundry 
expenses (such as fitting-out expenses) in addition to the house 
prices, as a means to evade tax. 
  In sum, in areas and cities where investments have already 
shifted toward private residences and the renovation of old city 
districts the land added-value tax will in reality have no 
adverse impact, because low-profit houses are exempt from land 
added-value tax. Those who will really be affected are bound to 
be investors in large office buildings, in medium- and 
high-class residences, and developers of large tracts of land. 
However, this is precisely the initial purpose of promulgating 
the land added-value tax. 
  According to latest reports, the land added-value tax has 
been designated a local tax. That means, the local authorities 
have the power, with the approval of the central finance and tax 
departments, to be flexible in the implementation and 
application. The Guangzhou Municipal Government will these days 
announce that it will permit the transfer of many-storied 
houses, an act which is extremely important for the invigoration 
of the second-hand market. On the whole, the land added-value 
tax will not seriously and adversely affect developments in the 
real estate trade, but will rather ensure that the Chinese real 
estate trade will enjoy for a certain period a sustained, 
stable, and healthy development, for which prospects are very 
good. 



  Table Comparing the New and the Old Tax System 

Unit: 1 
million yuan 

Sales Receipt   150       200        300        400 


Item Cost       100       100        100        100 

Added Value     50        100        200        300 

Old Tax         4.5       6          9          12 
System, 
Business Tax 

Old Tax         16.5      33         66 
System, 
Income Tax 

Total Tax       21        39         75         111 
Payable 

Old             42.0%     39.0%      37.5%      37.0% 
Consolidated 
Tax Rate 

Rate of         29%       61%        125%       189% 
After-Tax 
Returns 

New Tax         15        40         100        180 
System 
Added-Value 
Tax 

New Tax         11.55     19.80      33.00      39.60 
System Income 
Tax 

Total Tax       26.55     59.80      133.00     219.60 
Payable 

New             51.1%     59.8%      66.5%      73.2% 
Consol.Tax 
Rate 

Rate of         23.45%    40.20%     67.00%     80.40% 
After-Tax 
Returns 

Decline in      -5.55%    -20.80%    -58.00%    -108.60% 
Rate of 
Investment 
Returns 


  Notes: 1) Business tax computed at 3 percent. 2) Income tax 
computed at 33 percent. 3) Land added-value tax on a 4-grade 
progressive scale: Added value not exceeding 50% of cost 
at 
30%, added value exceeding 50-100% of cost at 
40%, added 
value exceeding 100-200% of cost at 50%, added 
value exceeding 
200% of cost at 60%. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66240 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar031___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-031 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  1 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Difficult Choices' on Monetary, Tax Policies </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Difficult Choices' on Monetary, Tax Policies </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0436A Hong Kong CHIU-SHIH NIEN-TAI [THE NINETIES] in 
Chinese No 3, 1 Mar 94 pp 42-43 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0436A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong CHIU-SHIH NIEN-TAI [THE NINETIES] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by K'ung P'u (7895 0091): "Two Difficult Choices </F>
the Mainland Faces Today"] 
  [Text] Merger of Renminbi Conversion Rates Is a Move 
Toward Free Convertibility, But Free Convertibility Is Not 
Realizable At the Present Time Because of Fears of Large Scale 
Renminbi Devaluation. Tight Money Means Hardships For Business 
Concerns, But Slight Loosening Causes Inflation. If an 
Value-Added Tax Is Enacted for Land, Foreign Traders Will 
Recoil; If It Is Not Enacted, Speculation Will Be Difficult to 
Contain 
  Several major current problems in the Chinese mainland 
economy provoke general discussion, and Chinese Communist policy 
makers continue to waver between two difficult choices. 
<H5>  1. Merger of Renminbi Exchange Rates, But No Renminbi </H5>
Convertibility 
  The first problem concerns the merger of renminbi exchange 
rates, which was done on New Year's day 1993. 
  This so-called merger means that the official rate and the 
swap rate for the renminbi were merged into one. This 
situation seemingly shows that whereas people could formerly 
take renminbi or foreign currency to a swap center to exchange 
it, now this function has been transferred to officially run 
banking business centers. Some people feel that this was done in 
order to link the mainland market to the international market, 
enabling free convertibility of the renminbi in preparation for 
the China mainland's GATT entry. 
  Actually, this is not the case at all. Since the first of 
the 
year, not only are people unable to exchange renminbi for 
foreign currency at banks (the maximum degree of 
convertibility), but they do not even have the minimum degree of 
convertibility, i.e., enterprises that have obtained foreign 
xchange from exports may not convert all of the foreign exchange 
they have earned. Generally speaking, if such a firm makes $1 
million from exports, once this foreign exchange is deposited in 
their account, the official banks will convert only $500,000 of 
it for the enterprise, i.e., they may convert only 50 percent of 
their foreign exchange earnings. 
  This situation is even worse than before. Formerly, when a 
firm needed foreign exchange, it could get it at a swap center. 
Now, the swap centers' function has disappeared, but the 
national banks will not convert the money making it even more 
difficult for firms to use foreign exchange. 
  Simultaneous with the merger of the renminbi foreign 
exchange 
rates, the state tightened the conversion of foreign exchange, 
The reason was that it feared that free convertibility would 
lead to a great increase in demand for foreign exchange, thereby 
causing a great devaluation of the renminbi. 
  Naturally, this has put a damper on the economy's high speed 
growth. Because a high speed growth economic policy can lead to 
vigorous demand for foreign raw and processed materials and 
sophisticated equipment, when demand for foreign exchange is 
held down, this demand is a long way from being satisfied making 
it impossible for the economy to grow at high speed as well. 
<H5>  2. Credit Still Tight Despite Desire To Loosen It </H5>
  Following institution of macroeconomic control in July 1993, 
money became tight in business concerns, forcing halts or 
semi-halts in production. Many factories paid only half wages, 
and the ten major iron and steel mills sank into a difficult 
situation. Thus, during October and November, the banks loosened 
credit by 300 billion yuan (renminbi, and the same applies 
hereinafter), thereby somewhat easing business firms' 
predicament. Nevertheless, Zhou Zhengqing [0719 2973 1987], a 
deputy director of the Chinese People's Bank, figures that the 
amount of added investment needed because of 1993's high speed 
growth is 1 trillion yuan; hence, as soon as the 300 billion 
yuan is released, it will vanish without trace. What caught 
the Chinese Communist authorities even more unawares was that 
even though the input of money only eased business concerns' 
predicament somewhat, information about the early 1994 renminbi 
exchange rate merger, tax reforms, etc. stimulated a rise in 
grain and edible oil prices during late November 1993, causing 
astonishing inflation. The Central Committee was very upset 
about this. It immediately held a meeting that stressed the need 
to "maintain stability." Once again, it proposed macroeconomic 
regulation and control to hold down prices and control 
investment in fixed assets. 
  The Chinese Communists currently face two difficult choices 
on whether to loosen or tighten credit. If they loosen the 
money supply, inflation will ensue causing social instability. 
If they tighten the money supply, enterprises will be short of 
funds, and workers will be paid only half their wages or no 
wages and all, possibly making society even more unstable. 
  Another problem is that most of the money released at the 
end 
of 1993 went to factories to solve their predicament of being 
unable to pay wages and bonuses. Business concerns feel that 
this did not solve the problem. The present factory work halts 
or semi-halts stem mostly from the tight money policy. Products 
cannot be sold; thus inventories increase. Real solution to the 
problem requires release of funds to the demand side, e.g., 
loosening credit for investment in real estate. When investment 
in real estate increases, the demand for construction materials 
will naturally increase as well. Then, worries about steel 
reinforcing rod and cement sales will disappear. This is the 
only real solution to factories' predicament. 
<H5>  3. Refusal To Give In on the Value-Added Tax </H5>
  Admittedly, tightening of credit for real estate investment 
had an adverse effect on investment in real estate in China. 
Then in December 1993, the State Council's promulgation of 
provisional regulations on the collection of an value added tax 
further discouraged foreign traders from investing in mainland 
real estate. 
  By the so-called real estate value added tax is meant that 
when a real estate developer sells property he has built or 
after a property is purchased, after deducting the price of the 
land, construction costs, and 17 percent for taxes, the 
government levies a large tax on the profit realized. If the 
value added tax on the property's sale price is below 50 
percent, the value added tax is 30 percent of the value added, 
and rises progressively until the value added is 60 percent. 
  Government's reason for prescribing an value added tax is 
that large numbers of developers formerly obtained parcels of 
land at cheap prices from local governments. These developers 
could obtain fat profits by putting up buildings on the land. 
Furthermore, this resulted in speculation by holders of land. 
Therefore, it used an value added tax to decrease the profits of 
real estate dealers. 
  Imposition of an value added tax will naturally make many 
foreign traders apprehensive about the mainland real estate 
market. For this reason, Guangzhou City and Hainan Province 
intimated that the national government might propose, but local 
jurisdictions would dispose of the value added tax. In early 
February, Guangzhou mayor Li Ziliu [7812 1311 3177] said that 
taxes and profits on land within the city would be according to 
the former law, and that the value added tax on land would be 
handled flexibly. Hainan Province made a similar statement. 
However, several days later, Minister of Finance Liu Zhongli 
[0491 0112 5668] emphasized that all jurisdictions must enforce 
the value added tax in a uniform manner. Before central 
government detailed regulations on the real estate value added 
tax appeared, seemingly foreign traders could only hold off on 
investments in mainland real estate. 
  Furthermore, the central bank has no intention of loosening 
credit for mainland government agency investment in real estate. 
As a result, ever since it cooled in 1993, real estate has not 
heated up again. Without a warming of real estate, naturally, it 
is impossible to have demand for building supplies; thus, the 
mainland industrial structure, which is dominated by heavy 
industry, may again face a hungry period. 
  Whether to institute an value added tax is another difficult 
choice to make. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66241 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar031___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-031 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  5 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FOREIGN TRADE, INVESTMENT </F>
<H3> <TI>   Revision, Improvement of Trademark Law Explained </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Revision, Improvement of Trademark Law Explained </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0257A Shanghai ZHENGZHI YU FALU [POLITICAL SCIENCE AND 
LAW] in Chinese No 68, 5 Feb 94 pp 11-13 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0257A </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai ZHENGZHI YU FALU [POLITICAL SCIENCE AND 
LAW] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wang Meijuan (3769 5019 1227), affiliated with </F>
the School of Law at Shanghai University: "Revision and 
Improvement of China's Trademark Law"] 
  [Excerpt] [passage omitted] 
  As China's reform and opening intensified steadily, with 
market economy policies taking effect, the substance provided by 
our trademark law that had been in force for a decade was no 
longer fully suited to the needs of China's market economy 
development and international dealings and cooperation. So it 
was imperative that our current trademark law be revised. The 
NPC Standing Committee approved in February 1993 the "Resolution 
on Revising the PRC Trademark Law" and the "Additional 
Regulations on Punishing the Criminal Counterfeiting of 
Registered Trademarks." Their practicality and necessity are 
seen mainly as follows: 
<H5>  1. They Expand the Scope of Trademark Protection </H5>
  Article Four of our Trademark Law drawn up in 1982 provided 
that: "For enterprises, institutions, and individual 
industrial and commercial operators, as to their produced, 
manufactured, processed, selected, or sold commodities, they 
must obtain exclusive trademark rights, and should apply for 
registration to the Trademark Bureau." It is thus obvious that 
this protected only commodity trademarks, not service 
trademarks. This was because China's commodity economy was 
still undeveloped at the time, with service trades, or tertiary 
industries, such as banking, insurance, transportation, post and 
telecommunications, commerce, commodity supply and marketing, 
real estate, tourism, restaurants, hotels, and other consumer 
service trades, not yet having broken free from the 
planned-economy mold, and being in a backward state, leaving 
service trademark protection still not on the agenda. But after 
a dozen years or so of reform and opening, China's commodity 
eonomy had made great progress, with tertiary industries playing 
an increasingly important role in our national economy and 
people's lives, and receiving ever more attention. WEN HUI BAO 
reported on 18 February 1993 that the proportion of China's GNP 
accounted for by tertiary industries is up from 1992's 31.8 
percent to 33.1 percent. And Shanghai Mayor Huang Ju stated in 
a government work report in February 1993 that by the year 2000, 
the proportion of our GNP made up by tertiary industries will be 
over 45 percent. With the prosperity of tertiary industries, 
as improper competitive behavior in service trades had appeared, 
it was necessary to make clear provisions in law for service 
trademark registration and protection. So-called service 
trademarks refer to the marks used by service enterprises, to 
distinguish the services provided by various enterprises. 
Service trademarks are one of the targets of industrial 
property rights protection. Article 1 Section 2 of the "Paris 
Convention for the Protection of Industrial Property" provides 
that: "Industrial property protection targets are patents, 
functional new models, industrial exterior designs, trademarks, 
service trademarks, business establishments, product origin 
marks, or country of origin names, to curb improper 
competition." And Article 6 Section 6 also provides that, "all 
member nations of this union should protect service trademarks, 
...." It is reported that nearly 90 countries (regions) in the 
world today legally protect registered service trademarks. 
The U.S. began to take service trademark registration 
applications in 1949, and Japan began to in 1992. As a member 
nation of the Paris Convention, China is committed to abide by 
the Paris Convention provisions, by protecting exclusive 
service-trademark rights. Meanwhile, as international trade 
developed, the number of applications in China for service 
trademarks by all member nations of the Madrid Agreement had 
grown yearly. But as China had not provided in law for 
protection of service trademarks, we were unable to process 
these applications. So when we revised our trademark law in 
1993, we added Sections 2 and 3 to Article 4 of the Trademark 
Law, providing that "for enterprises, institutions, and 
individual industrial and commercial operators, as to the 
services they provide, they must obtain exclusive trademark 
rights, and should apply to the Trade Mark Bureau for service 
trademark registration." These sections also provide that "the 
provisions in this law on commodity trademarks are applicable to 
service trademarks," bringing service trademarks into the scope 
of protection. 
<H5>  2. They Provide That Place Names of Administrative Regions </H5>
Above the County Level May Not Be Used as Trademarks 
  Our 1982 Trademark Law did not make prohibitive provisions 
on 
whether place names of administrative divisions could be used as 
trademarks. But practice proved that the major flaw in using 
place names as trademarks was their lack of prominence, not 
helping consumers to distinguish them from other similar 
commodities. Meanwhile, this did not conform to international 
practice. So Article 8 of our revised Trademark Law includes 
an additional section, that: "While place names of 
administrative divisions above the county level or publicly 
recognized foreign place names may not be used as trademarks, 
place names do have other implication exceptions; already 
registered and in-use place-name trademarks will remain valid." 
It can be seen from the provisions of this section that while 
place names of administrative divisions may not be made 
registered trademarks in principle, some place names have other 
implication exceptions. This clearly indicates that a much-used 
place name can be made a registered trademark. For instance, the 
"Changshou" in the well-known Changshou County refers generally 
to long life; and the "Fenghuang" in Fenghuang County is a kind 
of bird [phoenix], symbolizing good luck, riches, and honor, 
which are examples of much-used words. Our legislators also 
considered the reputation in both China and abroad of place 
names used in the past as registrerd trademarks for certain 
commodities, such as Guizhou Maotai [liquor], Qingdao Beer, and 
Jinhua Ham, so to stabilize protection of already registered 
trademarks, provided that "already registered and in-use 
place-name trademarks will remain valid." This provision 
reflects the high degree of unity of principle and practicality 
in the spirit of Chinese legislation. 
<H5>  3. They Improve Trademark Registration and Revocation </H5>
Procedures 
  Trademark registration refers to trademark users, in order 
to 
obtain exclusive trademark rights, applying according to legal 
procedures to trademark registration organs for trademark 
examination and approval, to be granted the statutory fact of 
exclusive trademark rights. China's registration principle is 
that only registered trademarks have legal protection, but 
unregistered ones do not. Article 12 of our 1982 Trademark Law 
provided that: "When the same applicants use the same 
trademark for commodities in different categories, they should 
submit [separate] registration applications based on commodity 
classification form." This shows that China's trademark 
registration application followed the principle of "one form, 
one category," in which application for the same trademark was 
limited to one category of commodity and, when the same 
applicants used the same trademark for different categories of 
commodities, they should submit separate applications based on 
commodity classification form. But practice proved that for 
enterprises that produced many classifications of products, this 
registration application procedure was tedious and more 
expensive. The trademark registration applications of the 
"Madrid Agreement for International Registration of Trade Marks" 
and developed Western countries all used the principle of "one 
form, multiple categories," or that the same applicants could in 
one application apply for the same trademark for different 
categories of commodities. This principle streamlined the 
procedure, helping to protect the trademark ownership of 
production plants, while promoting the development of 
diversified products by a single factory. So we drew on this 
more scientific application procedure, deleting the word 
"separate" from Article 12, showing that China's trademark 
registration applications are more internationalized. 
  Article 27 of our revised Trademark Law adds a section, that 
"already registered trademarks, which violate the provisions of 
Article 8 of this law, or obtained registration by fraudulent or 
other improper means, will be revoked by the Trade Mark Bureau, 
and that other units or individuals can ask the Trademark 
Examination Commission to rule on revocation of so registered 
trademarks." The addition of this section on the revocation of 
registered trademarks was very timely and necessary. The grounds 
for this revision were: 1. Part 1 of Section 2 of Article 6 of 
the "Paris Convention for the Protection of Industrial Property" 
provides that, for notorious trademark duplication, copying, or 
dubbing, Convention member countries can, based on their own 
laws or at the request of concerned litigants, refuse or revoke 
registration credentials, and prohibit their use. And Part 3 of 
Section 2 of Article 6 provides that, for trademarks registered 
or used through dishonest means, requests for cancellation of 
registration or prohibition of use may not be subject to time 
limitations. 2. As to China's judicial practice, the phenomenon 
of obtaining registration through fraudulent or other improper 
means is common, with falsified documents and hiding of the 
facts being employed for trademark registration; the public is 
well familiar with trademark registration through means, such as 
duplication, copying, or dubbing. 
  This article provides that registered trademarks already 
obtained through fraudulent or other improper means should be 
revoked. This so-called revocation [cancellation] is one of the 
reasons for registered trademark termination. We need to 
clarify here that cancellation differs from nullification. 
Nullification means that the registered trademark owner 
voluntarily renounces the use of the registered trademark and 
asks for it to be cancelled, or uses its expiration to not 
request continued use of the registered trademark so that it is 
cancelled; cancellation means that the applicant has violated 
the pertinent provisions of the "Trademark Law," and been 
subjected to disciplinary sanction, being the use of coercive 
means to terminate the trademark rights. 
  From these set cancellation grounds, as to actions to obtain 
registration through fraudulent or other improper means, in line 
with the provisions of Article 58 Section 3 of the "General 
Rules of Civil Law," actions committed "by fraudulent means" by 
one party, "which violate legal or public interests," are 
invalid [null and void] civil actions. As invalid civil 
actions have no legally binding force from the time the behavior 
begins, cancellation of trademark rights means that exclusive 
trademark rights are terminated beginning not on the day they 
are cancelled, but rather are null and void from the day the 
behavior begins, giving them back-dating force. As to invalid 
civil behavior, anyone can request validity certification. So 
this section of our revised Trademark Law provides that in 
addition to the Trade Mark Bureau having cancellation authority, 
other units and individuals can request cancellation so that, 
with a ruling by the Trademark Examination Commission, the 
registered trademark will be cancelled. This provision is fully 
in accord with Civil Law provisions on invalid civil behavior. 
<H5>  4. They Increase the Penalties for the Criminal </H5>
Counterfeiting of Registered Trademarks 
  In recent years, all sorts of illegal criminal acts, such as 
imitating others' registered trademarks, counterfeiting others' 
registered-trademark symbols, and selling commodities clearly 
known to have fake registered trademarks, had become rampant, 
continuing despite repeated crackdowns, to directly infringe 
upon registered exclusive trademark rights, bring severe chaos 
to socio-economic order, and infringe on the legitimate rights 
and interests of the masses of consumers. The increase in fake 
commodities was a negative effect of the replacement of the old 
economic system with the new, which negative effect had not been 
curbed for many reasons. While certain criminal elements 
manufactured fake and shoddy commodities, counterfeited others' 
trademarks, and used the means of bribes to promote sales to 
earn exorbitant profits, the industrial and commercial 
administrative management sector imposed mostly fines in such 
criminal cases, which objectively fostered criminal arrogance. 
In addition, Article 127 of the PRC "Criminal Law" set too light 
penalties for counterfeit trademark crimes, providing only for 
imprisonment for up to three years, detention for [community] 
service, or fines. For those who obtained huge amounts of 
illegal income, such penalties were obviously too light to have 
a deterrent impact. In light of this, the Seventh NPC Standing 
Committee passed on 22 February 1993 the "NPC Standing Committee 
Additional Regulations on Punishing the Criminal Counterfeiting 
of Registered Trademarks" (abbreviated hereafter as "Additional 
Regulations"). These Additional Regulations provide important 
revisions and additions to the pertinent parts of our "Criminal 
Law," which in detail are as follows: 
  1. They increase the statutory penalties for such crime. 
All who illegally use trademarks the same as other registered 
trademarks for similar commodities, where the illegal income is 
large or in other serious cases, or who sell commodities well 
known to bear counterfeit registered trademarks, where the 
illegal income is large, can be sentenced to up to three years 
of imprisonment, with those where the illegal income is enormous 
being sentenced to 3-7 years imprisonment, as well as fined. 
And those who counterfeit or manufacture without authorization 
others' registered-trademark symbols, or sell 
registered-trademark symbols that are counterfeited or 
manufactured without authorization, where illegal income is 
large or in other serious cases, can also be punished according 
to the abovementioned statutory penalties. 
  2. Article 127 of the PRC "Criminal Law" provided for 
"imprisonment for up to 3 years, detention for service, or 
fines." This provided for choosing just one penalty, being 
commonly called "punishment without fines, or fines without 
punishment." As it used the word "or" rather than "and," the 
"Additional Regulations" provide for fines also for criminals 
sentenced to up to 3 years imprisonment or detention for 
service, as well as for those sentenced to 3-7 years. This will 
economically curb this type of crime, keeping such criminals 
from benefiting economically. 
  3. Article 127 of the PRC "Criminal Law" also made 
provisions 
concerning "violations of trademark management laws and 
regulations, in which industrial and commercial enterprises 
counterfeit other enterprises' already registered 
trademarks...." It is not hard to see that this section provided 
only for cases in which industrial and commercial enterprises 
counterfeited trademarks, not ones in which individuals did so. 
As this was obviously out of line with China's current 
conditions, the "Additional Regulations" delete the words 
"industrial and commercial enterprises." 
  4. The "Additional Regulations" provide that "where 
enterprises and institutions commit the above two crimes, their 
units will be fined and, as to their responsible personnel [1] 
and others [2] who are directly liable, criminal liability will 
be investigated and affixed according to the above two 
regulations." While China's criminal law used to provide for a 
single penalty system, legal persons [corporations] can now be 
regarded as criminal subjects, which can be sentenced to fines, 
with the two abovementioned liable subjects being sentenced to 
deprivation of their freedom. 
  5. The "Additional Regulations" provide that "for state 
workers who exploit their posts to deliberately shield or 
prevent the prosecution of enterprises, institutions, or 
individuals that they well know have criminally violated these 
regulations, their criminal liabilitty will be investigated and 
affixed according to the provisions of Article 188 of the 
Criminal Law." In other words, state workers who commit the 
above crimes will be punished according to Article 188 of the 
Criminal Law on illegal embezzlement by company employees. 
[passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66242 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar031___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-031 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  8 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Sichuan Implements Preferential Cotton Policies </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Sichuan Implements Preferential Cotton Policies </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0398C Chengdu SICHUAN JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 8 Mar 94 p 
3 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0398C </F>
<F P=104>  Chengdu SICHUAN JINGJI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by You Huoqing (3266 3499 3237): "Fixed Quota </F>
Purchasing of Cotton Will Certainly be Smoothly 
Completed--Sichuan Province Prescribes Preferential Measures for 
the Promotion of Cotton Production"] 
  [Text] The Sichuan party committee and the Sichuan 
government have recently decided on a preferential policy to 
promote cotton production. The particulars are: 
  1. In the case of cotton farmers, the system of fixed quota 
purchases by contract shall be continued. Uniform purchases of 
the cotton designated in the contracts shall still be effected 
by the supply and marketing cooperatives (in districts with 
fertile land and abundant harvests purchases may be entrusted to 
the processing plants for improved varieties of cotton) and 
there would be no harm in actually opening cotton markets. This 
year's plan provides for 2.2 million mu of cotton acreage for 
the entire province, with a the responsibility to buy a fixed 
quota of 2.2 million dan. 
  2. According to a decision by the state council, Sichuan 
province will again raise the purchasing price for cotton, 
namely for each 50 kg of standard grade (grade 3, 27 
millimeters) ginned cotton, last year's price of 330 yuan is 
raised to 400 yuan. Price differentials for different grades are 
also adjusted and raised by 6 yuan. 
  3. Redemption of [above-norm production] bonus sales of 
chemical fertilizer and diesel oil shall be effected according 
to the differential between parity prices and negotiated prices, 
that is, with each purchase of 50 kg of ginned cotton an 
allowance of 14 yuan shall be paid as differential between 
parity prices and negotiated prices of chemical fertilizer and 
diesel oil. 
  4. The provincial government has decided to continue to 
uphold the cotton support policy; for each 50 kg of grade 1 to 4 
ginned cotton purchased, a subsidy of 15 yuan shall be paid by 
the provincial treasury. 
  5. Cotton that was grown without having been included in the 
plan shall be fixed up within the provincial plan and shall be 
treated equally without discrimination with regard to 
applicability of policies. 
  6. The provincial finance administration's cotton support 
policy for cotton farmers with regard to plastic mulch film 
shall remain unchanged. 
  The Sichuan provincial party committee and the provincial 
government also asked the banks, supply marketing cooperatives, 
and other such agencies to ensure availability of funds needed 
for cotton production and to ensure supply of agricultural means 
of production. The official agricultural agencies must 
conscientiously and effectively survey and report plant diseases 
and insect pests and undertake preventive and curative action. 
They must perfect the establishment of bases for the growing of 
high-quality cotton. The provincial party committee and the 
provincial government ask all localities to exert efforts to 
fulfill and overfulfill the cotton quota procurement tasks of 
the province, so as to raise Sichuan's cotton production from 
out of its low state and to make increased production and 
increased income a reality. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66243 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar031___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-031 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  11 April 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Sichuan Spring Grain Area </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Sichuan Spring Grain Area </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0397R Chengdu SICHUAN RIBAO in Chinese 11 Apr 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0397R </F>
<F P=104>  Chengdu SICHUAN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] In 1994 the spring grain area in Sichuan 
Province will be 102 million mu. The corn area will exceed 10 
million mu. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66244 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar031___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-031 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  13 May 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> SOCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Major Obstacles To Building Spiritual Civilization </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Major Obstacles To Building Spiritual Civilization </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0209B Shanghai SHEHUI [SOCIETY] in Chinese No 109, Feb 
94 pp 38-39 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0209B </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai SHEHUI [SOCIETY] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Ling Qi (0407 3825) and Fang </F>
Zhengxin (2455 2973 1800); edited by Lu Jian (7120 0256): 
"Outstanding Issues in Developing Spiritual Civilization"] 
  [Text] [Excerpts] [passage omitted] 
  One is that it lacks a "position" in the brain. Some cadres 
and people believe that developing the economy is hard and 
practical and developing the spiritual civilization is soft and 
empty. So, they lack a strong sense of urgency toward developing 
the spiritual civilization. Some comrades believe that with the 
whole party taking development of the economy as its core, 
development of the spiritual civilization should "clear out and 
make way." If we only do a good job on the economy, we can 
"cover 100 uglies with one pretty," and development of the 
spiritual civilization will automatically come up. In the vast 
majority of enterprises, factory head and secretary are 
shouldered by the same person and he has no time to attend to 
the development of the spiritual civilization. In quite a few 
enterprises, the full-time assistant secretary is the main 
person responsible for running the factory or is concurrently 
chief of the political work section, carrying little weight. 
This causes the occurrence of "the factory head does not have 
the energy and the secretary does not have the authority; the 
factory head is not in position and the secretary is afraid to 
exceed his position" in enterprise political ideology, and the 
development of spiritual civilization is an "empty portfolio." 
It is said from the ranks of the political workers themselves 
that in the great tide of the market economy, some comrades 
mistakenly believe that now is the "spring of economic work and 
the fall of political ideological work." They say that "ten 
years of supply and marketing makes one wealthy, ten years of 
science and technology makes one highly skilled, and ten years 
of political work is all in vain" and "a basket of great 
principles is not equal to a single great solidarity." They have 
a losing feeling, a feeling of self-pity, and a feeling of 
crisis about developing the spiritual civilization. A few 
comrades have the one-sided understanding that "if one has a 
ticket he gets a seat and if one does not have a ticket, he 
gives up his seat." They think with all there heart about 
leaving their political work position and changing jobs to 
struggle for money. 
  The second thing is not knowing how to do the work. Some 
grassroots party organizations are not clear on the details of 
enhancing the spiritual civilization in the market economy. They 
generally feel that they "cannot use the old way, they do not 
know how to use the new way, and they dare not use the reckless 
way." The thinking of some comrades remains in the old set 
patterns of the planned economy. They are set in their old ways 
and are not apt to learn to change to a new situation. In their 
work they only go by the book and by their superiors and not by 
practice. They indiscriminately copy and indiscriminately go by 
the convention, copying mechanically and weakening the 
attraction of political ideological work. 
  The third thing is that they lack the ticket for input. Only 
if one has input does he have output. The spiritual civilization 
also is this way. The present soaring development of the economy 
is incompatible with ideology and culture. Quite a few units do 
not have a place for recreational and sports activities, they do 
not have a book and newspaper reading area, and a few units have 
even squeezed out the "grassroots party school" and the "staff 
and workers house," and have relaxed the ideological education 
outside the eight hours. There are some units that although they 
have an activity area, do not organize activities and it is in 
name only. 
  The fourth thing is that the evaluation lacks standards. 
Achievement in developing the spiritual civilization can not be 
measured in figures like achievement in economic development. 
Development of the spiritual civilization has its abstract 
nature. Even though there are testing norms, they start with the 
hardware of developing the spiritual civilization. This time we 
investigated some grassroots party committees and discovered 
that not one had established a relatively complete inspection, 
comparative appraisal, and testing system for developing the 
spiritual civilization. A leader in a certain department said 
that now from top to bottom everyone is shouting, "Grasp with 
both hands, be firm with both hands." At what level do leaders 
truly manage to do solid work in developing the spiritual 
civilization? They just clamor, they do not establish a model. A 
certificate of responsibility is signed for economic work, a 
certificate of responsibility is signed for environmental 
protection, and a certificate of responsibility is signed for 
public security, but no department or system has signed a 
certificate of responsibility for developing the spiritual 
civilization. Testing lacks standards and lacks binding 
mechanisms. Responsibility for evaluation does not truly fit 
into the scope of the responsibility of the position of anyone 
in charge of any level of the party or government. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66245 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar031___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-031 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  8 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY, PUBLIC SECURITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Navy Lt. Commander on Role of Blue-Water Navy </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Navy Lt. Commander on Role of Blue-Water Navy </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0241A Beijing JIANCHUAN ZHISHI [NAVAL AND MERCHANT 
SHIPS] in Chinese No 2, 8 Feb 94 pp 2-3 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0241A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JIANCHUAN ZHISHI [NAVAL AND MERCHANT 
SHIPS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Lcdr. Yang Zhiqun (2799 1807 5028): "Officers' </F>
Forum--Brown Water, Blue Water--Thoughts on Naval Theory"] 
  [Text] Editor's Note: Based on the concern of our 
numerous readers about naval issues, this publication is coming 
out with a new exploratory column--"Officers' Forum," and 
inviting some officers to talk about their individual 
viewpoints. At the same time, we also hope that our numerous 
readers will make some suggestions regarding the new column. 
  This is a very small planet and one third of the planet's 
surface is black land. The other two thirds is blue sea. The 
black of the land extends to the blue of the sea and the blue 
sea washes the black land. Where they intersect the mixture 
becomes brown, and the brown water is the transition between the 
black land and the blue water. There is one very important 
point: All people live on land. Only by sailing a ship can we go 
down to the brown water and enter the blue water. 
  All newly-constructed ships enter the water from berths and 
docks on the land, and when construction is completed, all ships 
are sailed out to sea from ports on the land. All early fleets 
went out to the vast blue waters from brown water close to land. 
  When a ship is outfitted with weapons, it becomes a naval 
ship. Seamen undergo training to become sailors. Sailors and 
naval ships are organized into fleets, and under the command of 
an admiral, the fleet becomes a navy. 
  Navies all go down into the water from the land, first the 
brown water, then the blue water. 
  Navies establish bases on land. Naval ships and aircraft set 
out from the bases and attack and beat back the enemy in the 
brown water. 
  If the enemy in the brown water is defeated or driven off, 
the navy returns to its base and rests, reorganizes, and 
replenishes, and prepares for the next attack. If it is 
defeated, the navy escapes back to its base to hide. If it is 
not even secure in the base, the whole navy is annihilated. 
  The navy, stationed at the base, waits to annihilate the 
enemy in the brown water. The principal naval tactics are 
developed and formulated according to this line of thinking. 
  Bases are generally distributed equidistantly along the 
coast, and assault forces are deployed in key directions. Naval 
base forces are deployed in accordance with this principle. 
  Forces are composed of coastal based aircraft, submarine 
formations, and formations of surface ships and boats capable of 
carrying out an assault in brown water. Coordinated coastal 
defense fronts and small ships and boats can protect base 
defensive forces. The organization of the navy's basic forces is 
designed, planned, and developed in this way. 
  The overall plan of relying on the coastal land and keeping 
the brown water in view is called naval strategy. 
  But things generally are not like this at all. The navy by 
nature must be concerned about the blue water. 
  Blue water has had a very long maiden period. The first navy 
to bravely go into its depths and draw its sea-lanes was the 
Ming Dynasty eunuch Zheng and the Chinese fleet that he led 
across the Indian Ocean for the first time in the early 15th 
century. Eighty years later, for the first time the Portuguese 
navy went around the Cape of Good Hope and proceeded to the 
Orient and the Spanish navy crossed the Atlantic for the first 
time and passed through the West Indies and saw the Pacific 
Ocean. 
  The blue water has greeted the master and has greeted the 
hegemonist. It was almost immediately recognized and carved up. 
In 1494 a straight line was drawn along the 48th longitude 2,057 
kilometers west of the Cape Verde Archipelago formed an eastern 
and a western half, and divided up the great hegemony of 
Portugal and Spain. 
  The blue-water navy began from that. 
  The blue water has its own blue-water logic: The ocean does 
not belong to anyone. The ocean is the common property of 
everyone. In world competition, common property also is the 
property of the strong. Whoever is strong occupies it first, and 
whoever occupies it first, has it first. The blue water has its 
own blue-water stage. Time changes and is fickle with all 
leaders. The invincible Spanish fleet, the unsinkable imperial 
fleet, Holland, France, Japan, the Third Empire to the United 
States and Soviet nuclear navies of the Cold War, the blue-water 
hegemonists in blood and fire have torn each other apart and 
fought to the death, down through history it has never ended. 
  Blue water has its own blue-water rules. After a thousand 
years of evolution, the ancient land powers' concept of natural 
expansion of sovereignty into the sea ultimately evolved to the 
two modern principles of freedom of the high seas and 
sovereignty of territorial waters. With the current 
newly-arising countries, the development of technology to 
exploit the ocean, and the ever-growing demand for ocean 
resources, such concepts as the "archipelago principle," 
"contiguous zones," the "continental shelf," "special economic 
zones," and "ocean-bottom resources as the common legacy of 
humankind" arise. 
  The blue-water navy is completely different from the 
brown-water navy. 
  The first person who changed from the original single masted 
and single sailed ships to the multiple masted and multiple 
sailed ships was the first person to turn his sights to the blue 
water. But he still was a "blue-water person" looking at the 
blue water from the land. 
  In 1584 when the English Queen Elizabeth ordered the pirate 
admiral Drake to command a ship and attack the Spanish fleet in 
the West Indies, she was a "blue-water person" looking from the 
blue water to the blue water. And in this century after the 
commanding officer of the first guided missile nuclear 
submarine, the George Washington, in July 1960, successfully 
fired a Polaris intercontinental guided missile from his boat, 
he actually was the first "blue-water person" to look back at 
land from the blue water. 
  An historical regression also is a logical regression. The 
navy sailed to the blue water from the brown water to conquer 
the ocean, but conquering was by no means the objective. The 
ocean was conquered to use the ocean. The navy campaigned the 
length and breadth of the blue waters to use the ocean. But 
using still was not the objective. The use of the ocean was to 
counteract the land! 
  The navy went into the blue water for the blue water, but 
more than that it went into the blue water for the land. 
  The blue-water navy has its own blue-water navy thinking. 
  Because it goes into the blue water to use the blue water, 
it 
by no means takes what occurs on the sea as the goal of its 
actions, but it takes "control of the seas" as its goal. 
Luo-si-ji-er [5012 2448 1015 1422] said, "The function of a sea 
force is to seize and maintain control of the seas and put them 
to its own use, while preventing the enemy from controlling the 
seas." 
  But "controlling the seas," what objective can it achieve? 
  First, it protects commercial trading and ensures that 
trading sea-lanes are unimpeded. Secondly, it can use sea forces 
to capture trading transfer points, colonies, and bases in 
distant lands, as Alfred Mahan said. Old Mahan after all was a 
man of the last century. He could not understand the 
significance of blue water as a strategic nuclear base, nor 
could he understand the significance of blue water as a treasure 
house of resources. 
  He-de-li Bu-er [6378 1795 0448 1580 1422] said, "There are 
two other uses for sea forces that by no means depend on the 
basic objective of relying on the sea as a main line of 
transportation. The first is that certain countries utilize sea 
forces as a system of strategic nuclear weapons deployed at sea, 
or to resist enemy strategic weapons systems. The second 
objective has become more and more obvious only in the past ten 
years. A country uses military forces at sea to seize or expand 
its own ocean resources and to safeguard them from being 
threatened from the outside." 
  In its traditional meaning, navies go into blue water first 
for transportation lines, second for nuclear bases, and third 
for ocean resources. 
  The concept of using huge fleets to protect transportation 
lines at sea or the merchant fleet of one's own country is 
somewhat outmoded, because every large country should believe 
that the security of international sea-lanes can be maintained 
by more civilized and more intelligent means. The concept of 
maintaining a huge sea-based nuclear force in the blue water to 
obtain a reliable strategic deterrent is somewhat a product of 
the Cold War, at least after the Cold War, it cannot be ample 
reason for developing a huge blue-water navy. 
  The concept of developing a modern blue-water navy to join 
in 
the approaching fight for blue-water resources somewhat deviates 
from the spirit of the present international law of the sea. In 
international law the concept of no controlling land, in which 
blue-water resources are the common legacy of humankind and not 
to be had by whoever first occupies them, is a principle that is 
becoming generally accepted. 
  Blue water as before and blue-water navies today encounter 
perplexities. 
  Navies after all have not forgotten that they went into the 
blue water for the land. 
  When state sovereignty is limited to land borders, the navy 
patrols the brown water to safeguard the country's land. When 
such concepts in modern international law of the sea as 
"contiguous zones," "continental shelf," and "special economic 
zones" began to extend the legal meaning of state sovereignty to 
brown waters, the implications for the country's land that the 
navy should safeguard changed and by direct inference, the navy 
in the new meaning of safeguarding the country's land patrolled 
the blue water. 
  When the present world was divided into two large opposing 
blocs, each navy to contend for world hegemony made its bid in 
blue water, because either side could encounter its adversary in 
blue water, and one side need only completely withdraw from the 
arena and the the other side could realize its aspiration of 
controlling the blue water. When one side ultimately realizes 
this aspiration, it has no adversary in the arena and its navy 
does not patrol the blue water to drive out the adversary, but 
patrols the blue water to take advantage of the blue water to 
offer resistance close to its country's land. 
  When a country's security is military security, the navy 
patrols the blue water as a means of military combat. As the 
world enters a new era, and state security is more importantly 
expressed as economic security and environmental security, the 
navy with its unique characteristic of "using non-combat forms," 
must patrol the blue water in a new guise as economic and 
diplomatic emissary and as guardian of environmental security. 
  When a country outside of brown waters asserts sovereignty 
over land or islands, its navy will patrol the blue water. 
  When a country still maintains a nuclear deterrent as the 
content of its national security strategy, its navy will patrol 
the blue water. 
  When a country has the humiliation of being chased out of an 
ocean, today when it also has an extremely great oceanic 
interest, its navy will patrol the blue water. 
  Sticking to its old ways, the navy will patrol the blue 
water. 
  This is a very small planet and the planet's surface has 
black land, brown water, and blue water. 
  The international law of the sea today stipulates thus: the 
black land is yours, the blue water is everyone's, and the brown 
water is yours and everyone's. 
  Oceanic politics today is expressed thus: Guard yours and 
categorize everyone's. 
  The enlightenment from historical experience today is: If 
you 
cannot occupy yours, it is someone else's. 
  The next century has this prediction: The black land belongs 
to the dried up past, the brown water belongs to the unfolding 
present, and only the blue water is the hopeful future. 
  The navy is a legal person in the law of the sea, is a tool 
in oceanic politics, is a student of historical experience, and 
is a harbinger of the next century. 
  Brown water, blue water, the navy patrols in them. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66246 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar032___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-032 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  11 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ownership as `Method, Not End' Deemed Erroneous </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Ownership as `Method, Not End' Deemed Erroneous </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0271A Beijing ZHENLI DE ZHUIQIU [PURSUIT OF TRUTH] in 
Chinese 11 Feb 94 pp 2-6 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0271A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHENLI DE ZHUIQIU [PURSUIT OF TRUTH] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yun Xiliang (1926 1585 5328): "Comments on </F>
`Ownership as a Method, Not an End'"] 
  [Text] Recently the argument that "ownership is a method, 
not an end" has been prevalent. From this argument, some people 
have concluded that taking public ownership as the essence of 
socialism is "mistaking the method for the goal and trying to 
defend it." Being a method, public ownership is in a subordinate 
position when compared with goal of socialism. Development of 
productive forces is the end. Whatever ownership is conducive to 
economic development should be promoted. If the publicly owned 
sector of the economy gradually dwindles because it is unsuited 
to market competition, such outcome, from an overall viewpoint, 
is good for the development of our productive forces, the 
strengthening of our comprehensive national strength, and the 
improvement of the people's living standard. 
  This view is an obvious mistake. 
  Here, first of all, let us explain the relationship between 
social practice and the nature of society. Our social 
practice--for example, we take the quick development of 
productive forces as our primary task--is bound up with the fact 
that our society is socialist in nature. So any practice 
conducive to consolidating and developing the socialist system 
must be protected. Any practice with an adverse effect on this 
must be restricted and banned. From this viewpoint, building a 
modern socialist society is our end, while developing productive 
forces is the method to achieve that end. Sometimes we may say 
developing productive forces is our end, but that is based on 
the premise that our system is a socialist system--what we mean 
is that in socialist society we should take the development of 
productive forces as our work target or fundamental task. In 
fact, ownership hinges directly on the nature, or system, of 
society. Leaving primitive communist society aside, in slave 
society the means of production was owned by slave owners. In 
feudal society, it was owned by feudal lords, and in capitalist 
society, by capitalists. In socialist society it is, of course, 
owned by the whole people and the collectives. This is common 
knowledge. 
  China is now in the initial stage of socialism. Because of 
our relatively backward economy and based on the experience and 
lessons drawn from the past, our party and government are 
carrying out a policy of coexistence and co-development of 
several economic sectors in order to speed up the development of 
social productive forces. This policy allows the existence of 
enterprises owned by individuals as well as enterprises run with 
private capital, with Chinese and foreign capital, and with sole 
foreign capital. Now, all these types of enterprises have 
developed to some extent. This is absolutely correct. Meanwhile, 
however, our party and government have unequivocally stipulated 
that the state-owned and collective economic sectors, that is, 
the publicly owned sectors, should still dominate our economy. 
The non-state-owned sectors, they say, should remain 
supplementary, or in other words, in a subordinate position. 
This is the basic principle for socialist modernization. Our 
socialist politics, culture, education, science and technology, 
and military affairs should all follow this principle and serve 
the purpose of developing social productive forces. Above all, 
they should serve the purpose of defending and reinforcing the 
mainstay position of public ownership. Failing this or acting to 
the contrary will impair our cause of socialist construction. 
  To substantiate this, we would like to quote some relevant 
viewpoints held by our proletarian revolutionary teachers. In 
the preface to the 1888 English edition of "Manifesto of the 
Communist Party," Engels said: "The fundamental proposition 
which forms the nucleus of this Manifesto' belongs to Marx. That 
proposition is: In every historical epoch, the prevailing mode 
of economic production and exchange, and the social organization 
necessarily following from it, form the basis upon which is 
built up, and from which alone can be explained, the political 
and intellectual history of that epoch." (Selected Works 
of Karl Marx and Frederick Engels, Vol. I, p. 237). This 
means that the nature of a society is mainly determined by the 
mode of material production in that society, or in other words, 
the condition of productive forces and the corresponding 
production relations in that society. With the development of 
productive forces, human history has developed from a low to a 
high level through five kinds of production relations, namely, 
production relations of primitive communism, the slave system, 
feudalism, capitalism, and socialism (communism). Commensurate 
with the different economic bases are five basic forms of 
society, which have appeared successively. They are: primitive 
society, slave society, feudal society, capitalist society, and 
socialist society (communist society). 
  Therefore, to determine the nature of a society, we 
should, first of all, look into its economic base. Lenin said: 
"Only by attributing social relations to production relations 
and attributing production relations to the level of productive 
forces, can we have a reliable basis to view the development of 
forms of society as a natural historical process." 
(Collected Works of V.I. Lenin, Second Edition, Vol. 
I, p. 110) 
  If the nature of society is determined by production 
relations, which are connected with the condition of productive 
forces, then there must be an inner link between the ownership 
system, which is the basis of production relations, and the 
nature of society. In fact, most people acknowledge that the 
ownership system is a major criterion for judging the nature of 
society. The fundamental reason for the socialist nature of 
contemporary Chinese society is that it has public ownership as 
its main foundation. Similarly, the fundamental reason for the 
capitalist nature of society of Western developed countries is 
that their society is founded mainly on private ownership. 
  The link between the ownership system and the nature of 
society and the importance of the ownership system to social 
development were clearly expounded long ago by the founders of 
scientific socialism. In the Manifesto of the Communist 
Party, they declared to the whole world: "The 
distinguishing feature of Communism is not the abolition of 
property generally, but the abolition of bourgeois property. But 
modern bourgeois private property is the final and most complete 
expression of the systems of producing and appropriating 
products, that is based on class antagonisms, on the 
exploitation of the many by the few. In this sense, the theory 
of the communists may be summed up in the single sentence: 
Abolition of private property." (Selected Works of Karl 
Marx and Frederick Engels, Vol. I, p. 265) 
  Now, everyone acknowledges that elimination of 
exploitation is the essence of socialism. But how is 
exploitation to be eliminated? By relying on the exploiters' 
mercy? Or by relying on open-minded rulers? These are merely 
utopian socialism. Can we merely rely on the development of 
productive forces to eliminate exploitation? If so, how come 
developed capitalist countries, which have a very high level of 
productive forces, cannot eliminate exploitation? To eliminate 
exploitation, it is imperative to replace private ownership with 
public ownership. This is an irrefutable truth. 
  In addition, everyone acknowledges that elimination of 
polarization is also the essence of socialism. How can 
polarization be eliminated? The history of the world has proved 
that polarization cannot be eliminated in any society with 
private ownership. Peasants of feudal society once rose up to 
struggle for equal land rights, but their struggle ended in 
failure. During the bourgeois revolutionary period, some 
thinkers stood for the elimination of economic inequality, only 
to find that their ideal was no more than a beautiful bubble. 
Reality in the 20th century has made people aware that only by 
replacing private ownership with public ownership is it possible 
to eliminate polarization. 
  As can be seen, elimination of exploitation and 
polarization is bound up with public ownership. Their 
relationship, it may be said, is just like the two sides of a 
coin. An inner link exists between public ownership and the 
essence of socialism, and there is no doubt about it. 
  Productive forces are the most dynamic factor for social 
development. The condition of productive forces determines the 
nature of production relations, while the development of 
productive forces determines the changes in production 
relations. This, however, cannot be construed to mean that the 
condition of productive forces alone is a direct determinant of 
the nature of society. 
  The histories of countries in the world have repeatedly 
proved that, under roughly the same condition of productive 
forces, the nature of society varies from country to country. 
For example, under the condition of modern productive forces, 
some countries have capitalist society, while others have 
socialist society. This is because their specific environments 
are different. Even under the same condition of productive 
forces, when a country is fettered by production relations that 
are incompatible with the condition of its productive forces, it 
may have one form of society, but after it has replaced the 
outdated production relations with advanced production relations 
that are commensurate with the condition of its productive 
forces, it may have another form of society. 
  It follows that the condition of productive forces, albeit 
a vital determinant of social development, does not necessarily 
reflect the nature of society. The direct determinant of the 
nature of society is production relations. In other words, the 
nature of society is determined by production relations based on 
certain productive forces. Here, production relations refer to 
the dominant relations of production at a certain stage of the 
development of human society, that is, the basic economic system 
of society. Consequently, we may say that the basic economic 
system of society based on certain productive forces directly 
determines the nature of society. 
  Is the conclusion that production relations directly 
determines the nature of society in conflict with the thesis 
that productive forces serve as the criterion for economic work? 
No. It does not deny the fact that productive forces are always 
the most revolutionary element of economic activities in 
society, and that the development of productive forces 
invariably determines the changes in production relations. 
  Productive forces and production relations complement, 
condition, and promote each other. In China, persisting in using 
productive forces as the criterion for economic work is 
associated with adherence to the basic socialist economic 
system. All views and practices making them mutually exclusive 
are harmful. If we say that the idea "we would rather have the 
grass of socialism" is to sever from an extremely leftist stand 
the inner link between using productive forces as the criterion 
for economic work and implementing the basic socialist economic 
system, then stressing the importance of productive forces in an 
abstract, isolated, and lopsided way is to sever that link from 
a rightist stand. "To stress the four modernizations without 
stressing socialism is to forget the essence of the matter." 
(Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping, Vol. III, p. 204) 
  Productive forces are connected with production relations 
both in substance and in form. In a certain sense, developing 
productive forces may be considered as the end. But this does 
not mean that public ownership can be downgraded to a low, 
subordinate position and is no longer a decisive factor for the 
essence of socialism. 
  In any society, economic progress has to rely on a variety 
of methods. Undoubtedly, many methods have no inner link with 
the essence of society and may be considered to be in a low and 
subordinate position. For example, plans and markets may be used 
as economic methods by capitalism as well as by socialism, for 
they have no inner link with the essence of society. But this is 
not the case of public ownership. As a basic economic system, 
public ownership should in no way be downgraded to an 
unimportant, low, and subordinate position. 
  Moreover, the end and method can be transformed into each 
other. As far as productive forces versus production relations 
are concerned, the former is the end. But, when we talk about 
the essence of socialism (liberating and developing productive 
forces and eliminating exploitation and polarization so as to 
finally achieve common affluence), the end is to "finally 
achieve common affluence," while developing and liberating 
productive forces are methods to achieve this end. In this case, 
can we say that development of productive forces is placed in a 
low, subordinate position? Obviously not. Development of 
productive forces and common affluence also complement and 
condition each other. In socialist society, on the one hand, 
development of productive forces must be subordinate to the 
objective of satisfying the people's material and cultural 
needs; otherwise, "production would be for the sake of 
production." On the other hand, without developing productive 
forces, it would be impossible to provide abundant materials and 
products and, hence, impossible to achieve common affluence. For 
this reason, we must take a comprehensive look at the 
relationship between developing productive forces and achieving 
common affluence. Even though development of production should 
be subordinate to the people's needs, development of productive 
forces is still the practical starting point and plays a 
dominant role in the whole economic process. So development of 
productive forces must be regarded as a fundamental task of 
socialism. 
  To sum up, both productive forces and production relations 
play a vital role in determining the nature of society. 
Absolutely exaggerating the role of productive forces and 
believing that once we have developed our productive forces, we 
would not slip to the capitalist road no matter what ownership 
system we have adopted is as much a mistake as absolutely 
exaggerating the role of production relations and believing that 
with a large and collective organization, we would transit to a 
communist society despite our backward productive forces. 
Similarly, the thinking that socialism can be realized in the 
absence of public ownership is as absurd as the thinking that 
socialism can be achieved without developing productive forces 
and with a poverty-stricken society. 
  Lopsidedly stressing that the ownership system is a method 
is aimed at nothing but weaken, eliminate, and change public 
ownership. 
  Is it possible to get a better effect on developing 
China's productive forces by weakening, eliminating, and change 
public ownership? No. As shown by the history of the last 100 
years or so, China did not quicken the development of productive 
forces whether it was dominated by the feudal system, 
semi-feudal and semi-colonial system, or bureaucrat capitalism. 
On the contrary, when such systems held sway, the people were 
often suffering hunger and cold, and sometimes dead bodies of 
the starved were found here and there. After the founding of the 
People's Republic of China, the national economy quickly revived 
from the awful mess left from old China. On the heels of such 
revival was a large-scale economic construction. All these 
relied upon the socialist system based on public ownership. 
Though once we erred by arbitrarily pursuing a "large and 
collective" organization, we have never destroyed the socialist 
system. Since the 1980's, our productive forces have developed 
at a quickened pace. What we have relied upon is still the 
socialist system with public ownership as the mainstay. 
  Public ownership as the mainstay is a very important aspect 
of Chinese socialism and a basic socialist principle we must 
keep to. The ongoing reform is a process of further improvement 
of the public ownership system. This improvement means a change 
in the system and mechanism of public ownership to meet the 
needs of developing productive forces. It differs radically from 
weakening, eliminating, and changing public ownership. Only by 
improving the public ownership system can we achieve better 
results in fulfilling the basic task of developing productive 
forces. This is a fundamental principle for building socialism. 
  In China, the economic sector owned by the whole people and 
the enterprises owned by the state were and still are leading 
forces in ensuring the fast development of the national economy. 
In the first place, they have relatively advanced technology and 
equipment, large numbers of competent professionals, and the 
masses of hard-working and discipline-abiding workers. They are, 
therefore, the most advanced part of productive forces in our 
society and represent the orientation for the development of 
productive forces. Secondly, they always play a leading role in 
industrial production, transportation, financial affairs, and 
commodity circulation. Thirdly, they are the chief financial 
source for the state. Fourthly, they serve the people across the 
country and play a pillar role in strengthening macroeconomic 
regulation and control. It is due to the leading role played by 
the economic sector owned by the whole people that China's 
economic construction and its reform and opening-up drive have 
scored such remarkable achievements as to attract worldwide 
attention. 
  Some people say that enterprises owned by the whole people 
cannot compare with enterprises owned by collectives and 
individuals. They argue that our economic growth since the start 
of the reform and opening-up drive has resulted mainly from the 
growth of the economic sector not owned by the whole people. 
This viewpoint is superficial and groundless. It must be noted 
that the rapid growth of the economic sector not owned by the 
whole people has depended, to a great extent, on the support 
provided by the economic sector owned by the whole people. 
State-owned enterprises have provided necessary raw materials, 
energy, and transportation facilities as well as lots of 
technology, equipment, and manpower to the economic sector not 
owned by the whole people. Moreover, this economic sector has 
reaped a large amount of profits from the state's tax-reduction 
and exemption policy and, in particular, from the low prices of 
products made by state-owned enterprises. Because of this, the 
following situation has appeared in China: Despite its advanced 
equipment, competent work force, and enormous capital, the 
state-owned economic sector is growing slowly, while the whole 
economy and the non-state-owned sector are making quick headway. 
With regard to the above-mentioned situation, Vice President 
Rong Yiren said very clearly in his November 1993 speech in 
Tianjin: "Today, without support from state-owned large and 
medium-sized enterprises, no other enterprise could enjoy 
lasting prosperity whether it is a township enterprise, an 
enterprise in the foreign-funded enterprise category, or any 
other enterprises not owned by the public. State-owned big and 
medium-sized enterprises were, are, and will continue to be the 
pillar of China's national economy." No doubt, this conclusion 
is quite correct. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66247 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar032___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-032 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  6 April 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Analysis of Current Economy </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Analysis of Current Economy </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0464B Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 6 Apr 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0464B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Commentary by Yan Qialin (7051 0595 2651): "Low Growth or </F>
High Growth--What Is the Actual State of Our National Economy?"] 
  [Text] What is the actual state of the current 
Chinese economy? Based on the new conditions that have 
appeared in our economic operations in the first few months of 
1994, the experts have recently presented certain differing 
views. 
  In 1994, China's industrial production, in addition to 
continuing to be restricted by transportation, energy, and raw 
materials "bottlenecks," has also run into certain new problems, 
the more glaring of which are fund shortages and marketing 
difficulties. In many places, "triangular debt" has resurged, 
not only interfering with normal enterprise production, but also 
having a severe impact on fund turnover, profit and tax 
payments, and employee [wage] distribution. Due to poor sales, 
the first two months of 1994 contrast with the same period in 
1993 as: the manufactured goods sales rate is down 1.6 percent; 
finished goods inventories of independently accounted industrial 
enterprises throughout China top 400 billion yuan, up 30 percent 
from the beginning of 1993. Impacted by funds and sales, 
state-owned industrial production growth in 1994 is nearly 
stagnant, up only 1.2 percent for January and February over the 
same period in 1993. This includes declines in state industrial 
production of 2.4-4.4 percent in places, such as Shanxi, 
Liaoning, Jilin, and Heilongjiang. 
  In light of these phenomena, the analyses of certain 
economics experts hold that this impact on state industry will 
gradually be reflected somewhat in the production and sales of 
township enterprises and other similar types of enterprises, so 
that the Chinese economy in 1994 is likely to see low or even 
zero growth. 
  But certain other experts take the absolutely opposite 
view, holding that 1994's growth rate not only will not be low, 
but even will be higher than 1993's. Their key grounds are 
that overall investment and consumer demand are now both 
brisker. Meanwhile, the growth momentum of coastal and township 
industry remains quite strong, averaging over 20 percent for the 
first two months in places, such as Guangdong, Fujian, and 
Jiangsu; township-run industrial output value is still growing 
at a rate of 49 percent; the growth of the three kinds of 
foreign trade enterprises and private industry is even higher at 
76.4 percent. 
  So will the Chinese economy in 1994 see low growth or 
high growth? It seems that we still need to analyze more 
conditions. 
  As long as China's inflationary pressures are quite 
strong, a too fast economic growth rate will cause high 
inflation, which in turn will severely threaten 1994's overall 
reform and social stability, finally forcing us to take 
"brake-slamming" steps. So while things are tight, an economic 
slide is inevitable. To prevent this, the center has not only 
set forth clear macroeconomic regulation and control 
targets--GNP growth of 9 percent, industrial production growth 
of 15 percent, an investment scale of 1.3 trillion yuan, and new 
loans of 470 billion yuan, but has also taken effective steps, 
such as stopping up "the two floodgates" of money supply and 
credit, and conducting a strict "two controls"--controlling too 
fast growth of investment scale and too much expansion of 
consumption funds. Our experience in the last half of 1993 
showed that as long as we exercise timely macroeconomic 
regulation and control, we can prevent economic overheating, to 
maintain the sustained and sound growth of our national economy. 
So it seems that there is little likelihood that the Chinese 
economy in 1994 will overheat again or see growth rates higher 
than in 1993. 
  Our 1994 growth rates will be neither too high or too 
low. While some areas and enterprises have recently run into 
certain thorny problems, with new conditions appearing in 
economic activities, this will not be enough to impact and 
change our good growth momentum of recent years. In short, the 
international economic climate, domestic public demand, and 
basic industry supply capability and credit fund conditions will 
all support the continued rapid growth of the Chinese 
economy. 
  1. The faster growth of the world economy, 
particularly the recovery of the economies of Western countries 
after 3 years of recession, will provide the opportunity for the 
rapid growth of the Chinese economy. On one hand, investment by 
foreign firms in China will maintain its very brisk momentum; on 
the other, driven by world economic growth, international market 
demand and trade will increase sharply, which will be highly 
beneficial to increased Chinese export trade. 
  2. Since we exercised [tightened] macroeconomic 
regulation and control in the last half of 1993, our residents' 
savings are up sharply, and our banking system, after being 
rectified, has also amassed a sizeable amount of available 
funds. These will both provide funding sources for maintaining 
a definite overall investment scale in 1994, as well as for 
further alleviating enterprise working capital shortages. 
  3. The series of significant reform steps that we took 
at the beginning of 1994 will gradually become a new and 
powerful driving force to promote the sustained growth of the 
Chinese economy. Meanwhile, local governments at all levels 
and enterprises remain subject to an inherent impulse calling 
for faster growth, with the Central Government also emphasizing 
that development opportunities be seized, and certainly not 
hoping that its macroeconomic policy orientation will bring 
growth rates back down too much, to cause a chain reaction and 
shock. 
  4. While 1993's macroeconomic regulation and control 
shrunk capital construction investment somewhat, "projects" 
still exist, with 1994's ongoing scale still quite large, which 
is substantial grounds driving rapid economic growth. As to 
consumer demand, 1994's increase in wages for employees in 
administrative organs and institutions will bring enterprise 
employee wage increases; peasant income is also expected to 
continue to grow steadily. So as both urban and rural incomes 
grow, overall consumer demand, along with consumer markets, will 
maintain steady growth. 
  5. Recently, our transportation, energy, and raw 
materials supply conflicts have eased somewhat. And in light of 
the growth of our basic industry supply capability and our 
import-export adjustment, the rapid growth of the Chinese 
economy in 1994 is also ensured fundamentally and 
materially. 
  In addition, township, the three kinds of foreign 
trade, and private enterprises have not only become a vital 
new force on our economic front, but also are maintaining a 
strong growth momentum. So even though our state industry 
growth rate is not high, this will not have a substantial impact 
on the rapid growth of our national economy in 1994. 
  According to the general pattern of China's 
economic-growth boom-and-bust cycle, after two successive years 
of rapid growth, growth will top out and begin to fall back in 
1994, so that our economic growth rate will decline somewhat. 
But an analysis summing up conditions in all areas shows that 
this decline will not be very large, so that our 1994 economic 
growth rate is likely to remain at about 11 percent. 
  The matter that currently needs attention is the need 
to earnestly tighten and improve our macroeconomic regulation 
and control, by controlling our investment scale, in order to 
curb price rises. The appearance of severe inflation would not 
only have a negative impact on our social stability and reform 
progress, but also would force our economic operations to a 
"hard landing." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66248 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar032___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-032 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  28 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Forecasts of Consumption Trends for 1994 </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Forecasts of Consumption Trends for 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   92CE0432A Beijing ZHONGGUO GUOQING GUOLI (CHINA NATIONAL 
CONDITIONS AND POWER MONTHLY) in Chinese No 1, 28 Jan 94 pp 10-11 </F>

<F P=103> 92CE0432A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO GUOQING GUOLI (CHINA NATIONAL 
CONDITIONS AND POWER MONTHLY) </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Kong Fanjin (1313 4907 6855) of Commercial </F>
Information Center of the Ministry of Domestic Trade: "Trend of 
Supply and Demand of Major Consumer Goods for 1994"] 
  [Text] The market of consumer goods will continue to 
maintain a steady growth in 1994. On the basis of the 
presumption that the GNP will grow 9 percent, the industrial 
production 15 percent, the agricultural production 4 percent, 
the urban and rural residents' incomes 24 percent, the total 
investment in fixed assets 13 percent and all other economic 
targets are fulfilled as planned, the total amount of retail 
sales in 1994 would reach 1.57 trillion yuan, up 18 percent over 
1993. If price increases are factored in, the actual percentage 
would be approximately 7.3 percent, of which the amount of 
retail sales for consumer goods would grow approximately 19 
percent and the capital goods for agriculture approximately 10 
percent. We estimate that the sales of major commodities will be 
as follows: 
  Grain Preliminarily we estimate that China's 
total grain output will be 451.79 million tons. A balance 
between supply and demand will be basically achieved on the 
grain market with a slight over-supply. However, structural 
imbalance will remain existent. This year, the price for 
purchasing farm products will steadily move upwards in general. 
The increase will not be excessively high this year, because 
last year's price was already relatively high. The price 
increase is not expected to exceed 10 percent. As for specific 
varieties of grain, the situation of wheat shortage has been 
alleviated. The supply of wheat will exceed the demand slightly. 
Due to the readjustment of the import policy and the 
introduction of the single foreign exchange rate, the market 
price is expected to go up on a small scale. The prices of 
millet and soybean will remain strong because of the continuous 
expansion of millet and soybean exports and the increasing 
demand of such farm products on the domestic market. The price 
of soybean is expected to rise only slightly, while that of 
millet will be relatively higher. The supply of paddy rice will 
be slightly insufficient, because the area planted with paddy 
rice was dropping every year and its output declined on a large 
scale. It is possible that the situation of rice shortage may 
reappear in some areas. Price increase may be relatively high, 
and there is an inkling of such price increase. The price of 
oil-bearing crops may rise on a large scale this year due to low 
inventory and dwindling output. 
  Cotton. This year's demand for cotton is about 4.5 
million tons. The supply and demand of cotton in China are 
relatively stable. Cotton is mainly used in light industry, 
textile industry, cotton for wadding, exports, cotton reserve 
and other uses. A balance has been basically achieved in the 
exports and imports of cotton in recent years. The use of cotton 
for wadding and other uses is basically stable. The supply and 
demand for cotton in 1994 are mainly dependent on cotton 
production and how much cotton will be used by textiles and 
other light industrial products. After the 10 percent increase 
of the cotton-purchasing price in 1989, the effective supply of 
cotton has increased. The higher cotton price and the rise of 
the production costs for textile products have greatly prevented 
the textile industry from blinding expanding. However, since 
nearly one-third of the capacity in textile industry is idling, 
the supply and demand of cotton have become stable. The export 
of cotton textiles remains basically stable. Due to the limits 
imposed by the international quota, it is difficult to increase 
exports in this connection. On the other hand, the domestic 
cotton price is relatively higher. The advantage in exporting 
cotton and silk products is notably declining, and it is rather 
difficult to compete with others on the international market in 
this connection. 
  In recent years, there have been no major breakthroughs in 
developing cotton varieties and production technology. The 
average per-mu yield of cotton is basically between 50 and 60 
kg. If the area planted with cotton in the whole country is 
maintained at the present level of about 90 million mu, the 
output of cotton will be approximately 4.8 million tons. Thus, 
the total supply and demand of cotton are expected to strike a 
balance in the country. 
  Sugar The supply of sugar may fall short of demand 
this year. The main reasons are as follows: A gap is formed in 
the supply of sugar in the world, and sugar prices skyrocket on 
the international market. In recent years, major sugar-producing 
countries in the world such as Cuba, Thailand and India reported 
reduced sugar production, while sugar consumption is rising. The 
amount of sugar to fill this gap is about 2.84 million tons, 
causing the sugar price to go up. However the demand of 
sugar-consuming countries and districts is growing. In 1993, 
Russia was expected to consume 7.5 million tons of sugar, but it 
only produced two million tons itself. It needed to import a 
large amount of sugar. Under the influence of the supply and 
demand of sugar in these countries, tremendous changes have 
taken place in the relations between the imports and exports of 
sugar in China. China has become a purely sugar-exporting nation 
from a purely sugar-importing nation in 1991. According to 
customs statistics, a total of 1.06 million tons of sugar were 
exported and 250,000 tons of sugar imported between October 1992 
and April 1993, leaving a net export of 810,000 tons of sugar, 
up 710,000 tons over the same period in the previous year. In 
addition, the sugar reserve in stock is dwindling, and the area 
planted with sugar-bearing crops is shrinking. The supply of 
sugar is expected to be scant in 1994. 
  The sales of articles of daily use will be basically at the 
same level as before. The demand for bicycles, wrist watches, 
sewing machines and aluminum wares will be somewhat greater. The 
sales of other articles of daily use will be about the same or 
slightly weak. However, products of higher grades will be in 
great demand. Consumers will prefer products of higher quality, 
new designs and better features. Particularly they will prefer 
stainless steel cooking utensils and electric appliances. They 
will tend to buy more high-quality perfumed soap and cosmetic 
manufactured by Sino-foreign joint ventures. 
  For bicycles, consumers prefer to lighter, smaller, more 
convenient ones with variable gear-shifts. The sales of mountain 
bicycles will notably increase. There will be an over-supply of 
sewing machines on the market, and the inventory would increase. 
The sales may somewhat go up slightly when new models appear on 
the market. There will be an over-supply of wrist watches, and 
the inventory would increase. 
  The supply and demand of soap, toothpaste, detergent, 
aluminum pots, thermos and other articles of daily use will 
level off. Due to the increase of varieties and reasonable 
prices, utensils made of plastic material will register a steady 
growth. There will be little changes in the sales and marketing 
of canned goods, after their prices bottom out. The export of 
toys will rise, but not much efforts are being made in pushing 
domestic sales. There is a large potential to sell toys 
domestically. The general trend in the sales of enamelware has 
changed. Now, the supply exceeds demand instead of the supply 
falling short of demand several years ago. The market demand 
will drop, because the enamelware products are gradually being 
replaced by their plastic counterparts. 
  The sales of durable goods with low inventory in cities will 
increase such as motorcycles, air conditioners, video tape 
recorders, video cameras, computers, high-quality audio 
equipment and health care products. The demand of such products 
will drop in medium-sized and small cities, but the total demand 
of such products in the whole society will grow. The market for 
refrigerators will flourish. The prospect in exporting more 
electric fans is good, although the domestic demand for such 
fans is decreasing. In short, the total demand for electric fans 
is rising. The demand for air conditioners and ceiling fans will 
increase, while that for table electric fans will level off. The 
demand for color television sets will increase slightly. More 
color television sets will be sold in medium-sized and small 
cities and flourishing rural areas instead of large cities. The 
demand for table-model recorders, imported pocket-sized radio 
sets and boom boxes with CD players will increase. Stereo 
equipment in the 2,500 yuan price range will become popular. In 
addition, there will a good market for electric heating shower 
equipment, kitchen exhaust fans, microwave ovens, rice cookers, 
food processors, electric ovens, air purifiers, heating 
equipment for health care and other home appliances. 
  This forecast is made on the basis of the following reasons: 
  1. The macro-economy is being developed healthily, and the 
supply of commodities is continuously increasing. According to a 
preliminary estimate made by a relevant department, the total 
value of commodity supply for 1994 will reach 1.655 trillion 
yuan, and the supply of commodities will exceed demand by 
approximately 55 billion yuan. 
  2. There will be a steady growth of residents' income. If 
factors such as the gradual increase of government employees' 
salaries and its influence as well as the price adjustment of 
major rural products are taken into consideration, this year's 
growth rate of residents' actual incomes is expected to be 
higher than that in the last year. The workers' wage is expected 
to increase 21.8 percent, slightly higher than the 21.6 percent 
in the previous year. The per-capita peasants' net income will 
be close to 1,000 yuan with its growth rate exceeding 13 percent 
(12.2 percent in the previous year). 
  3. There will be more investments in capital construction. 
The total amount of investment in fixed assets in 1993 is 
expected to reach 1.15 trillion yuan, up approximately 46 
percent over that in 1992. It is estimated that this figure will 
reach 1.3 trillion yuan in 1994, up about 150 billion yuan over 
1993. 
  4. There will a reasonable growth in institutional 
purchases. The rate of growth in 1993 is expected to be 
approximately 25 percent. The expenditure of social groups for 
consumer goods will still go upwards. 
  5. There will be more currency issued this year as compared 
with the last year. The total amount of currency issued in 1993 
is expected to be between 29 and 38 percent higher than that in 
1992. The amount issued in 1994 will be higher than that in 1993. 
  6. The sales of some commodities will decline. Due to 
considerable fluctuations in the exchange rate, the delay in 
re-entering the GATT, the large-scale price increases and the 
relatively low interest rate for deposits, some residents rushed 
to buy imported or domestically manufactured high-quality home 
appliances and jewelry made of gold during the first half of 
1993. These purchases, which were ahead of season, will push the 
price of such commodities down this year. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66249 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar032___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-032 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  20 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Economists Predict Bumpy Road for Reform </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Economists Predict Bumpy Road for Reform </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0415A Chongqing GAIGE [REFORM] in Chinese No 1, 20 Jan 
94 pp 93-105 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0415A </F>
<F P=104>  Chongqing GAIGE [REFORM] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with economists by GAIGE reporter Hu Shuli (5170 </F>
5289 4539): "Reform in 1994 Expected To Be More Risky, 
Difficult"] 
  [Text] "It is one of the fundamental characteristics of an 
individualistic capitalistic economy that it is rationalized on 
the basis of rigorous calculation, directed with foresight and 
caution toward the economic success which is sought in sharp 
contrast to the hand-to-mouth existence of the peasant, and to 
the privileged traditionalism of the guild craftsman and of the 
adventurers' capitalism, oriented to the exploitation of 
political opportunities and irrational speculation." 
  -- Max Weber, The Protestant Ethic and the Spirit of 
Capitalism 
  As they ushered in 1994, many Chinese economists were both 
excited and a little anxious. 
  "The Decision of the CPC Central Committee on Certain Issues 
Relating to the Building of a Socialist Market Economy," 
unveiled a year ago, has been described by the press in a 
variety of bold and lofty terms: "a grand design," "a call to 
arms." While the man on the street felt inspired by these 
necessary comments, economists adept at independent thinking, 
having understood the content and implications of the 
"Decision," have begun to foresee the grim challenges facing 
China as it works to implement the document. 
  Henceforth, as someone said, China has entered an era when 
"reform is an utterly mental exercise." Nineteen ninety-four 
happens to be the first year of rational reform. 
  Rationality--The Soul of the Market Economy 
  "Speed up reform, speed up development," so says the 
"Decision." It is clear what "speed up development" means both 
theoretically and practically. That "development is the way to 
go" is now deeply etched in the public psychology. But what 
about "speed up reform?" 
  We must realize that reform in China has always been a 
gradual process, moving from the countryside to cities, from 
special economic zones and the coast to the interior, from the 
establishment of individual enterprises, township and town 
enterprises, and foreign-funded enterprises to the 
transformation of the mechanism of state enterprises, and from 
the price decontrol of some commodities to the abolition of 
command planning. In the 15 years since reform began, there have 
been ups and downs, twists and turns, but the upshot is a 
miracle that has caught the attention of the world, fueled the 
spectacular growth of the economy--and, by spawning a host of 
problems that are as distressing as they are stubborn, exacted a 
steep price. At the numerous seminars and conferences held in 
Beijing in the past half year, economists have enumerated, from 
a variety of perspectives, the costs of the current reform with 
its dual-track system: 
  Cost 1: The boom-and-bust economic cycle. When controls are 
tightened, life is snuffed out of the economy. When things are 
eased up, there is chaos. 
  Cost 2: The loss of state properties. Rising corruption. 
  Cost 3: Urban-rural gap widens. Inequitable distribution. 
  Cost 4: Financial disorder. The "bubble effect." 
  Look more closely, and you can find the fifth, sixth, 
seventh, eighth, and even twentieth costs. An article, perhaps 
even a tome, can be written on each one of them. 
  There is probably not a single economist who believes reform 
comes without a price tag. There is probably nobody who 
fantasizes writing a cure-all prescription. We hope that in the 
future reform does not come with a price. Nevertheless, anybody 
remotely familiar with the theory and practice of the modern 
market economy knows that economic life characterized by 
arbitrariness, corruption, and disorder is not inherent in the 
market itself but is exactly the opposite. It is a sheer 
misunderstanding to think that a market economy is inevitably a 
filthy thing, "every pore oozing with blood from head to toe." 
The reason is that at the heart of the modern market economy is 
rationality, including the rational activities of microeconomic 
organizations and the rationalization and rationality of the 
social macro control mechanism and the legal framework. 
  However, far removed the dual economic structure may be from 
the old order, if it fails to complete the transition to the 
market system based on the principle of rationality, at best it 
becomes an embryonic but distorted version of a market economy. 
  This is precisely why those clear-headed economists 
earnestly 
hope and strongly call for reform to be accelerated and deepened 
across the board even as they praise the achievements of past 
reform without reservation. 
  Some sharp words have been uttered. Dr. Du Runsheng [2629 
3387 3932], the 80-year-old president of the China Land 
Institute, for instance, told reporters as early as last summer 
that we must start thinking about merging the two tracks of the 
dual-track system right now. Not that we do not need the 
dual-track system; in fact, it is essential. But there are two 
sides to everything in the world, even good things. Today we 
must accelerate the transition from the dual-track system to a 
market economy conscientiously and purposefully in accordance 
with a plan. Any more flip-flops and the masses will have little 
confidence in reform. 
  Then, there is Fan Hengshan [5400 1854 1472], who has a 
doctorate in economics and works in the State Restructuring of 
the Economic System Commission. Not long ago he spoke to this 
reporter with the bluntness and intelligence of youth. "The 
negative effects of the conflicts and loopholes of the 
dual-track system have now outweighed the positive results of 
reform. We have reached the `uppermost limit' of tolerable 
reform costs. Whether or not we can swiftly go beyond the 
`uppermost limit' has become a choice which we must make without 
delay and which will decide the success or failure of reform." 
  The "Decision" adopted by the 3d Plenum of the 14th CPC 
Central Committee and its appendices make up a lengthy document. 
In summing up the overall reform mission called for by the 
"Decision," economists use a variety of terms: "dual-track 
coexistence," "all-round coordinated reform," "reform of key 
areas," and "the macro policy environment necessary for the 
creation of a market economy." Perhaps more than the stirring 
eulogistic language -- "the great bridge," "blueprint," "call to 
arms"--used by the press, it is these honest down-to-earth 
characterizations by the economists which can better help us 
understand the nature of the "Decision" and the arduousness of 
the reform facing us. The call to "speed up reform" was made 
with the mission in mind. Not for a moment can one interpret it 
as an ordinary exhortation. 
  Well, then, should the new round of reform be the "storming 
of a fortified position" or incremental reform? 
  Some people look at it this way: Reform today still depends 
on a stable social environment. Thus the strategy of moving 
incrementally in general but going for breakthroughs at specific 
points should be continued. At the present stage, however, with 
its basic characteristic of "storming fortified positions," an 
over-emphasis on incrementalism and stability may cause us to 
miss opportunities and artificially lengthen the transitional 
period, ultimately making reform more risky and costly. We must 
zero in on the key links and grasp the favorable opportunity to 
achieve a breakthrough. 
  Read the "Decision" more carefully and you will come across 
this line: "Push ahead on all fronts and go for breakthroughs 
where they really matter." Now we know. 
<H5>  Over-Heating or Over-Anxious? </H5>
  It was a drizzly evening soon after the closing of the 
plenary session of the CPC Central Committee. Inside the 
professors' building, which is part of the faculty and staff 
quarters on the campus of Beijing Normal University, Professor 
Wu Jinglian [0702 2417 8834] was at his desk revising the 
commentary he had written for ZHONGHUA GONGSHANG SHIBAO. The 
title: "Take the First Step and Do It Right." 
  Wu Jinglian, currently a researcher with the State Council's 
Development Studies Center, had just returned from South Korea 
four days earlier. As soon as he arrived back in Beijing, he 
telephoned Ding Wang [0002 2598], editor-in-chief of ZHONGHUA 
GONGSHANG SHIBAO. Even when he was on the road, this economist, 
who cares for the nation and the people, was thinking how to 
take the critical first step after the "Decision" was unveiled. 
  The first thing that came to his mind was the economic 
climate. 
  As he saw it, to ensure that reform measures already decided 
upon are implemented as planned, the foremost task is to 
continue to create a favorable economic climate and keep it that 
way, preventing the economy from overheating and inflation from 
coming back. Otherwise, the new reform may be derailed as soon 
as it is introduced and in the end we may, to our eternal 
regret, miss a splendid opportunity to push ahead with reform. 
  These views were shared by a number of other economists. 
  Not long ago interested experts from the Chinese Academy of 
Science and the State Statistical Bureau jointly conducted a 
study to analyze the economic situation and make projections. 
According to that study, the "soft-landing" of the economy in 
1994 following the tightening of macroeconomic regulation and 
control in the summer of 1993 may produce any one of several 
possible outcomes: 
  Outcome 1: The various regulatory and control 
measures are applied with the right degree of intensity and are 
coordinated from top to bottom, bringing the overheated economy 
under control. Inflation begins heading downward and the 
economic growth rate drops to 10 percent or so. Even in times of 
economic retrenchment, banking reform, fiscal reform, and tax 
reform are intensified, nudging state enterprises to enter the 
market. After a smooth transition, the economy enters a 
prolonged period of steady growth. 
  Outcome 2: Macroeconomic regulation and control 
goes a little too far. Excessive retrenchment decelerates the 
economy a tad too much, forcing the economy to "hard land." 
Although the scale of investment and price increases are reined 
in, we fail to shift the focus of regulation and control to 
adjusting the optimizing the structure. In the end, economic 
development suffers. Not only that, but the seeds of a new round 
of "overheating" have been sown. 
  Outcome 3: To avoid the disruptions of structural 
adjustment and yielding to pressure brought on by the string of 
problems resulting from decelerated economic growth, economic 
reform is stalled out. There is a lack of firm resolve in the 
face of a chorus of complaints from localities and enterprises. 
To stimulate an economic recovery, the government hastily adopts 
a liberal monetary policy, loosens its grip on the scale of 
investment, and boosts the money supply. The result is a 
premature expansion of the economy and the resumption of 
inflation, forcing the policymakers to readjust again by putting 
on the brakes. 
  In their analysis the experts said that currently Outcome 1 
is the desired outcome, Outcome 2 will not materialize in the 
near future, and we need to be on guard against a premature 
rebound of the economy, which is the last outcome. 
  Wu Jinglian also said, "The rate of economic growth is 
merely 
the synergistic result of a variety of factors working together, 
such as institutions and policies that constrain economic 
growth, and not the cause of changes in economic development. In 
China, where idle resources available for retrospective 
investment are scarce, the rate of economic growth is directly 
proportional to the real gain in productivity. To avoid economic 
overheating, we should not use the economic growth rate as the 
central indicator to guide our work." 
  Wishes and expectations, however, are no substitute for 
reality. Professor Zhang Zhuoyuan [1728 0587 0337], director of 
the Finance and Trade Institute of the Chinese Academy of Social 
Sciences [CASS], said after taking a sober look at the state of 
the economy, "If the present trends are any indicator, there is 
little hope that Outcome One in the above analysis can be 
realized in 1994. The likelihood of Outcome 2 materializing is 
also slim. In contrast, there is a good chance we may end up 
with Outcome 3: the economy taking off again without landing, 
finally leading to a hard-landing." He added, "The most likely 
scenario is a cross between outcomes 1 and 3. If it turns out to 
bear a closer resemblance to 1 than 3, we should consider 
ourselves lucky." 
  Thus it is unlikely the new round of reform will be smooth 
sailing. 
  Needless to say, some economists reject the "overheating" 
scenario. At Changchunyuan on the campus of Beijing University 
that same drizzly early-winter evening, Xiao Zhuoji [5618 3504 
1015], a well-known economics professor, told this reporter 
unequivocally, "The fact of the matter is that we need not worry 
that the Chinese economy will overheat." 
  Professor Xiao Zhuoji argued that economic development in 
China is cyclical, with each cycle lasting seven years. For 
three and one-half years, we have robust growth, followed by 
another three years and a half of adjustment. During the period 
of strong growth, the economy surges ahead at the rate of 13 to 
14 percent, which is both inevitable and normal. When we analyze 
inflation, we need to look at the causes behind it. Inflation in 
China after 1993 has something to do with the lifting of price 
controls and the increase in the business tax, not the 
over-expansion of the money supply. Therefore, Xiao Zhuoji said, 
we should not exaggerate its danger. 
  Xiao Zhuoji also produced some data showing that real 
household incomes outpaced inflation in the first half of 1993, 
when urban and rural household incomes still rose 12 percent and 
4 percent, respectively, after adjusting for inflation. With 
income rising faster than inflation, the fear of some experts 
that "households may have unrealistic expectations" is quite 
redundant. 
  What then would be an appropriate rate of economic growth in 
1994? In Professor Xiao Zhuoji's opinion, not lower than 10 
percent. 
  Professor Xiao Zhuoji's opinion has quite a large following. 
His supporters say, "Don't worry about slow growth. The worst 
thing is standing still. The Chinese economy used to follow a 
stop-go pattern. To date it is galloping along, and that is 
normal. Moreover, the very concept of `overheating' is less than 
clear." 
  In any case, it is both good and normal for reform-minded 
economists in China to disagree among themselves and debate with 
one another. All of them rightly wish to push ahead with the 
enterprise of economic reform in China. In the end, their 
arguments also will be tested in practice. 
<H5>  Who Will "Weaken" Reform? </H5>
  Economists consider "overheating" in terms of its effects on 
the external environment for the next round of reform. But there 
is another concern, namely that reform would be "weakened" by 
purely internal human factors. 
  Reform measures must be put into effect by human beings. The 
reform measures newly introduced by the CPC Central Committee 
directly involve a number of departments in charge of 
administration and management, the very same departments most 
deeply rooted in the old order. To ask these people to bid 
farewell to tradition and take the initiative to advance the 
re-invention of the economic system as well as the overhaul of 
the functions of their units is no different from asking them to 
take up the scalpel to operate on themselves. How can we ensure 
that they will make the first cut? 
  Fang Fenglei [2455 7364 7191], a young economist who is 
deputy director of the Investment and Market Research Institute 
under the Chinese Academy of Management Science and currently 
managing director of the Hainan Sanya Yinjian Company, recently 
convened and presided over an international conference in 
Shenzhen on banking reform. He summed up the upcoming 
macroeconomic reform in one sentence, "The difficulty lies in 
maintaining intensity and momentum." 
  Fang Fenglei said, "It must be admitted that reform has 
fallen behind badly in such key areas as banking, foreign 
exchange, finance, taxation, and foreign trade. The inertia of 
traditional forces is exceptionally powerful. How can we be sure 
that people who operated in accordance with standard procedures 
under the traditional system will now take the initiative to 
spearhead reform in their own units energetically? If the new 
reform is stalled out even before it is launched because of some 
human factors, the impact on the creation of a market economy as 
a whole would be enormous." 
  He agreed that we should certainly think strategically and 
phase in new reform measures gradually in stages. Be that as it 
may, the stress should be on the need to firmly implement the 
CPC Central Committee's "Decision" and prevent the departments 
involved from using all sorts of excuses to undermine the 
leadership's resolve in the course of implementation, thereby 
weakening the new reform and precluding the realization of the 
reform demands already put forward. Alternatively they may keep 
dragging their feet in launching the new reform plan. In the 
end, the latter may never see the light of day. 
  Of course, the danger of weakening reform comes not only 
from 
conservative-minded operatives but also from vested interests 
who have benefited enormously and tangibly from exploiting the 
loopholes of the dual-track system in the past decade and more 
of incremental reform. This is something the experts all agreed 
on. 
  Just open any newspaper or glance at the television and you 
can get an idea. Since when has white-collar crime in China 
meant cases involving millions, even tens of millions, of yuan? 
Since when have white-collar criminals in China been moving in 
and out of the country? Since when has white-collar crime spread 
all over the land, from north to south, from east to west, from 
Beijing to every province? It is impossible to uproot human 
greed, but what sort of external environment has given it such a 
hospitable breeding ground? Apart from those criminals who have 
committed the most flagrant crimes and been punished in 
accordance with the law, how many others have so far escaped the 
long arm of the law? 
  Some of the data are shocking: 
  -- In 1987 alone, the price differential of all controlled 
commodities amounted to more than 130 billion yuan, the 
interest-on-funds differential totaled about 20 billion yuan, 
and the foreign exchange price differential amounted to 50 
billion yuan, for a combined price differential society-wide of 
more than 200 billion yuan. Since price differentials are on 
this mammoth a scale and there are so many institutional 
loopholes, the exploiters reaped a windfall of a whopping 10 
billion yuan even if they pocketed only 5 percent of the 
differential income. 
  -- Investment loans totalled 2,200 billion yuan or so in 
1992. Because interest rates were so low and the demand for 
funds was so strong, private kickbacks accounted for 10 percent 
of that sum at least. Here alone we are looking at 220 billion 
yuan in hidden bribes. 
  This is only the tip of the iceberg of economic 
opportunities 
available to the vested interests. 
  Those who break the law are in the minority, but it is 
totally conceivable that all over China there are countless 
people who have made a fortune legally or not illegally by 
taking advantage of a policy or a law, who started out with 
quite modest expectations but ended up making a killing anyway 
because the distorted market "favored" them, who got caught up 
in the real estate speculation fever or stock market fever and 
who always hope to reap a bonanza from the current dual-track 
system even thought they have not done so yet... 
  Referring to this situation, Lin Yifu [2651 3015 1133], a 
Taiwanese who holds a Ph.D. in economics and has come to China 
from the University of Chicago, made the following comment: 
"Reform no doubt entails the reshuffle of the old pattern of 
vested interests. But because a new environment of competition 
has not come into being even as the old interest structure is 
being reformed and shaken up, and because not every individual 
or interest group has been put on a level playing field even as 
new profit-making opportunities are being created, public 
expectations of reform have been skewed. Some people expect too 
much, and if their expectations are not met completely, they 
become skeptical and hesitant about reform. Other social groups 
who don't expect good things from reform may boycott a 
particular piece of reform. People in both groups may be tempted 
to think and act opportunistically and make a killing, rendering 
reform more difficult and risky." 
  The fact of the matter is that the new vested interests 
created in recent years are definitely not limited to a 
particular trade, profession, or unit. Nor do they form any 
clear-cut interest group. Also, not every person who forms part 
of the vested interests joins the forces consciously opposed to 
the continuation of reform. However, it is a fact that vested 
interests are present from top to bottom, from the coast to the 
interior, to varying extents and in different forms. It is also 
a fact that vested interests not only exist in industry, 
commerce, and the agencies in charge of the economy, but have 
also spread to other government departments, to judicial and 
political circles, to the world of letters, to the cultural and 
theoretical circles, and to the media. 
  In his analysis of this situation, Wu Jinglian said that by 
providing spectacular opportunities for people who abuse their 
office for private gain or who take advantage of a malformed 
market to reap staggering profits, the prolonged existence of 
the dual-track system has enabled corrosive vested interests to 
grow. The vested interests and their representatives, therefore, 
are not categorically opposed to reform, much less calling for a 
return to the old beaten path of the planned economy. On the 
other hand, pleased as they are with the dual-track system, they 
argue against abolishing administrative intervention and call on 
us to go slow with market regularization. Since reform revolves 
around the creation of a market system for fair competition, 
these people instinctively take unkindly to and oppose such 
reform. 
  This is precisely why, Professor Wu Jinglian reminds us, 
that 
the vested interests, which are extremely powerful, may work to 
distort the new round of reform while holding high the banner of 
reform so as to create new opportunities to "trade power for 
money," "engage in insider trading," and "play money games." As 
a result, reform may become warped and distorted, in the end 
departing from the right course. As a matter of fact, similar 
things have happened many times in the course of reform in the 
past several years. 
  In an analysis a year ago of the current situation in China, 
Ji Si Dao, chief Beijing correspondent for the NEW YORK TIMES, 
wrote, "Although things are going well now, it is hard to tell 
whether in the future China will become a dragon like Singapore 
or degenerate into yet another Latin American amoeba." 
  Look at the world around us and we can see that after World 
War II a number of developing nations have fallen into the 
so-called "Malthus trap" and exhibit the "Latin American 
phenomenon." In those countries, an embryonic market economy 
combined with administrative intervention and bureaucratic 
privilege to give rise to a bureaucratic elite composed of the 
rich and the powerful who owe their wealth to "rent-seeking 
activities." The market economy was never developed fully and in 
the end the economy suffered a disastrous decline. 
  Reportedly a Beijing doctor normally with no interest in 
politics blurted out this biting epigram when faced with 
bureaucrats who spout fine-sounding slogans but in reality 
pervert justice for a bribe, "I see what you mean by socialist 
market economy. People who used to have power now have money as 
well... that is `socialist market economy.'" As long as a theory 
remains empirically unverified, we can only make logical 
inferences. The socialist market economy will finally prove that 
this and other bitter sarcasms from the masses will not become a 
harsh reality. 
  So far we can still congratulate ourselves on not missing 
the 
chance to effect the transition from the old system to the new 
system smoothly. There is no reason to believe that resistance 
by the vested interests can really block our march toward a 
market economy. But think more carefully. The inertia bred by 15 
years of incremental reform is humongous. So there is indeed a 
possibility that the new round of reform may be weakened so much 
by human factors that it becomes deformed or stillborn. 
  Come to think of it, clearly it is not because they have an 
identical power of visualization that almost all economists 
invariably refer to the coming round of reform as a "battle to 
storm a heavily fortified position." As we take the first step 
of reform in 1994, we should really interpret "storming a 
heavily fortified position" accurately as a scientific 
expression and not an example of poetic hyperbole. That way we 
will be more determined and firm in our resolve, summoning up 
even greater intelligence and courage to face up to the new 
reform tasks. 
<H5>  Exploring Ideological Liberation, I: State Ownership </H5>
  After the "Decision" was made public, I talked to many 
scholars, experts, party and government cadres, and 
entrepreneurs. Their consensus: "It seems that the difficulties 
of implementing the `Decision' cannot be underestimated." Dr. 
Fan Hengshan, in particular, hit the nail on the head when he 
said "I think the main problem ahead is not that we don't have a 
well-defined reform philosophy, but that our thinking is not 
liberated." 
  Ideological liberation is an old topic. Reformers harp back 
on it in the face of new reform tasks because they realize full 
well that the forces of traditional thinking cast a long shadow 
on the road to reform. 
  Economists link the proposal of ideological liberation not 
only to the overall goal of reform as stated in the "Decision," 
which is to create and perfect a market economy, but also 
directly to other more specific major issues, which are of 
fundamental importance. 
  Three matters are particularly worthy of mentioning. One is 
public ownership, more specifically, the property rights of 
state enterprises. 
  Some economists ask, "With economic reform having gone this 
far, what should we concentrate on now so that the new system 
can take center stage?" Among the many priorities, the foremost 
is the reform of the state enterprise system. And it is the 
property rights issue that lies at the heart of the reform of 
the state enterprise system. 
  At long last the "Decision" adopted by the latest plenary 
session puts forward a plan for a modern enterprise system and 
offers an innovative interpretation of the principle of 
upholding the predominance of public ownership, thus 
highlighting the issue of modernizing public property rights. 
However, the fact of the matter is that the dominance of the 
traditional way of adhering to public ownership remains 
stubbornly enshrined both on a conceptual level and in practical 
terms. 
  China still had 13,600 large- and medium-sized state 
enterprises as of 1992 with a combined output value of 1,350 
billion yuan. Two-thirds of these enterprises are losing money, 
while the remainder is marginally profitable. What are the 
negative effects of this situation on national economic 
development and on the overall drive to create a market economy? 
  Fan Hengshan sums up the four characteristics of the 
existing 
way of sustaining public ownership: 
  -- Emphasis on form, not content or result. In other words, 
the only thing that matters is whether or not property rights 
belong to the state, not whether an enterprise is being operated 
in a way that preserves the value of public properties and adds 
to such value. 
  -- We are interested only in the overall size, never mind 
the 
actual results. That is, what concerns us is that the state 
economy accounts for over 51 percent of the overall economy, 
never mind whether or not it actually plays a guiding and 
regularizing role in national economic life. 
  -- The emphasis is solely on state properties in the form of 
goods and materials, not state properties in the form of money. 
In other words, there is a belief that only state properties in 
tangible material form are real public properties. 
  -- There is a preoccupation with the static, with preserving 
what already exists, while little is done to encourage fluidity 
and value appreciation. The belief is that the only way to 
prevent state assets from being lost is to leave them alone. 
  He calls this a passive way of maintaining public ownership, 
the only consequence of which is to reduce existing state assets 
to an "empty shell" while weakening the ability to increase 
their volume. In the end, state assets will be lost in large 
quantities. 
  After 15 years of reform, whither state enterprises? This 
has 
become a most thorny issue in the enterprise of reform as a 
whole. From the contract system of the mid-1980's to the 
proposal put forward two years ago to transform the operating 
mechanism of enterprises, state enterprise reformers have 
experimented in all sorts of ways within the framework of 
delegating power and sharing profits with enterprises and 
localities. But they have yet to turn the state enterprises 
around. At the heart of their predicament is the failure to come 
to grips with property rights. 
  The time has come, Fan Hengshan says, to clearly define 
property rights relations and thoroughly overhaul the fuzzy 
public ownership model in which "everybody is an owner but 
nobody is responsible." As long as this issue is not resolved, 
the mission put forward by the "Decision" of creating a modern 
enterprise system will not be accomplished and the reform of 
large- and medium-sized state enterprises will only go around in 
circles. 
  Actually, it is not hard to come up with a coherent set of 
thinking on resolving the property rights issue. What is hard is 
liberating our thought, transcending the limits of traditional 
thought, and proceeding from the general goal of establishing a 
socialist market economy to understand public ownership and the 
nature of the property rights of state enterprises correctly. 
  It was the night before the closing of the 3d Plenary of the 
14th CPC Central Committee. Yu Guangyuan [0060 0342 6678], the 
philosopher and economist of the older generation, spent the 
evening writing a short article at his home in Beijing. He said, 
"I hope reform will become more radical. Not only deeper, but 
also faster." He also believed now is the time to make a mighty 
effort to "wrestle with the reform of ownership structure." 
  Reform of the ownership structure--state enterprise property 
rights--the modern enterprise system, that is, the company 
system. If we conceptually shy away from this fundamental issue, 
how can we even begin to talk about moving forward? 
<H5>  Exploring Ideological Liberation, II: From "Overtaking" to </H5>
Practical 
  There is another issue which is probably just as 
fundamental: 
"choosing a development strategy," in the words of some 
economists. 
  There is a small ordinary-looking building near 
Xihuangchenggen in Beijing. It is inside this unremarkable 
building that some economists seclude themselves in 
inconspicuous spots to study the mundane issues of agriculture. 
  In fact, it is precisely here that a number of brilliant 
minds are watching China's future economic development model 
from the perspective of agriculture and examining the theories 
of development. Bear in mind that there are 1 billion peasants 
in China and that to this day China remains an agricultural 
country. These economists understand agriculture and hence China 
very well. 
  Winter had arrived in Beijing; a cold front lingered in town 
for several days. Braving the snow and the wind, this reporter 
went to the small building to interview some of the experts 
there and ask them to analyze the difficulties that may be 
encountered after the "Decision" was introduced. 
  It is clear what they think: To implement the "Decision," we 
need to liberate our thinking as far as development strategy is 
concerned. 
  Dr. Lin Yifu talked about this in considerable detail. This 
young economist, who once studied under Theodore Schultz, a 
Nobel Laureate, at the University of Chicago and is currently a 
researcher at the rural office of the State Council Development 
Studies Center, has been involved in development economics 
research for years. 
  Lin Yifu said, "The `Decision' is a very good document, the 
most comprehensive since reform began. In its design of the 
macro policy environment, the `Decision' is consistent with the 
premises of a market economy. However, if we, in implementing 
the document, still cling to old habits and ideologically favor 
the heavy-industry-first development strategy, it may be quite 
difficult to put the `Decision' into effect." 
  The "Decision," for instance, calls for establishing markets 
for capital goods, allowing the market to set the prices of 
funds and raw materials, and decontrolling exchange rates. 
However, many industries will not make it if the dictates of the 
market are really followed in making choices. After decades of 
development, some industries now have existence potential, but a 
majority still don't. For some industries whose development is 
considered critical, overly high interest rates would be 
intolerable. For other industries which need to import equipment 
from overseas, excessively high exchange rates would also be a 
big problem. To support these industries, should we continue a 
coordinated policy of a welfare nature? 
  Hence the need to change our thinking about development 
strategy. In practical economic work, that means jettisoning the 
old "overtaking strategy" of emphasizing heavy industry and 
embark on the road of development that is suited to China's 
conditions. Only thus can the various reforms proposed in the 
"Decision" be implemented. 
  What kind of development strategic thinking, then, should 
China adopt? Lin Yifu's answer: the comparative advantage 
strategy. 
  The so-called comparative advantage strategy means fully 
exploiting the comparative economic advantage in product 
technology and industrial structure at every stage of economic 
development as a means of generating fast economic growth. There 
is a perfect fit between the comparative advantage strategy and 
the macro policy environment described in the "Decision" with 
its full-fledged market economy. For instance, since China has a 
huge population but is short on arable land and funds, it should 
work harder to develop labor-intensive enterprises. Only by 
making full use of this comparative advantage--cheaper and 
internationally competitive products--can it accumulate funds 
fairly and swiftly. When it becomes capital-rich instead of 
fund-poor, China can then move onto the development of 
capital-intensive industries. 
  Actually, the post-war economic history of a number of 
developing countries speaks volumes. 
  The economies of India, the Philippines, and Argentina, have 
consistently been slow-growth economies. These countries have 
one thing in common: In hastening to overtake developed nations, 
they have overlooked their own comparative advantage; their sole 
preoccupation was to develop a capital-intensive industrial 
system against a backdrop of fund shortages. The result: more 
haste, less speed. 
  Although they started out at a lower level than many 
countries in South and Central America, countries and regions 
such as Taiwan, Hong Kong, South Korea, Singapore, and other 
latecomers like Thailand, Indonesia, and Malaysia either have 
taken off economically or are about to do so. These nations too 
have one thing in common: Following the principle of comparative 
advantage, they relied on labor-intensive or resource-intensive 
industries as the engine of economic growth and devoted 
themselves to developing an export-oriented economy. As a 
result, they accumulated a wealth of funds, making possible 
industrial upgrading. 
  One other fact must be made clear: It is those very 
countries 
that made "overtaking" their goal with no regard to natural 
conditions that had no choice but to resort to anti-market 
policies and management systems. To rely on comparative 
advantage, which is more pragmatic, we must create a market 
environment that allows full competition. 
  According to a number of young and middle-aged economists, 
China did adopt a development strategy that favored the 
development of heavy industry in the early days of the PRC but 
rethought its priorities as early as the 1960's, when the 
strategy of "agriculture, light industry, and heavy industry" 
was advanced. In the dozen years since reform went under way and 
the open policy was introduced, even less was ahead about giving 
heavy industry priority. In those same years, rapid gains were 
indeed made in agriculture and the textile and light industries. 
Even now, however, people have not risen above the mentality of 
"developing heavy industry first" as part of the guiding thought 
for economic work. This is actually at variance with the overall 
plan of creating a market economy put forward by the CPC Central 
Committee in its "Decision." Thus in thinking about the 
development strategy, we should liberate our thought even 
further. 
  One other person has talked about using comparative 
advantage 
from yet another angle. He is Du Runsheng, who comes from an 
older generation of economists and is one of China's most 
authoritative experts on rural issues. 
  I went to interview Du Runsheng just as a debate was raging 
within the economics community on the relations between reform 
and development. Asked about this, old Du Runsheng said, 
"Development and reform... Development is the right thing to do, 
but sometimes it should give way to reform. Development should 
slow down a little in some years if necessary." Then he said 
something very meaningful, "Some things both advance reform and 
speed up development. Given the situation in China today, we 
must come to grips with one thing, namely employment." 
  In old Du Runsheng's opinion, China's ample manpower is both 
a burden and an opportunity. China should redouble its effort to 
develop enterprises which require little capital but provide 
lots of jobs, thus creating many employment opportunities. We 
should solve the problem of money-losing enterprises without 
delay and shift the resources to the development of enterprises 
that create many jobs. In the process we also put to use our 
comparative advantage. The employment issue lies at the very 
heart of the drive to change and develop Chinese society. 
  While Du Runsheng did not expound on the theory of 
development strategy, it is clear he was on the same track as 
Lin Yifu and others. As China is perched on the threshold of a 
new round of reform, these economists' original but pragmatic 
thinking should be an inspiration to us all. 
  Exploring Ideological Liberation, III: "Weak Government?" 
"Strong Government?" 
  Since last fall a young man and his idea have shaken up the 
economics community and caused a good deal of controversy. 
  The scholar is none other than Dr. Hu Angang [5170 7254 
6921], a researcher with the state of the nation analysis group 
at the Chinese Academy of Sciences [CAS]. The idea is that the 
power of the Chinese Government has been in decline steadily. 
  For over two years Hu Angang and a Chinese scholar in the 
United States named Wang Shaoguang [3769 4801 342] conducted a 
quantitative analysis and comparative study in the United 
States. In a report completed last May on the state of the 
nation, they argued that because of the diminished ability of 
the central government in recent years to raise revenue, the 
Chinese Government has become a "weak government" in name and in 
fact. 
  These young men came back from the other shore and touched a 
raw nerve in China: What should be the relationship between the 
central government and local authorities? For a while the debate 
was most heated, with arguments and counter-arguments flying 
back and forth between their supporters and detractors. 
  As the Year of the Rooster neared its end, the "Decision" 
was 
published in pamphlet form and found its way onto our desks. 
This reporter sought out Hu Angang, who just returned from a 
trip to Australia. His frankness was a little startling. "I 
believe the major difficulty in reform next year will come from 
within the party, quite possibly strong opposition from local 
governments over some issues." 
  He described the "Decision" as immensely significant, a sign 
that China has now entered a stage where reform revolves around 
institutional innovation. However, the implementation of the 
"Decision" is fraught with risk. What is worrisome is the 
introduction of the tax separation system in 1994 under the 
"Decision." Under that system, localities would still hold their 
own as far as revenue is concerned, but the central government 
would have trouble collecting taxes. These days every province 
or region thinks in terms of local interests, rarely considering 
the interests of the state or central government. It is like the 
social "beilun" in "Boyilun." Here we have what they call a 
"dilemma" in the English language. The boat can take only 15 
people. If there are 30 people all demanding to board it, the 
ship may well overturn. Thus it is an uphill struggle to put the 
"Decision" into effect. It is hard to predict what will happen 
next. 
  In a large country like China, Hu Angang said, the 
relationship between the central government and local 
authorities has been a problem since time immemorial. This 
problem has never been satisfactorily resolved even after the 
PRC was founded. During the past 44 years, the fiscal system 
affecting both the center and the localities has been 
extensively revised 15 times, in addition to several minor 
adjustments. The relationship has never been institutionally 
regularized and hence stabilized. Certainly the principle has 
been to "let the two sides each do what they do best," but there 
is still a lot of grey area, their respective jurisdictions 
having never been clearly delineated. Accordingly, the 
central-local relationship should be written into law explicitly 
and in detail. 
  Survey the world today and take a look at China itself. In 
Hu 
Angang's opinion, what China needs is a strong central 
government based on the market economy. As he sees it, in the 
future China should follow neither a system of power sharing 
between the central and local governments, nor a centralized 
system, but a mixture of the two which would wed the two 
principles of unity and pluralism. In this context, unity means 
there are uniform macroeconomic policies, primarily financial 
policies and fiscal policies. The central government should be 
the only player responsible for macroeconomic policy-making; 
local governments must be mere executors. Social security must 
be integrated, domestic markets, including the markets for 
capital goods like funds and manpower, must be unified. 
Standards of public service must be uniform, as must the tax 
system. 
  Everything else is pluralistic. In a nutshell, local 
governments can do anything not prohibited by the central 
government. The central government shall not exercise powers 
exclusive to local governments. Local governments have the 
authority to oppose regulations and orders from the central 
government which are not consistent with the written 
constitution. 
  "This is the vertical checks and balances of power," said Hu 
Angang. 
  Does it therefore follow that it was a mistake for the 
central government to delegate power to the localities and let 
them share revenue in the past 15 years of reform and openness? 
That kind of conclusion is unwarranted, Hu Angang said, noting 
however that it is a fact that the contract system is no longer 
viable. He said, "The most important thing about central-local 
relations is institutionalization and the most ideal form of 
such institutionalization is the tax separation system. Research 
shows that the existing financial contract system is un-modern, 
irregular, and unscientific. Its negative result is the current 
weak-center-strong-localities situation." He added, "Ultimately 
reform should take us out of the traditional 'power economy' and 
'government economy' framework. If all we do is to divvy up 
power between the central government and local governments level 
after level, that will do nothing to end the bloated bureaucracy 
at the local level performing an endless variety of things and 
directly intervening in economic life. That is a far cry from 
the basic requirements of a market economy." 
  China should swiftly introduce a full-fledged tax separation 
system. That is Hu Angang's proposal. 
  Echoing Hu Angang's support for the tax separation system 
and 
his call for an end to the "power economy," a number of 
economists nevertheless disagree with some of his basic 
premises. One of them is Wu Mingyu [0702 2494 3842], the 
well-known economist. 
  At his home on Liulinguan Nanli in Beijing, Wang Mingyu, 
currently deputy director of the Worldwatch Institute, produced 
about a dozen charts loaded with data and proceeded to explain 
his views to me at length. 
  He said, "First of all, China has been highly centralized 
for 
decades. During the past dozen years or so, the central 
government took pains to give additional power to local 
governments and went out of its way to cultivate their ability 
to make decisions on their own, with spectacular success. 
Without local initiative, the achievements of reform and 
development over the past 10 years and more would not have come 
about and the brave new economic world with its special economic 
zones, development zones, and coastal open belt would not have 
materialized. None of that can be denied. Needless to say, it is 
absolutely not enough just to shift power onto local 
governments. Ultimately, we must transfer to enterprises such 
powers as properly belong to them. Having said that, removing to 
the localities some of the power that has hitherto been 
concentrated in the hands of the central government is without 
doubt a direct achievement of a decade of reform." 
  Furthermore, what do we mean by enhancing national power? 
National power must not be interpreted to mean only the fiscal 
power of the central government. What is wrong with "storing 
wealth among the people?" What is wrong with "storing wealth 
among the enterprises?" What is wrong with "storing wealth among 
the localities?" Even before the Cultural Revolution, the 
Chinese economy grew as much as 6 percent a year, yet if we look 
at the chart for the 1952-1978 period, the line representing the 
savings of the masses was virtually flat. By late 1978, their 
savings amounted to just 21 billion yuan, a mere 20 yuan per 
capita. These days public savings have been soaring, increasing 
50-fold by 1992. In October 1993 personal savings stood at 1,400 
billion yuan. This is part of national power. Every form of 
economic strength is an expression of national power and 
government revenue represents only a small part of national 
income. In the past dozen years or so, has China become stronger 
as a nation? People at home and abroad would all answer in the 
affirmative. If China's national power has really diminished, as 
indicated by the research of Dr. Hu Angang and others, how can 
we explain the exceptional attention Chairman Jiang Zemin 
received when he visited the United States as invited? 
  Besides, the relationship between the central government and 
local governments is not exclusively fiscal. It is unscientific 
to just look at the share of revenue going into the national 
coffers and call it "weak." In China, the central government is 
led by the CPC and based on longstanding unified party 
leadership. Local elections too must be approved by the central 
government. If some local authorities have too much power, the 
central government can take it back right away if it wants to. 
To suggest that there is now a "feudal economy" in China would 
cause unnecessary jitters. 
  The new round of reform today certainly includes some power 
adjustment between the central government and local authorities. 
In Wu Mingyu's analysis, right now we must face up to four major 
issues: 
  -- Legislation must be drawn up to spell out the division of 
labor between the center and the localities. 
  -- Both the center and the localities must return power to 
enterprises, society, and intermediate organizations. Achieving 
this will be much more difficult than the transfer of power by 
the central government to the localities in the past 15 years. 
  -- Take pains to encourage local initiative even as steps 
are 
taken to augment the regulatory and control abilities of the 
center as appropriate. 
  -- Party-government relations at the local level should be 
further adjusted to ensure that policies and orders from Beijing 
are carried out. 
  While revenue-sharing and the contract system, introduced 
during the decade of reform, have mobilized local initiative, 
they have also bred local protectionism in some respects, to the 
detriment of the formation of a nationwide unified market. The 
time has now come for the contract system to give way to the tax 
separation system. This idea is not a major point of contention 
among the economists. However, in what way should the "tax 
separation system," put forward in the "Decision," be 
implemented? Hu Angang wants to see it carried out "thoroughly" 
and "as soon as possible," but there is also a large number of 
scholars who advocate a more incremental approach. Wu Mingyu and 
others, for instance, propose a "win-win" strategy. 
  As they see it, the tax separation system involves central 
taxes, local taxes, and shared taxes. In the initial period 
shared taxes must be handled cautiously, taking into 
consideration the local interests formed during the past 10 
years and more. Certainly the status quo must not be maintained. 
When we talk about the risk of reform in the new year, this is 
probably what we mean. A most satisfactory solution is to make 
the pie bigger so that the center can take more as local revenue 
rises, thus gradually increasing its revenue share. In the final 
analysis, of course, the goal is to increase the central 
government's revenue-enhancing ability. 
  When it comes to the relationship between the two poles--the 
central government and local governments--in the reform of 1994, 
some scholars are most meticulous thinkers. Besides the tax 
separation system, they say, other reforms would also disturb 
local interests. Nowadays, for instance, specialized banks have 
all become commercialized banks, but they remain essentially 
branches of banks at higher levels. Should we allow and assist 
to localities establish local commercial banks, which is what 
Guangdong has been doing? In the months and years ahead, 
moreover, the creation of a futures market, the reform of the 
enterprise shareholding system, and the issue of shares must 
also be approved. In the absence of standardization, should we 
also take care to avoid the effects of the old planned economy 
when we go about selecting a site and allocating quotas? 
  The fact of the matter is that reform is an adjustment of 
interests. And the new round of reform is precisely the 
rationalization of interests at a deeper level. In the course of 
this process, the horizontal and vertical conflicts spawned by 
the old order for years and years would inevitably manifest 
themselves as a host of entangled problems. "Horizontally," 
local protectionism is a cause of concern, while "vertically" 
traditional inertia, low efficiency, and rigidity are equally 
worrisome. Even more important, as organs of government, both 
the center and local governments are faced with the daunting job 
of transforming their functions in a fundamental way. 
  Failing that, Chinese reform will unavoidably suffer major 
setbacks, go astray, or beat a retreat to the old path. 
  The scholars disagreed on specific ideas and emphasis and 
argued among themselves heatedly, but they all said that this is 
closely related to the deepening of political reform. This is 
precisely what makes reform today such a herculean task. 
<H5>  Ignorance Is Archenemy </H5>
  The last issue I posed to the interviewees was also the 
simplest: On the eve of the launching of reform in 1994, how 
many people in China really understand the CPC Central 
Committee's "Decision?" 
  As expected, the economists' response was to shake their 
heads and sigh. Many pointed out grimly that studying modern 
economics has become something of critical urgency to the 
completion of reform. 
  Just think. Suppose we have liberated ourselves from all 
traditional ideological shackles. Suppose we are utterly devoted 
to the new round of reform sincerely and passionately. We still 
have to wrestle with one basic problem: understand the real 
implications of all the reform measures. 
  In New York City, any teenager has a thorough understanding 
of things like credit card, shares, and commodities. Provided he 
is fairly intelligent and can write reasonably well, an American 
college graduate majoring in history can be a columnist for the 
Wall Street Journal effortlessly analyzing the stock market 
every day. What about China? All our direct experiences with the 
market are of the most elementary kind. All our education--never 
mind you went to a college or party school offering a solid 
education--consisted of political economy that merely described 
the early phase of capitalism and taught you the socialist 
planned economy. Even among experts in economics theory, let 
alone rank-and-file party and government leading cadres, public 
employees, people in industry and commerce, or the media, how 
many have really mastered modern economics theories? 
  Ignorance may well turn out to be the worst enemy of the new 
round of reform in China. This is because what we are about to 
embark on is no longer elementary reform based on intuition and 
common sense, but putting up an edifice of an economic system 
which is complex and elaborate. After four centuries of 
development, the market economy has become a most complicated, 
most intricate gigantic machine of resource allocation. 
Economics too has blossomed into a science with numerous 
branches. To understand the reform plan in its totality, to 
create an ideal environment for reform, to implement reform one 
practical step after another, and to overcome the barriers to 
reform, we really do need knowledge, basic knowledge pertaining 
to the theories of the modern market economy. 
  Fang Fenglei, the young scholar, did not mince his words, 
"China has three kinds of illiterates: people who can't read or 
write, scientific illiterates, and economic illiterates. 
Economic illiterates present the biggest problem. A majority of 
the cadres at all levels, particularly leading cadres, who will 
actually be in the field carrying out reform, don't know modern 
economics. This will create considerable difficulties for the 
implementation of the `Decision.' Today we must popularize the 
ABC of economics." 
  In the commentary he stayed up late to write for ZHONGHUA 
GONGSHANG SHIBAO, Wu Jinglian made this appeal: "The time has 
now come for us to launch a study campaign among the cadres and 
masses, exhorting them to study the works of Deng Xiaoping and 
learn about the market economy. The market system, we often say, 
is the glorious achievement of the human civilization. And the 
best way to master this glorious achievement in the shortest 
time possible is through theoretical study. Only by standing on 
the high plane of modern human civilization, it may be said, can 
we grasp the spiritual essence of the `Decision' and establish a 
socialist market economy in China without delay." 
  Related to the problem of widespread ignorance is another 
regrettable fact: the shortage of experts in modern economics. 
  A number of young scholars pointed out that when it comes to 
the promotion of cadres in recent years, not enough economists 
were given key positions. The breakdown of expertise among 
leading cadres does not meet the requirements of building a 
modern market economy. Now we should truly put to good use this 
group of young talented people based on the actual needs of 
implementing the "Decision." 
  They also cited a suggestion by Gao Xijun [7559 1585 0971], 
a Taiwanese scholar who is now an economics professor at the 
University of Wisconsin. There are now 50,000 mainland students 
studying in the United States, of whom at least 1,000 major in 
economics, including as many as 100 who have already earned 
their doctorates. China should do what Taiwan did back then, 
which was to attract the qualified personnel to come home. They 
may stay and work or they may be invited to come to China on 
short-term visit. These people would certainly make themselves 
very useful. 
  Thus did China's eminent economists think long and hard and 
talk at length on the eve of the launching of reform 1994. For 
the past several years these people worked hard to drum up 
support for reform, directly or indirectly participated in 
designing the overall economic reform plan, appreciated the real 
meaning of reform most deeply, and most ardently looked forward 
to the smooth sailing of reform. Faced with the risks and 
difficulties of a new round of reform, these people now 
earnestly point out the challenges that may lie ahead and 
suggest possible responses. 
  Being clear thinkers, they said solemnly, "There is no 
romantic song in reform in 1994. The first step will be an 
uphill fight." 
  But who can say that as soldiers of reform they are not full 
of confidence and hope about success tomorrow? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66250 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar032___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-032 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  28 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Statistics Bureau Economist Comments on Reforms </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Statistics Bureau Economist Comments on Reforms </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0432B Beijing ZHONGGUO GUOQING GUOLI (CHINA NATIONAL 
CONDITIONS AND POWER MONTHLY) in Chinese No 1, 28 Jan 94 p-28 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0432B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO GUOQING GUOLI (CHINA NATIONAL 
CONDITIONS AND POWER MONTHLY) </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by reporter Ye Shuiqiao (5509 3055 0829): "Quicken </F>
Tempo in Reform for Rapid Economic Growth in China for 1994, 
Forecast by Chief Economist of State Statistics Bureau Qiu 
Xiaohua (6726 2556 5478)"] 
  [Text] The reform program and the national economy will be 
rapidly developed, and all benefits quickly distributed. This 
will be the social and economic situation in China during 1994. 
For the 1.2 billion Chinese people who expect a great deal from 
the reform program and wish to lead a comfortable life at an 
earlier date, the year of 1994 is full of hope as well as 
contradiction. This is the view expressed by the chief economist 
of the State Statistics Bureau, Comrade Pan Xiaohua when he was 
interviewed by our reporter. 
  The contents of the reform program, announced at the end of 
1993 and gradually put into practice from the beginning of this 
year, were quite rich. They involved banking, finance and 
taxation, planning, investment system, economic affairs and 
trade, pricing, marketing, social security, housing system, 
enterprise management and other spheres. The current task of 
reform will touch upon many areas in breadth and depth. It will 
be difficult to carry out the reform with the adequate momentum. 
Qiu Xiaohua believed that this year is a crucial year in which 
the reform program should be promoted in an overall manner and 
major breakthroughs be made. This year's reform differs from the 
single-item reform project. It is an overall reform program 
aimed at storing heavily fortified points, he added. If we fail 
to foresee some problems on time, such problems may cause 
relatively big shocks in society and create negative effects on 
this year's economy. If we are able to timely discuss and deal 
with these problems, and smoothly carry out the reform program, 
our national economy should witness a rapid growth rate of 
approximately 10 percent. 
  Since China entered the year of rapid economic growth in 
1992, it has maintained a high-speed growth rate of 
approximately 13 percent for two years running. This trend is 
rarely seen in the world history of economic development. It is 
similar to the speed attained by Japan and Korea during their 
economic leap-forward. Right now, except for some individual 
Latin American nations or Kuwait who is devoted in rebuilding 
the nation because of the Gulf War, most the nations in the 
world register an economic growth rate below 5 percent. 
Therefore, China's strong momentum in economic development 
during the past two years has aroused world attention. China 
will definitely be able to keep this kind of momentum for a 
period of time to come. 
  Qiu Xiaohua pointed out, China's economy went through three 
stages in 1993 -- the stage of accelerated development during 
the first half of the year, the declining stage during the third 
quarter and the rebounding stage during the fourth quarter. 
According to an estimate, even if China's economy rebounds at 
the beginning of 1994, it should not be excessively high, and 
even if it declines during that period, neither would be 
drastic. Following the relaxation of the macro-regulation and 
control, the economy will gradually pick up speed in developing 
itself. However, there will be some fluctuations. It is possible 
that this year we may achieve a high economic growth along with 
a high rate of price increases, if we take into consideration 
the after-effect of last year's rate of price increases (rate of 
retail price increases approximately 13 percent) and the 
potential pressure from the cost-push inflation. The speed of 
economic growth in 1994 may be slightly lower than that of the 
last year, and the commodity price maintained at last year's 
level. If measures for exercising the macro-control are 
excessively harsh, they may affect the smooth implementation of 
a series of reform programs. Therefore, under the circumstances 
in which our economy is rapidly growing, and complicated changes 
in economic relations are taking place, how to control 
inflation, prevent the commodity price from rising too sharply 
and achieve the goal of quickening the tempo in carrying out 
reform is an issue that the leadership at all levels should 
closely watch, study and learn how to deal with. 
  In answering questions from our reporter about the factors, 
both favorable and unfavorable to the healthy development of the 
economic situation in China this year, Qiu Xiaohua pointed out 
that there are mainly four favorable factors: 1) China is a 
large nation with a population of 1.2 billion. It provides a 
huge domestic market to help our economy grow rapidly. 
Therefore, from an overall point of view, there exists no 
question of insufficient effective demand. 2) The imbalance in 
China's industrial structure and in its regional development 
helps create many more new realms of growth. It is important to 
eliminate the structural imbalance and help strengthen the weak 
links in order to support the rapidly developing economy. The 
backward areas must strive to change their outlook and catch up 
with the rest of the country. This constitutes another factor in 
promoting the economic growth of the entire nation. 3) With the 
new system replacing the old, the old system will soon 
disappear, and the new system will grow up. This procedure is 
conducive to emancipating and developing the productive forces. 
This is a long-term factor, not a short-term one. 4) Opening up 
to the outside world is a basic state policy. Opening up means 
to join the world market and participate in international market 
competition. This itself provides China with a favorable 
condition to promote its own economic development on an even 
broader scale. 
  There are two unfavorable factors: 1) Pressure from the 
inflation. After the macro-control was strengthened in 1993, the 
commodity price was still quite high, although the rate of price 
increases started to level off. This was the third year in which 
prices had sharply increased. It would surely affect this year, 
and it cannot be eliminated within a short period. 2) Risks in 
carrying out reform. This year is a year in which we would 
quicken our tempo in promoting the reform program. Reform is a 
factor in supporting quick economic growth. At the same time, 
there is also the issue of cost and risk in carrying out reform. 
This issue is mainly manifested in the following aspects: On the 
one hand, the new round of reform differs in nature from the 
previous round of reform of expanding authority and transferring 
profits. The previous round of reform had the nature of "giving 
some benefits to others." All sectors may see immediate benefits 
in the course of carrying out such reform. However, the new 
round of reform is mainly a macro-economic reform aimed at 
blazing a new trail by means of the system. Within a short 
period of time, this round of reform would tend to increase the 
burdens of all sectors. In order to protect their vested 
interests, various sectors will hesitate to carry out such 
reform wholeheartedly. According to a survey conducted by us 
recently, various sectors are taking counter-measures to keep 
the losses of their vested benefits to the minimum. Therefore, 
we must fully realize the difficulties in carrying out this 
current round of reform and the side effects that we might feel. 
On the other hand, the new round of reform will be carried out 
at a time when the government functions have not yet been 
completely changed, and the government has not yet standardized 
all its actions taken. If the government fails to carry out its 
operations and supervise all the departments under its 
administration in a proper way, some problems left by the old 
system may crop up once again. This is because efforts are being 
made to strengthen the role of the government at a time when the 
government performs its functions irrationally and lacks a good 
regular system. As a result, things that the government should 
not control are being controlled, while those that the 
government should strictly control are not controlled. As a 
result, the inherent vitality in economic life is destroyed by 
the government. Under the conditions of market economy, it is 
necessary to strengthen the macro-control. To exercise the 
macro-control is an important topic in developing the economy 
and carrying out reform. However, if the principal body which 
exercises the macro-control performs its functions irrationally, 
it may create many negatives effects. This is something which 
merits our attention. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66251 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar032___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-032 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  20 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> PROVINCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reportage on Shanghai's Pilot Shareholding System </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reportage on Shanghai's Pilot Shareholding System </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0331A Chongqing GAIGE [REFORM] in Chinese No 1, 20 Jan 
94 pp 63-67 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0331A </F>
<F P=104>  Chongqing GAIGE [REFORM] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yu Houkang (0151 0624 1660) and Wang Jianhua </F>
(3769 1696 5478): "A Survey of Shanghai's Commercial Enterprises 
Piloting the Shareholding System"] 
  [Excerpt] In view of the importance of standardizing the 
state's equity management to the perfection of the pilot 
shareholding system, last June, we conducted a survey of 
Shanghai Municipality's commercial enterprises piloting the 
shareholding system. The following is our report: 
<H5>  I. Development of Shanghai's Commercial Shareholding </H5>
Enterprises 
  Shanghai is one of the cities with the largest number of 
enterprises piloting the shareholding system. At the end of May 
1993, it had 63 shareholding enterprises, with 12.66 billion 
yuan in share capital. Of that, 13 were commercial shareholding 
enterprises, with 914 million yuan in share capital; they 
accounted for 20.6 percent and 7.2 percent of the municipality's 
total number of shareholding enterprises and total share 
capital, respectively. 
  The development of Shanghai's pilot commercial shareholding 
enterprises can be divided into three stages: 1987-1990 marked 
the first stage. Yuyuan Shopping Mall Shareholding Co. Ltd. and 
New World Shareholding Trading Co. Ltd. were the municipality's 
first experimental points. Constrained by the internal and 
external conditions, besides converting the original assets into 
shares, Yuyuan only absorbed 1.3 million yuan in personal shares 
and New World absorbed only 390,000 yuan in legal person shares. 
The two enterprises only had 6.5 million and 6.94 million yuan, 
respectively, in share capital. Because of the lack of relevant 
policies and laws and regulations, there were many conflicts 
between the shareholding system and the original system, and 
adding the fact that people had different ideas about the system 
and because of inappropriate administrative intervention, it 
made the pilot project even more difficult, and for some time, 
no progress was made. The second stage began toward the end of 
1990 and lasted until the first half of 1992. During this 
period, the State Council officially allowed Shanghai to pilot 
the system of issuing shares to the general public. China's 
first securities exchange opened in Shanghai. The municipal 
government introduced a series of policies and laws and 
regulations pertaining to the pilot shareholding system. In 
particular, Comrade Deng Xioaping's speech delivered during his 
South China tour further increased the people's consciousness 
about speeding up the reform. In the first six months of 1992, 
development began to gather momentum. Some large- and 
medium-sized commercial enterprises began to link the 
shareholding system to the vitalization of Shanghai's businesses 
and the goal of developing great circulation, big markets, and 
big business. The nation's two largest departments 
stores--Shanghai Number One Department Store and Shanghai 
Hualian Business Building--and the municipality's largest food 
store--Shanghai Number One Food Stores--proceeded to restructure 
their enterprises under the shareholding system. Yuyuan Shopping 
Mall Shareholding Co. Ltd. and 15 enterprises initiated a 
reorganization and set up the Yuyuan Tourist City Shareholding 
Company, Ltd. In March and April of 1992, New World Trading 
Company, Ltd. took over five small state-owned shops as 
determined by the district business commission and, upon 
expanding the scope of state-owned assets, successfully went 
public with their stock. In the first half of 1992, the 
municipal commercial system set up eight public-offering 
companies. They had total share capital of 487 million yuan and 
raised more than 1.6 billion yuan by issuing shares at a 
premium. The third stage began in the second half of 1992. After 
the State Restructuring of the Economic System Commission and 
other relevant departments promulgated a dozen or so laws and 
regulations pertaining to the shareholding experimental points, 
the pilot project's external conditions were further improved. 
In the first half of 1993, the municipal commercial system set 
up another five directional capital raising companies, among 
them, New Asia (Group) Shareholding Company, Ltd. had as much as 
230 million yuan in share capital and was Shanghai's largest 
commercial shareholding enterprise. Because of the strong 
guiding role of the policies and laws and regulations, the 
organization and development of new shareholding enterprises 
took another big step toward standardization. 
  Facts show that Shanghai's pilot commercial shareholding 
enterprises have produced clear results. The pilot enterprises 
have the initial mechanisms to make autonomous management 
decisions and take care of their own profits and losses, and 
they have quickened the pace of self-improvement and 
self-development. Enterprises sold shares and used the funds 
they raised first to transform and expand their original 
operating facilities and build new business outlets. They 
actively opened up new management territories and vigorously 
developed the export-oriented economy and in turn greatly 
increased their ability to compete in the market. They have had 
good economic results. If we look at enterprises' realized 
profits, from 1987 when Yuyuan Shopping Mall became a limited 
liability company until 1991, in four years' time, its profit 
had increased at an annual rate of 18 percent, and after 
reorganizing, its average profit increased 1.2 fold in 1992 and 
another 1.2 fold in the first six months of 1993 compared to the 
same period a year earlier. Number One Department Store and 
Hualian Business Building which converted to the shareholding 
system in 1992 saw their profits grow 23 percent that year 
compared to the previous year and another 51 percent and 68 
percent, respectively, in the first half of 1993 compared to the 
same period a year earlier. Currently, six of the municipality's 
commercial shareholding companies are listed in the market. 
Their very promising future has attracted many investors. 
<H5>  II. Current Conditions of the State's Equity Management in </H5>
Shanghai's Shareholding Commercial Enterprises 
  Of Shanghai's 63 shareholding enterprises, 37 were 
originally 
state-owned enterprises. The original state properties were 
converted to state-owned shares in the shareholding enterprises. 
The state owns 7.65 billion yuan's worth of stocks in the 37 
enterprises, accounting for 70 percent of the share capital. 
  Of the 13 commercial shareholding enterprises, 10 have 
state-owned stocks, and we looked into eight of those 
enterprises. The state owns 342 million yuan worth of shares in 
these eight enterprises, accounting for 49.9 percent of their 
share capital. Specifically: 


Enterprise      Share      Percentage     Organ              Individual 
Name            Capital    of             Representing       Representing 
                (in        State-Owned    State Shares       State Shares 
                million    Shares 
                yuan) 

Number One      121.086    56.2           Municipal Number   deputy director, 
Department                                One Business       Municipal Number 
Store                                     Administration,    One Business 
Shareholding                              Municipal          Administration; 
Co. Ltd.                                  Administration     cadres, 
                                          of State           Municipal 
                                          Properties         Administration 
                                                             of State 
                                                             Properties 

Hualian         81.526     44.8           Municipal Number   general manager 
Business                                  One Business       of the original 
Building                                  Administration,    enterprise; 
Shareholding                              Municipal          cadres, 
Co. Ltd.                                  Administration     Municipal 
                                          of State           Administration 
                                          Properties         of State 
                                                             Properties 

Yuyuan          112.904    14.3           district           deputy district 
Tourist                                   government,        director 
Shopping City                             District 
Shareholding                              Administration 
Co. Ltd.                                  of State 
                                          Properties 

Number One      28.387     34.1           Municipal Number   general manager 
Food Stores                               Two Business       of the original 
Shareholding                              Administration,    enterprise; 
Co. Ltd.                                  Municipal          cadres, 
                                          Administration     Municipal 
                                          of State           Administration 
                                          Properties         of State 
                                                             Properties 

New World       15         54.7           district           original 
Shareholding                              business           district 
Trading Co.                               commission,        department store 
Ltd.                                      District           manager; cadres, 
                                          Administration     District 
                                          of State           Administration 
                                          Properties         of State 
                                                             Properties 

Xinya (Group)   235.642    69.4           Municipal          original 
Shareholding                              financial          municipal 
Co. Ltd.                                  office,            financial office 
                                          Municipal          director 
                                          Administration 
                                          of State 
                                          Properties 

Buyecheng       60         47.8           district           original deputy 
Shareholding                              government,        director of the 
Co. Ltd.                                  District           Administration; 
                                          Administration     cadres, District 
                                          of State           Administration 
                                          Properties         of State 
                                                             Properties 

Kaikai Real     30.703     36.5           district           original 
Estate                                    financial          enterprise 
Shareholding                              office, District   general manager 
Co. Ltd.                                  Administration 
                                          of State 
                                          Properties 

Total           685.248    49.9 


  Below we will look at the state's equity management from 
three different perspectives: 
  1. Setup of the State's Equity Management 
  In the process of reorganizing state-owned enterprises into 
shareholding enterprises, to protect the legal rights and 
privileges of state properties, the Municipal Administration of 
State Properties was put in charge of auditing the assessment of 
state properties to verify the assessed value of state 
properties and the number of state shares upon converting the 
assets to share capital. This was the basic task of state equity 
management. Prior to 1991, however, Shanghai did not have a 
specialized department to manage state properties, and therefore 
basically no one was looking after the state-owned shares in the 
shareholding enterprises. Yuyuan and New World, the two 
shareholding companies set up between 1987 and 1988, did not 
have their properties appraised properly during reorganization 
and only converted the book value of the state properties into 
state shares. Since the actual value of the state properties was 
higher than their book value, and since other shareholders had 
purchased shares based on face value, the state shares were 
compromised. In the first six months of 1992, these two 
shareholding companies underwent reorganization and three other 
state-owned enterprises--Number One Department Store, Hualian 
Business Building, and Number One Food Stores--also converted to 
the shareholding system. All five enterprises followed policies 
effective at that time to entrust specialized organs to appraise 
their assets. The assessed net asset values were all higher than 
the book value. The assessed net asset values of the two 
original shareholding companies were 39 percent and 33 percent, 
respectively, higher, and the other three state-owned 
enterprises' assets had appreciated 143 percent, 176 percent, 
and 71 percent respectively. Amid the assessed net asset value, 
the value of the intangible assets has appreciated the most, but 
the book value of the original enterprises' properties did not 
include intangible assets. The three state-owned enterprises' 
assessed net assets became the state's share capital and added 
to the shareholding companies' assets, but the state share 
capital was still based on the original book value of the 
assets, and the added value of the assessed net assets was used 
only as one of the bases for determining the price premium when 
issuing stocks. Enterprises did not readjust the book value, nor 
did they record the added net asset value in the capital 
accumulation fund. Only one enterprise readjusted the book value 
of the tangible assets and recorded that in the capital 
accumulation fund; however, intangible assets were still left 
out of the books. The above situation means the value of the 
state properties put into the shareholding companies is never 
fully recognized; the appreciated value of the state properties 
after the appraisal becomes the shareholding companies' unlisted 
assets. Similar problems also cropped up during the 
reorganization of Yuyuan and New World in 1992. 
  When appraising and converting state properties in the 
course 
of setting up the three directional fund-raising companies in 
1993, a new way of handling the financial issues had already 
been implemented: book value was readjusted according to the 
appraised value of the net assets. Among the net assets, the 
added values of the negotiable securities, long-term 
investments, and intangible assets were recorded in the capital 
accumulation fund; the remaining net assets were converted to 
state-owned share capital. The converted net assets as a 
percentage of all net assets were used as one of the bases for 
determining the price premium when issuing shares. This is a 
fairly standard approach. However, problems left behind by the 
way the five companies that went public in 1992 appraised and 
converted their original assets have yet to be addressed. 
  2. Exercising the State's Equity Rights 
  This includes selecting representative for the state's 
equities, fulfilling the responsibilities, and restructuring the 
state's equity rights. Currently, the only organs representing 
the state's equity shares in Shanghai's shareholding companies 
are the original enterprise management departments and the 
administrations of state properties at the corresponding levels. 
The department in charge of enterprises has substantial power in 
deciding who represents the state's equity interests. It may 
consult the administrations of state properties or act 
independently on its own authority to choose the 
representatives. Some shareholding enterprises have one person 
assigned by the department in charge of enterprises and one by 
the administration of state properties to represent the state's 
interests, but the person assigned by the department in charge 
of enterprises is always the first representative who also 
serves as the company's board chairman. This in fact follows the 
old state-owned enterprise cadre management system. The 
department in charge only assigns someone to represent the 
state's equity interests as a means to control enterprises and 
does not actually exercise control over the equities, and as a 
result, a set of management systems necessary to make sure that 
the representatives are fulfilling their responsibilities--such 
as the systems of equity representative's work report and of 
supervision, examination, rewards and penalties--was never 
formulated. Moreover, some government officials serving on 
enterprises' boards of directors have created a new mechanism of 
commingling government and enterprises, which hampers the change 
in government functions and obstructs fair competition among 
enterprises. 
  Another problem in the exercise of state equity rights is 
that state shares cannot be traded in the market. This method of 
freezing the state's equities hampers the readjustment of the 
industrial structure and makes it impossible for the state 
shareholders to make a profit by buying low and selling high. 
  3. Management of the State's Equity Profits 
  According to current policies and laws and regulations, the 
municipal and district administrations of state properties 
should collect share dividends from the shareholding enterprises 
based on the number of state-owned shares. On the other hand, 
share dividends collected must be put into the municipality's 
and districts' separate budgets; however, the administrations of 
state properties acting as state shareholders have no 
independent right to determine the use of the share dividends, 
and in addition, neither the state shares nor the share income 
are transferrable, and therefore the administrations of state 
properties cannot reinvest and cannot generate a benign cycle of 
"input--output--reinvest," which seriously limit the propagation 
of state assets in shareholding enterprises. In June 1963 Number 
One Department Store decided to increase capital and bonus 
shares. Each bonus share was priced at six yuan, 2.9 yuan below 
the IPO price. Because the Municipal Administration of State 
Properties had no money to reinvest, it had to give up its right 
to buy additional shares, and as a result, the state's interest 
in the company fell by 10 percentage points, bringing losses to 
the state as shareholder. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66252 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar032___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-032 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  13 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Foreign Banks Hail New Regulations on Institutions </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Foreign Banks Hail New Regulations on Institutions </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0416A Beijing GUOJI SHANGBAO in Chinese 13 Mar 94 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0416A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUOJI SHANGBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Under general heading "Foreign-Financed Banking </F>
Institutions in China (Part 1)" special article by own 
correspondent Jin Jianhang (6855 1696 2635): "Ways Open for 
Foreign-Financed Banks To Enter China--Not Yet Free for RMB 
Business"] 
  [Text] How many branches in China are foreign-financed 
banks? 
  According to official figures, foreign-financed banks have 
started up almost 100 business organizations in China. 
  At the same time, there are almost 100 foreign-financed 
banks 
that have opened own offices in China. 
  How, then, is China controlling this situation? Recently, 
the 
State Council promulgated "Regulations for the Administrative 
Control of Foreign-Financed Banking Organizations," which are in 
force since 1 April. Some representatives of foreign-financed 
banks stationed in Beijing voiced their opinions to reporters on 
such questions as the competition between foreign and Chinese 
banks, business in RMB, etc. 
<H5>  Another Step Forward in a Systematic Progress </H5>
  Since the early years of the 1980's, China has admitted 
foreign-financed banking institutions, and for their 
administrative control has applied the regulations on special 
economic zones, and the Shanghai regulations for the 
administrative control of foreign-financed banking institutions. 
Now, the State Council has promulgated control regulations that 
have nationwide validity, and this event has generally been 
welcomed by all foreign-financed banking institutions. 
  Ms. Rong Fenge [2837 7685 1230], chief Beijing 
representative 
of the Nanyang Commercial Bank, expressed the opinion that the 
promulgation of these regulations has newly provided rules that 
give guidance, and have enhanced clarity, be it regarding the 
state's administrative control or regarding procedures to be 
followed by foreign-invested banks that intend to enter the 
Chinese market. 
  Mr. Guo Zhonghua [6753 0112 5478], chief Beijing 
representative of the Royal Commercial Bank of Canada said, this 
is another step forward in the systematic progress of China's 
reform of the banking system. Methods of operations on China's 
financial market have become more and more standardized and 
mature. He said, although China's financial market is rapidly 
becoming internationalized and increasingly open, the said 
regulations prescribe that foreign-financed banks that intend to 
establish business agencies in China are required to have had 
representative organizations for two or more years. When 
applying for permission to establish a bank branch, the 
applicant's total assets must be no less than $20 billion. These 
regulations restrict short-term operations by foreign-financed 
banking institutions, and reduce the chances to nil for smaller 
banks to come to China for risky speculative operations. China, 
in this way, achieved one objective in connection with the entry 
of foreign-financed banking institutions: lots and lots of 
capital, less and less risk. 

<H5>    No Possibility for a Few Firms to Constitute a Monopoly </H5>
  It was still a unique affair in 1981 when the Nanyang 
Commercial Bank established the first foreign-financed bank 
branch in the Shenzhen SEZ, but today China has welcomed in a 
virtual flood of foreign-financed banks, it is like the 
"hundreds of flowers in spring vying with each other." According 
to statistics of the People's Bank of China, up to the end of 
1993, banking organizations from 15 countries and territories 
have established 98 business agencies in China. They are mostly 
concentrated in such places as Shanghai, Shenzhen, Xiamen, 
Guangzhou, and Dalian. 
  Competition between foreign-financed banks is unavoidable. 
On 
this point the chief Beijing representative of the Bank of 
Tokyo, Mr. Isao Okubo, has a deep understanding. When the news 
spread in Beijing, in the middle week of February, that 2 to 3 
foreign-financed banks will open offices, Mr. Takagaki, the 
president of the Bank of Tokyo--the bank had been first in 
setting up an agency in Beijing--flew into Beijing. He called on 
leaders in the Beijing Municipality and in the People's Bank of 
China and renewed his request to open a branch bank. There were 
40, 50 other foreign-financed banks that equally intended to 
open branches in Beijing. 
  At present, the bank that has most business in China is the 
Chartered Bank. Its Beijing representative, Mr. Bai Lian [4101 
4409 1344], revealed that the Chartered Bank had already opened 
seven branches, in Shanghai, Shenzhen, Zhuhai, Nanjing, Tianjin, 
and Haikou, and had opened representative offices in another 
seven places, in Dalian, Beijing, Ningbo, Hangzhou, Guangzhou, 
Nanjing, and Qingdao. Bai Lian said that the Chartered Bank will 
in the future open up in a few more places. 
  The First National City Bank of New York, also not to be 
left 
behind, is about to transfer its China head office from Hong 
Kong to Shanghai. 
  These "roots" of foreign-financed banks seem to show no fear 
of competition in the market economy. 
  Ms. Rong Fenge expressed optimism when she said, because 
each 
bank has its own clientele, each has its own particular work 
sphere. At present, business in China would essentially require 
to open one branch bank in every place, so that the situation of 
several banks forming a monopoly will not arise, as it will 
rather be a competition in coexistence. 
<H5>  Trading in RMB is a Slow Train Affair </H5>
  In the said regulations there are ten paragraphs listing 
operations allowed to foreign-financed banks. Most reason for 
concern is the last paragraph: "approval for trading in local 
currency." 
  During his interview with a Reuters correspondent on 26 
February, Zhou Zhengqing [0719 2973 1987], a vice president of 
the People's Bank of China, said, conditions are not yet ripe to 
allow foreign-financed banks to do business in RMB in the 
interior of China. However, he indicated at the same time that 
conditions will be ripe when three preconditions will be 
fulfilled: 
  1) taxes and levies will be equal for Chinese and foreign 
banks, and their burdens will in this respect be 
identical; 2) the system of commercial banks will have been 
perfected; 3) financial laws and regulations, such as a "Law 
Governing Commercial Banks," will be in place. 
  Most foreign-financed banking institutions have accepted the 
concept that for them "in the matter of business activities in 
RMB, there is nothing else to do but to wait patiently." The 
difference is that they believe that the crucial point in the 
matter of freeing RMB transactions is raising the 
competitiveness of the domestic Chinese-financed banks. 
<H5>  Chinese-financed Banks Must Gain Strength </H5>
  In comparison with the Chinese-financed banks, the 
foreign-financed banks have five great advantages: Abundant 
strength, diversity of banking procedures, a broad information 
network, and perfect credit facilities that make for low banking 
costs; A wealth of expert personnel well versed in international 
banking practices and highly efficient in their performance; 
Structural elasticity that allows full use of methods of price 
competition, combined with complete sets of advanced equipment. 
The Chinese banks are evidently lagging behind in efficiency, 
attitudes, and quality of service. 
  At present, Chinese and foreign banks are "in a fight at 
close quarters" in handling settlements and documentary bills in 
the import-export trade where risks are small and profits large, 
and in some areas the foreign-financed banks have gained the 
upper hand. According to statistics, import-export trade 
settlements through foreign-financed banks in Shanghai in 1992 
accounted for one-fourth of the whole amount done in that city. 
  Mr. Okubo, who had been concerned with this question all 
along, expressed: The "Regulations" that allow entry of foreign 
banks into the Chinese market constitute an external pressure on 
the Chinese banks to enhance their competitive strength. 
However, the actual work that still has to be done is to deepen 
the reform of the Chinese banks in the interior, get them become 
commercial banks, become international banks. When that will 
have been achieved, the ideal state will have been reached in 
that there will be no difference in business operations between 
foreign-financed and Chinese-financed banks. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66253 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar032___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-032 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  21 March 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reform of Foreign Exchange, Banking Systems </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reform of Foreign Exchange, Banking Systems </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0449A Beijing JINRONG SHIBAO in Chinese 21 Mar 93 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0449A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINRONG SHIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chen Caihong (7115 1752 4767), deputy chief </F>
representative of the Seoul Representative Office, Chinese 
People's Construction Bank: "Reform of Foreign Exchange Control 
System; Adjustment of Banking System"] 
  [Text] The core of the reform of the foreign exchange 
control system may be summarized as follows: "One passageway, 
one exchange rate, and one market." This "three one's" reform 
will have a major effect on the central banks' monetary policy 
and on the operation of foreign exchange-assigned banks. 
  First, speaking of the central banks, because all foreign 
exchange income within the boundaries of China must be sold to 
foreign exchange-assigned banks, which, besides maintaining a 
certain foreign exchange circulating fund, must sell the 
surplus, if the foreign exchange taken in by the foreign 
exchange-assigned banks exceed the highest limit of the 
circulating fund, that foreign exchange must be sold to the 
central banks. Thus, under the past system, out of the foreign 
exchange held by each credit bank a very large part will 
eventually be put into the central banks, so obviously there 
will be an increase in the amount of foreign currency held by 
the central banks, a situation that will certainly have an 
effect on the central banks' monetary policy. Viewed from the 
angle of currency and banking theory, when foreign currency is 
held in different banks it will have a completely different 
effect; the funds held and used by the central banks are the 
basic currency to hold and use, and the funds held and used by 
credit banks are the gradually expanding currency to hold and 
use. On this point, the central banks' monetary policy must be 
appropriately considered and adjusted. 
  Next, because the amount of foreign exchange held by the 
central banks increases, the efficiency of, and restraint on, 
the use of foreign exchange funds has become a major issue that 
the central banks must consider, and issue in which what is most 
important is the question of the structure of foreign exchange 
assets as well as investment and speculation with foreign 
exchange funds. This means that the central banks must increase 
its "business-type" operations with foreign exchange funds, 
doing business on the international currency market and gaining 
economic returns from the use of foreign currency. 
  Finally, the foreign exchange transaction market between 
banks needs to be specially managed by the central banks with 
regard to the following points: First, how to determine well the 
size of each bank's foreign exchange circulating fund; second, 
how to intervene and control the application of foreign exchange 
funds to market prices; and third, what measures to use in 
control and regulation--all these problems need to be 
conscientiously studied and solved. From a look at the reform 
plan that has appeared, one sees that that this is a limited 
foreign exchange transaction market, and that the central banks 
try, through managing the foriegn exchange market between 
control banks, to regulate and control the rate of all foreign 
exchange. However, whether to use exchange rate measures to 
regulate, or to use changes in the supply and demand to 
regulate, is a question that requires study and finding out 
which is best. 
  With regard to foreign exchange-assigned banks, the reform 
plan that has appeared shrinks the foreign exchange deposit 
business to the smallest possible size: Only enterprises and 
individuals carrying the smallest amount of foreign exchange 
will make foreign exchange deposits. Correspondingly, the 
foreign exchange loan business of foreign exchange-assigned 
banks will be almost completely eliminated, and there will also 
be a necessity for the existence of a foreign exchange fund for 
the capital formed by the banks that had made foreign exchange 
loans. 
  Second, the foreign exchange-assigned banks' income from 
doing business in foreign exchange will only be the price 
differential of foreign exchange in over-the-counter business 
and the difference between "buying low and selling high" on the 
foreign exchange transaction market between banks, as well as 
the profit from the banks' own regulation of the structure of 
foreign exchange assets. Because the customer can use foreign 
exchange to buy directly corresponding "hard currency" at a 
foreign exchange-assigned bank, he no longer will need to have 
the bank buy and sell foreign exchange for him, and the bank 
will itself bear the risk in the aspect of the structure of 
foreign exchange assets. Viewed from this angle, we see that the 
foreign exchange-assigned banks are being pushed toward the 
market, where its risks in doing business will increase. 
  Third, investment abroad by a foreign exchange-assigned bank 
entails a two-way restriction. Under the old system, with the 
approval of the investment abroad by a central bank, the foreign 
exchange-assigned bank could use its own foreign exchange 
capital, or directly use its own Renminbi funds, to buy foreign 
exchange for investment abroad. Under the new system, the 
investment plan of a foreign exchange-assigned bank must be 
approved by a central bank, and also the sources of the foreign 
exchange funds to be invested are required to have a central 
bank undertake to sell them before they can be formed; this 
selling of foreign exchange by the central banks touches on many 
aspects in regulating the foreign exchange market and in 
implementing the monetary policy. Therefore, the two-way 
restriction on the plan and the foreign exchange structure 
increases some systemic restraints on foreign investment by 
foreign exchange-assigned banks. 
  At present, to link up with the world economy, the renminbi 
must as early as possible take the path of an exchange rate and 
in the end become a freely convertible currency, and China's 
foreign exchange control system must be correspondingly 
reformed. Today, the plan for reform of the the foreign exchange 
control system that we are promoting is essentially the choice 
to put into practice the socialist market economy. We should 
adapt to this choice, adjusting China's banking system and 
institutions, and ensuring that the course of China's overall 
reform is not adversely affected. 
  This reform will add to the central banks' tasks in the 
aspect of monetary policy, but it will also provide the central 
banks with fairly appropriate means to solve difficult problems. 
This is only the nature of the foreign currency market, and the 
central banks should pay more attention to the influence and 
effect on monetary policy exerted by the foreign exchange 
transaction market between banks, and with relative flexibility 
use foreign exchange measures to regulate the foreign exchange 
transaction market and achieve relatively stable exchange rate 
prices. At the same time, the central banks' public market 
business should, as fast as possible, be put into substantive 
operation, in order to ensure an appropriate measure of currency 
supply, to prevent too-large fluctuations in currency supply 
from forming an enormous pressure on the foriegn exchange 
transaction market, and to help stabilize the exchange rate on 
the foreign exchange transaction market. With regard to 
intervention on the foreign exchange transaction market and the 
public market, I personally think that now it is appropriate to 
use simultaneously the dual regulation measures, both achieving 
a controlled interest rate and exchange rate system, and doing 
so by regulating the amount of supply and demand on the markets. 
  In addition, the central banks should, at each large 
financial center in the world, set up a corresponding foreign 
exchange regulation and business operations organization, and, 
in line with the changes on the international currency and 
foreign exchange markets, adjust the structure of the foreign 
exchange assets that the central banks hold, thereby ensuring 
that the value of the foreign exchange funds they hold are not 
adversely affected, and under possible circumstances, striving 
to hold foreign exchange funds that increase in value. In fact, 
after reforming the foreign exchange management system, the 
central banks will be faced with two marekts: One is the 
domestic foreign exchange transaction market between banks; the 
other is the international foreign exchange and currency market. 
Only by operating with facility on these two large markets can 
the central banks ensure the efficiency in use and the returns 
on its foreign exchange funds, and ensure that the central 
banks' monetary policy attains the predesignated goals. 
  As for the foreign exchange-assigned banks, the effect of 
this reform will really demand that each bank begin to change 
its past way and pattern of management, consider problems from 
the angle of the market, and by taking risks on the market get 
returns on the foreign exchange managed by the bank. Each bank 
must, as fast as possible, train fairly many foreign exchange 
counter personnel and fairly many foreign exchange transaction 
personnel. At the same time, we need to train a large number of 
specialists in business management and information processing on 
the foreign exchange marekt, and to set up a corresponding 
foreign exchange business management system and 
institutionalized system with a tight-knit organization, 
flexible operations, up-to-date information, and clear decision 
making. As for the dual restrictions on ivestment abroad with 
foreign exchange, this is a systemic change and it can, through 
systemic adjustments, lead to the best advantage for investment 
abroad by foreign exchange-assigned banks, taking into 
consideration whether it is an overseas investment fund set up 
by a central bank in each foreign exchange-assigned bank, with 
its funds source and foreign exchange capital held by the bank. 
After a central bank approves the overseas investment plans of 
certain foreign exchange-assigned banks, the problem of finding 
a source of foreign exchange will be solved by this fund. 
  Without the slightest doubt, the reform of the foreign 
exchange control system will have an effect on the banking 
profession, as well as on the corresponding adjustment measures, 
and we need to change them in line with the changes in practice. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66254 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar032___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-032 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  8 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Next Steps in Foreign Trade Reform Outlined </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Next Steps in Foreign Trade Reform Outlined </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0408A Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO in Chinese 8 Mar 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0408A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wang Zixian (3769 1311 0341) and Chen Baomei </F>
(7115 1405 3780): "On Speeding Up the Pace of Getting Onto 
Track With the World Economy--A Critique of China's Foreign 
Trade Reform for 1994"] 
  [Text] On 1 January 1994, China merged its exchange rates, 
to establish a market-based, single, and managed floating 
exchange rate system, which exchange-rate system-reform made a 
smooth transition. Meanwhile, we have also achieved conditional 
RMB convertibility for everyday transactions, which is a major 
step in making the RMB a convertible currency. In addition, 
China has also lowered again the import tariffs on some 
products, publishing management regulations on machinery and 
electronic imports and on ordinary commodity import quotas. 
While lifting the obligation of foreign trade enterprises to 
turn foreign exchange over to the state, we have also instituted 
a uniform value-added and income tax system, abolishing 
directive foreign trade planning, which has further deregulated 
foreign trade operations, and strengthened foreign trade 
coordination mechanisms. 
  The successive implementation of these foreign trade reform 
measures, in contrast to past reform steps, has been a great 
breakthrough in areas, such as policy consolidation, operating 
deregulation, liability for profits and losses, and equal 
competition. It will solve well certain deeper problems that 
have long troubled our foreign trade growth, as well as bringing 
China's foreign trade system closer to international standards, 
and further opening up China's huge markets to the outside world. 
  The major substance of this round of foreign trade reform is 
mainly as follows: 
<H5>  I. We Have Established a Market-Based, Single, and Managed </H5>
Floating Exchange Rate System, Achieving Conditional RMB 
Convertibility for Everyday Transactions. 
  Since 1 January 1994, the RMB exchange rate mechanism has 
become marketized, consolidating the official and market 
exchange rates, with the recent exchange rate essentially 
maintained at about 8.7 RMB to the dollar. The complete 
marketization [commercialization] of our exchange rate mechanism 
will help to eliminate existing market distortions, paving the 
way for deeper participation by China in the international 
division of labor and exchanges based on the comparative 
advantage principle. 1) As to China's foreign trade enterprises, 
the exchange rate merger and foreign trade reform have 
rationalized the distribution relations between the state and 
enterprises, by abolishing the obligation of foreign trade 
enterprises to turn over foreign exchange to the state either 
with or without compensation, and changing to payment of income 
taxes according to a uniform enterprise income tax system, which 
has helped to consolidate policy, creating a climate of equal 
competition for all foreign trade enterprises, giving them 
genuine liabiliy for profits and losses and deregulated 
operation. 2) The full marketization of our exchange rate 
mechanism conforms to GATT and IMF arrangements on not 
practicing dual exchange rates, bringing China's foreign trade 
system closer to international standards. 3) Our exchange rate 
mechanism reform will also help to prevent sharp, unchecked RMB 
exchange rate volatility through manipulation of speculative and 
psychological-expectation factors, thus bringing trade 
convenience to both China and our trading partners. 
<H5>  II. We Have Abolished Foreign Exchange Retention, Changing </H5>
Our Wholesale Foreign Exchange System to One of Bank Settlement 
and Sale of Foreign Exchange. 
  While merging our exchange rates, we correspondingly 
reformed 
our foreign exchange management system, changing our past 
foreign exchange retention and wholesale foreign exchange 
systems to bank settlement and sale of foreign exchange, and 
achieving conditional RMB convertibility for everyday 
transactions. While our foreign exchange retention system was 
a key step in our foreign trade reform of devolving authority to 
lower administrative levels, playing a key role in stimulating 
the initiative of all to export more, it was also an objective 
factor in the formation of departmental, regional, and 
enterprise [foreign exchange] ownership, strengthening local 
foreign trade protectionism, sharpening market divisions, and 
having many negative effects, with the duplicate development of 
export manufacturing industries, the too similar export 
commodity mix, and the regional divisions in our foreign 
exchange conversion market all being involved to a certain 
extent. Since we went to the system of bank settlement and 
sale of foreign exchange, enterprises can buy foreign exchange 
from banks for imports within the limits allowed by national 
laws and decrees with valid documents, such as contracts and 
payment notices. This has formed a nationally uniform and 
standardized foreign exchange market, thus thoroughly breaking 
local and enterprise foreign exchange ownership, and helping to 
eradicate the impact of local protectionism. 
<H5>  III. We Have Abolished Directive Planning, Improving Our </H5>
Macroeconomic Regulation and Control of Foreign Exchange. 
  In order to eliminate the conflict of foreign trade 
enterprises having to be liable for their own profits and losses 
while fulfilling directive foreign trade plans, in coordination 
with our overall plans for foreign trade market reform, the 
state conducted a major reform of our foreign trade planning 
system, deciding to abolish foreign trade directive planning, 
and to draw up guidance plans for overall foreign trade volume, 
export earnings, and import exchange use, with the state using 
economic and legal means to guide enterprises to achieve 
predetermined targets. To ensure a balance of foreign trade 
and international payments, the state will use the methods in 
current international practice, such as adjusting macroeconomic 
policy and taking other GATT-permitted steps, to achieve 
balance. Our foreign trade macroeconomic regulation and 
control will change from the former regulation and control that 
was relatively independent of the national economy to a 
basically uniform state. 
<H5>  IV. We Have Better Promoted Deregulated Operation, Breaking </H5>
With Monopoly, and Bringing Market Competition Forces Into Full 
Play. 
  We have speeded up the examination and approval of foreign 
trade operating rights for all types of production enterprises, 
as well as clarifying that along with the establishment of a 
modern enterprise system, the clarification of property rights, 
and the perfection of our legal system, the state will no longer 
in the future practice a system of examination and approval of 
foreign trade operating rights, with enterprises automatically 
having foreign trade operating rights according to law. We 
will further deregulate foreign trade merchandise operations 
with, except for a very few staple resource-product imports and 
exports that will be jointly and uniformly operated according to 
international practice, all other commodities being freed up to 
deregulated operation, so that full market competition will form 
a new and rational operating order. 
<H5>  V. We Have Instituted a Modern Enterprise System, Speeding </H5>
Up the Conversion of Operating Forces, So That Foreign Trade 
Enterprise Operations Can Get On Track With International 
Practice as Quickly as Possible. 
  This related reform of our foreign exchange and tax system 
has created the prerequisites for rationalization of the 
financial relations between foreign trade enterprises and the 
state, making it possible for foreign trade enterprises to 
genuinely practice standardized operations in which they are 
liable for their own profits and losses. Meanwhile, the 
widespread practice of a modern enterprise system, with foreign 
trade enterprises being upgraded to corporations, will help to 
establish the enterprise operating forces suited to current 
market economy norms of distinct property rights, clear rights 
and obligations, separation of government administration from 
business management, and scientific management. 
<H5>  VI. We Have Maintained a Uniform Foreign Trade and Economic </H5>
Cooperation Policy, Making It More Transparent. 
  China has instituted a clearer and more nationally uniform 
foreign trade and economic cooperation system and policy, to 
promote a sound and improved nationally uniform market, as well 
as to meet the needs of international trade standards. In the 
interests of transparency, China will in the future apply only 
officially promulgated laws, regulations, and policies, which 
are uniformly announced to the outside world by MOFTEC. 
  While foreign trade reform since 1988 has always been in the 
forefront of all national reforms, creating positive terms for 
expanded opening and faster foreign trade growth, the lack of 
reform synchronization has also caused a series of conflicts. 
The lack of market reforms in other fields has put severe 
limitations on foreign trade growth, leaving foreign trade 
falling between the cracks of international and domestic markets 
in a particularly difficult situation. The greatest difference 
between this 1994 foreign trade reform and past ones is that 
this is a part of overall economic reform, being conducted as a 
related reform along with others in areas such as tax revenue, 
banking, investment, and business. It is precisely due to 
these externally related terms that this reform is so 
unprecedented in dynamics and depth, so that the reform can 
basically establish market operating forces that are on track 
with international practice, unlike past reforms that all were 
flavored by compromise and transition. This will help to bring 
market forces into full play in the foreign trade field, while 
making the government's indirect macroeconomic regulation and 
control more standardized and effective, thus ensuring positive 
and sound foreign trade growth. While it will be impossible to 
completely avoid certain new conflicts and frictions, the 
general assessment is that the foreign trade operating-system 
climate will be much better, which will undoubtedly contribute 
to foreign trade growth. 
  In particular, certain conflicts that affected our 1993 
foreign trade, particularly our export growth, such as problems 
of jacked-up-price panic buying and cut-price competition 
touched off by unequal competition due to nonuniform policy, 
foreign trade enterprises being squeezed at both ends by 
exchange rate instability, local protectionism driven by 
interests such as foreign exchange, and the conflict between 
directive export-plan obligations and economic efficiency, can 
all be essentially resolved. The existing problem is mainly how 
foreign trade enterprises will adapt to the new operating 
forces, by speeding up their own reform and development, raising 
their management level, and improving their service. In this 
area, the crucial factors according to modern enterprise needs 
are speeding up the pace of state-owned foreign trade enterprise 
reform, and accelerating the conversion of their operating 
forces. As to government, how to speed up the establishment of 
an indirect regulation and control system suited to market 
economy needs, improve macroeconomic regulation and control, and 
standardize government functions, are major issues affecting 
foreign trade growth prospects, as well as a problem for foreign 
trade reform and expansion. How to escape the past customary 
form and fixed mode of thinking of direct control, to achieve 
indirect control in line with new needs is a challenge to 
government at all levels. 
  As long as we make certain progress in these areas, we can 
predict that China's foreign trade will grow more in 1994 than 
it did in 1993, with prospects that exports will do better than 
their poor growth of 1993, thus achieving our aim of rapid and 
stable foreign trade growth, paving the way for long-range, 
sustained, and rapid foreign trade growth, and providing more 
trade opportunities for all countries throughout the world. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66255 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar032___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-032 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  17 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Utility of Voluntary Export Restraints Discussed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Utility of Voluntary Export Restraints Discussed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0382A Beijing GUOJI MAOYI WENTI [INTERNATIONAL TRADE 
JOURNAL] in Chinese No 133, 17 Jan 94 pp 25-28 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0382A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUOJI MAOYI WENTI [INTERNATIONAL TRADE 
JOURNAL] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhang Nan (1728 0589), M.A. Candidate, </F>
Department of Commercial Economics, Jinan University: "Voluntary 
Export Restraints: A Business Strategy Analysis"] 
  [Text] I. Introduction 
  What is meant by Voluntary Export Restraints (VER) is that 
exporting nations or regions, under demands or pressures from an 
importing nation, will "voluntarily" impose restraints on 
exports to a particular country for certain goods for a given 
period of time. VER is a neo-protectionist measure in nature, 
with the following special features: 
  1. Nontransparency. VER are arranged privately between 
governments after bilateral consultations. Calling it 
"voluntary" is an excuse to bypass the principles of GATT, and 
conduct "grey area" measures. 
  2. Discrimination. VER is not restricted by GATT's 
"nondiscrimination principle." It usually has an anticipated 
purpose and is highly selective, directed at individual 
countries and individual producers. 
  3. Flexibility. VER is usually a short term measure, with a 
term of from three to five years. VER can be renewed, extended, 
or expanded. It is much more flexible than long term, fixed 
tariff measures, making it more direct and efficient for 
handling temporary trade disputes. 
  Although under certain conditions these characteristics can 
make VER simpler, more direct, faster and more efficient than 
other trade protection measures such as tariffs, VER can have 
serious limitations. 
  Trade experts consider VER to be one type of "imperfect 
protectionism." Trade protectionism itself will twist the 
disposition of resources, plus it is "imperfect," causing profit 
losses in importing countries which implement VER. This is 
because under VER, "scarcity of profit" caused by trade 
restraints will be gained by exporting countries. When tariffs 
are used, this part of the interest is obtained by the importing 
countries' governments by means of tariff income; under a quota 
system, most of them will be gained by importers with quotas by 
means of "quota rent." Obviously, a nation adopting VER is 
actually sacrificing the profits of its own domestic consumers, 
to increase the interests of its exporters or the exporting 
nation's government. Moreover, it is equivalent to pushing, even 
compelling, other nations to create export cartels to deal with 
its citizens. This is where VER is "imperfect." So, just from 
the standpoint of economic efficiency, based on the above 
analysis, VER is not at all more reasonable or efficient than 
other trade protection policies such as tariffs; on the 
contrary, to a certain degree, it turns out to be even worse. 
  However, the statistical reality shows that in current 
international trade, VER is being used more frequently, 
affecting a growing number of nations, regions, and industrial 
areas. From 1981 to 1988, among all the nontariff policies 
adopted by the EC for imported industrial products, the VER 
proportion increased from 24.6 percent to 38.1 percent, while in 
the same period, the U.S. proportion grew from 59.3 percent to 
66.5 percent, close to two-thirds. At the outset of the 
nineties, 15 percent of the world's trade had been arranged by 
VER. 
  Why has VER, a kind of "imperfect protectionism," become 
such 
a popular instrument of trade policy? This article will try to 
find answers to this question from the standpoint of marketing 
strategy. 
<H5>  II. VER's operating system and the combination of operations </H5>
and marketing 
  1. The involvement of large enterprises. 
  Before discussing VER's operating system, we must first pay 
attention to an important fact: VER is not just an activity or 
arrangement between governments. 
  First, surveys show that 80 percent of VER are formal 
agreements between governments, while the remaining 20 percent 
are "informal" (that is, agreements between governments and 
industries) or "nongovernmental measures" (that is, agreements 
between industries or enterprises). Because the latter two forms 
of VER are usually entered into secretly, and therefore 
difficult to document, the above results may not be 
representative. But regardless of whether they are "informal" or 
"nongovernmental measures," they differ from common export 
cartels in that they usually have the approval or tacit consent 
of the importing nation's government. In 1971, the Japanese 
Steel Association announced it was implementing VER on its steel 
exports to the EC. This was the result of secret negotiations 
between the major steel corporations of Japan and Europe. 
  Second, VER agreements between governments usually also have 
the enthusiastic participation of large enterprises. These 
enterprises are usually of large scale, and solid strength, so 
it is not difficult to forecast that in most VER arrangements, 
the interests of trade groups or large enterprises usually 
receive priority consideration. In return, these trade groups or 
large enterprises will be more obedient to their governments' 
control. For example, in the U.S.-Japan VER agreement on 
semiconductors, such major U.S. enterprises as Motorola, Intel, 
and Texas Instruments, and major Japanese enterprises like 
Toshiba, Hitachi, JVC, and Panasonic all participated in the 
initiation and negotiation of the agreement, and were decisive 
in its formulation and conclusion. 
  It is just because the establishment of VER are so 
influenced 
by individual trade or enterprises, that this kind of measure 
tends to have administrative decisions concerning export quotas 
which are based on how specific enterprises compare with 
tariffs, quotas, etc., so it is easier to use to lay out a 
specific operating and marketing strategy based on a 
competitor's position, attraction of the target market, and 
product cycle. 
  2. VER's operating system and the combination of operations 
and marketing. 
  Combining operations and marketing is one aspect of an 
enterprises's operating and marketing strategy; at the same time 
it is also a combination of the controllable variables of 
operation and marketing for enterprises to use in implementing 
operating and marketing strategies. Since the restraining 
policies of VER are usually manifested in restrictions on such 
variables of operating and marketing as prices, market size, 
etc., of exported products, therefore VER's own mechanisms can 
work directly or indirectly to combine operations and marketing, 
and become an efficient and precise measure for reflecting and 
conducting enterprises' operating and marketing strategies. This 
cannot be defeated by such trade protective measures as tariffs. 
  The figures listed below are based on survey statistics from 
289 VER agreements. In these VER arrangements, the individual 
variables restricted in operating and marketing combinations 
were distributed as follows: 
  export amount in established markets (rate) 
  53% market share in established markets 
  25% increased export supply 
  10% the lowest export price in established markets 
  20% conditions and opportunities of distribution 
  30% assigned conditions [tiaojian] and opportunities 
[shiji] 
  1) VER's effect on pricing policies. 
  As listed above, 20 percent of the sample VER agreements 
included provisions for the lowest export limited price. For 
example, in 1990, in the EC-Japan VER agreement on 
semiconductors, it stipulated that Japanese semiconductor 
manufacturers would set the lowest price at 9.5 percent higher 
than production cost for their "dynamic random chip." In 
addition to its direct influence on overseas manufacturers 
setting their export price to the importing nation, this kind of 
policy sometimes also limits their export price to third 
nations. For example, in 1986, a VER agreement on 
semiconductors between the United States and Japan implemented 
market price oversight on certain products in third countries. 
  Since VER increasingly has been used as a way of avoiding 
anti-dumping and anti-subsidy punitive measures, this kind of 
lowest price policy becomes increasingly important in VER 
agreements. Its direct result is to cause the price of the 
exported product to rise in the importing nation's market. For 
example, the 1981 VER agreement on automobiles between the 
United States and Japan caused the total U.S. import price index 
to drop 5 percent during the period 1982 to 1985, while the 
automobile price index rose 7 percent. 
  (2) VER's effect on product strategy. 
  With the restriction of VER, exporters have to give up some 
of their price advantage, and in order to maintain their 
competitive position, they must turn to improving their 
products' nature, improving quality. This will push enterprises 
to continue expanding their product mix when determining their 
product strategy, developing new products (including new models, 
new designs, etc.), developing toward areas which have not been 
restricted by VER; constantly improving the level of their 
products, and strengthening their competitiveness. 
  One interesting example is the automobile VER between the 
United States and Japan (1981-1985): although the number of 
automobiles exported to the United States from Japan decreased, 
Japanese enterprises were able to maintain their profit level in 
the automobile market by improving models and adding new models 
which were outside those restricted. 
  (3) VER's effect on distribution strategy. 
  VER's stipulations will often involve every aspect of 
distribution strategy in enterprises, for example, items 
concerning time of supply, "expected quantity" and "reserved 
quantity," mode of transport, port of entry, etc. They may even 
stipulate marketing channels in the importing nation. These 
detailed restrictive measures are very meaningful and important 
for importing nations to implement protections, and for 
exporters to strengthen monopolies. 
<H5>  III. VER and competitive strategies. </H5>
  1. Exporters' competitive strategies. 
  As challengers to the overseas markets, exporters can 
implement a series of competitive strategies, including the 
following very typical ones: 
  (1) Frontal attack strategy. Market challengers launch a 
direct attack on market leaders. This kind of direct 
confrontation will usually lead to a VER agreement. This was 
precisely the situation with U.S. semiconductors at the 
beginning of the eighties: the Toshiba Corporation of Japan--the 
second chip manufacturer in the world, launched an "attack" on 
the leading U.S. chip manufacturer, the Motorola Corporation, 
and their intense market battle led to a U.S.-Japan VER 
agreement in 1986. 
  (2) Flank attack strategy. Exporting corporations try to 
avoid a frontal fight through bypassing the market leaders in 
exporting countries, and obtain a market share from the side. In 
the seventies and early eighties, while major U.S. automobile 
manufacturers were still devoted to making large-sized cars, 
Japanese corporations began concentrating on producing and 
exporting small-sized cars. 
  (3) "Eating little fish" strategy. Market challengers turn 
to 
attacking and eliminating smaller competitors instead of 
fighting with the market leaders in importing countries. In the 
seventies and early eighties, European data control machine tool 
manufacturers adopted exactly this strategy to "attack" 
initially the same type of small enterprises in the U.S. market. 
  Under VER arrangements, exporters usually must abandon the 
frontal attack strategy, and turn instead to the flank attack 
strategy or "eating little fish" strategy. At the same time, 
because VER leads to similar cartel activity by exporters, it 
gives them on the one hand the ability to share in monopoly 
profits, while on the other hand it makes them pay more 
attention to nonpricing competition under the stronger pressure 
of price competition. This makes for comprehensive improvement 
in their products' competitive ability. 
  2. Competitive advantage for manufacturers in importing 
countries. 
  The competitive advantage for manufacturers in importing 
countries under VER acts chiefly as an advantage in protecting 
their market share and established profits, so actually it is a 
"protective advantage." This functions to: 
  (1) Share markets with overseas manufacturers. 
  With the stronger trend to internationalized production and 
sales and the increasing progress made in science, technology, 
and productive forces, more enterprises with strong technical 
and products advantages attempt to improve the level of their 
profits by means of expanding their quota in the international 
market. Therefore, manufacturers in importing countries are 
facing an increased risk of frontal attack from foreign market 
challengers. In this situation, importing countries try to reach 
agreement on sharing the market with the challengers, while the 
"imperfect" parts of VER mentioned above can be understood 
partly as designed to compensate or encourage the other side to 
accept this sort of agreement. For example, in mid- eighties, 
due to the implementation of VER, Japan increased the price of 
its video tapes exported to the EC market by 50 percent; steel 
prices in the EC market rose 14 to 16 percent. 
  So, VER can make enterprises in importing countries 
negotiate 
with foreign challengers, attaining price and profit levels 
which would be impossible under other conditions. It is only in 
this way that VER receives the further protection and support of 
bilateral parties. For example, when Japanese automobile 
manufacturers went outside Congress to launch their opposition 
to replacing the U.S.-Japan VER agreement with quotas or a 
tariff on automobiles exported from Japan, they obtained support 
from the U.S. International Wholesalers Association and several 
major U.S. auto makers. 
  (2) Restrain foreign manufacturers. 
  Most VER agreements include a provision to restrict the 
market share of foreign manufacturers, with the purpose of 
limiting their market within a smaller scale. So, for the 
domestic industries that will implement protections, this kind 
of VER is more clear, reliable, and efficient, at least for the 
short term. In the seventies and eighties, France obligated 
Japan to voluntarily restrain the growth rate of its French 
market share to no more than 3 percent of its small car exports, 
which effectively limited Japanese imports, and protected 
domestic enterprises of the same type. 
<H5>  IV. VER and market mix. </H5>
  Competitive strategy is closely related to market mix. It is 
not difficult to find that implementation of VER is concentrated 
in a small number of industries. These industries can generally 
be divided into two large categories: (1) industries in which 
the market mix is characteristically an oligarchical monopoly, 
such as steel, automobile, electrical products, etc.; (2) 
industries which have problems adjusting mix, and are in decline 
in the developed industrial countries, such as shoes, fabric 
products and clothing, etc. VER plays a different role in these 
two kinds of industries. 
  1. VER as a protective measure. 
  VER chiefly is employed in the second type of industry as a 
kind of protective arrangement, and usually does not include the 
factor of importing countries and enterprises in exporting 
countries seeking a joint monopoly. However, due to the 
intrinsic "imperfection" of VER, this kind of protection 
functions very unsatisfactorily. As Jiadisi Pagewadi [6328 6611 
2448 1584 2706 3907 5530] has noted, this sort of "imperfect 
protectionism" of VER on the one hand, goes along with the 
exporting countries, permitting them to continue exporting under 
import tariff conditions which are closer to free trade; on the 
other hand, it also goes along with the desire of policy makers 
in importing countries of wanting to conduct free trade while 
seeking to reduce the threat from imports. 
  2. VER promotes seeking joint monopolies. 
  In the first kind of industry mentioned above, there 
commonly 
is an oligarchical monopoly market mix. When these industrial 
oligarchs expand into foreign markets, they meet intense 
competition. If they compete, both of them will be hurt; so they 
discuss sharing monopoly profits. Under VER agreements, 
importing countries threaten more severe trade restrictive 
measures; exporting governments also step up coercive measures, 
to eliminate apprehensions about violating anti-monopoly laws; 
in addition, VER itself establishes an operational system of 
regular inquiries, communication of information, and resolution 
of special problems, and all this has provided a strong impetus 
for importing countries and large enterprises and trade groups 
in exporting countries to seek joint monopolies. The result is a 
trend to further concentration in the steel, automobile, working 
machine tool and electric products industries. For example, in 
the electrical industry, the 25 largest corporations dominate 50 
percent of the total output of electrical products, while the 
top 200 corporations dominate 80 percent of the world's gross 
output. 
  So we can see from this, VER is an arrangement of monopoly 
agreements by large corporations or trade groups in the 
international market, and the government's involvement actually 
provides a "cover" for them from anti-monopoly laws' oversight 
restrictions, as well as help safeguard them from coercive 
measures taken against destructive and violating agreements. 
<H5>  V. Conclusion </H5>
  VER is not only an "imperfect protectionism," but also a 
kind 
of forceful power. It can form precise and flexible operating 
strategies in global trade, which can be overcome by other 
measures such as tariffs, quotas, etc. To operate this weapon, 
besides governments, there are more individual large enterprises 
and trade groups taking advantage of VER, changing strong 
foreign competitors into collaborators, jointly sharing the 
market profits. 
  At present, this kind of measure, which violates free 
competition global trade policy, is getting wild. As GATT expert 
Professor Jackson has observed: with trade policy becoming 
complicated and flexible, people will see more clearly that 
activities due to a lack of unified rules for international 
competition, especially activities among privately run 
enterprises, definitely will damage the objective of global free 
trade. 
  Establishing unified rules and policy for international 
competition will very possibly become major topics in the next 
cycle of GATT negotiations. 
<H5>  Major references: </H5>
  1. Preusse, Heinz Gert. "Voluntary Export Restraints--An 
Effective Means Against a Spread of Neo-Protectionism?" JOURNAL 
OF WORLD TRADE, 1991, No 2. 
  2. Madin Woerfu [7456 0002 3087 1422 1133], translated by 
Ning Xiaohui [1337 2556 2547] "Why Implement VER? A Historical 
Analysis." JINGJI ZILIAO YICONG, 1991, No 1. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66256 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar032___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-032 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  25 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> POPULATION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Urban Women's Changing Perception of Childbearing </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Urban Women's Changing Perception of Childbearing </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0439A Beijing RENKOU YU JINGJI [POPULATION AND 
ECONOMICS] in Chinese No 82, 25 Feb 94 pp 42-46, 56 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0439A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENKOU YU JINGJI [POPULATION AND 
ECONOMICS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wang Shuxin (3769 2885 2450), affiliated with </F>
the Population Economics Studies Institute at the Beijing 
Academy of Economics: "The Changing Perception of Childbearing 
Among Beijing's Urban Women"] 
  [Excerpts] [passage omitted] The Population Economics 
Studies Institute at the Beijing Academy of Economics conducted 
a sample survey on marriage and the family in Beijing's urban 
and suburban districts, polling 2,162 married women betwen the 
ages of 20 and 54. To facilitate comparative analysis, we have 
divided the surveyed women into three groups: 1) those born 
before 1949; 2) Those born between 1950 and 1959; 3) those 
born from 1960 to 1972. 
<H5>  I. The Childbearing Perceptions of Women Born in the Three </H5>
Different Periods 
  Women born from 1937 to 1941, on one hand were more deeply 
affected by the old society's ideology, culture, and customs, 
with the feudal ethical concepts of "the earlier the marriage, 
the sooner one has children," "the earlier one has a son, the 
sooner one benefits," passing on to future generations that 
received from the ancestors," and "regarding men as superior to 
women," deeply rooted in their minds. On the other hand, during 
their childbearing peak, as population growth restraint forces 
had not been officially established, leaving this group of women 
in the midst of the conversion from old to new population and 
childbearing forces, they essentially followed traditional 
childbearing perceptions, with their key childbearing 
motivations being "passing on to future generations that 
received from the ancestors," and "raising children to take care 
of them in their old age." As they were influenced by these 
childbearing motivations and restraints, they particularly 
favored boys, inevitably striving to achieve their sex bias in 
children through having many children, which was accompanied by 
early marriage, early childbearing, and multiple births. 
  Marriage and childbearing are closely interrelated, with age 
at first marriage having a definite restrictive impact on 
childbearing age and number of children born. In China, early 
marriage is generally accompanied by early childbearing, with an 
earlier beginning-childbearing age. Early marriage and 
childbearing also extend the real childbearing-age period, 
increasing the possibility of multiple childbearing. Real 
survey results fully confirm this point.... As women born in 
this period had traditonal childbearing perceptions, their 
childbearing behavior showed up as early marriage, early 
childbearing, and multiple births. The number of women in this 
group who were married before the age of 19 made up 23.2 percent 
of the population in their age-group, with as many as 56.3 
percent of early-married women bearing more than three children, 
and 33.6 percent having two children. 
  Women born between 1942 and 1949 were 16-23 years old by the 
mid-1960s, beginning to be affected by traditional 
family-planning indoctrination. Restricted by family planning 
policy, this group of women had a controlled childbearing 
pattern. Their number of marriages before the age of 19 was 
down, with higher percentages of marriage between the ages of 20 
and 29, one child, and two children, being respectively 75.2 
percent, 71.5 percent, and 19.9 percent. This group of women 
were characterized by a composite childbearing pattern of both 
traditional and controlled forms coexisting. 
  Women born in the 1950s were 21-30 years of age by the 
1980s, 
by which time China had officially announced a revision of its 
family planning policy, advocating that, except for in minority 
nationality regions with sparse populations, a couple should 
generally have only one child. The CPC Central Committee issued 
an open letter on the matter of controlling China's population 
growth to all Communist Party and CYL members. China achieved 
marked family planning successes in the 1980s primarily due to 
the greater contributions made at the time by women from 30 to 
40 years of age. This group of women's first-marriage age was 
generally higher, with an average first-marriage age of more 
than 26, or nearly three years later than that of women born 
before 1949. Those married at older than 25 rose in percentage 
from the preceding group's 28.7 percent to 70.1 percent. Due 
to comprehensive factors, such as later marriage age, shorter 
childbearing period, and longer time between childbearing, the 
percentage of women born in the 1950s bearing only one child was 
up sharply to 94.73 percent, with only 4 percent having two 
children, and the incidence of three children essentially 
stopped. As to the lower level of childbearing by women born in 
this period, it was the government's family planning policy that 
played the decisive role. 
  Women born from the 1960s on reached marriage and 
childbearing age only by 1980, by which time it was universally 
advocated that a couple have only one child, with emphasis on a 
policy of late marriage and childbearing. Meanwhile, 
influenced by social and economic reform and opening and market 
economy, the traditional perceptions of Beijing women about 
women's values and childbearing had undergone a great change, 
with higher numbers wanting no children at all or only one 
child. This group of young married women had the lowest 
early-marriage percentage (0.3 percent), the highest percentage 
of no children, and very few bearing two children, basically 
achieving late marriage, late childbearing, and few births. 
The lower childbearing level of women born from the 1960s on 
resulted from the overall impact of childbearing policy and 
socio-economic development. 
<H5>  II. The Change in Childbearing Perceptions </H5>
<H5>  1. The Change in Childbearing Perceptions From the </H5>
Perspective of Childbearing Aspirations and the Real 
Childbearing Difference 
  As used here, childbearing aspirations means, under set 
socio-economic terms, and supposing no intervention by family 
planning policy, the voluntary choices made by women as to the 
number of children to bear and their sex. 
  As to the women born before 1949 and in the 1950s, the 
childbearing aspirations to have no children, one child, or two 
children were roughly the same. But the childbearing 
perceptions of women born from the 1960s on underwent a marked 
change, with the percentages of those wanting no children or 
only one child up sharply, the percentage of those wanting two 
children lower than for those born in both of the previous 
periods, and not even one woman wanting a third child. As to 
the overall childbearing aspirations of the 2,162 women 
surveyed, the childbearing perceptions of Beijing's urban women 
are undergoing a conversion from traditional to modern form, 
with the numbers of women wanting less or no children growing 
steadily. As to the sex preference, since having a boy is no 
longer the key childbearing motivation of urban women, in the 
childbearing aspirations of the women surveyed, regardless of 
the child's sex, the percentage of women opting for only one 
child was the highest. In the aspirations for one boy, one 
girl, two boys, or two girls, more women wanted a girl than a 
boy, exactly the opposite from the old, traditional childbearing 
perception. 
<H5>  2. The Change in Childbearing Perceptions from the Angle of </H5>
the Childbearing Aspirations of Women Now Having Varying Numbers 
of Children 
  The women who have not had children were basically born 
since 
the 1960s, with their childbearing aspirations for no children 
at 28.4 percent, for one child at 43.2 percent, for two children 
at 24.7 percent, and for three or more children basically 
nonexistant. Of the women now having one child, 50.5 percent 
have had their aspirations basically satisfied, while 40.3 
percent would like a second child. Of women with two children, 
50.4 percent have satisfied their childbearing aspirations, with 
47.4 percent having real childbearing levels higher than they 
had hoped for. As to women with three or more children, only a 
very few had wanted this many, with 92.6 percent having more 
children than they really wanted. [passage omitted] 
  The childbearing aspirations of the women now having two or 
more children shows the obvious change in the childbearing 
perceptions of Beijing's urban women. Most women with more 
than one child were born before 1949. While their actual 
number of children is higher than they had hoped for, their 
childbearing aspirations were certainly not satisfied. As 
childbearing perceptions have changed from the past multiple 
births to less births, only one child, or no children, there is 
a phenomenon of real childbearing levels being out of line with 
aspired-to childbearing numbers. [passage omitted] 
<H5>  3. The Change in Women's Childbearing Perceptions as to the </H5>
Value of Children 
  The change in childbearing perceptions is restricted by many 
factors, with the benefits playing a key role, being reflected 
in many values about the children born. The survey 
questionnaire categorized the value of children as follows: 1) 
To keep you from being lonely; 2) to form a complete family; 3) 
to bring happiness; 4) to help the family make a living; 5) to 
avoid possible reproach for not wanting children; 6) 
childbearing is a woman's duty; 7) raising children to take care 
of one in their old age; 8) to please parents and relatives; 9) 
to preserve conjugal relations; 10) to give you honor; 11) to 
bring you love; 12) to pass on to future generations that 
received from ancestors. The value of children is closely 
linked to regional factors and economic conditions. Before 
liberation and in the 1950s, Beijing was closed to international 
intercourse, with very low living standards, where people often 
emphasized the economic value of having children, generally 
regarding the number of children born as a source of increased 
family income, and seeing boys as future family pillars, support 
in old age, and the "incense" of passing on to future 
generations that received from ancestors. But as Beijing has 
now become a modern, open city, with a relatively developed 
economy, higher per capita income, and adults with more years of 
schooling, it has experienced a qualitative leap from a social, 
economic, or cultural perspective, with many of the perceptions 
of Beijingers, including childbearing perceptions, having 
naturally changed sharply. Even the women born before 1949 
have essentially abandoned their backward, traditional 
childbearing values and perceptions. In this survey, the two 
values of children, of passing on the generations and raising 
children to take care of one in their old age, ranked lowest of 
all values, being replaced by the "family happiness" and "sense 
of a complete family" of bearing children for the spiritual 
benefits and forming a complete family, bringing love, keeping 
one from being lonely, and bringing family pleasures. As the 
family focus shifts from blood to matrimonial relations, with 
children no longer being the "tie" that binds families together, 
the phenomenon of young married women not wanting children is 
growing steadily. 
  As educational levels differ, so do the values of women 
about 
having children. For instance, as to passing on the 
generations, raising children to take care of one in their old 
age, bringing honor to one's ancestors, and childbearing as a 
woman's duty, women with grade school educations or less made up 
the highest percentage at over 20 percent, with the percentages 
for those with junior and senior high school eductions being 
very low, at 3.4 percent and 4.6 percent respectively, and 
college-educated women ranking lowest at only 2.3 percent. The 
value perceptions of "family happiness" and "sense of a complete 
family," such as holding that childbearing is to form a complete 
family, bring family happiness, provide parents love, and keep 
the family from being lonely, ranked high among women of all 
educational levels. 
  As women's occupations vary, so do childbearing values and 
perceptions. For instance, among women in the three higher 
levels of occupation, such as professional technicians, 
officials in state organs, party and mass organizations, and 
enterprises and institutions; and office workers and related 
personel, less women held old, traditional perceptions, such as 
"passing on the generations, raising children to take care of 
one in their old age, and childbearing as a woman's duty," than 
in the three categories of business workers, service workers, 
and production and transportation workers and related personnel, 
with these values for the former three categories of women 
ranking respectively at 4 percent, 6.3 percent, and 9.3 percent, 
but for the latter at 12.6 percent, 15.2 percent, and 19.3 
percent, respectively. The key values of "forming a complete 
family, bringing happiness, providing love, and keeping one from 
being lonely," ranked very high among women of all occupations. 
<H5>  III. The Factors Affecting the Change in Women's Perceptions </H5>
About Childbearing [passage omitted] 
<H5>  1. Economic Factors Affecting the Change in Childbearing </H5>
Perceptions 
  Economic factors are the most important ones promoting the 
change in childbearing perceptions. In recent years, as 
Beijing's economy has experienced impressive changes, the 
economic status of women has correspondingly risen. Of the 
married women from 20-54 years of age who we surveyed, the 
employment rate topped 90 percent, with specialized technicians, 
officials in state organs, Party and mass organizations, and 
enterprises and institutions; and office workers and related 
personnel, accounting for 47.7 percent of the workforce. Based 
on state occupational classifications, as these three categories 
of personnel are considered to be in high-level occupations, 
such a high percentage of them in the workforce shows that 
Beijing women have a higher economic status. As women have 
higher economic status, they no longer emphasize the past 
economic values of having children to take care of them in their 
old age, or in hopes that they will help the family make a 
living and earn money for family support, weakening their 
perceptions about early marriage, early childbearing, multiple 
births, and regarding men as superior to women, and 
strengthening them about less births, eugenics, and better 
educations, meaning that they generally make higher demands on 
their childrens' quality, involving sharp increases in the costs 
of educating and raising children. The monthly consumption in 
Beijing today of a non-adult child equals or even exceeds that 
of the monthly wages of a key family worker, with the younger 
the child, the higher the cost. This "high" cost of raising a 
child affects women's quality of life, with young and 
middle-aged married women in Beijing having an increasing sense 
of independence and money, and striving for personal freedom and 
happiness, as well as for cultural lives and material benefits, 
with correspondingly changed consumer perceptions. The survey 
showed that Beijing women's consumption ranks by money spent in 
descending order as "buying daily necessities, clothing, 
cosmetics, and beauty and hair care products, and paying for 
recreational consumption, such as restaurants, karaoke, dancing, 
and health clubs," with tourism and human relationship costs 
also accounting for quite a high percentage of their monthly 
incomes. The cost of having a child, plus the monthly spending 
of both husband and wife, leaves very little left over. Many 
women, in the interests of easier and more comfortable lives, 
are unwilling to sacrifice personal well-being and happiness for 
the fetters of a tied-down life. So the numbers of women not 
wanting children are growing steadily. 
<H5>  2. Policy Factors Affecting the Change in Childbearing </H5>
Perceptions 
  Population and family planning policies are hard-limitation 
factors affecting childbearing perceptions. Our survey of 
women's childbearing aspirations proves that many more women 
have had a child than had wanted or hoped to, with the most 
crucial factor in this being China's current family planning 
policy. Of the women with one child, most are of the new 
generation born and raised since the founding of the PRC who, on 
one hand were less affected by traditional childbearing 
perceptions and, on the other are better educated and have 
improved economic conditions, so can more easily understand and 
accept the state's childbearing policy, and can proceed from 
national and nationality interests to conscientiously practice 
family planning. Of the women born before 1949, there is a 
sharp gap between their childbearing aspirations and actual 
childbearing levels, a key cause of which is the impact of the 
propaganda and indoctrination in state family planning policy. 
<H5>  3. Social Factors Affecting the Change in Childbearing </H5>
Perceptions 
  Changes in perceptions follow closely behind social change. 
While most of the women born before 1949 still maintained the 
customary women's image of "virtuous wife and good mother," the 
tide of change, with the passing of time, change in social and 
economic system, and opening of Beijing's doors, has sharply 
shaken traditional women's values and childbearing perceptions. 
The young and middle-aged married women born since the 1950s, 
as to childbearing aspirations, increase in percentage by lower 
age as to not wanting children or wanting only one child, no 
longer focusing their time and energy on raising children, but 
preferring rather to develop themselves and enhance their own 
quality. By the mid-1980s, the intense competition formed by 
reform and opening had brought worries and concerns to young and 
middle-aged women, bringing many to understand that unless they 
strengthened their sense of competition, improved their 
educations, and pursued advanced technical studies, it would be 
hard for them to cope with the risks brought to women's 
employment by reform. ZHONGGUO FUNU BAO [CHINA WOMEN'S REPORT] 
has directly surveyed its readers on how women see the risks and 
challenges brought by reform. This survey shows that 73 
percent of women feel that reform has brought more risk to 
women's than men's jobs, which figure is 67 percent for young 
and middle-aged women, and 73 percent for middle-aged women. And 
in our survey in Beijing on marriage and the family, almost 
all women held that as to promotion opportunities, men had more 
chance of promotion than women. Due to the historical image of 
the weak woman, it should be said that while the competitive 
climate is equal, the competitive terms for men and women are 
unequal, with the "priority" consideration of women at times of 
cutbacks being nothing new. So the masses of women can only 
face up to their historical disadvantage, by improving their own 
quality, so that they can compete with men in an unequal social 
environment. Educational level is a key inherent factor 
affecting childbearing perceptions and their change. The years 
and extent of education directly affect the rate and depth of 
human understanding of things. Better educated women focus 
their childbearing perceptions on less births, eugenics, and an 
emphasis on their children's quality, instead of striving for 
numbers. They have less sex bias, clearer childbearing 
objectives, and more distinct pre-conception rational thought 
and choice processes. Based on their own social environment, 
they can conscientiously consider and correspondingly adjust 
their childbearing behavior, to make it as consistent as 
possible with national policy. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66257 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar032___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-032 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  17 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> PRC MEDIA ON FOREIGN ECONOMIES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article Praises ROK's Export Strategy </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Article Praises ROK's Export Strategy </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0383A Beijing GUOJI MAOYI WENTI [INTERNATIONAL TRADE 
JOURNAL] in Chinese No 133, 17 Jan 94 pp 21-24 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0383A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUOJI MAOYI WENTI [INTERNATIONAL TRADE 
JOURNAL] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Li Geng (2621 1649) of Institute of </F>
International Economic Relations of the Shoudu Iron and Steel 
Research and Development Company: "ROK's Import and Export 
Policy Following Its Entry into GATT and Its Inspiration to Us"] 
  [Excerpt] [Passage omitted] It can be realized that ROK's 
foreign trade policy is mainly to encourage exports, while 
relaxing imports; and to turn trade deficits into trade surplus 
in the course of "maximizing imports and exports." In the past, 
China had, over a protracted period of time, implemented an 
excessively protective foreign trade policy which has become an 
obstacle for its re-entry into GATT. As for imports, the number 
of mandatory plans have been duly reduced with the scope of 
planned management narrowing. However, due to the lack of a 
mechanism to guide imports with the industrial policy, 
shortcomings such as weak macroeconomic control, unfair 
competition and delayed legislation on foreign trade have 
cropped up. As for exports, the role of market regulation 
remains insignificant. Moreover, competitions are usually 
unfair. In domestic trade, commodity prices are being driven up, 
while in foreign trade, goods are exported at a much lower 
price. All this has harmed the overall interests of the state. 
The enterprises which handle exports have monopolized the export 
business. In addition, export products are divided into 
different grades. This prevents the enterprises from improving 
their production quality and enhancing their competitiveness. As 
for the customs duties, protective measures are over-emphasized, 
while not enough efforts are made to help enterprises become 
more competitive. Right now, China's average tariff rate is 22 
percent, while that of the industrialized nations is 4 to 5 
percent, and that of developing countries is 13 to 14 percent. 
Moreover, the structure of China's tariff rates is not so 
rational. It lacks flexibility in regulating imports, and falls 
far short of the GATT requirements. China's highly protective 
policy fails to draw a clear-cut line between the protection of 
an "infant industry" and the protection of a backward industry 
with low economic efficiency. It cannot help some industries 
extricate themselves from their predicament of high energy and 
production costs and low economic efficiency. It serves to 
increase the scale of capital-intensive industries, and makes 
the highly competitive labor-intensive and technology-intensive 
industries suffer. It crushes the incentive of the enterprises 
to lower their production costs and improve the quality of their 
products. As a result, the enterprises lack enthusiasm to seek 
technological progress and the ability to compete with others on 
the world market. In short, this policy has made China's 
industry to develop production without taking into consideration 
the production costs and economic results, and suffer from an 
inherent shortage before it competes with others on the 
international market. We must change our practice of protecting 
our own products in an overall manner and suppressing 
competition; place emphasis on protecting our infant industry; 
introduce a competition mechanism; and use the tariff and 
foreign exchange rates as an economic lever and a means of 
regulation; and improve the relevant legal system. It is 
necessary to thoroughly change the pattern of controlling 
imports and exports with administrative measures; make full use 
of the market mechanism in carrying out activities in foreign 
trade; permit more industrial enterprises directly engage in 
import and export business and compete with others on the world 
market; and establish China's own multinational corporations. 
  In formulating its enterprise policy, the ROK government 
gives the enterprises all kinds of preferential treatment and 
relaxes restrictions placed on them. It helps enterprises 
become export-oriented and allows them to wholeheartedly compete 
with others on the world market. Since the implementation of its 
reform program, China has raised the status of its enterprises. 
The change of the management mechanism of the enterprises has 
become a priority item on the government agenda. As for the 
foreign trade policy, only a limited number of large and 
medium-sized enterprises are authorized to do foreign trade, 
although the power to handle foreign trade is being delegated to 
the lower levels. As a result, the great majority of China's 
enterprises are separated from the world market, while some 
enterprises specialized in handling foreign trade have 
monopolized the business in foreign trade. Therefore, China's 
foreign trade is monopolized and divided to a great extent. 
However, due to trade restrictions, it is also difficult to lift 
all restrictions in doing foreign trade. The existence of this 
kind of "partition" puts China at a disadvantage in export 
competition and also creates friction between industry and 
trade. It also violates the GATT provisions regarding "state-run 
trade enterprises." All these not only hamper the process of 
China's re-entry into GATT, but also hinder the development of 
enterprises, weaken their competitiveness and actually undermine 
their vitality in competing with others on the world market. 
China's state of affairs is different from that of the ROK. 
However, ROK's successful experience also gives us an 
inspiration. After we re-enter the GATT, our enterprises and 
their foreign counterparts will be placed on the same starting 
line. Therefore, we should give our enterprises greater power to 
manage their own business and narrow the gap between our 
enterprises and foreign enterprise in terms of operating 
environment. The government must establish a set of all-round 
preferential policy, encourage enterprises to develop foreign 
trade and compete with others on an equal footing according to 
GATT provisions. Generally speaking, the degree of 
industrialization of a nation is mainly determined by its major 
enterprises. China's large and medium-sized enterprises with the 
state-run enterprises as the core constitute the main force 
which bears the financial burden of the state. To lift 
restrictions on these enterprises and let them directly 
participate in international competition will undoubtedly 
increase China's competitiveness, give the medium-sized and 
small enterprises an impetus to become export-oriented and help 
China's enterprises to become more internationalized. 


</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66258 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpcar032___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-032 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  23 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Remove Bottlenecks in Marketing Farm Products </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Remove Bottlenecks in Marketing Farm Products </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0413A Beijing NONGYE JINGJI WENTI [PROBLEMS OF 
AGRICULTURAL ECONOMY] in Chinese No 2, 23 Feb 94 pp 7-11 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0413A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing NONGYE JINGJI WENTI [PROBLEMS OF 
AGRICULTURAL ECONOMY] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhan Wu (6124 2976) of the State Commission for </F>
Restructuring the Economic System: "Under the Socialist Market 
Economic System, All-Out Efforts Should Be Made To Solve the 
Problem of Difficulty in Buying and Selling' Farm Products"] 
  [Text] I. Understanding the Nature of the Big Waves 
of "Difficulty in Buying and Selling" Farm Products 
  The past decade has witnessed two rounds of "difficulty in 
selling" farm products: one in 1982-1984; the other in 
1989-1992. From 1985 to 1988, there also appeared a wave of 
"difficulty in buying" farm products accompanied by "big battles 
for commodities." By analyzing the "difficulty in selling and 
buying" farm products, we have arrived at the following five 
conclusions about the nature of the issue: 
  1) "Difficulty in selling" and "difficulty in buying" 
are both extensive problems As far as the variety of farm 
products is concerned, 13 products were involved in the first 
round of "difficulty in selling," 17 in the "difficulty in 
buying" and the "big battles for commodities," and 10 in the 
second round of "difficulty in selling." In terms of the 
purchase and sales systems, some of the products involved were 
originally under the state-monopolized purchase system but later 
switched to the contracted purchase system. These were staple 
farm products such as grain, cotton, and oilseeds. Others were 
essential farm products originally belonging to the quota 
purchase category and later either liberalized from quota 
purchase or remaining in that category. Examples were silkworm 
cocoons, wool, hogs, tea, and ramie. Still others, which took up 
the largest share, were items whose prices and transactions had 
long been decontrolled. They included eggs, fish, kelp, apples, 
haws, citrus fruits, sugar canes, chestnuts, rabbit hair, wood 
rosin, dried pepper, dairy products, garlic, and other 
perishable, native, and special indigenous products. 
  Why was it "difficult to sell" those farm products that had 
already been decontrolled? The reasons are diverse. If a farm 
product was "difficult to sell" because of monopoly by the 
state's supply and marketing cooperatives or the old 
price-control system, it could sell well once monopoly was 
removed and price control was lifted. However, if, after this 
was done, new negative factors appeared, such as declined 
product quality, difficulty in transportation, or poor 
management in marketing the product, then "difficulty in 
selling" would come up again. 
  Why was it "difficult to buy" already-decontrolled farm 
products, resulting in "big battles for commodities"? There were 
also a number of reasons. Examples were failure to gear up 
management in the wake of the decontrol, commodity circulation 
being out of order, and artificially jacked-up prices triggering 
buying sprees. All these could lead to a "big battle for 
commodities." 
  2. The two rounds of "difficulty in selling" farm 
products had common features as well as specific 
characteristics Their common features were: A) The 
commodities involved were essentially the same. Both involved 
the following three broad categories: Farm products originally 
under the state-monopolized purchase system and later switched 
to the contracted purchase system; essential farm products 
originally belonging to the quota purchase category and later 
either liberalized from quota purchase or remaining in that 
category; and perishable, native, and special indigenous 
products that had been completely decontrolled. B) Both followed 
the same course of development, i.e. from farmers' "difficulty 
in selling" to "difficulty in storing" and "difficulty in 
transporting and selling" experienced by the state's supply and 
marketing cooperatives. C) Their basic reasons were the same. 
For example, both rounds of "difficulty in selling grain" 
stemmed, in essence, from an imbalance between supply and 
demand, which was either temporary or local in nature or due to 
improper product mix. The imbalance was caused by a series of 
complicated factors: our people's low consumption level at the 
present stage, the incompatibility between the variety of grain 
produced and the consumers' requirements, inadequate 
infrastructure with respect to commodity circulation, 
processing, storage, transportation, and information, as well as 
unsound macro-regulatory and control mechanisms. The problem was 
not an absolute surplus of grain. As for other farm products, 
the basic causes for two rounds of "difficulty in selling" were 
more or less the same as the "difficulty in selling" grain. 
  With respect to the characteristics of the two rounds of 
"difficulty in selling" farm products, let us still take grain 
as an example. The two rounds of "difficulty in selling grain" 
showed the following characteristics: A) The scope increased. 
The first round of "difficulty in selling grain" involved 
essentially rice in the main rice-producing provinces in the 
south and corn in Jilin Province. The second round of 
"difficulty in selling grain" spread to Henan and other main 
wheat-producing provinces and even to some grain production 
bases (such as Fujian's Jianyang and Jianou counties). B) The 
total stockpile increased. For instance, during the first round 
of "difficulty in selling grain," Hunan, a main rice-producing 
province, had 1.5 billion kilograms of rice in stock. During the 
second round, the stockpile was four times as large as this 
amount. C) State grain departments' difficulties also increased. 
During the first round of farmers' "difficulty in selling 
grain," the state grain departments' macro-financial situation 
was not so tight; therefore, they issued no IOU's to farmers. 
During the second round, their financial situation became 
relatively strained, and they had to issue many IOU's, resulting 
in a total debt of some 30 billion yuan. If you buy more, you 
will do more business but you will also lose more money--this 
was one of the major subjective factors that hindered the grain 
departments from attempting to ease farmers' "difficulty in 
selling grain." 
  3. For many farm products, "difficulty in selling" 
and "difficulty in buying" transformed into each other and 
succeeded each other. In the case of grain, oilseeds, 
cotton, hogs and other staple farm products, "difficulty in 
selling" was closely followed by "difficulty in buying," which 
then transformed into a new round of "difficulty in selling." 
"Difficulty in selling" and "difficulty in buying" also recurred 
frequently one after the other for silkworm cocoons, wool, 
rabbit hair, ramie, jute, and ambary, forming a big vicious 
cycle. 
  For grain, cotton, oilseeds, and other staple farm 
products, the chief reasons that "difficulty in selling" 
transformed into "difficulty in buying" were as follows: a) 
There was a lack of clear understanding of the true nature of 
"difficulty in selling." The temporary or local imbalance 
between supply and demand or the imbalance with respect to 
product mix was mistaken for an absolute surplus of supply. 
Accordingly, protective and preferential treatments for 
agriculture were discontinued. This dampened the farmers' 
enthusiasm about increasing production and led to the four 
years' zero-growth in the output of grain, cotton, and oilseeds. 
b) Macro-regulation and control were not effective. c) During 
the period of "difficulty in selling" those farm products that 
were industrial raw materials, such as cotton, wool, and 
silkworm cocoons, factory production capacities were 
unreasonably expanded. This resulted in the subsequent problem 
that the supply of these farm products could not meet the 
factories' demands. d) Some farm products were affected by 
fluctuations in the international market. 
  The transformation of "difficulty in buying" these 
products into "difficulty in selling" them was attributable 
mainly to the following factors: (1) Attention was devoted 
merely to agricultural production. No corresponding measures 
were taken to gear up the circulation of goods, processing of 
produce, and infrastructure construction. This did not meet the 
needs after a new bumper harvest. (2) Due to eagerness to solve 
the "difficulty in buying," some measures taken were aimed at 
tackling current and local problems rather than long-term and 
overall issues, sowing seeds for "difficulty in selling." (3) 
During the period of "difficulty in buying" and the "big battles 
for commodities," the problem of selling fake and shoddy 
products and passing off low-grade goods as high-grade goods 
became severe. This greatly affected the overall product 
quality, providing an optimum condition for a new round of 
"difficulty in selling." 
  (4) Deep-rooted causes for the recurrence of 
"difficulty in selling and buying" farm products As far as 
the total quantity is concerned, at the time of "difficulty in 
selling" farm products, supply was not necessarily excessive. 
Similarly, when it was "difficult to buy" farm products and when 
the "big battles for commodities" occurred, supply was not 
necessarily insufficient. Instead, there were deep-rooted causes 
for the occurrence of serious "difficulty in selling," 
"difficulty in buying," and the "big battles for commodities." 
  1. Various mechanisms existed that amplified fluctuations: 
There were two mechanisms amplifying fluctuations in production, 
one caused by farmers, the other by local governments. As 
farmers were engaged in separate productive activities and 
lacked timely information on supply and demand, they generally 
chose this year's most profitable crop as the main crop they 
planned to grow next year. This was the case for most farmers, 
though plans made in this way were often outdated. Since China 
has 200 million farming households, a slight change in each 
one's plan would result in a sizable increase or decrease in the 
total. So a craze in growing or not growing a certain crop would 
have a great impact on the up and down of the output of that 
crop. County governments also tended to act in such a way. 
Sometimes, they arbitrarily called on farmers to grow a certain 
crop or even forced farmers to fulfill certain cropping quotas. 
Such actions helped amplify the ups and downs in production. 
  With regard to the marketing of farm products, there were 
three mechanisms adding to fluctuations, caused by farmers, 
enterprises, and local governments respectively. When the 
harvest was good and farm products were in abundant supply, 
farmers were afraid of a decline in prices. They vied to keep 
less harvest in their hands and sell more. Conversely, when the 
harvest was poor, they expected a rise in prices and vied to 
keep more and sell less. When the 200 million farm households 
were increasing or slashing the quantity of a product they put 
on the market, the impact on market fluctuations was 
considerable. When a decline in prices was expected, the state's 
supply and marketing cooperatives often took in less, refused to 
buy, or even purchase at purposely reduced prices. Sometimes, 
they even vied to dump their own stocks on the market. All these 
aggravated the farmers' "difficulty in selling" their products 
and caused the prices to drop further. When the market was good, 
they offered higher prices in order to buy more, thus triggering 
a "big battle for commodities." Moreover, some non-agricultural 
departments as well as enterprises and institutions that had 
nothing to do with agriculture and even self-employed 
businessmen remained still when farmers were experiencing 
"difficulty in selling" farm products, but when it was 
"difficult to buy" such products on the market, they rushed to 
purchase by offering high prices. Another problem was that some 
local governments' actions were aimed at short-term targets and 
local interests only. For instance, when the harvest was good, 
many grain-producing provinces wanted to increase the amount 
transferred to other provinces, while the other provinces wanted 
to take in less or postpone such in-bound transfer. When the 
harvest was poor, many grain-producing provinces wanted to 
reduce the amount transferred to other provinces. They even put 
up blockade to guard against the outflow of their grain. In many 
grain-selling provinces [provinces to which grain-producing 
provinces used to sell their grain], purchasing agents were 
overactive. They drove up the prices and started a buying spree. 
Some local governments even used administrative measures to 
close the free grain market and forced farmers to sell grain as 
they directed, thereby artificially creating a tense atmosphere 
and making farmers all the more reluctant to sell their harvest. 
  2. Conflicts existed between the interests of producing 
and selling regions [regions producing farm products and regions 
to which farm products were sold]: One of the chief reasons for 
the above-mentioned activity carried out by local governments 
was that conflicts existed between the interests of producing 
and selling regions and nothing had been done to solve such 
conflicts either by macro adjustment or through coordinated 
efforts of the regions concerned. On the one hand, under the 
responsibility systems for finances, foreign trade, and grain 
and oilseed production, all staple farm products contained the 
producing region's investment plus the local government's 
subsidies. To producing regions, the outflow of these products 
to selling regions without an appropriate compensation would 
mean "an outflow of interests"; to selling regions, this would 
mean an extra profit. This forced some producing regions to 
block the outflow of their harvest or to increase the prices of 
their farm products as a way to protect their own interests. On 
the other hand, the state's preferential-treatment polices 
created disparities between different localities. For instance, 
after the power of doing foreign trade business had been 
delegated to the local level, the system of "eating from the big 
common pot" with regard to financial subsidies created a 
situation where whoever had a greater export volume received a 
greater amount of subsidy from the central government. As a 
result, the big commodity battles directly related to exports 
became more and more acute. Examples were the "big battle for 
rabbit hair," "big battle for ramie," "big battle for silkworm 
cocoons," and "big battle for prawns." In 1988, following the 
implementation of the financial responsibility system for 
foreign trade, the government set a fixed amount of the basic 
subsidy for all localities. But due to the varying amounts of 
foreign exchange retention and the price-differential subsidy 
from place to place plus the serious unreasonableness of foreign 
exchange rates, the various "big battles" still existed. 
  3. Price adjustment was improper: "Difficulty in selling 
and buying" farm products, big dips and peaks in production, and 
sharp rise and fall in prices are closely related and mutually 
affecting. Price adjustment plays a dynamic role in this regard 
because it can regulate supply and demand as well as affect 
production. The improper work on price adjustments we did in the 
past produced the following effects on the "difficulty in 
buying" farm products and on the "big battles for commodities": 
a) Prices were decontrolled, but no effort was made to 
strengthen management. As a result, commodity circulation was in 
a disorderly state, and prices were pushed up in various ways, 
bringing about the "big battles for commodities." b) Prices in 
adjacent areas differed immensely and nothing was done to 
equalize them. This resulted in an abnormal flow of farm 
products between adjacent areas, which also contributed to the 
breakout of the "big battles for commodities." c) While all 
retail prices were going up and the government's purchase prices 
for farm products remained comparatively low, the government 
further reduced the purchase prices for certain staple farm 
products. This caused production to decline and, accordingly, 
created the "difficulty in buying" these products. Our previous 
price adjustments also had numerous effects on farmers' 
"difficulty in selling" their farm products. The most striking 
aspect of our improper price adjustments was failure to maintain 
a proper price gap between products of different quality and 
between products sold in different seasons. In southern 
provinces, "difficulty in selling grain" was actually difficulty 
in selling early long-grained rice. As for late-ripening 
non-glutinous rice and other species of fine-quality rice, 
supply often fell short of demand. One of the chief reasons for 
such a situation was our failure to maintain a proper price gap 
between rice of different qualities. This encouraged farmers to 
grow more early long-grain rice and less fine-quality rice. 
Another problem was that all farmers rushed to sell their rice 
right after the harvest, thus adding to the "difficulty in 
selling." And one of the main reasons for this problem was the 
lack of price differential for different seasons. So farmers 
were not enthusiastic about keeping their harvest to be sold at 
a later date. 
  5. The big waves of "difficulty in buying and 
selling" farm products differed from the normal, inevitable 
market fluctuations that appeared in the planned economy, and 
were more harmful than the latter Their conspicuous 
differences were: a) Quantitative difference. In general, normal 
fluctuations on the farm products market are small ups and downs 
caused by the situation of supply versus demand or by price 
differences due to seasonal reasons or other temporary or local 
factors. In contrast, the big waves of "difficulty in buying and 
selling" and the "big battles for commodities" represented big 
dips and peaks in supply and demand, sharp rise and fall in 
prices, and immense increase and decrease in production. Their 
magnitude of changes could be from several times to more than a 
dozen times. b) Qualitative difference. Normal fluctuations on 
the farm products market follow the law of supply and demand and 
the law of value and serve to regulate commodity circulation and 
production. So they are basically benign. The big waves of 
"difficulty in buying and selling" and the "big battles for 
commodities" were caused by artificial amplification mechanisms. 
They reflected neither the situation of supply versus demand nor 
the change in value, and were destructive in nature. 
  Their destructive effects were as follows: (1) As far as 
farmers and agricultural production are concerned, first, they 
made farmers feel ill at ease and unaware of what to do. Second, 
they posed difficulties for reproduction and for farmers' 
livelihood. Farmers' interests were thus hurt to a serious 
extent. Even though high prices of farm products might give 
farmers some benefits, such gains were rather meager, and what 
is more, they were offset by the rise in prices for means of 
agricultural production. Third, the reasonable price ratio 
between different products were disrupted. This not only made it 
impossible to coordinate the production of various farm products 
and the development of different rural undertakings, but 
resulted in a situation of lopsided development and caused 
various rural undertakings to elbow out each other. (2) As far 
as industrial and commercial enterprises are concerned, first, 
processing enterprises could not have a guaranteed stable supply 
of raw materials. Especially during the period of "difficulty in 
buying" and the "big battles for commodities," shortage of raw 
materials, decline in product quality, and skyrocketing prices 
forced these enterprises to totally or partially suspend their 
production and lose money. Second, "difficulty in buying" and 
especially "difficulty in selling" farm products forced the 
state's supply and marketing cooperatives to carry large 
stockpiles of goods. Their losses and debts shot up quickly. (3) 
Negative effects on urban consumers: During the period of 
"difficulty in buying" and the "big battles for commodities," 
the sharp rise in the prices of grain, pork, poultry, eggs, and 
other nonstaple foods impacted on the normal daily life of 
residents and employees. During the period of "difficulty in 
selling," urban residents sometimes had to eat old rice or stale 
meat. (4) The effects on government finances and the national 
economy were: First, the sharp increase in losses and debts on 
the part of industrial and commercial enterprises reduced their 
profit and tax contributions to the state and made it necessary 
for the government to give them more subsidies. Second, negative 
effects appeared on the export of certain farm products in terms 
of quantity, quality, and credibility, thus reducing foreign 
exchange earnings. Moreover, some "big battles for commodities" 
started at home and later extended abroad, resulting in an 
"outflow of benefits." Third, "difficulty in selling" farm 
products tied up large amounts of funds in major producing 
regions, thus affecting the development of other undertakings. 
"Difficulty in buying" and "big battles for commodities," on the 
other hand, caused producing and selling regions to blockade 
each other and put up barriers between each other. This not only 
marred the growth of a unified market, but also hindered the 
exploitation of the advantages of both producing and selling 
regions, the rational layout of productive forces, and the 
all-round development of the national economy. 
  As someone puts it, every big wave of "difficulty in buying" 
and "difficulty in selling" farm products and every "big battle 
for commodities" was a disaster to production. It produced 
negative effects on producers, dealers, and consumers--all 
suffered from it. The only one who profited was the speculator. 
<H5>  II. Proposed Measures To Solve "Difficulty in Selling and </H5>
Buying" Farm Products 
  Although the "difficulty in selling and buying" farm 
products 
and the "big battles for commodities" were phenomena appearing 
in the course of commodity circulation, the reasons for their 
occurrence involved production, circulation, distribution, and 
macro-regulation and control. That is, they were caused by 
production being out of step with sales, impeded commodity 
circulation, inharmonious interests, and ineffective regulation 
and control. Accordingly, our strategy to correct these 
phenomena is to implement the policies of balanced supply and 
demand (or coordination between production and sales), smooth 
commodity circulation, harmonized interests, and effective 
regulation and control. In other words, we should make 
systematic, coordinated, and comprehensive efforts to solve the 
"difficulty in buying and selling" farm products. 
  1) Balanced supply and demand (coordination between 
production and sales) To eliminate before the production 
process the potential factors creating "difficulty in selling 
and buying," we should adopt four measures to coordinate 
production and sales and strike a balance between supply and 
demand: a) Macroeconomically, we should decide on an appropriate 
equilibrium point between the supply and demand of staple farm 
products for the short and medium periods as a basis for our 
national strategy. b) Microeconomically, we should let farmers 
base their production on sales and arrange sales before 
production. In recent years there are two effective ways for 
farmers to arrange sales before production: One, they can sign 
sales (purchase) contracts with the state's supply and marketing 
cooperatives or other enterprises. Two, they can join those 
organizations that integrate trade, industry, and agriculture or 
agriculture, industry, and commerce or production, supply and 
marketing. This way farmers and enterprises form an entity based 
on their common economic interests. Farmers not only have a 
guaranteed market for their products, but can also obtain 
various services before and during the course of production and 
increase the value of their products. The contractual 
arrangement for sales before production provides a radical 
solution to the problem that farmers are at a loss about what to 
do under the new market economic system. It can also effectively 
correct the problem caused by the two fluctuation-amplifying 
mechanisms in connection with production. c) Efforts should be 
made to adjust the farm production mix in terms of product 
variety and quality so as to meet the consumers' demands. To do 
this, an overall plan is necessary and that plan should be 
reflected in the two kinds of production and sales contracts as 
mentioned above. Adjustment of farm production should be based 
on the principle of overall stability and minor changes, and 
every precaution should be exercised against creating a new 
imbalance between total supply and demand. From this viewpoint, 
we suggest that the following basic requirements be met: 110 
million hectares of grain crops and 5.669 million hectares of 
cotton. With regard to grain crops, the appropriate ranges of 
adjustment of acreage sown to different grain crops are: about 1 
percent for rice, 2 percent for wheat, 3 percent for corn, and 4 
percent for soybean. d) We should develop processing of farm 
products to meet market demands. Through processing, for 
example, some primary products can be transformed into animal 
feed or prepared foods required by the market. 
  2. Smooth circulation of commodities There are 
five major factors pertinent to commodity circulation that led 
to the difficulty in selling and buying farm products, namely, 
rigid control and sales monopoly, undeveloped market, backward 
infrastructure, inter-regional barriers and blockade, and the 
three fluctuation-amplifying mechanisms. Because of this, we 
have proposed the following five measures: a) We should reform 
our commodity circulation system. First, in a step-by-step and 
planned way, we should completely liberalize the five or six 
kinds of farm products that have yet to be fully decontrolled. 
Second, we should institute a multifaceted, multiform, and 
multichanneled system for the circulation of commodity. In 
particular, farmers should be encouraged to get organized and do 
their own marketing. b) We should form and make perfect a 
developed market system centering on spot wholesale markets. In 
view of the weaknesses in the present market system, we have 
proposed seven measures in order to give full play to the role 
of markets. c) We should speed up infrastructure construction in 
the fields of warehousing, transportation, communications, and 
information. d) We should rationalize the relationship of 
interests between producing and selling regions and remove 
inter-regional blockade and barriers mainly by economic means. 
e) We should establish and make perfect a reserve system for 
farm products and an emergency fund against risks to eliminate 
the influence of the three fluctuation-amplifying mechanisms in 
connection with commodity circulation. 
  3. Harmonized interests Four coordinated measures 
have been proposed to correct the irrational relationship of 
interests between different regions: a) producing and selling 
regions should form economic alliances or engage in joint 
operations. One of the methods is that adjacent areas of 
different provinces may jointly build a border market, set up a 
border trade belt, or establish a common market. Another method 
is the formation of joint farm products companies by producing 
and selling regions. b) Adjacent provinces and regions should 
coordinate their policies, management, and prices for farm 
products and supervise each other in this respect. c) The state 
should adjust the relationship of interests between producing 
and selling regions. In 1992, for example, the state required 
cotton-selling regions to pay 25 yuan to cotton-producing 
regions for each ton of cotton supplied by the latter as a fee 
for supporting cotton production. That was a significant initial 
step taken by the central government to adjust the unbalanced 
interests between producing and selling regions. d) We should 
organize and popularize well-organized economic alliances that 
integrate production, supply, and marketing and cover trade, 
industry, and agriculture. Such alliances may involve different 
departments, regions, and ownership systems. 
  To protect farmers against losses in selling their products 
due to "difficulty in selling" or "the negative effect of the 
low grain price," three measures have been proposed: a) We 
should have a protective price for government procurement of 
staple farm products and a ceiling price for means of 
agricultural production. b) We should have more farmers join 
economic organizations based on their common interests, such as 
those integrating production, supply, and marketing or trade, 
industry, and agriculture. (3) We should popularize agriculture 
insurance under appropriate conditions. 
  4. Effective regulation and control We should 
form an effective macro-regulatory and control system mainly by 
the following measures: a) Special reserve systems for staple 
farm products like grain, oilseeds, and cotton should be set up 
and made perfect at the central and provincial levels. 
Government procurement of these products from farmers should be 
at the protective prices. Local governments may store some 
essential staple farm products as reserves if they are 
financially capable of doing so. b) Imports and exports of farm 
products should be regulated in line with domestic market 
demands. Since imports and exports are usually in large amounts, 
they have a significant effect on solving the shortage or 
stockpile of farm products. In this regard, what is most needed 
is our understanding and foresight about changes in the 
international market. For example, when signs appear on the 
domestic market showing it will be "difficult to buy grain," we 
should promptly import some grain to cover the shortage. When 
signs of "difficulty in selling grain" appear on the domestic 
market, we should export our overstocks as early as possible. It 
is imperative to truly correct the abnormal state of affairs -- 
known as "negative assistance" -- as experienced in the recent 
past. That is, large amounts of grain and oilseeds were imported 
when domestic products were overstocked, while large amount of 
these items were exported when "big battles" to buy them broke 
out at home. c) We should make arrangements for producing and 
selling regions to benefit and help each other. When we 
encourage producing and selling regions to consult, cooperate, 
and coordinate with each other on their own initiative, we do 
not mean that the state should be indifferent and take a 
laissez-faire attitude about them. Actually when the numerous 
"big battles for commodities" broke out, the state authorities 
concerned did issue repeated orders to stop the panic purchase 
of silkworm cocoons and certain other products. However, more 
important is for the state authorities to make systematic and 
in-depth investigations and studies of the relationship of 
interests between producing and selling regions, make the best 
use of the conditions available, and guide them to benefit and 
help each other. In addition, the state authorities should 
encourage and popularize the application of those methods that 
have proved effective through practice in promoting mutual 
benefit and assistance between producing and selling regions. 
This will bring the state's macro-guidance role into full play. 
d) Under the new circumstance of multichanneled competition, the 
state's supply and marketing cooperatives should play the role 
of the main channel. First, they should expand their business 
volumes and boost their buying, selling, and market-adjustment 
abilities. Second, they should successfully carry out the tasks 
assigned by the state in keeping appropriate reserves of farm 
products. 
  As far as easing the waves of "difficulty in selling and 
buying" farm products is concerned, coordination between 
production and sales is the fundamental task, smooth circulation 
of commodities plays the key role, harmonization of interests is 
the work at the core, and effective regulation and control may 
be considered as a leading job. We must do these four things at 
the same time in a systematic and well-coordinated way so as to 
make comprehensive efforts to solve the problem. As long as all 
concerned -- from the top down and in all localities -- have the 
same understanding, make concerted efforts with one mind, take 
serious and effective measures to guide and carry out this work, 
and continue to do so with perseverance, we believe that it is 
possible to cure the stubborn disease of "difficulty in selling 
and buying," which appeared from time to time during the past 
decade, causing serious harm to our agriculture and national 
economy. We also believe that our agriculture and rural economy 
are bound to embark on a course of steadier, faster, healthier, 
and more harmonious development. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66259 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar032___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-032 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  3 May 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Sichuan Hog Output Declines </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Sichuan Hog Output Declines </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0397U Chengdu SICHUAN JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 3 May 94 p 
3 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0397U </F>
<F P=104>  Chengdu SICHUAN JINGJI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] At present, Sichuan Province has 52 million hogs 
in stock, sows number 4,200,000, piglets 8,400,000, and porkers 
39,400,000, decreases of 4.3 percent, 8.7 percent, 9.7 percent, 
and 3.4 percent from the same period in 1993. Reasons for the 
decline are: 
  1. Grain output declined in 1993, and the market price of 
grain increased. At present, the price of corn in rural markets 
is 1.00 yuan per kilogram, and mixed feed is 0.96 yuan per 
kilogram, increases of 20.5 percent and 21.5 percent 
respectively over the same period in 1993. The cost of raising 
hogs exceeds profits. 
  2. According to some counties, in general 30 percent of the 
rural labor in one county has left to find work outside Sichuan. 
In some counties rural households not raising hogs account for 
about 65 percent of total households. 
  3. At present the slaughter of hogs and circulation links 
are out of control. Careless slaughter has resulted in sales of 
diseased pork on the market, and the spread of epidemic disease 
throughout Sichuan, which severely affects the stability and 
development of hog output. 
  At present the procurement price of hogs is 4.50 yuan per 
kilogram, and the price of hogs entering factories is 4.90 yuan 
per kilogram, increases of 33.9 percent and 49.4 percent over 
the same period in 1993. 
  It is estimated that in the first quarter of 1994 Sichuan 
will procure 2,100,000 hogs, sell 800,000, and ship 1,400,000 
hogs to other provinces, decreases of 15.2 percent, 18.4 
percent, and 28.3 percent from the same period in 1993. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66260 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar032___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-032 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  20 April 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Guangxi Rural Saving Deposits </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Guangxi Rural Saving Deposits </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0397T Chongqing XINAN JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 20 Apr 94 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0397T </F>
<F P=104>  Chongqing XINAN JINGJI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] At the end of February, rural saving deposits in 
Guangxi totaled 10.541 billion yuan, an increase of 414 million 
yuan over the same period in 1993. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66261 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar032___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-032 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  17 May 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> SOCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Flourishing' of Private Schools Examined </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Flourishing' of Private Schools Examined </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0233A Shanghai SHEHUI [SOCIETY] in Chinese No 110, Mar 
94 pp 33-34 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0233A </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai SHEHUI [SOCIETY] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Xi Ling (3588 7227): "Multi-Dimensional </F>
Perspective on Private Schools"] 
  [Excerpt] Even though private schools appeared in China 
back in 1982, it has only been during the past two years that 
they have grown and flourished on a large scale. 
  In August 1992, a private school that claimed to be the 
largest since founding of the People's Republic, Guangya primary 
school, opened in Chengdu. It aroused widespread public 
attention, thereby opening a new page in the history of China's 
private schools. It was not Guangya primary school's size but 
its high fees that caused a sensation: Each student made a 
one-time payment of 18,000 yuan for school construction, and 
each student paid an additional 4,200 yuan each semester for 
tuition, room and board. Fees at the private Jinghua primary 
school, which opened at about the same time as Guangya primary 
school, were even higher. This school required each student to 
pay 13,500 yuan each year for tuition and room and board, and 
each student had to make a one-time payment of 30,000 yuan to 
the school construction fund. 
  Nevertheless, this sum of money was nothing at all compared 
with what Yinghao Middle School in Guangzhou charged. Each 
student entering that school had to make a one-time payment of 
150,000 yuan into an education fund. A fee of no less than 12 
percent of 150,000 was collected each year for normal teaching 
expenses. At graduation time, 150,000 yuan was returned to the 
student. 
  However, this was still far from being the most expensive 
school. At the private Chaoneng International School in Huizhou, 
Guangdong, the payment into the education fund ran to 200,000 
yuan. For people making an income of about 3,000 yuan per year, 
such expensive fees were simply astronomical; thus, those able 
to attend these schools were certainly not the common people. In 
Guangdong, the millionaire owner of a private concern had one 
son; and even though he himself could not read a word, he wanted 
his son to obtain the highest possible diploma. From the time 
that the child began to talk, he had a teacher come to his house 
to teach him. Despite the greatest effort, for various reasons, 
matters did not turn out as hoped. When he heard that a private 
school could relieve him of his worries and make his 
long-cherished wish come true, he forked over 60,000 yuan for 
his son to enter a private school. The co-pilot of a southern 
airline, whose monthly salary was several thousand yuan and who 
was flying all year round and unable to look after his children, 
had to pin his hopes for his children's education on a private 
school. He felt that investing money in his children's education 
was most worthwhile. 
  Miss Cao is the Beijing representative of a certain 
corporation in Papua New Guinea. Her child is in the second 
grade of a boarding school in Beijing. She felt that more than 
40 pupils in each class at that school were too many. The 
teacher could not attend to all of them. However, a private 
school had a "small class system," of 25 pupils in each class, 
and it taught English too. This made her give up the idea of 
having the child go to school in Hong Kong during the second 
half of the year. According to her, many of her friends were 
planning to bring their children back from Hong Kong, because 
mainland school fees were much cheaper than those for private 
schools in Hong Kong. 
  In Beijing, two men from a firm came to register their 
children at the same time. Originally, they figured that the 
30,000 yuan sponsorship fee would be paid by their firm, but no 
agreement was reached on this, so they simply put up the money 
themselves. "After all, when an organization puts up money, that 
is no indication of a person's worth; a greater indication of 
personal worth is whether one looks after one's own children," 
they said. 
  However, not every head of household who registers has a lot 
of money. After hearing a briefing at a school, a state-owned 
enterprise worker named Li felt the fees were more than he had 
imagined, but he gritted his teeth and registered anyway. He 
said that he would need help from his close friends to pay the 
expensive tuition. 
  Statistics from a private school in Yunnan show that 10 
percent of the student's parents are owners of small businesses, 
50 percent are owners of medium size businesses, and the 
remainder are from various strata of society such as the legal, 
medical, or cultural and teaching professions. Statistics for a 
private school in Beijing are as follows: 39.2 percent are 
children of the heads of companies or enterprises and of persons 
in charge of high technology enterprises; 17.9 percent are 
children of personnel from elsewhere who are stationed in 
Beijing, 14.7 percent are children of personnel sent abroad, 8.2 
percent are the children of agents of foreign concerns in China, 
5.5 percent are children of private business owners, and 14.5 
percent are other. Figures may be dry, but they are best able to 
illuminate issues. 
  It would be dead wrong to conclude that the doors of private 
schools are open only to "aristocrats." In fact, of the 
thousands of private schools in the country, those that have 
high fees and cater to the children of wealthy families number 
no more than 40-odd. Although most private schools do charge 
higher fees that public schools, their fees are within the means 
of those who work for wages and salaries. 
  The several civilian-operated middle schools that set up 
student enrollment sites on Haidian Road in Beijing during the 
summer of 1993 charged no more than 1,200 per semester. At Junyi 
Middle School, which practiced closed management, and in which 
all students were boarded, students paid only 1,500 yuan for 
tuition and miscellaneous fees and 1,200 for food and lodging 
each semester. 
  Approximately 60 percent of the students attending the 
nearly 
100 private schools in Zhejiang Province come from wage and 
salary earning families. Most of the students in the more than 
10 private schools in Yongxian in Guangxi are the children of 
peasant families who "toil on the land." An overwhelming 
majority of kindergartens are playgrounds for the children of 
"ordinary folk!" 
  Although the fees that private schools charge are generally 
higher than for public schools, and the schools do not even give 
diplomas (very many civilian-run middle schools may not issue 
diplomas), pupils flock to them. Before the school term began, 
many parents from outside Beijing who heard about it came to the 
Bowen Primary School in Beijing. Finally, the school accepted 10 
students from places such as Shandong, Hebei, Henan, and 
Shenzhen. The Jinghua private school planned an enrollment of 50 
first form to fourth form students, but in less than a month 
more than 100 had registered. The number of registrants for the 
first and fourth forms was oversubscribed. On the very first day 
that students were enrolled at the Nanjing Xiaozhuang 
Experimental School, the school ran out of briefing materials 
and had to rush print an additional 500. The school received 
more than 70 registration forms on the first day of a total 
enrollment of 256. 
  People cannot help but ask what attracts so many students 
and 
parents? 
  It cannot be denied that high educational goals are the 
first 
thing that attracts people. Virtually all types of private 
schools today emphasize preparation of students for the 
twenty-first century. The schools are run for all-around 
development of ethics, intelligence, the body, aesthetics, and 
work. The idea in running the schools is to produce people who 
have expertise. In Shanghai, the New Century Private Primary 
School and the New Age Middle School begin teaching foreign 
languages in first grade. By the time the pupils are in senior 
middle school, they have pretty well mastered one foreign 
language, so they begin a second foreign language. The primary 
school also has a computer course. In middle school, the 
students gain a basic knowledge of computer hardware and 
software. 
  Very many schools have a plentiful teachers to make sure 
they 
attain their goals. Jinghua private primary school hired 46 
highly experienced teachers who were graduates of renowned 
universities such as Beijing University and Beijing Normal 
College, and it also hired an American to teach English. Many 
highly experienced teachers who have retired or who are still 
employed as teachers have been hired at high salaries to teach 
in private schools. The teacher-student ratio has risen from the 
1:10 in public schools to 1:5. An overwhelming majority of the 
23 teachers that the Beijing Zhengze private middle school has 
hired are leaders from the teaching and research sector in all 
districts, and high-level teachers in important city and 
district middle schools. One school in Shanghai offers special 
music, dance, and art teachers as the pupils' talents require. 
  Very many people appreciate the flexible curriculum and the 
open style teaching methods. Responding to market demand, the 
Huanan private girls academy set up a curriculum that changed as 
the market changed. In 1985, foreign language classes emphasized 
English for tourism; in 1986, it emphasized English for foreign 
trade; in 1987, it emphasized English for secretaries; and in 
1989, it changed back to an emphasis on English for 
international finance and banking. Thus, it was able to say that 
"we have what others do not have; what others do, we do better; 
and what others are doing very well, we are doing innovatively." 
The New Century School in Yunnan devotes one day each week to 
social activities day during which students may go outside of 
school to experience life. The Guangya primary school in Sichuan 
gives pupils military training, holds flag raising ceremonies, 
and uses both Chinese and English to recite the pledge of 
allegiance: "I am Chinese; I love China. I want to make my 
motherland more beautiful, more prosperous and stronger." The 
school also regularly organizes pupils to conduct social surveys 
in village fields and peasants homes. It permits these fortunate 
pupils who have been brought up in a cloistered environment to 
experience personal privations and hardships such as they cannot 
imagine. 
  It does without saying that the comfortable and luxurious 
living conditions and first-rate teaching facilities make many 
parents hearts thump with excitement. Both Guangya and Jinghua 
primary schools have computer rooms, piano salons, language 
laboratories, body-building rooms, close circuit television, and 
central air-conditioning. Some school dormitories are also 
equipped with ultra-violet disinfecting lights, and nurses and 
nutritionists are provided for the students. At the Jinghua 
Primary School, each class has a "life class manager," who is 
responsible for student's extracurricular life. In addition to 
three square meals a day, snacks and fruit are provided. This 
produces a "one-day, five-meals system" that combines both 
Chinese and Western elements. At Bowen primary school, managers 
and nurses are responsible for student's food, beverages, daily 
life, and extracurricular activities. The school also provides 
all-day scheduled vehicle runs on week-ends to pick up and 
deliver students at their homes. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>
